Authors
Dragan Antulov
Number of Reviews
325

Title
Review for Dirty Rotten Scoundrels (1988)
Professional assassins are the usually the most fascinating
category of criminals on the silver screen and potentially
the most rewarding for any serious filmmaker. But in the
genre of comedy another category of criminals - con artists
- rules supreme. This is hardly surprising because they are
by definition the most charming of all criminals, and taking
advantage of other people's stupidity often corresponds with
said stupidity being the source of on-screen humour. One of
the examples could be found in DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS, 1988
comedy directed by Frank Oz.
The plot is set in Beaumont-sur-Mer, little resort town on
French Riviera, frequented by rich people from USA and other
parts of the world. This used to be the perfect hunting
ground for Lawrence Jamieson (played by Michael Caine),
sophisticated and suave British con artist specialised in
extracting money from rich and gullible women by posing as a
mysterious exiled prince. Through the years Jamieson amassed
enough fortune to afford a mansion, butler (played by Ian
McDiarmid) and co-operation of local police inspector
(played by Anton Rodgers). His idyllic life suddenly becomes
threatened with the arrival of rival in the form of Freddy
Benson (played by Steve Martin), uneducated and
unsophisticated American who earns money by telling sob
stories about his ill grandmother. Jamieson, convinced that
this raw routine might bring unwanted attention, does
everything in his power to drive Freddy out of town, but the
American keeps coming back. Finally, two men decide to make
a wager - whoever extracts 50,000 US$ from American "soap
queen" Janet Colgate (played by Glenne Headley) wins, and
the loser would have to leave town.
Not among the most remarkable films thirteen years ago,
DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS looks surprisingly good from today's
perspective. The reason is probably in the humour, which is
way above the today's Hollywood standards of comedy embodied
in the films by Farrelly brothers. The script by Dale
Launer, Stanley Shapiro and Paul Henning is very intelligent
and the film leaves the impression of belonging to another
era - 1950s or 1960s (hardly a surprise, since this happens
to be the remake of BEDTIME STORY, directed by Ralph Levy in
1963). The plot is, on the other hand, weak and serves as
nothing more than excuse for the series of scenes in which
two principal characters try to outwit each other. Another
surprise of the film is good direction by Frank Oz of MUPPET
SHOW fame; in DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS, unlike his previous
film THE LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS, he abandons special effects
in favour of authentic locations of French Riviera (and
famous Victorine studios in Nice) and allows great actors to
carry the film. Michael Caine and Steve Martin look like
they were born to play the characters; the contrast between
sophisticated European and provincial American is not only
mirrored in screen personalities of Michael Caine and Steve
Martin, but also in the different styles of acting. While
Caine, same as his aristocratic character, keeps stiff upper
lip at all times, Steve Martin often goes for the physical
comedy, although not always with the best results. The
biggest and the most pleasant surprise, however, comes in
the form of Glenne Headley, the actress who had misfortune
of wasting her talent in many disastrous films in late 1980s
and early 1990s. Her talents were not wasted in DIRTY ROTTEN
SCOUNDRELS - she simply shines in the role of naive and
innocent woman whose charm is going to enchant our immoral
protagonists. Unfortunately, she appears relatively late,
and because of that the film is slightly overlong, and the
twist ending is not as unpredictable as the authors would
like. DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS is nevertheless very funny and
entertaining film that should be recommended as an example
of something that is rather absent in Hollywood these days -
stylish and well-crafted comedy.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Temptation (1994/I)
It seems that Jeff Fahey had certain tendency for the roles
of seamen, because his character in TEMPTATION, 1994 film by
Strathford Hamilton, was very similar to the character the
same actor had played in WOMAN OF DESIRE one year earlier.
Here he plays Eddie Lanarsky, former sailor who spent five
years in prison for the failed insurance scam. His partner
in crime, Michael Reddick (Philip Casnoff) is married to
rich and beautiful Lee (Alison Doody). Together with his
friend Bone (David Keith), Eddie boards Lee's yacht as
sailor, in order to asks some questions his former partner.
That would provide a lot of drama during the cruise, but
Michael has a very sinister plan of his own.
Compared with WOMAN OF DESIRE, this combination of
"whodunit", action and erotic thriller looks like a
masterpiece of style and intelligence. However, compared
with any average thriller, TEMPTATION is rather forgettable.
Filled with cliches, mostly predictable plot twists -
Elisabethan bloodbath in the finale being one of them - it
works only because of nice scenery. Part of that scenery is
Patricia Durham, exotic beauty who doesn't mind revealing
her body and playing the erotic scenes. Problem is, those
scenes are set in the wrong places of the movie, seem
totally implausible, and finally, just illustrate how corny
this film is. Same effect is with the musical score by
Conrad Pope who uses too much motives of Goldsmith's BASIC
INSTINCT. The actors are mostly fine, but it is shame to see
Alison Doody, former romantic interest of Indiana Jones in
THE LAST CRUSADE, using her talents in B-grade confection
like this. Unlike Patricia Durham, she doesn't appear naked,
but I doubt that even such drastic measure would make this
film better than average.

Title
Review for Bad Day at Black Rock (1955)
One of the great paradoxes of American history is in the
fact that Hollywood in 1950s - era usually associated with
Cold War hysteria, McCarthy witch hunts, demonisation of any
nonconformist thought and Hollywood blacklists -brought many
great, groundbreaking films that actually challenged
self-righteous view of USA as the greatest nation in the
world. Those films exposed some dark, unflattering truths
about American society by pointing towards some burning
problems previously swept under the carpet. One of those
problems was, of course, racism as most visible violation of
noble American ideas about equal rights for all of its
citizens. Racism was also responsible for the most shameful
episode in the American involvement in WW2 - forced
internment of Japanese Americans. One of the first Hollywood
films to speak about this embarrassing issue was BAD DAY AT
BLACK ROCK, 1955 thriller directed by John Sturges.
The film begins in 1945, few months after the end of WW2.
Black Rock is small Arizona town, so small and insignificant
that passenger train never stops there. When it stops it is
big news, especially when the passenger stepping off is
mysterious one-armed stranger named McCreedy (played by
Spencer Tracy). McCreedy's presence alone is enough to cause
suspicion by townspeople and open animosity by local cowboy
goons. McCreedy would earn even more hostility when he
starts inquiring about Japanese farmer who used to live in
Black Rock before the war. Reno Smith (played by Robert
Ryan), rich farmer and the only real authority in town, is
especially upset over stranger's inquiry. McCreedy is being
told that the Japanese farmer was "relocated" after the war,
but he suspects something more sinister and that some
townspeople, including Smith, had something to do with it.
His suspicions are validated when he realises that Smith and
his goons don't want him to leave Black Rock alive.
BAD DAY AT BLACK ROCK is often referred as companion piece
to HIGH NOON. Those two films have many things in common -
setting in small Western town, populated with hypocrites and
cowards; lone protagonist who would risk his life over noble
principles; suspense created with certainty of inevitable
showdown; relatively short length. Unfortunately, John
Sturges could hardly compete with directorial skills of Fred
Zinnemann while screenwriter Don McGuire couldn't repeat the
complexity of Carl Foreman's HIGH NOON script and its
characters. BAD DAY AT BLACK ROCK looks promising in the
beginning, though. Sturges withholds information from the
viewers. When McCreedy steps off the train, dressed in
black, his presence is menacing and his motives unclear.
Spencer Tracy excellently plays this character by slowly
building our confidence with grace, dignity, intelligence
and confidence. It is real pleasure watching how Tracy
outsmarts those who want to trick him and how he handles
those who want to intimidate him. By showing growingly
hostile reaction of the people like Smith and always
reminding us of the hopelessness of McCreedy's situation,
Sturges slowly builds the suspense. Unfortunately, it all
begins to fall apart in the second part of the film, when
the mystery is revealed and all sides begin preparations for
inevitable final conflict. Instead of action, we are given
sermons and McCreedy, who is shown as man who can take care
of himself, actually talks his way out of bad situation.
Some of the lines spoken by characters are powerful, but
unrealistic, hardly expected from people who spent all their
lives as ordinary, blue-collar inhabitants in small desert
towns. That is especially so with character of Smith, played
by Robert Ryan, who seems somewhat too refined for simple
redneck bigot. Final showdown is also ruined with
unnecessary melodramatic plot twist.
Perhaps the worst flaw of BAD DAY AT BLACK ROCK is lack of
courage in handling whole embarrassing affair with Japanese
Americans in WW2. Don McGuire uses euphemism of "relocation"
for the event that was actually nothing less than
state-sponsored ethnic cleansing (Interestingly enough, when
Croatian and Serbian intellectuals in early 1990s propagated
ethnic cleansing as the only solution of Yugoslav crisis,
they also used euphemism called "humane resettlement").
Racism, that was the prime motivating factor of such event,
is never attributed to the system itself; instead, racism
and bigotry is something that should be attributed only to
few rotten individuals like Smith. General population, which
gave tacit support to ethnic cleansings and holocausts of
this world, either by looking the other way or enjoying the
fruits of someone else's dirty work, is actually forgiven in
this film. McGuire, on the other hand, redeems himself by
using this opportunity to expose rarely seen economic
motivation for racial, ethnic and religious hatred - Smith
did what he did because he wanted someone else's property.
What is really sad about this film is the fact that the
events portrayed in it don't belong to dark pages of history
- BAD DAY AT BLACK ROCK can still teach us a lot about the
world we still live in.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Hear No Evil (1993)
Marlee Matlin is a great actress, and it is real pity that
we don't see her more often in the movies. Unfortunately,
that seems to be case because of her own affliction. Being
deaf herself, she has rather limited pool of available
roles, but when she gets any of them, the audience is
rewarded with truly remarkable performances. One of the
examples is HEAR NO EVIL, 1993 thriller directed by Richard
Greenwald.
In this movie Matlin plays Jillian Shanahan, deaf exercise
instructor who, without knowing, got involved in rather
dangerous situation. Her friend, journalist Micky O'Malley
(played by John C. McGinley) got into the possession of
rare, valuable and stolen coin. Before being blown up in his
car, Micky had stashed the coin in Jillian's apartment.
Jillian is now becoming the target of Lieutenant Brock
(Martin Sheen), ferocious corrupt cop who sees the coin as
his own retirement fund. She is also being stalked by
mysterious figure dressed in black. The only help comes in
the shape of Ben Kendall (D.B. Sweeney), mountain climber
that also happens to fall in love with her.
Although not very original in concept and borrowing a lot
from WAIT UNTIL DARK, 1967 classic with Audrey Hepburn as
blind woman in similar situation, HEAR NO EVIL is very good
thriller. The crime subplot is unoriginal and very
formulaic, full of usual Hollywood plot holes and
implausibilities. On the other hand, the atmosphere of the
film is very well-done, Oregon locations seems refreshing,
and sometimes, the horror that waits our heroine can be
sensed by the audience too. The best thing in this film is
in actors' performances. Marlee Matlin is superb, and she
has a good chemistry in the romantic scenes with D.B.
Sweeney. Martin Sheen is also good in very reserved, yet
menacing role of corrupt policeman. All in all, HEAR NO EVIL
is film with weak concept, but the execution so good that
deserves praise.

Title
Review for Spartacus (1960)
1950s weren't the happiest of times for Hollywood talents
with leftist sentiments, since in the atmosphere of Cold War
hysteria many were considered to be Communists. Many of them
were blacklisted by studios and forced to take pseudonyms in
order to earn their living. It took great courage for
executive producer Kirk Douglas to defy the Blacklist and
hire a screenwriter from such blacklist. It took even more
courage to use his talent to make adaptation of the novel
written by radical leftist Howard Fast. And, to add insult
to injury for any hysteric anti-leftists in these times, the
subject of the film was life of a man who was considered one
of great Communist martyrs and role models. It all happened
in 1960 with SPARTACUS, the film that finally ended the era
of Hollywood black lists and thus became one of landmark
events in the history of American cinema. Unfortunately, its
historical importance barely corresponded with the quality,
and today it is often considered to be "the worst film ever
directed by Stanley Kubrick".
The novel, as well as the film, is based on the events that
took place in the first part of 1st Century B.C. Once
democratic Roman Empire became the wealthiest and most
powerful nation of the world, but with the wealth came
corruption and widespread use of slavery. One of such slaves
is Spartacus (played by Kirk Douglas), tough Thracian who
was sentenced to spend the rest of his life working in
Lybian mines, but even in such terrible conditions he didn't
cease to defy his captors. Slave trader Batiatus (played by
Peter Ustinov) thinks that such fighting spirit could be
used, so he buys Spartacus for his gladiator school in
Capua, Italy. Spartacus is there being subjected in intense
combat training and also develops feelings for slave girl
Varinia (played by Jean Simmons). One day the school is
visited by powerful Roman politician Marcus Licinius Crassus
(played by Laurence Olivier), and Batiatus, in order to
entertain two of his lady companions, organises four of his
best gladiator fighting to the death. In one of such fights
Spartacus is defeated but his opponent Drabba (played by
Woody Strode) decides to spare his life and instead
sacrifices his own in vain attempt to escape. Spartacus is
deeply moved by such event and when his beloved Varinia is
being sold away, his personal anger leads to spontaneous act
of rebellion that would be joined by all of the gladiators.
Soon gladiators overwhelm their guards and the news of their
revolt begins spreading like wildfire. Spartacus and his
rebels begin plundering rich slave-owners' estates and
thousands of escaped and liberated slaves join his band.
Spartacus would use his combat skills and experience, as
well as his charisma, to organise them into fighting force
able to handle any Roman army sent after them. Spartacus
begins his campaign towards port city of Brundisium, where
he would find to transport slaves outside of Italy into
freedom. In the meantime, slave revolt has some important
political consequences in Roman Senate. While Crassus wants
to use it as a pretext to impose his personal dictatorship,
his main rival, liberal senator Crassus (played by Charles
Laughton) wants to use the revolt as way to foil such plans
and save the Republic.
SPARTACUS had a lot of potential to be one of the greatest
films of its era, and the big box-office success and few
"Oscars" prove that. Unfortunately, it failed in being
anything more than historical spectacle because people
behind the project had rather different creative visions.
For screenwriter Dalton Trambo this historical story was an
excellent opportunity to comment on the social condition of
1950s America, not so subtly disguised in his vision of 1st
Century B.C. Roman Republic. Both countries were most
powerful in the world, but their old republican institutions
and democratic virtues had been corrupted by social
injustice and class exploitation, and in both cases
ambitious politicians were threatening to use society's
paranoia in order to install their own personal
dictatorship. It isn't very hard to imagine character of
Crassus being inspired by Senator Joe McCarthy.
Unfortunately, when Stanley Kubrick replaced director
Anthony Mann after his quarrel with Kirk Douglas, it turned
out that Kubrick's vision was quite different. Kubrick,
being perfectionist, checked the historical data about
Spartacus and concluded that Trambo, just like many PC
filmmakers of today, sacrificed historical accuracy for the
sake of delivering political message. For example, many
important details of Spartacus' campaign and his multiple
attempts to lead slaves out of Italy, as well as infighting
and desertions within his own ranks, remained outside the
script. Furthermore, Trambo's idea to make huge contrast
between rich, decadent and utterly depraved Romans on one
side, and their hard-working, clean-cut and noble slaves was
definitely not in line with Kubrick's own more pessimistic
and misanthropic view on human affairs. After unsuccessful
attempts to change the script, Kubrick lost interest in the
film and did his job as "hired gun".
This becomes evident when we compare first third of the
film, which was directed by Mann, with the segments later
directed by Kubrick. The segment directed by Mann is the
best in the film, because it deals almost exclusively with
Spartacus and the events that led to revolt. The audience is
being subjected to all harsh realities of the life of slaves
and gladiators, and action dominates the words. But as soon
as the plot is removed from the gladiator school and Kubrick
takes over, film loses momentum. Spartacus and his
gladiators are reduced to cardboard characters, and even
charisma of Kirk Douglas can't make him as sympathetic as in
the first segment of film. Hollywoodised romance between
Spartacus and Varinia also doesn't help, being injected in
the plot only to give some bright overtones to the dark, yet
corny finale. In this segment, bad guys in the form of
Romans are more interesting than the slave protagonists.
Charles Laughton is simply grand as shrewd, cynical,
hedonistic yet kind-hearted Roman Senator. In the case of
Crassus, screenwriters obviously didn't know how to
reconcile or explain the sharp contrast between Crassus'
insistence on old Roman values on one side, and his
depravity and ruthless dictatorial ambition on the other.
But Laurence Olivier still shows his great talent by making
this badly written character memorable. Finally, Peter
Ustinov justly deserved his "Oscar" for the role of Batiatus
- his character, despite being involved in one of the most
deplorable professions of slave trade, comes out as nice guy
at the end, not because of some sudden virtue, but because
of his humanity. Tony Curtis as slave Antoninus, singer of
songs we hear spoken as plain text, on the other hand,
played his role very badly, and his character would be
remembered simply as the dark object of Crassus' bisexual
desire.
Script and characterisation problems aside, SPARTACUS is
very attractive film because it doesn't lack spectacle. In
the latter part of film, Kubrick obviously tried to
compensate the lack of movie's quality with quantity - there
are plenty of mass scenes with many interesting details and
good use of colour photography by Russell Metty.
Unfortunately, the most spectacular scene - the final battle
between Spartacus and Roman legions under Crassus - is a
failure. We actually don't see why and how the slaves had
been beaten and Kubrick's effort to direct some 8,500
Spanish soldiers hired as extras weren't justified. After
the last climactic battle, we are presented with its tragic
aftermath, and subjected to many extra minutes of historical
inaccuracy and pointless melodrama. The music by Alex North
is also somewhat disappointing and explains why Kubrick in
his later films relied mostly on non-original soundtrack.
For some people three hours spent in front of SPARTACUS
might seem wasted, but despite being much overrated, this
historical epic can be quite entertaining. It is especially
interesting because of the insight given into one important
and splendid era of American motion picture industry, as
well into the early career of Stanley Kubrick.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Ying huang boon sik (1986)
Few people in the history of film had the honour of an
entire subgenre or filmmaking style being made after them.
John Woo, first Hong Kong filmmaker to continue successful
career in Hollywood, is one of those precious few. In late
1980s and early 1990s he made a series of action films that
managed not only to redefine the genre but also to bring
global respect and admiration to previously overlooked Hong
Kong cinema. In previous decades John Woo was undoubtedly
one of the most influential filmmakers, at least judging by
the multitudes of action-oriented filmmakers who tried to
recreate his style in their films. Although Woo had directed
before, there is a single point in his career when all the
elements of his formula came into place. That point is A
BETTER TOMORROW, 1986 action film that brought him his first
major success and later paved the way for other Hong Kong
directors willing to explore similar avenues of filmmaking.
It is understandable why A BETTER TOMORROW is now often
referenced as "The movie that began it all".
Plot of the film revolves about two brothers. The older is
Ho Tse Sung (played by Ti Lung), gangster who runs smooth
and successful counterfeit operation with his trusted aide
and friend Mark Lee (played by Chow Yun Fat). The younger is
Kit (played by Leslie Cheung), graduate of Hong Kong police
academy and blissfully unaware of the true nature of his
brother's business. Ho's routine business trip to Taiwan
starts the series of violent and tragic events that would
shatter his life and family - while Ho himself gets ambushed
and forced to turn himself to the police, his ailing father
gets killed in botched kidnapping attempt by rival gang.
Three years later Ho is out of prison and doesn't want
anything but to live an honest life and reunite with the
brother. But this is harder than he had ever imagined - Kit
blames him for the death of their father and apparent
failure of his own police career, while his former
employers, including Mark, crippled while conducting a
retribution raid three years ago, want him back in their
organisation. Kit, on the other hand, starts his own
investigation on counterfeiters, this time led by new young
and ruthless boss Shing (played by Waisee Lee), and Ho is
forced to choose sides in a violent confrontation that is
about to begin.
The formula for movies most usually associated with John Woo
- gangster setting, choreographed violence, themes of male
bonding combined with sentimentality - was comprised of the
elements present in previous films, albeit made in cinema
industries other than Hong Kong. Apart from Hollywood as
most obvious source of inspiration, John Woo's films were
influenced by French gangster films of Jean-Pierre Melville
and Jose Giovanni. Woo pays tribute to those films by
dressing his gangster protagonists in long trenchoats,
similar to those worn by Alain Delon's character in
Melville's SAMOURAI. Choreographed violence, on the other
hand, can be attributed to the influence of great Sam
Peckinpah and his disciple Walter Hill, two men usually
referred as the best action directors until John Woo era.
However, Woo creates something original out of those foreign
elements by putting them in the very specific context of
Hong Kong - place with ethical codes, culture and moral
alignments are slightly different than in the West. For
example, the line that separates legitimate business from
organised crime is much more blurred, and this was even
reflected in this film; drinking incident, referred by Ho
and Mark, was allegedly based on real-life adventures of
Hong Kong film producer who got too close with the wrong
people. Even the title of the film has ironic twist,
considering A BETTER TOMORROW was made eleven years before
Chinese take-over - event that had apocalyptic meaning for
many citizens of Hong Kong, including Woo. Because of that,
A BETTER TOMORROW is at times very dark and melancholic film
- which later became an important part of John Woo's
formula.
Being the first film, of course, meant that some elements of
that particular formula weren't exactly polished. The script
was simple and tight, yet almost ruined by using few
completely unnecessary characters, like Kit's girlfriend or
Taiwanese police inspector (played by Woo himself). The
musical score by Ka Fai-Koo at first sounds very corny, but
after a while becomes quite adequate for this kind of films.
Woo displays his skills in few very effective action scenes
- the best of them is hit in the restaurant that combines
slow-motion with explosive actions and lots of fake blood.
The actors are great, especially Ti Lung as world-weary
gangster and Cheung as his neurotic brother, but the show
was stolen by the actor who played supporting character.
Chow Yun Fat displays whole variety of talent in his
portrayal of Mark - at first he is cocky, almost comical;
later in the film he is pathetic wreck of his former self.
We seldom have opportunity to watch character who is "cool"
and vulnerable in the same time. It is hardly surprising
that the same actor appeared in the sequel of this film few
years later, this time established as Hong Kong's top movie
star. In the end, even those who don't particularly like
John Woo and Hong Kong cinema would probably agree that A
BETTER TOMORROW was a title quite fitting for this film.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Lolita (1962)
Contemporary media are flooded with images of young, often
adolescent, girls (and boys), who are sometimes not so
subtly presented as desirable sexual objects. However, if
someone takes those not so subliminal messages seriously and
tries to act on them, he is usually branded as worst
possible human scum and monster. Even worse things happen to
those who try make books or movies in which they try to
present that problem from the perspective of such monsters.
If such reaction could be expected in our, presumably more
liberal, time we could only imagine the difficulties that
faced the authors of similar books and films few decades
ago. Taking this into account, we must really appreciate the
bravery of Russian emigre author Vladimir Nabokov. In 1955
he risked his reputation with his novel LOLITA, novel that
described obsession of middle-aged intellectual with 12-year
old girl. Seven years later, the literary world was still
recovering from the shock when another great artist showed
the same bravery. Stanley Kubrick took almost impossible
task of adapting this controversial novel for the silver
screen, and the result was one of the landmark events in
history of cinema.
Plot of the film deals with Professor Humbert Humbert
(played by James Mason), European writer who came to America
after WW2. Before he takes teaching position in one of
American colleges, Humbert would like to spend summer in
small resort town of Ramsdale, New Hampshire. He rents the
room in the home of Charlotte Haze (played by Shelley
Winters), widow who is obviously attracted to cultivated
European. Humbert, on the other hand, becomes enchanted with
her 15-year old daughter Dolores alias Lolita (played by Sue
Lyon), who seems to enjoy teasing him. After some time
Humbert decides to marry Charlotte only to remain close to
the object of his affection. This bizarre love triangle is
crushed when Charlotte finds Humbert's secret diary in which
he described his true feelings. Unable to confront mind-
shattering discovery, Charlotte runs on the street and gets
killed by a car. Humbert is now free to have his way with
Lolita and use his role of stepfather in order to become her
lover. But his idyllic life and relationship would be
threatened by group of mysterious people that seem to be
connected to television writer Clare Quilty (played by Peter
Sellers).
Although Nabokov himself wrote the screenplay and although
he praised the film in later interviews, many fans of the
novel accuse Kubrick of unfaithfulness to the film's
literary source. Many of those people forget that the best
novels are often very difficult or almost impossible to be
faithfully adapted for the screen, and that Kubrick, like
any other sensible filmmaker, had to make some serious
changes in the material and re-write Nabokov's original 400
page screenplay in order to make it filmable. During such
re-writes Kubrick also had to take censorship into account;
some changes had to be made in order to accommodate the
producers and conservative segments of the audience. The
most important in all those changes was the decision to
raise the age of Lolita from 12 to 15, thus making her
relationship with Humbert somewhat more acceptable for 1960s
standards. Kubrick thus made the film more acceptable for
censors, and LOLITA today seems rather tame. But the
promotional tagline "How did they ever make a movie of
Lolita?" was quite on the spot in its time, because it was
one of the first Hollywood films that tackled the issue of
erotic obsession and unconventional sexuality.
One of the reasons why the public accepted LOLITA was in
Kubrick's approach to Nabokov's material. Kubrick in all of
his classic films liked to present People As They Are, and
not People As They Should Be. Troubled characters of the
novel and writer's often-sarcastic observations about
post-WW2 America were perfect for Kubrick's trademark
cynicism. So, instead of moralising or presenting the events
of the novel as mind-shattering tragedy, Kubrick simply
turned LOLITA into dark comedy. All major characters in the
novel are deeply tragic, yet in Kubrick's vision they are
also very funny. The script equipped them with lines full of
double entendres, but Kubrick also makes us laugh with his
superb directorial skills. Almost any scene is elaborately
staged, with great care for the details that reveal much
about characters and things that they couldn't do or say on
the 1960s screen. The movie takes place in America, but
Kubrick used exclusively English locations. The audience,
thanks to suggestive black-and-white photography by Oswald
Morris, doesn't notice it, and this is another proof of
Kubrick's talent. Another example of such talent is the way
Kubrick turned producer's meddling of screenplay into
advantage - the producers insisted that the last scene of
the novel had to be shown in the beginning in order to
initially show the protagonist as cold-blooded murderer and
thus prevent any sympathies for him in the rest of the film.
Kubrick, instead, used this opportunity to make characters
more tragic - the audience know that they are doomed and all
their actions have a flavour of Greek tragedy laced with
misanthropy and black humour.
However, the most memorable element of the film is in its
characters and actors playing them. Sue Lyon, who plays
Lolita, was 16 years old during the production and that is
probably movie's only major flaw. Her figure - which is
quite evident in the scenes like her introduction to
Humbert, when she tans herself on the lawn, wearing skimpy
bikini - is somewhat too developed for someone we usually
associate with paedophiles' dark objects of desire. Lyon
tries to compensate that by playing Lolita as immature
annoying brat trapped in the body of grown woman, and,
later, as clever teaser and manipulator. Lyon's talent is
enhanced with infantile, yet somewhat menacing musical theme
by Bob Harris that plays constantly in background. Another
great performance is given by Shelley Winters, whose role
seems somewhat similar to the role she had played in
Laughton's NIGHT OF THE HUNTER. Similarity is mostly in the
terms of sexual frustration; in this film Winters is quite
successful in portraying obnoxious and shallow woman, whose
pathetic attempts to show herself as educated and cultivated
cause many laughs among intellectuals within film's
audience. Although Shelley Winters became somewhat typecast
after this film, her performance is great; her character
might be poster girl for misogyny, but we still pity her.
James Mason as Humbert Humbert has more scenes, since the
story is being told from his POV, but he fares no better in
the end. Mason portrays this cultivated, mild- mannered
gentleman from aristocratic Europe as being equally affected
by dark desires and perversions as the rest of society.
Contrast between his noble outside image (and the fact that
he remains desirable sexual object for females despite being
middle-aged) and his downright pathetic actions bring a lot
of dark humour to this film. However, the man who stole the
film is Peter Sellers as Clare Quilty. Sellers does wonders
with the character reduced to nothing more than dark,
menacing presence in the novel, making him vulgar,
unscrupulous but intelligent and finally superior to
old-school Humbert. Sellers also used this opportunity to
experiment by playing the same character in three different
incarnations, which would, later lead to the great multiple
roles in Kubrick's DOCTOR STRANGELOVE. Many people like to
criticise Sellers' multiple appearances in the film as too
distracting, but his presence actually contributes to film's
ironic tone.
The biggest flaw of LOLITA is perhaps the fact that it
wasn't made ten or fifteen years later, when the attitudes
towards depiction of sex or taboo subjects like paedophilia
and incest were more liberal (when Louis Malle made few
brave excursions into such dark area). However, Kubrick made
excellent film even in such circumstances, and today's
audience may still enjoy it, which is another proof of its
timeless quality. LOLITA also became one of those great
films that have the rare privilege of having been remade in
satisfactory fashion by Adrian Lyne in 1997.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Per qualche dollaro in piů (1965)
Some STAR WARS fans might disagree, but movie trilogies tend
not to get better with each passing segment. It is quite
understandable, because now we know that even the second
sequel of the film, or the second part of the trilogy,
usually turns out worse than its predecessor. Even if the
second film somehow escapes that doom, the final film of the
trilogy is almost always the disappointment (STAR WARS and
MAD MAX are the best examples). Some thirty-five years ago
an exception to that rule happened in the form of Man With
No Name trilogy, series of three spaghetti westerns directed
by great Italian filmmaker Sergio Leone. The third and final
film in the trilogy, THE GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY, is
often considered as a true masterpiece, one of the best
films ever made, while the first, A FISTFUL OF DOLLARS,
although most copied, is often considered to be only the
embryonic shadow of its sequels. The second in a row, FOR A
FEW DOLLARS MORE, made in 1965, is least talked about,
although it represents not just the obvious improvement of
the series, but also one excellent western.
The plot of FOR A FEW DOLLARS MORE is set in New Mexico
Territory in the latter half of 19th Century, in a time when
the land is at the mercy of vicious bandits. As prologue
tells us, "when life has value, death sometimes has price",
and the bounty killers are there to do the dirty work for
the weak forces of law. One of them is Colonel Douglas
Mortimer (played by Lee Van Cleef), excellent shot and
former war hero, now reduced to having to track and kill
wanted fugitives for a living. The other is Manko (played by
Clint Eastwood), younger and somewhat less experienced, but
equally deadly with gun. Two of them often share hunting
area, but never the same prey. Such thing would happen when
Indio (played by Gian Maria Volonte), leader of vicious gang
of bandits and sadistic killer, escapes from prison with the
help of his cohorts and thus becomes the most wanted (and
potentially most lucrative) fugitive in the territory.
Having bounty killers on his back doesn't concern Indio,
since he has other things on his mind, like a big, fortified
and allegedly robbery-proof bank in El Paso. When Indio's
men begin coming to El Paso, preparing for their daring
raid, Manko and Mortimer must overcome their rivalry and at
least temporarily join forces in order to set a trap for
their common prey.
When FOR A FEW DOLLARS MORE and A FISTFUL OF DOLLARS get
compared with each other, the improvements in the 1965 film
are evident in almost any area. First of all, the script by
Sergio Leone, Fulvio Morsella and Luciano Vincenzoni is much
tidier, without plot holes and implausiblities, and the plot
is concentrated solely on three major characters. Instead of
one or two, this film features three major characters and
their interaction is much more intriguing. Musical score by
legendary Ennio Morricone (this time credited with his real
name) is also improved, providing at least two memorable
themes; the opening theme is often became trademark of
spaghetti westerns, and the last theme, used for the scene
of final showdown, was so effective that it would be
repeated in THE GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY. And, finally,
although higher budget at least has something to do with the
better quality of this film, the real reason is drastically
better directorial skills of Sergio Leone. The Italian
director has obviously worked very hard in order to avoid
repetition and this film looks very different from its
predecessor. Every scene, from those that introduce the
character at the beginning of the film, until the last, is
perfectly staged, with Leone combining Morricone's music,
superb talents of his actors, and editing to create desired
emotional impact. Dark, almost nihilistic tone of the script
is brightened with sharp, cynical dark humour (with episode
featuring Joseph Egger as an old man on the railway as the
best example), while in the same time Leone gives rather
new, unusual and for its time somewhat controversial spin on
the classical western motive of revenge.
Unlike the first, this film has three major characters, and
all three are played by three superb characters. Clint
Eastwood, whose character is (debatably) the only link to
the other two films, is shadowed by his two colleagues,
although he actually plays nominal lead. Eastwood actually
hadn't got much to do to bring some new life to the
character of cynical gunslinger already established in A
FISTFUL OF DOLLARS, although his interaction with other two
actors is fine to watch. Lee Van Cleef, until this film
specialised for the roles of heavies, brings somewhat more
texture to his character. Leone's "show, don't tell"
directorial style relies heavily on actors to tell his
stories, and Lee Van Cleef does just that, creating
character of a cold, distanced professional and ruthless
killer, whose motives, at the end of the day might not be
that simple. When we have two Good Guys in the form of
cold-blooded killers, it is understandable that the Bad Guy
must be bad with capital B. This is achieved through
wonderful performance of Gian Maria Volonte. He plays Indio
as truly psychopathic villain (who almost reaches orgasm any
time he kills a helpless victim), yet in the same time he
gives him charisma and intelligence of natural leader.
Although for some his role might be slightly over the top,
Volonte's Indio is one of the most impressive villains in
the history of cinema. Even those who play supporting roles
have something to offer, like Luigi Pristilli as Indio's
sidekick Groggy, whose face would appear again in THE GOOD,
THE BAD AND THE UGLY.
As a slick combination of western, powerful psychological
drama, violent action and dark humour, FOR A FEW DOLLARS
MORE provides entertainment for viewers even today, after
decades of exposure to other films promoted by it. The only
possible flaw of the film is in its length, but Leone
probably intended this film to be that long, because only in
a long, elaborate scenes his sense of detail could be
properly seen. Those viewers who are ready to sit for two
hours watching this film would be more than adequately
rewarded for their patience.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Blade Runner (1982)
Sometimes in the late 1980s "Sfera", club of science fiction
aficionados from Zagreb, Croatia, asked its members to take
a poll and name the ten best SF movies of all times. The
results were printed in "Parsek", club's official fanzine
with the accompanying article that commented each film's
ranking. As many had expected, the top spot was held by
BLADE RUNNER, 1982 cult classic by Ridley Scott. However,
the author of the article didn't bother to give any broad
explanation for its success. "BLADE RUNNER is simply movie
to be seen and enjoyed", he wrote. The author of this review
was faced with exactly the same problem any time he tried to
give his reasons why he considered BLADE RUNNER one of the
best pieces of seventh art ever made. For me, every time I
watch the movie (and it happened quite a lot in the last
fourteen years) it is almost like a religious experience,
something that defies any rational discourse. Put that in
perspective with the deluge of reviews, essays, books,
studies and numerous references inspired by BLADE RUNNER in
last decade and half, and you'll also see that is very hard
to find anything original to say.
Anyway, many times I indeed tried to find the reason why I
like BLADE RUNNER so much. The closest thing to answer was
somewhat sentimental nature; when I saw movie for the first
time, it actually turned out to be the end of a period in my
movie watching habits. BLADE RUNNER was actually the last
movie that I had liked so much that I bothered to go to
cinema for the second time. Never again I was so blown away
by cinematic quality to buy tickets for repeated viewing.
The movie wasn't just the end of an era for me personally,
it was also the end of an era in history of contemporary
science fiction cinema. It was based on the novel DO
ANDROIDS DREAM OF ELECTRIC SHEEPS? by Philip K. Dick, the
science fiction writer who got enormous popularity with his
works that depicted worlds of near future with the sharp
contrast between superior technology and nightmarish state
of humanity. Visions of the author (who died short before
the movie premiere) were very in line with the dominating
pessimistic trends of science fiction and futuristic films
of the late 1970s and early 1980s, like ALIEN, OUTLAND or
MAD MAX. Although probably the best of them, the movie
flopped at the box-office and was abandoned by the critics,
sealing the fate of mainstream science fiction cinema for
next decade and turning it to mindless Spielbergian
infantilism.
The plot begins in Los Angeles in November 2019, decaying
megalopolis drowning in Malthusian nightmare, permanent smog
and acid rain. The only refuge from the hopeless reality of
dying planet lies in the off-world colonies, where
artificial humans known as the replicants provide slave
labour for the colonists. However, following the bloody
off-world revolt, replicants are permanently banished from
Earth and special police force, known as the Blade Runners,
is authorised to exterminate them on sight. One of their
former members is world-weary Rick Deckard (Harrison) who
reluctantly agrees to return to his old police job for one
more time. His target is a group of new, state-of-the-art
and deadly Nexus 6 generation replicants, led by Roy Batty
(Rutger Hauer). While he tracks the group, he stumbles onto
Rachael (Sean Young), beautiful woman that doesn't know
about her own replicant identity.
On the surface, the plot of the movie looks like material
for cheap B-movie schlockfest. However, BLADE RUNNER
actually wasn't intended to be something like that and its
plot is probably the least memorable or important element of
the big picture. The audience who initially expected
conventional action thriller or futuristic horror was
probably disappointed, but almost anyone remembered
something else - characters, music, brilliant production
designs, costumes; the atmosphere in general. Perfectionist
care about even the most single details of futuristic world
and originality of artists' ideas paid off in the end, and
BLADE RUNNER is now considered to be one of the most
recognisable movies of all times. The same thing can be said
of musical score by Vangelis, whose melancholic tunes remain
one of the composer's best works to date.
After the atmosphere, the characters are strongest point of
BLADE RUNNER. Most of them have few screen time, but they
are made unforgettable through superb acting. One of the
biggest ironies of BLADE RUNNER is its lead role; Harrison
Ford played Rick Deckard so differently from his usual
all-American hero image. His Deckard is cynical,
unsympathetic chandleresque anti-hero who actually has to
wait to the final shots in order to redeems himself. To make
things even more ironic, Ford privately doesn't appreciate
his most unconventional and one of the best roles. Perhaps
that was due to the fact that the show was stolen from him
by excellent Rutger Hauer. His portrayal of Roy Batty is not
only the most remembered performance in his entire career
but also his own ad-lib intervention is responsible for the
monologue that remains one of the best in the history of
motion pictures.
The other actors were somewhat overshadowed by leading duo;
yet, almost any of them gave a strong performance. For some
of them, like Edward J. Olmos, M. Emmet Walsh, James Hong
and Daryl Hannah is quite understandable why they became
huge stars or dependable character actors later on. Some,
like Sean Young, William Sanderson and Joe Turkell, weren't
that lucky and that's a real shame. Same can be said also
about director Ridley Scott, who slowly reduced his almost
divine reputation by making stylishly perfect movies bellow
the standards of BLADE RUNNER.
The strength of the movie isn't just in its popularity and
the cult that steadily grows with each new generation of the
moviegoers. It can also be seen in the influence it had on
other media. BLADE RUNNER, at least initially, didn't
influence other movies (which is understandable, because of
its commercial failure), that was compensated in the area of
science fiction literature. Because it was so stunningly
refreshing, this movie is considered to be the main
inspiration to the extremely popular sub-genre of cyberpunk,
and later to the sub-culture of cyberpunk on Internet. BLADE
RUNNER was also one of the very rare movies that dared to
predict future and to become more accurate in its
predictions as the years went by.
Some movies aren't just good because of their own quality.
They are also good because of the viewers feedback,
especially when they inspire them to ask questions and get
often very different answers. In the case of BLADE RUNNER,
the followers of cult had a great schism due to the great
replicant controversy - issue that was adressed in a 1992
released Director's Cut. Another endless debate is between
those fans who like the voice-overs in original 1982 version
as a tribute to the great film noires of 1940s, and those
who consider them as unnecessary dumbing-down. Anyway,
although some argue that those controversies can prove the
lack of perfection in BLADE RUNNER, the author of this
review thinks that they can be just another reason for
people to enjoy this movie.

Title
Review for 12:01 (1993) (TV)
1993 was the year that lacked thought-provoking Hollywood
films. One of the exceptions was GROUNDHOG DAY, fantasy
comedy by Harold Ramis. Its concept - protagonist caught in
a same day for all eternity - was later used in some popular
TV shows like XENA or THE X-FILES. The concept, however,
wasn't original. It was first used in a short story by
science fiction author Richard A. Lupoff. The same story was
used in 1990 film by Jonathan Heap. Three years later,
television remake was filmed, this time directed by Jack
Sholder and written by Philip Morton.
The movie protagonist is Barry Thomas (Jonathan Silverman),
office worker who meets beautiful scientist Lisa Fredericks
(Helen Slater) and falls in love with her. But, before he
could meet her, she falls victim to uknown assassins.
Depressed, Barry goes to bar and gets drunk. Next morning,
he is surprised to see his colleagues use exactly the same
lines and doing exactly the same movements like yesterday.
When he sees Lisa alive and well, he figures that something
is very wrong. Next morning, exactly the same thing happens,
and Barry realises that he is trapped inside the time loop.
Finally, he discovers the facts that could serve as an
explanation - secret nuclear physics experiments that may
have disrupted the time-space continuum and caused the loop.
Compared with GROUNDHOG DAY, this film is disappointment. On
its own, it is more than passable piece of TV entertainment.
The story has its own internal logic (although the
pseudoscientific explanation is rather lame). Jack Sholder,
director whose best film so far is 1986 SF thriller HIDDEN,
is handling this television production quite well. The
characters and situations are interesting, providing a lot
of humour. The actors are capable in their roles, although
they lack charisma (especially Jonathan Silverman). Martin
Landau, on the other hand, wasted his own in the role of
rather conventional project leader. All in all, good film
for the viewers who watch movies without too much
expectations.

Title
Review for Coma (1978)
There are some films that resemble quality wines - they get
better with each passing year and decade. But few of them
could enjoy such favourable fate because they became more
frightening for future generations than for their
contemporaries. One of such cases is COMA, 1978 thriller by
Michael Chricton. In its time, it was branded as science
fiction by most critics, even those very familiar with the
genre. But today, nobody would dare to do it, because some
of the future predictions in this film became chillingly
accurate. Which, of course, makes this film even more scary.
The script, written also by Michael Chricton, was based on
the best-selling novel by Robin Cook, author of many
successful medical thrillers. The movie protagonist is
Doctor Susan Wheeler (played by Genevieve Bujold), young
doctor in big Boston hospital. During her practice, she
begins noticing a strange pattern of young and healthy
patients falling into unexplained coma during the routine
surgeries. She begins to investigate, although everyone,
including her boyfriend and colleague Doctor Marc Bellows
(played by Michael Douglas), doesn't believe her claims
about all those cases being connected. Actually, the cause
of that phenomenon becomes even more sinister after Doctor
Wheeler survives an attempt on her life. Finally motivated
to push through the bitter end, she begins to reveal the
shocking truth.
COMA is just another example for all those film critics of
today who consider 1970s to be the Golden Age of world
cinema. That time period was very fruitful for many movie
directors who had made many great films, only to deliver
disappointments in the latter decades. Michael Chricton,
acclaimed novelist, screenwriter and director was one of
them, reaching the peak of his film career in 1970s. Many,
including the author of this review, would claim that COMA
happens to be his best film. One of the reason for that is
Crichton's medical background that provided him an
opportunity to create realistic settings and characters
(same as with his hit TV-show ER two decades later). As a
result, COMA is a film with very plausible plot and
convincing characters. And the realism worked very well in
order to create extremely scary atmosphere - the hospital,
institution where the people are supposed to be safer than
in all other places, is suddenly turned into place of
unimaginable horrors. The movie is even more scarier than
cult horrors that used to be very popular in those days; few
people could imagine themselves being attacked by sharks or
stalked by axe murderers and supernatural demons, but almost
everyone could expect himself to end in hospital, helpless
and totally at the mercy of people in white coats. Scariness
also sprang from the widespread feeling of post-Watergate
paranoia, when every segment of the establishment, including
even the medical profession, caused suspicion about its good
intentions or scruples.
Crichton's direction in this film is almost flawless. He
presents the scenes of Doctor Wheeler's boring and totally
unexciting domestic and professional every day life, shot in
almost quasi-documentary fashion, and quickly replaces them
with the breath-taking scenes of suspense. Doctor Wheeler's
battle with the assassin in the dark corridors and autopsy
room is one of those scenes that leave strong impact on the
viewers. And the truth, being finally revealed in the
Jefferson Institute, is one of the most memorable and
frightening images in the history of cinema. The movie was
deliberately left without original musical score for most of
its part, except in the suspense scenes, when always
reliable Jerry Goldsmith provides needed audio stimuli for
suspense and horror.
Acting talent in this film is excellent. Genevieve Bujold
was very well cast as a heroine of this film. She portrays
Doctor Wheeler as a liberated, professional woman of 1970s,
strong and stubborn, and yet vulnerable because of her
physical limitations. In many ways she resembles Sigourney
Weaver as Ripley in ALIEN, another feminist action hero
faced with unspeakable horrors. The other actors mostly fill
the blanks - Michael Douglas is, at best, passable as her
romantic interest. Richard Widmark is good as Doctor
Wheeler's mentor. The movie also shows many future stars and
respected actors like Ed Harris and Tom Selleck in small
roles, although the latter one looks rather lame.
That wasn't the only flaw of this film. The plot worked very
well until the very end, with the unexpected plot twist
which had reduced Doctor Wheeler from the heroine into
typical "damsel in distress". And the ending was rather weak
and not too cathartic. But that plot twist at the end was
also an opportunity for the authors to allow some of the
characters to explain the ethical challenges - the basis for
the plot premise. That same premise looked preposterous
twenty years ago, but today, it is taken for granted as a
sad fact of life. Perhaps that, more than everything else,
makes this film so scary and so effective after all those
years.
Review written on September 27th 1999

Title
Review for Flintstones, The (1994)
These days, we are witnessing the deluge of films based on
old, cult TV shows. Most of the times, the fans of these
shows shudder thinking what could Hollywood hacks of the
present do with the memories of their past. But, some five
or six years ago, there weren't that many movies and the
trend didn't look that depressing. So, the people who, like
the author of this review, grew up watching FLINTSTONES,
popular 1960s animated series about "modern Stone Age"
family, weren't particularly worried when the word came
about live action remake. After all, the producer behind the
project was Steven Spielberg and, if anything else, at least
the special effects would be good.
The plot revolves about Flintstones, family set in fictious
Stone Age "town" of Bedrock, whose members enjoy the
lifestyle of 1950s middle class America. Fred Flinstone
(John Goodman) works in the quarry, and one day he helps his
best friend and neighbour Barney Rubble (Rick Moranis) and
his wife Betty (Rosie O'Donnell) to adopt a baby. To return
the favour, Barney switches his results of aptitude test
with Fred, and, based on that, Fred gets well-paid job in
management. But, of course, this is just a sham - corrupt
official Cliff Vandercave (Kyle MacLachlan) and his sultry
secretary Sharon Stone (Halle Berry) need a scapegoat for
their embezzlement scheme. In the meantime, Fred's wife
Wilma (Elizabeth Perkins) must face her mother (Elizabeth
Taylor) who can't stand Fred.
On the superficial level, THE FLINTSTONES did the excellent
job in bringing the animated series to life. Computer
effects are flawless, and the costumes, settings and other
details are authentic for all the fans of the show.
Unfortunately, problems with this film start with inadequate
casting - Rick Moranis is too thin for the role of Barney,
while the cartoon Betty used to be much skinnier than Rosie
O'Donnell. But the greatest problem of all is plot, or to be
precise, the lack of plot. Some thirty six screenwriters
made sure that the plot of the film is lame, original
characters one-dimensional, and many elements of the story,
like embezzlement and inter-office politics, totally
incomprehensible for the little children, the main targeted
audience of this film. Result is almost unwatchable mess,
occasionally saved mostly by excellent acting (Elizabeth
Perkins was right on mark as Wilma) and one of the classic
example of mortal Hollywood disease known as "high concept".
After great hype, movie quickly sank into oblivion and the
fans of the show returned to the animated version. All in
all, film isn't that bad, but only the hard core fans and
nostalgics can find more than guilty pleasure in it.

Title
Review for Brain Smasher... A Love Story (1993)
There are various ways to classify movies that fail to reach
even the lowest possible criteria. Among them there should
be a place for a category labelled as "films by Albert
Pyun". Although there are directors who gained a lot of
notoriety due to the abysmal quality of their work, few of
them made so many atrociously bad movies as Pyun did.
Despite his reputation, Pyun almost always managed to
surprise even the most experienced viewers and show them
that there isn't a movie so bad that it couldn't be made
look good in comparison with another. However, Pyun once
actually made a movie that turned out to be watchable, but
this was not the case with his 1993 action comedy BRAIN
SMASHER... A LOVE STORY.
The plot of this film deals with Sam Crain (played by Terri
Hatcher), professional model that gets in the whole new
world of trouble after agreeing to smuggle a package from
Europe to Portland, Oregon for her sister Carrie (played by
Deborah Van Valkenburgh). Soon she becomes the target of
murderous Shaolin monks and her only protection comes in the
form of Ed "Brainsmasher" Molloy (played by Andrew Dice
Clay), a night-club bouncer.
Even Clay, comedian who carried the tragically underrated
ADVENTURES OF FORD FARLANE on his shoulder, seems unable to
save this film from its fate. Pyun, who also wrote the
script, seems to lack the sense of humour, while the action
scenes look unimpressive and the whole story, even with the
surprise twist at the end, completely unoriginal and
uninspiring. Teri Hatcher, future star of LOIS AND CLARK, is
also left without any opportunity to show her potential.
Fans of both stars should do themselves a great service if
they watch something else.
Review written on September 21st 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Forbidden Planet (1956)
One of the most widespread forms of amusement among movie fans is
"Kevin Bacon game" - connecting various, often quite different, films
based on the actors who appeared in them. Movie fans who like to
explore the essence of films play another kind of "Kevin Bacon game" -
connecting various films based on ideas or characters that appeared in
them. One of the most spectacular of such sequences, in which we can
trace the original ideas centuries back, is the sequence that begins
with William Shakespeare's THE TEMPEST and ends with STAR TREK. There
is an important link between 16th Century play and 20th Century cult
SF-series, and that link happens to be SF-film with the cult following
of its own. This film is FORBIDDEN PLANET, 1956 space opera directed
by Fred M. Wilcox.
The plot of the film is set in 22nd Century. Starship is sent from
Earth to solar system of Altair. Captain J.J. Adams (played by Leslie
Nielsen) has the task to investigate apparent lack of communication
with scientific colony that had settled on its fourth planet two
decades ago. When the ship approaches the planet, the expedition
receives warning by Doctor Morbius (played by Walter Pidgeon), the
only remaining member of the expedition. He claims that he doesn't
need outside help and that the starship should leave. Adams
nevertheless orders the landing and his expedition is greeted by
strange, exotic, yet barren world. The only thing that stands out are
structures inhabited by Doctor Morbius, his young daughter Altaira
(played by Annie Francis) and exotic household appliance called
"Robbie the Robot". Morbius reluctantly agrees to help Adams in his
investigation, explaining that all the members of his expedition, with
exception of his family, succumbed to mysterious force which caused
very violent and messy deaths. Stranded on the barren planet, Morbius
had begun to explore its underground and found ruins of mighty and
ultra-developed civilisation of Krell, people who mysteriously
perished centuries ago. Their superior technology persevered, allowing
Morbius to create many technological wonders, including "Robbie",
despite his lack of formal engineering skills. While some members of
the starship crew are intrigued by this finding, most of them are
aroused by attractive yet sexually inexperienced Altaira, including
Captain Adams. However, after a while, Adams would find that this
bizarre planet has lifeforms different from Morbius family and more
inimical to his ship and crew.
At first glance, FORBIDDEN PLANET looks like an embodiment of
everything that is bad about Hollywood's 1950s science fiction. The
predictions of future are laughable, starships look like flying
saucers, their crews are made entirely out of white males who speak
with American accent. Comic relief in the form of Cookie (played by
Earl Holliman) is an incarnation of all cliches of the period. "Robbie
the Robot", on the other hand, doesn't just look obsolete - he looks
like too obvious attempt by producers to attract juvenile audience,
and, compared to this, Lucas and Spielberg look like masters of
subtlety. Even on purely technical level director Wilcox manages to
shoot himself in the foot when one shot during Altaira's
skinny-dipping scene reveals Annie Frances wearing swimsuit. However,
despite these flaws, FORBIDDEN PLANET is considered one of the most
important science fiction films ever made.
The importance of FORBIDDEN PLANET is in the influence it had on
numerous filmmakers till this day, mostly in the form of basic plot.
That speaks a lot of about ingenuity and intelligence of screenwriter
Cyril Hume, who, unlike many other SF writers, didn't use the premise
as a simple excuse for standard action/horror plot, but actually built
the real, intriguing story on it and led it to its logical and
effective conclusion. Thanks to that, even the viewers who are
accustomed to CGI graphics, different standards of sex, violence and
language would actually appreciate this film. Despite antiquated
special effects, slow rhythm, old-fashioned morality of the
characters, FORBIDDEN PLANET doesn't insult viewer's intelligence. It
is exactly what is supposed to be - a science fiction film from
beginning to the end.
Even on technical levels, FORBIDDEN PLANET is successful film. Special
effects were best of its age, and even today some of the scenes might
impress the viewers. There was even some room for experimenting, and
musical of Bebe and Louis Barron is the very first example of
completely electronic soundtrack for Hollywood feature film. This
experiment resulted in eerie, surreal atmosphere that seems quite
appropriate for the film. Although the actors in this film don't
usually belong to Hollywood major league, they do quite a decent job.
That includes young Leslie Nielsen of comedic POLICE SQUAD fame as
starship captain, and despite his usual deadpan delivery, this non-
comic role is rather impressive; "trekkies" wouldn't have much trouble
seeing shades of proto-Kirk in Nielsen's version of Adams. On the
other hand, Walter Pidgeon is also quite effective as Morbius, and
Anne Francis as his attractive daughter delivers seductive combination
of sexuality and childlike innocence. Hume's dialogue, despite some
usual cliches, has enough room for some rather entertaining double
entendres.
All in all, FORBIDDEN PLANET, even after almost half of century, is
not only important but very entertaining and intelligent piece of
science fiction cinema and it should be recommended to all fans of
that particular genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Goldfinger (1964)
When we are dealing with movie series made out of twenty or
so titles, finding the best of them might look like a
difficult task. But, in the case of James Bond films, it
isn't so. Almost everyone agrees that the best Bond films
used to be made in 1960s, in a Golden Age that spawned Sean
Connery and set the standards that would never be satisfied
again in later decades. Choice is even simpler when we
discount first two films - DR. NO and FROM RUSSIA AND LOVE -
which were some sort of experiments for the series creators.
The third film in the series, GOLDFINGER, directed in 1964
by Guy Hamilton, is often considered to be the first "true"
Bond, the one that firmly established formula that we all
know and love. GOLDFINGER also has a very special meaning
for the author of this review. It was the first Bond film I
have ever watched, and, although some time had to pass
before I started truly appreciating its quality, it sets my
standards for all the future Bond viewing experiences.
The plot of the film begins when British secret agent James
Bond (played by Sean Connery) crosses path with Auric
Goldfinger (played by Gert Froebe), wealthy international
gold trader, whose character is unscrupulous enough to cheat
even in trivial games of poker and golf. British and
American authorities suspect that he could break rules even
in even more serious matters like international trade, and
Bond is being sent to investigate possible Goldfinger's
involvement in grand-scale gold smuggling operation.
Goldfinger is too shrewd to allow himself being fooled by
Bond's cover as fellow smuggler, but Bond won't stop the
investigation. The trail leads him to Switzerland, where he
would hear Goldfinger discussing some sinister plan called
"Grand Slam". Unfortunately, he can't report his findings to
his superiors, since Goldfinger's henchmen capture him.
Goldfinger decides to leave Bond alive for a while, and his
personal pilot Pussy Galore (played by Honor Blackman) would
fly him over the Atlantic to Goldfinger's stables in
Kentucky. Bond there sees what the "Grand Slam" actually is
- spectacular raid on the US government golden reserves in
Fort Knox. Equipped with this knowledge, Bond must find a
way to escape and foil Goldfinger's plan.
GOLDFINGER is often referred as the best example of what
Bond movie is and what every Bond movie should be. Made in
1964, as a third movie of a well-established series, it was
the fortunate transition between realism and seriousness of
first two films, and spectacle and glamour of later Bond
films. The plot is, relatively speaking, realistic (at least
for the Bond series standards), and the script by Richard
Maibaum and Paul Dehn actually improved Ian Fleming's
original novel in this area. The character of Bond is hardly
invincible and in the film he often makes mistakes, gets
beaten or captured, and his survival generally depends more
on the mere luck and good will of other people than on his
own brain or charm. Sean Connery again shows his great
talent making his jovial attitude even in direst of
circumstances quite believable.
This time character of James Bond has quite a match in the
character of chief Bond Villain. Auric Goldfinger is
brilliantly played by German actor Gert Froebe and, unlike
the usual cardboard villains of the Bond series, this one
looks genuine. From the first scene, he is clearly
identified as Bad Guy and audience is spared from the
unnecessary and time-consuming attempts to shed doubts about
his moral alignment. Goldfinger is also portrayed as truly
intelligent villain, someone who relies more on his brain
than on his immense wealth or underground armies of
henchmen, and, in the end, has enough brains to think about
back-up plans. Such Bond Villain truly deserves to have
quality assistants at his disposal, and Korean bodyguard
Oddjob, played by Harold Sakata. Equipped with funny yet
deadly hat, and almost invincible, Oddjob gives Bond run for
his money and turns out to be the best Bond Villain ever (or
at least shares that spot with 1970s Jaws).
Bond Villain is not the only category that makes this Bond
movie superior to the rest. Pussy Galore, played by Honor
Blackman, is more than interesting Bond Girl. She is quite
believable character - tough, no-nonsense and able to take
care of herself. But most of all, she is mature, at least
compared to usual Bond Girl stock (in case of Honor Blackman
term "girl" might not be quite appropriate, since she was 38
years old in time of production). However, despite her
relatively old age, she manages to stay not just impressive,
but very sexy and sometimes even more desirable than two
other younger yet more shallow Bond beauties in the form of
Shirley Eaton and Tanya Mallet. Even her defection to the
side of the Good Guys couldn't be explained as simple
capitulation to Bond's masculine charm - Bond appealed to
her common sense as well as her feminine desires.
In terms of spectacle, GOLDFINGER represents the obvious
improvement over first two sequels. The series introduces
one of not so important and obligatory, yet attractive
elements of Bond formula - spectacular battle between Good
Guys and Bad Guys. But most attractive thing about
GOLDFINGER is its style. Guy Hamilton paces film
brilliantly, never allowing a single minute of the film to
seem boring. Musical soundtrack by John Barry is one of the
best ever made in history of cinema, and the title song,
sung by Shirley Bassey, became some sort of Bond's
alternative anthem. GOLDFINGER is also great in visual
sense, with Ted Moore providing excellent photography and
Ken Adam creating truly impressive production settings. But
the most memorable thing about GOLDFINGER is, of course,
dead girl being covered with gold paint - one of the most
memorable images not only in history of cinema, but also in
history of art. There are few examples when artists are able
to create images that are haunting, terrifying and erotic in
the same time.
Another thing that makes GOLDFINGER truly attractive is the
fact that such films couldn't be made in this time and age.
Feminists would cringe at the sight of women being treated
like nothing more than easily disposable sexual objects, and
PC police would be infuriated with the fact that the
majority of villains happens to be of Asian origin. Newer
generations would probably grin after Bond's Beatles remark,
which shows how deeply Bond series was ingrained in its
time. Such remark shows how deeply Bond series was ingrained
in its time, and, consequently, all attempts to adapt it to
more "modern" sensibilities turn it into pathetic parody of
itself. Despite being set in past times, GOLDFINGER found
its way to the modern audiences and it is quite
understandable how even the generations born decades later
don't hesitate to name it the best Bond film ever made.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for 12 Angry Men (1957)
There are many ways in which Continental and Anglo-Saxon
schools of law manifest their differences in the area of
Criminal Procedure, but usually the most notable, at least
for outside observers, is the use of lay jury in the latter.
The advantages and disadvantages of both schools could be
the subject of lengthy debates, but there is no doubt that
the criminal trials in Anglo-Saxon countries provide better
drama and, consequently, better material for movies.
Hollywood filmmakers came to such conclusion long time ago
and, as a result, created whole new sub-genre of courtroom
dramas. However, the most important and possibly the most
interesting element of such trials - jury and its
deliberations - was mostly absent from Hollywood films. One
of the rare films to break such taboo and deal with juries
was 12 ANGRY MEN, 1957 directorial debut by Sidney Lumet.
Plot of this film is based on the play by Reginald Rose, who
had been allegedly inspired by his own experiences as juror.
The movie begins one hot summer day in New York courthouse.
A teenager has just been tried for the murder of his father,
and the judge sends the jury to deliberate about his guilt
or innocence, warning them that the guilty verdict brings
mandatory death penalty. When jurors enter the room, things
aren't looking very well for the defendant - jury members
are eager to pronounce him guilty as soon as possible. The
only exception is Juror #8 (played by Henry Fonda), who
votes "not guilty" only because he thinks that the decision
on someone's life and death should be made after careful
examination of the evidence. The rest of the jury is upset
with such dissent, but Juror #8 gradually convinces them to
review the case. As a result, reasonable doubt about boy's
guilt emerges and more jurors are ready to vote "not
guilty", while, on the other hand, some jurors are becoming
quite passionate about sending defendant to the electric
chair.
Today, 12 ANGRY MEN is a considered to be classic, one of
the greatest films made by 1950s Hollywood. Unfortunately,
it also belongs to those films, which are not made in
Hollywood today, since it is hard to imagine big studios
spending money on films based on stage plays, shot in black
and white and with plots set in a single room during one
afternoon (1997 remake was shot in cable production). On the
other hand, some filmmakers in today's Hollywood would find
the theme of this film quite to their tastes. Reginald
Rose's play doesn't just reveal dramatic tensions, usually
hidden behind locked jury room doors; it also reveals the
role prejudice plays in judicial, as well as any other
important collective decisions in American society. If made
today, and without some constraints Lumet had in 1950s, this
film would be considered very "politically correct". Of
course, subplot about prejudices could be hidden for those
accustomed for more direct and more preachy ways of socially
conscious American cinema of 1990s. All person in the jury
room are white men; but even they are object of social
stratification and prejudices. Through the escalating drama
anonymous jurors slowly reveal their different social
backgrounds and the ways in which they perceive the world
and each other. The biggest prejudice is, of course, racial
one - directed against "people from the slums", who are,
same as jurors themselves, anonymous for the viewers, but
their ethnic background is presumed to be Puerto Rican.
Because of such prejudices, many jurors were ready to make
their fatal decision before they were really examining the
evidence. The microcosm of the jury room could be perceived
as metaphor for the American society in 1950s and the
struggle of the lone Juror #8, whose background is
intellectual, could be seen as a metaphor for the struggle
for civil rights of American ethnic minorities.
With or without politics, 12 ANGRY MEN is a powerful film,
and its director Lumet should be really praised for making
it such with small budget and in so unappealing setting.
Lumet's achievement is even greater when we take into
account the fact that it was his first major film. On the
other hand, we could say that he had easy time, since few
directors enjoyed privilege of working with such stellar
cast. Always reliable Henry Fonda is only a nominal lead,
being partnered with eleven great character actors. Thanks
to Lumet's meticulous pacing and editing, each of them used
opportunity to give splendid performance. Only one of them,
Lee J. Cobb (Juror #3 and most ardent member of "guilty"
camp), got "Oscar" for the role in this film, but each other
member of the cast deserved it too. Perhaps 12 ANGRY MEN
should have been the opportunity to introduce new category
of "Oscars" - given for collective performances. The
excellent acting was supported with good photography by
Boris Kaufman and also by ascetic but suggestive musical
score by Kenyon Hopkins. The only thing that doesn't look
perfect in this film is the ending, which seems somewhat
abrupt and the epilogue is unnecessary. However, this flaw
is a minor one, and 12 ANGRY MEN completely deserved its
high status of undisputed classic.
Another thing that makes 12 ANGRY MEN important is its
educational value. This film is a great combination of an
adult theme and the treatment suitable for younger audience.
Therefore, 12 ANGRY MEN is a film that should be viewed not
only by those who want to educate themselves about inner
workings of American judicial system.

Title
Review for Relentless IV: Ashes to Ashes (1994)
Serial killers seem to think of Los Angeles as their most
popular hunting ground. LAPD detective Sam Dietz (played by
Leo Rossi), protagonist of the RELENTLESS series of films,
however, does everything in his power to stop them and
through the years he gained enough experience to solve even
the most complicated cases. In RELENTLESS IV: ASHES TO
ASHES, fourth and final sequel, directed by Olley Sassone in
1994, Dietz would again be subjected to difficult ordeal
when L.A. women become prey of vicious serial killer.
Dietz's investigation is hampered by problems on the
personal front -rows with his rebellious teenager son Cory
(played by Christopher Pettiet), and the fact that he is
simultaneously attracted to two beautiful women - his
inexperienced partner Jessy Paretti (played by Colleen
Coffey) and Doctor Sara Lee Jaffee (played by Famke
Janssen), psychotherapist that might be linked to the case.
RELENTLESS IV: ASHES TO ASHES doesn't bring anything
particularly new or exciting to the genre of serial killer
movies. However, the script by Mark Sevi, although not
spared of some cliches (including romantic and "killer
preying on detective's family" subplots), looks refreshingly
dark compared to similar movies. Director Sassone keeps all
those confusing and complicated subplots nicely wrapped
within 91 minutes limit, and the acting is more than fine.
Leo Rossi can play the role of Dietz in his sleep and
Janssen is quite believable psychotherapist, not allowing
her good looks to overshadow complexity of her role. All in
all, RELENTLESS IV: ASHES TO ASHES looks like a fine piece
of film, which is surprisingly rare achievement for the
fourth sequel in the B movie franchise, at least in 1990s
Hollywood.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Day of the Jackal, The (1973)
Last few years could very well be remembered as the years of
the dreadful movie remakes. The most notorious example is,
of course, THE JACKAL, 1997 action thriller that shows the
catastrophic lack of talent and originality in today's
Hollywood. The movie is even less watchable for those
unfortunate viewers who had the opportunity to watch the
original. The original, 1973 spy thriller THE DAY OF THE
JACKAL, happens to be the political thriller in the history
of seventh art, one of the real gems of 1970s - the Golden
Age of world cinema. It shouldn't surprise anyone that Fred
Zinnemann, film's director, fought hard and losing battle
against the studio heads, trying to stop them in their plan
to smear his work by associating with "modern, contemporary"
third-rate rubbish. Unfortunately, Zinnemmann lost his fight
after the death and THE JACKAL was made. Fortunately, THE
DAY OF THE JACKAL is still available to those who want to
see the really good films. And even those who aren't so sure
about its top quality would probably enjoy comparisons
between the two.
The movie was based on the bestseller novel by Frederick
Forsythe, British journalist who made reputation by mixing
real life events and fiction in his books. His first novel,
THE DAY OF THE JACKAL, published in 1970, also deals with
real life events and begins with one. In August 1962, after
giving the independence to Algeria, French President Charles
De Gaulle (played by Adrien Cayla-Legrand) became the target
of extreme right-wingers and disgruntled war veterans united
in the terrorist organisation known as OAS. The spectacular
attempt on his life fails, the conspirators are caught and
their leader, Colonel Bastien-Thirry (Jean Sorel) is
executed for treason. At this point, real life is replaced
with fiction - a year later, surviving OAS members, led by
Colonel Rodin (Eric Porter) had decided to strike again.
Their problem is De Gaulle's security service being the best
in the world and their own organisation being infiltrated by
moles and informants. So, the idea is to have an outsider,
contract killer. The mysterious Englishman, known by his
code name Jackal (Edward Fox) accepts the offer and begins
his methodical work to prepare the assassination. In the
meantime, French security services receive some information
about OAS plans. Top government officials decide to hand
over the case to Inspector Lebel (Michel Lonsdale), the best
investigator in France. His job is extremely hard, because
he must stop the man he knows nothing about. On the other
hand, Jackal, despite some setbacks, is always one step
ahead from the police and is getting closer to his target.
Despite having background in almost forgotten and obscure
political troubles in early 1960s France, the script by
Kenneth Ross is very simple and easy to understand, even for
those who couldn't care less about the events of previous
decades. The plot is universal, the characters well-defined,
but they are anything but simple, despite having relatively
little time to develop. That's because they all act
realistically and through their actions, emotions (or lack
of) or small gestures, we might discover a lot about their
inner thoughts, alignments, fears and anxieties.
Of all those characters, Jackal is the most fascinating. The
novel and the film follow Hitchcock's advice that in a good
thriller the villain must be more interesting than the
protagonist. After 1973 many film-makers followed this
advice, but rarely with such care and realism as in
Zinnemann's film. Jackal is portrayed as cool professional,
very dedicated, yet emotionally distant from his profession.
During the course of his mission, he kills without
hesitation, but he feels no pleasure in it - he isn't some
kind of raving homicidal maniac; he does what it takes to
get the job done. He also doesn't possess supernatural
powers - he makes mistakes, sometimes even fatal, but due to
his intelligence and numerous back-up plans, he manages to
get away with it. Edward Fox, very good British actor, who
later played mostly character roles, presented Jackal in a
way that offers some kind of explanation to his actions. In
this film, Jackal is a individualist who makes his own
rules, and the challenge and thrill of his job is a bigger
reward than mere material compensation. For some critics,
Jackal was amoral yet romantic hero, one of many who used to
captivate the imagination of the anti-establishment
audiences of late 1960s and early 1970s.
If Jackal could be seen as some kind of anti-establishment
rebel, that same establishment is represented by the whole
series of different government officials, who are,
naturally, lacking his charisma and appeal. Among them, the
most recognisable and the closest thing to personal rival is
Inspector Lebel, played by Michel Lonsdale, one of the most
reliable character actors from Europe. Two men has something
in common - they are both extremely professional and
dedicated to their job. But, Lebel is, of course, on the
side of the system and he never breaks rules, making him one
of the rare film lawmen that do everything by the book. Film
suggests that his real problem isn't Jackal - the real
problem are his cynical superiors who are more than eager to
discard his services for petty political purposes. Lebel's
struggle with inter-office intrigues, international
complications and ineptness of his own national bureacracy
is almost as interesting to see as Jackal's actions. It is
natural for those two men to find certain bond, which is
suggested in the last shot of the movie.
Other actors are more than fine too. They are plenty of
them, but only a couple of them are stretching out, because
their roles are rather limited in scope. Most memorable is
Cyril Cusack as gunsmith who provides the perfect insight
into the world of professional, yet morally cripple people
like Jackal. The film also allows us to see some of the top
British character actors in their early days, playing minor
roles - most notable are Ronald Pickup as petty forger, and
Derek Jacobi as Lebel's assistant Caron. Their acting is
minimalistic, yet small details reveal a lot about the
characters, setting and the story.
The very same technique was employed by director too. Fred
Zinnemann tells the story very methodically, by exposing
small details that would later be important pieces of great
puzzle. His editing is superb - the viewer is given
relatively small amount of information, yet enough to draw
the clear picture for himself. The shots are very long at
occasion, but only when it is absolutely necessary. The best
examples are the scenes when Jackal must remove the
witnesses of his crimes; those shots are very effective in
its subtlety and hard to imagine in a movie decade plagued
by gratutiotus violence on the screen. Despite being the
movie that last almost two hours and half, THE DAY OF THE
JACKAL remains very exciting for the viewers. That too is a
proof of Zinnemann's talent. Another thing could also be
seen in this film - the original music by George Delerue is
almost never heard in the film, but the audience doesn't
have the time to notice. For the most of the film, the music
we hear is the one played on radio or on the streets. That
too makes this film almost semi-documentary in nature, as
well as documentary footage, which was very effectively
edited in the final scene at the end.
THE DAY OF THE JACKAL remains one of the best, if not the
best political thriller ever made. It is clever film, that
thrills the audience without insulting their intelligence;
one of those rare films that employ viewer's brain as well
as senses. Yet, despite anything, it remains very exciting
and entertaining film that deserved its place among the
classics of the Seventh Art.

Title
Review for Hardcore (1979)
Some of my friends who went to live in USA complain about
one thing - that country is very different from the one
depicted in Hollywood movies. That is especially true for
those who end up somewhere in that unexplored land between
Los Angeles and New York where they find, to their big
surprise, that the majority of people vote Republican, go to
church every Sunday and usually don't tolerate liberal
attitudes that are taken for granted in an average American
film. Such rude awakening, however, can happen in another
direction - conservative people are sometimes forced to
discover unpleasant truths about world they live in.
Something like that happens to Jake Van Dorn (George C.
Scott), successful Grand Rapids businessman who shares
strong Calvinist convictions with the rest of his community.
One day his daughter Kristen (Ilah Davis) disappears from
Calvinist Youth convention in California. Van Dorn is
worried because he doesn't believe that his daughter would
run from home. However, the truth delivered by private
investigator Andy Mast (Peter Boyle) is even harder -
Kristen is spotted in cheap pornographic film. Infuriated
Van Dorn is unsatisfied with the way Mast's investigation is
going, so he goes to Los Angeles to search for Kristen
himself. Unfortunately, he lacks experience and the quest,
that brought him to the utter depths of sex underworld, is
fruitless. Things change when he devises cunning plan and,
while doing it, stumbles on sympathetic prostitute and part
time porno actress Nicky (Season Hubley).
Almost two decades after its release, HARDCORE is mostly
forgotten by critics and film scholars. It is a real shame,
because very few movies in today's Hollywood would dare
tackle controversial issues that writer and director Paul
Schrader explored in his second directorial attempt. In late
1970s, it was totally different situation - films were
expected to have mature, serious themes for the mature
audience. For Schrader this film was nice opportunity to
expand the subplot of his previous work, TAXI DRIVER - one
that deals with the great generational divide that tormented
the American society in 1970s. On one side we have an old
America that sticks to the puritan ideals of hard work and
strict morals that made that country great. But that America
is obviously unable to cope with the new challenges brought
by the social turmoil in 1960s and, instead of facing them,
prefers to live in rural, conservative cocoons. The new
America, on the other hand, fares no better - ideals of the
so-called "sexual revolution", same as all other
"revolutions" of the Swinging Sixties, degraded into
exploitation and depravity. Instead of being "liberated",
Baby Boomers are stuck with their own inability to cope with
the newly discovered freedoms. Schrader very cleverly brings
the idea that those two Americas, actually, aren't so far
away - nice example is a brilliant scene in which Van Dorn,
already described as an authoritarian and paternalistic
capitalist, meets sleazy porno producer; the latter one also
turns out to be authoritarian, paternalistic and very
dedicated to this job. The difference between the two is
simply in the line of work.
Many contemporary critics actually accused Schrader of
promoting conservative agenda. On the surface, it may look
that way - audience is forced to sympathise with Van Dorn
and his quest. In the first scenes, he is portrayed as nice
family man who actually doesn't deserve to experience
parent's worst nightmare. The scene in the porno cinema that
reveals Kristen's fate is extremely cruel; pain and
humiliation, brought by Oscar-winning actor George C. Scott,
is of such intensity, that the audience feels sorry for him
and simply must support his agenda. Van Dorn is perhaps
flawed, and the subtle hints lead to the unflattering truth
at the end; but the viewers simply know that his cause is
just, and that prodigal daughter must be better off with her
loving father than with the sleazy pornographers that only
want to exploit her body. On the other hand, Schrader, who
grew up in an environment very much like Van Dorn's (his own
parents wouldn't allow him to watch movies until he was 18),
knows better and tries to bring another side of coin. Even
the people connected with sex underworld can show redeeming
qualities - like Nicky, who actually tries to improve her
life, and sleazy detective who develops something like a
conscience at the end. Unfortunately, Schrader fails to
erase the impact of the shocking scene at the beginning, and
his attempt to reconcile the opposing sides of America seems
lost in somewhat clichd finale.
The script is slightly flawed, and Schrader as director
doesn't show too much originality - his style seems too
influenced by techniques that Scorsese used in TAXI DRIVER.
Apart from the scenes in Grand Rapids, those two films even
look alike. But the content might be more than interesting
for today's viewer, especially those inspired by the current
70s revival. Until BOOGIE NIGHTS, no Hollywood mainstream
movie ever dared to explore the phenomenon of pornography in
1970s. HARDCORE, on the other hand, might serve as precious
document, because it depicts sex film industry in the period
often regarded as the Golden Age by connoisseurs - before
the advent of video, when many of the porno filmmakers could
afford to think of themselves as artists. The view of such
age and the industry is very unflattering, though, but for
the film whose main character takes time to explain
Calvinist doctrines to the audience, that shouldn't be too
surprising. Anyway, despite some flaws, HARDCORE remains
very interesting and powerful piece of cinema.

Title
Review for Life of Brian (1979)
Monty Python, legendary British comedian troupe, usually
divides people into two very distinct camps. Some consider
them comedic geniuses and literally worship all their
incarnations - all episodes of BBC show, songs, books and
movies. Other simply can't digest their rather strange, dark
and twisted sense of humour and, accordingly, can't fathom
what was so special about them. The author of this review
belongs somewhere in the middle. I first encountered Monty
Python in late 1980s, when former Yugoslav television aired
BBC show. Initially, I was somewhat disappointed - some gags
were truly funny, some were hard to understand. Later, when
I watched the entire show for the second time, I learn to
appreciate their humour a little more, but I still don't see
them as undisputed kings of comedy. That notion is
strengthened with my experiences with Monty Python films
that turned to be disappointments. The only exception is
LIFE OF BRIAN, directed in 1979 by Terry Jones. Before
watching I had entire film spoiled thanks to my friend who
happened to be most enthusiastic Monty Python fan. The
resulting lack of surprises didn't prevent huge outbursts of
laughter when I watched LIFE OF BRIAN for the first time.
Interestingly enough, LIFE OF BRIAN is somewhat obscure
chapter in recent film histories. It could be explained with
the fact that it tackles subject which is rather sensitive
for too many people around the world - religion, or to be
precise, fundaments of Christian religion. The movie
protagonist is Brian of Nazareth (played by Graham Chapman),
ordinary bloke from Judea who just happened to be born few
blocks away from Jesus. He doesn't like the fact that he is
bastard son of Roman centurion, and his hatred of Romans
leads him to join People's Front of Judaeo, group of rather
idle revolutionaries. Their attempts to overthrow Roman yoke
are mostly unsuccessful and in the process, Brian not only
brings the attention of the authorities, but also of the
masses that see long awaited Messiah in him.
For me, LIFE OF BRIAN is the best Monty Python film because,
unlike in all the rest, Monty Python jokes are held together
with more or less coherent plot. But that doesn't mean that
the film is conventional in any other sense. For example,
all members of Monty Python team are playing different
characters, yet in doing so they give each of them something
unique, so even those viewers who are unfamiliar with Monty
Python's unconventionality won't notice it. It is hard to
single out the best one among that multitude of characters
and incredible performances, but Graham Chapman as Brian is
probably the best answer. His performance is especially
touching when we take into account that the actor died few
years after the finishing of the film. Other good episodes
also stand - like Terry Jones as Brian's mother Mandy, John
Clues as revolutionary leader Redge, Michael Pallin as
Pilate, Michael Pallin as Ex-Leper and Eric Idle as Stan who
wants to be called Loretta. Even Terry Gilliam, the least
recognisable part of the team, has impressive role of
Jailer, and the other actors are fine too, including Sue
Jones-Davies as Judith, the only real girl among
revolutionaries.
Jokes in this film aren't just verbal, but visual too. The
film is directed by Terry Jones, whose latter record wasn't
that impressive (ERIK THE VIKING). But, in the barren and
simple settings of Tunisia provide quite adequate setting
for the whole story, and Jones is doing fine job. Gilliam's
animation is used only in opening titles, so it is not too
distracting. Members of Monty Python team also used greater
creative freedom of feature film, and provided this film
with enough quantities of four-letter words, blood and gore.
Graham Chapman entered movie history as the main participant
in the most spectacular film scene that involves full
frontal male nudity.
Some Christians, naturally, didn't like this film. It was
considered blasphemous, theatres showing it became favourite
target of picketing Christians, and Norway banned it. Those
who see this film as an attack on Christianity and Judaism
may have some point, although the film authors defended
their work as satire not on religion itself, but the way
religion is presented to the masses. Some jokes in this film
are hard to understand without familiarity with biblical
movies; members of Monty Python team probably noticed that
people in such movies hardly talk in behave in the way
normal people would. Jesus (who appears in a cameo role
played by Kenneth Colley) is mostly left out of picture, and
film concentrates on his contemporaries, but some parallels
with biblical events are impossible to ignore (miracles,
crucifixion etc.). Movie could be viewed as an attack not on
religion itself, but on its most absurd and dangerous forms,
like blind faith and fanaticism that accompanies it. The
criticism of fundamentalism and traditionalism on the right
is nicely contrasted with the way this film takes stabs at
radicalism on the left side of political spectrum. People's
Front of Judaea and their rivals in the Judaean political
underground could be viewed as author's commentary on
various extreme left-wing groups drowned in self-destructive
factionalism and even more irrationalism acts of terrorism
that marked 1970s. Some humour in this film is less
ambitious, like farcical and surreal scene of UFO abduction,
which could be seen as authors' comment on STAR WARS
crazyness. But even in such jokes, humour is great, although
some, like the one involving wall graffiti, require benefits
of the classical education. Some jokes, on the other hand,
aren't very funny or that effective.
But, despite those flaws, LIFE OF BRIAN remains one of the
best underapreciated films made in last hundred years. Time
would silence its critics, and new generations would watch
it, laugh and think about its messages. Probably the best
homage to LIFE OF BRIAN happened in 1982, during Falkland
War. Same as the film's protagonist, surviving crew of HMS
Sheffield, sinking British warship, found comfort and
encouragement in the ending song and its immortal lyrics
"Always Look on the Bright Side of Life".
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Bonjour tristesse (1958)
These days teenagers are supposed to get famous by making
successful careers as pop singers, actors or fashion models
or, if everything else fails, by gunning down their
classmates. It is almost inconceivable for teenager to reach
fame by writing best-seller books. In 1954 French author
Franoise Sagan did just that, by writing novel BONJOUR
TRISTESSE and becoming household name before her 20th
birthday. The novel was so influential that even Hollywood
got interested and four years later Otto Preminger directed
its screen adaptation.
The protagonist of the film is Cecile (played by Jean
Seberg), sixteen-year old girl who lives in Paris together
with her rich playboy father Raymond (played by David
Niven). Accustomed to all kinds of luxury, Cecile not only
approves, but also actually encourages Raymond's decadent
lifestyle that involves constant womanising. Two of them are
going to spend one summer at their luxurious villa at French
Riviera, accompanied by Raymond's latest girlfriend Elsa
(played by Mylene Demongeot). Summer idyll is interrupted
with the arrival of Anne (played by Deborah Kerr), Raymond's
old love interest, which came to visit their villa. Even the
briefest of encounters is enough to re-ignite romance
between Anne and Raymond. Soon, Elsa is out of the picture
and Raymond and Anne announce their intention to marry.
Cecile at first doesn't mind, but when Anne begins
establishing her control over Raymond and endangering
Cecile's carefree lifestyle, she becomes jealous. Her
animosity towards Anne would lead her to conduct romantic
intrigue with unexpected consequences.
The plot of this film, as well as its setting - closed
circle of idle rich people whose lives are one big endless
party - is hardly original, and it was used in thousands of
soap operas. Director Otto Preminger was quite aware of the
shallowness of content, and tried his best to mimic it with
style. BONJOUR TRISTESSE is nicely photographed, features
good costumes, pretty locations of French Riviera and nice
musical score by Gabriel Auric (although the title theme,
sung by Juliette Greco, seems somewhat overplayed). The
acting is very good - Jean Seberg is quite convincing as
spoiled and cruel teenage brat, and Deborah Kerr does her
best to make her character attractive to Raymond despite
having competition in girl with half of her age. David
Niven, on the other hand, seems quite relaxed in the role of
charming playboy that almost became his trademark. Even
Mylene Demongeot brings some texture and charm to terribly
stereotypical role of brainless bimbo. Unfortunately,
Preminger sometimes likes to experiment too much and allows
such experiments to get in the way of the story. His idea to
make contrast between Cecile's past in the Riviera with her
present and equally shallow life in Paris by using shooting
the latter in black and white seems somewhat snobbish. He
also uses Cecile's voiceover narration that is often
monotonous and tells the obvious. However, although such
experiments fail, BONJOUR TRISTESSE is still very good film
to watch - Hollywood soap opera at its best, nicely done and
still entertaining after many decades.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Right Stuff, The (1983)
People who enjoy science fiction are often faced with
unpleasant surprises due to the improper labelling of
novels, stories, comic books or movies. Often science
fiction aficionados find material, previously labelled as
science fiction, to be pure fantasy or supernatural horror,
or rather simple techno-thriller. In such cases, mistakes
are understandable - genre boundaries are never clearly
marked. But, I believe there are really few cases when a
movie labelled as science fiction actually happens to be
straight historical epic. Such thing occurred in former
Yugoslavia some fifteen years ago, when national
distributors gave such treatment to THE RIGHT STUFF, 1983
film directed by Philip Kaufman.
The mistake of the distributors could be explained with the
fact that the official poster of the film features men in
space suits. But THE RIGHT STUFF film isn't even fiction. It
was based on the non-fiction book by Tom Wolfe, covering the
early years of American space program. The plot of the film
begins in 1947 when few people heard of Edwards Air Force
Base, major test site for experimental planes. The major aim
of test flights is to determine ability of manned aircraft
to reach 1 Mach speed and thus break the sound barrier. Many
pilots tried to achieve that goal and many paid with their
lives for such bravado. But one quiet pilot, Chuck Eager
(played by Sam Shaped) succeeds and thus gives example for
whole new generation of test pilots, determined to enter
history books by breaking new speed records. Ten years
later, Soviets have launched "Sputnik" marking the beginning
of the Space Age. In order to regain national prestige, US
government decides to be the first to send man into space.
Best Air Force, Navy and Marine pilots are recruited into
program, but not Yeager, because he lacks college education
and desired all-American image.
In one of critics' polls THE RIGHT STUFF was named as one
among top 10 films made in 1980s. Such high position could
be explained with the fact that Kaufman's film looks quite
atypical for its time. With more than three hours of length
and epic scope it looked more suitable for 1950s and 1960s -
age when Hollywood used to make films larger than life. But
the real reason lies in the fact that it was made by truly
remarkable and talented filmmaker. Philip Kaufman created
reputation in 1970s by using all the opportunities of that
Golden Age in order to create original, memorable movies.
THE RIGHT STUFF was the last of them, swan song of an era
when producers allowed directors to spend big bucks on
unusual, risk-taking "artsy" projects.
THE RIGHT STUFF is unusual because it lacks many standard
elements of Hollywood film. The plot is almost non-existent
and not very coherent; the story, featuring many interesting
incidents and anecdotes, shifts focus from the old
generation of test pilots, embodied in Yeager, to new
generation of the astronauts. The film also lacks
conventional protagonist - Yeager (who also appears in small
cameo) remains the true hero of the film, but equal time and
exposure is also given to other astronauts and their wives,
making this movie into ensemble piece. That gave opportunity
for Kaufman to use multitude of great acting talents, until
that specialised only for bit or character roles. Sam
Shepard is great as Yeager, war hero whose greatest
achievement - breech of the sound barrier - remained
obscured in history books, probably due to his own modesty.
On the surface, he lacks personality compared with his hyped
and more fortunate astronaut colleagues, but Shepard gives
texture to this character with subtle gestures and phrases.
Shepard's performance is followed with great acting by Ed
Harris as clean-cut Marine (and future politician) John
Glenn. Young Dennis Quaid is more than fine as arrogant
fighter jock Gordo Cooper, and this arrogance is mirrored in
his friend and most tragic figure of Virgil Grissom,
superbly played by Fred Ward. Always reliable character
actor Scott Glenn provides some comic relief as Navy aviator
and (arguably) first American man in space Alan Shepard.
Kaufman left room for female talents to excel too - Barbara
Hershey, Pamela Reed, Veronica Cartwright and Mary Jo
Deschanel are great as pilots' wives. Royal Dano is also
impressive as menacing figure of Preacher, but the most
memorable performances belong to Donald Moffat as
Vice-President Lyndon B. Johnson and Jane Dornacker as Nurse
Murch.
Great acting talent assembled for this film was mirrored
with Kaufman's superb direction. Most notable of all is the
methods Kaufman uses in order to suggest the passage of
time. The beginning of the film shows test pilots living in
the middle of desert, as virtual unknowns, far away from
strict rules and discipline. Everything seems natural
-Yeager can indulge himself in horse riding just few yards
away from the fastest and most precious aircraft in the
world. In that setting, it's quite normal for important
technical problems to be solved with simple chainsaw and for
the test pilots not to report their ribs being broken before
most important flights. But the times are changing; WW2
alliance with USSR is replaced with Cold War, and "natural"
pilots like Yeager must be replaced with more disciplined,
conventional pilots. Their entire lives become focus of
media frenzy, and their job is subjected to strict rules,
meticulous plans and they must fight the bureaucrats,
publicity-seeking politicians and uncaring scientists (like
former Nazi rocket expert Werner von Braun, played by Scott
Beach) only to preserve their most basic human dignity. This
contrast is underlined with the beautifully edited sequence
- while Yeager conducts his final and most spectacular test
flight in absolute obscurity, "Mercury" astronauts receive
fame and fortune, although some of them even before going in
the space.
Those contrasts and similar effects are achieved with
Kaufman's superb use of poetic movie language. Editing is
great, and photography by Caleb Deschanel provides many
memorable scenes like the funeral in the desert or
astronauts in their suits walking in slow motion (the same
image would be copied in many latter films). Although
Kaufman enjoyed support of NASA and American military, which
provided authentic locations and period equipment, he still
had to use special effects in order to simulate space
flights. Those effects are excellent and they can still fool
the audience accustomed to CGI and real footage of Earth
from outer space. Another fine contribution of this film is
"Oscar"-awarded musical score by Bill Conti; I still tremble
from excitement every time I hear it. It is accompanied with
the use of Holst and Debussy. Some of the songs used in the
background also provide authentic atmosphere of the
historical period.
This film is great, and its cult status is well deserved,
but there are some minor flaws. Some of the "Mercury"
astronauts aren't fleshed out enough (although being played
by fine actors, like Lance Henriksen). Film also lacks
proper closure. On the other hand, most logical conclusion
of the film - landing on the Moon - would require this film
to be more than six hours long. Also, some critics were
prone to attack this film as too Amerocentric and hard on
Russians, who were portrayed as evil monsters, just in line
with most virulent Cold War rhetoric of Reagan's America. In
some of contemporary interviews, Kaufman defended that
approach by claiming that he wanted to make film as
authentic as possible, and in order to do that, he portrayed
Russians not as they were in real life, but as they were
perceived by Americans in early 1960s.
Time has passed; now we don't see astronauts as heroes. In
this age of widespread satellite communications and routine
space missions, those men and women in space suits are seen
as mere maintenance workers. Few young boys want to be
astronauts when they grow up. But this film, sentimental
reminder of the times "when future began", perhaps could
encourage at least some of them to follow "Mercury"
astronauts' footsteps seek new frontiers in the sky. And
even if they decide to stay on Earth, they could still
appreciate THE RIGHT STUFF as an extraordinary piece of
cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Nicholas and Alexandra (1971)
Russian Revolution was not just the most turbulent period in
the history of that great nation. It was regarded as one of
the most important events in the global history, at least
until the fall of the Berlin Wall and subsequent degradation
of Communist ideology to one of the tragic mistakes of human
spirit. As such important event, Russian Revolution inspired
many filmmakers, including even some that contributed a lot
to the history of cinema as art, like Eisenstein. However,
due to ideological reasons, almost all of those films were
presenting the Revolution from the perspective of its
victors, Communists. Western cinema, that was suppose to
offer somewhat different picture, was mostly silent on the
subject. There were, of course, few exceptions, most notable
being celebrated DOCTOR ZHIVAGO by David Lean. Seven years
later, Franklin J. Schaffner directed NICHOLAS AND
ALEXANDRA, another epic that covers the same period, this
time from the perspective of the ultimate losers.
For almost three centuries, Romanov dynasty, using the iron
grip of oriental despotism, ruled Russia and witnessed the
rise of that country into the most powerful empire of
Europe. But, in the same time, Russia is also most backwards
empire in Europe, because autocratic regime bars any serious
reforms and leaves most of the people in utmost poverty and
deprived of basic rights. In 1904, when movie begins, Tsar
Nicholas II (Michael Jayston) is convinced that the things
are good as they are. Soon, the humiliating defeat in the
war with Japan brings the wrath of oppressed masses and
Nicholas reluctantly agrees to begin reforms. But the
attempt is half-hearted, because Nicholas is basically
weakling, unable to be act strongly because of cowardice,
yet unable to compromise because of pride. The woes of his
empire are secondary to the woes of his family - wife
Alexandra (Janet Suzman) and the children, including
haemophilic Alexis. Power vacuum is quickly becoming misused
by many shady characters, including demonic Rasputin (Tom
Baker). But, the real danger emerges only after Russia gets
sucked into World War One, and when the military disaster
shatters any authority of Tsarist regime. The ensuing chaos
would give opportunity to revolutionaries - first moderates
under Kerensky (John McEnery), than radicals under Lenin
(Michael Bryant) and his Bolsheviks.
Based on the novel by Richard K. Massie, screenplay by James
Goldman neatly condenses last thirteen years of Romanov's
rule into three hour long film. Direction by Franklin J.
Schaffner (known for epic films like PLANET OF THE APES and
PAPILLON) is also superb, with segments that balance well
between the intimate tragedy of the last Russian Tsar and
the even greater tragedy that looms in front of him, his
family and country. The film is perhaps less successful in
contrasting the luxurious, almost fairytale life of Tsar and
the utter poverty and misery of his subjects - the unwashed
masses are given role in rather short segments that are
sometimes not so subtle in illustrating the growing
discontent that would lead into revolution. The acting, on
the other hand, is superb. Apart from Jayston, we have many
fine actors in side roles, with Tom Baker being one of the
more humane Rasputins in the long series of actors that used
to portray that mystical personality. Also, the film doesn't
lack spectacle, but the biggest value is great care for
period details, with eye-pleasing production design and
costumes. The film ends brutally, which is somewhat
disappointing, but filmmakers are less guilty for that than
history itself.

Title
Review for Decoy (1995)
Italian visual effects expert Carlo Rambaldi is always going
to be remembered for various impressive bad guys he had
helped create for films like KING KONG or ALIEN. When he was
executive producer for DECOY, Canadian 1995 action thriller
directed by Victor Rambaldi, the result was something which
was only bad and hardly the stuff he is going to be
remembered for.
Plot of this film deals with Travis (played by Robert
Patrick) and Baxter (played by Peter Weller), two superbly
trained mercenaries who used to work together and who are
about to be teamed up again. Reason for that is their former
employer who had obtained a revolutionary new chip. The
competition has learned about that and they start making
treats demanding chip for themselves. So, Travis and Baxter
are hired to protect his daughter. The job is not so simple
because it turns out that the opposition too is made of
dedicated, superbly trained and well-armed professionals.
Cynics would say that Peter Weller and Robert Patrick seem
like an excellent choice for the roles of mercenaries
because they played killing machines in their best known
films (ROBOCOP, TERMINATOR 2). Author of this review tends
to agree with that, but their presence alone is not enough
to save DECOY from well-deserved road to "straight-to-
video" oblivion. Everything else is a complete mess - the
plot is incoherent, the action scenes look terrible, so in
the end DECOY sinks bellow the standards, which are lowest,
even for B movies. The only thing that is relatively
pleasing to the eye is the use of Saskatchewan locations but
the viewers might do themselves a great service if they
watch some documentary instead of this.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968)
Few days ago people of the world had some opportunity to
rest from the usual depressive news about coups, wars,
disasters and presidential adulteries because world media
finally turned their attention to more serene and heavenly
subjects. One of those subjects is U.S. space shuttle
"Endeavour" and its mission with the aim of connecting space
modules - building blocks of the International Space
Station. This news story invigorated many Space Age
enthusiasts, but also filled their hearts with sadness.
Their beloved Space Station, even when becomes finally built
and fully operational in few years, would be far from
fulfilling their dreams. Most of those dreams were inspired
by a future envisioned in 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY by Stanley
Kubrick, the most influential and unique work ever made in
the history of seventh art.
In the small world of cult cinema, 2001 is somewhat shadowed
by other cinematic giants which are either more popular or
pleasing to the audience, either general or cult, or simply
more "earthly" to the mainstream critics and film scholar
who dictate what should be artistic summit or not. Another
thing that makes 2001 overlooked is the fact that its time
might be somewhat pass. Thirty years ago, space exploration
was a novelty able to catch people's imagination and inspire
idealistic visions of the bright future for entire mankind.
These days, almost nobody pays attention to space shuttles
and satellites unless they crash, and materialistic
considerations impede any ambitious plans for the human
presence in space. To the casual observer, 2001 might really
be discarded as the relict of age long gone, product of the
idealistic and naÔve minds, something that can't be
understood by today's cynical and nihilistic viewers,
especially those of Generation X.
Misunderstanding, however, isn't new problem for 2001. Even
during its premiere the movie was generally misunderstood -
critics panned it, because they didn't understand it, and
audience, inspired by contemporary psychedelic trend loved
it for the entirely wrong reasons. Even one of the movie
authors - screenwriter and famous science fiction novelist
Arthur C. Clarke - admitted that even he couldn't know what
the movie was all about. In the next thirty years countless
articles, essays, books, documentaries and scientific
studies would be written with the sole intent of trying to
answer those questions; despite their best efforts, the
audience would still remained confused as during the
premiere. However, the deliberate leaving of unanswered
questions benefited the movie and helped it to survive as
cult favourite for three decades. Mostly because 2001,
unlike most of other movies, has a unique ability to affect
its audience - whether they like the movie or not, or
whether they understand it or not, they can feel they are
experiencing something grand and magnificent, even if they
can't find the proper words to describe it or explain it.
The only thing that can be explained more or less coherently
is plot. The movie begins with the prologue set roughly
4,000,000 years ago in East Africa. Small band of
prehistoric ape-men, including Moonwatcher (Daniel Richter)
lives a poor, short and brutal life, plagued by famine and
under constant danger of predators. One day Moonwatcher
discovers big, black shining monolith. The artefact of
supposedly alien intelligence inspires Moonwatcher to use
intelligence of his own - he discovers the bone as weapon,
which leads to water buffalos as a new source of food for
his tribe. After defeating the rival tribe in a war for
water, Moonwatcher symbolically throws the bone in the air.
In the next shot - often regarded as the most spectacular
transition in the history of cinema - bone transforms in the
space satellite that roams the Earth's orbit 4,000,000 years
later. It is only one of the objects in Earth's orbit, full
of different spaceships, including one that carries Doctor
Heywood Floyd (William Sylvester), American space bureacrat,
to the Moon. Floyd is set to oversee the investigation of
monolith found on the Moon's surface. The monolith emits
signals to Jupiter, and 18 months later, US space ship
Discovery is sent to investigate the fourth planet of our
solar system. The spaceship is manned by two astronauts -
Frank Pool (Gary Lockwood) and Dave Bowman (Keir Dullea),
but actually controlled by HAL 9000, computer equipped with
artificial intelligence (voice by Douglas Rain). During the
voyage, allegedly infallible computer begins to make
mistakes, which forces the human crew to think about
disconnecting it.
Even those who don't like the lack of clarity in 2001 are
forced to admit that, on the technical side, this film
really deserves to praised as one of the milestones in the
history of cinema. Its director, Stanley Kubrick, made great
movies before (LOLITA) and after (A CLOCKWORK ORANGE, filmed
three years later, is actually preferred by mainstream
critics), but in this film he used all his talent to make
something really remarkable. First of all, 10 million US$
budget - something that looked like a fortune and was almost
unimaginable for science fiction at the time - was used to
create very detailed world of future supertechnology. Along
the professional production and costume designers, Kubrick
employed the talents of futurologists and real-life
scientists and  space vehicle designers, which resulted in
the high level of plausibility and authenticity for a
futuristic movie (the real life instruction for a zero
gravity toilet is just the most common example). Another
important element were the groundbreaking special effects;
Kubrick, together with legendary Douglas Trumbull,
introduced many revolutionary techniques that helped the
audience to suspend its disbelief and make studio-recreated
space, including zero gravity look also authentic. Thanks to
those effects, 2001 looks as convincing now as it looked for
the unsuspecting audience thirty years ago (and despite the
fact that we couldn't see such level of technology in
real-life 2001). Finally, Kubrick was also revolutionary in
using non-original music; his choice was superb and some
themes - especially those by Johann Strauss ("An der
schoenen blauen Donau") and Richard Strauss ("Also Spracht
Zarathustra") - would stay forever associated with his
powerful imagery.
The actors of the movie remained mostly forgotten and that
shouldn't surprise anyone, because this is the movie of the
sights, sounds and ideas and not of the great memorable
characters. Most of those characters are either hidden
behind ape-like costumes (Moonwatcher), or presented like
boring bureacrats (Floyd) or astronauts turned emotionally
numb by the boredom of their job (Pool, Bowman). Ironically,
it is the non-human character, HAL, that brings real human
dimension to the events of the movie by expressing genuine
emotions. Furthermore, there are relatively few words spoken
in the entire movie - and most of the lines are trivial and
serve only to illustrate banality and boredom of the life in
the Space Age. The only lines that entered movie lovers'
collective memory are the HAL's famous last words.
2001 is a movie as close to perfection as one movie can be.
Those who deny it such status are probably those who
question its plausibility. We are less than three (one, if
you consider the 1999 segment) years away from the world
presented in the movie, and most of the movie looks dated or
overoptimistic now. Our space technology seems decades, if
not centuries behind those presented in Kubrick's vision.
Our fashions and social customs changed drastically compared
with the late 1960s; the Cold War, that provided material
for one of the more banal conversations in the movie, is
thing of the past. Our computers didn't develop artificial
intelligence. But are all those false predictions reasons
enough for us to downgrade 2001? Is the Orwellian vision
moot because the world in 1984 lacked Big Brother? Should we
discard BLADE RUNNER when November 2019 comes without
replicants in sight? The answer should be no. The movie was
authentic by 1968 standards, and it was very plausible,
taking into consideration contemporary trends. 2001 is a
movie that presents future that probably won't happen, but
also the future that might have happened. Even as false
vision, 2001 remains powerful one, able to inspire us to ask
questions about our existence, our true nature as human
beings and, finally, our future.

Title
Review for Thunderball (1965)
 "Which Bond film is the best?" is a question commonly asked
among filmophiles. There are different answers, but most of
the Bond fans usually name one of the first five films of
the franchise - Bond classics that made character of James
Bond inseparable from the image of Sean Connery. Among those
five films the most popular choice is GOLDFINGER, but
judging by strictly commercial standards, the best Bond film
was made a year later. THUNDERBALL, directed by Terence
Young in 1965, was most profitable film in the history of
the franchise. Eighteen years later, the same film was
subjected to remake in the form of NEVER SAY NEVER AGAIN,
but the reason had less to do with the general quality of
the script and more with unsettled copyright issues. The
original novel was co-authored by series' creator Ian
Fleming and Kevin McClory, who later claimed copyright on
the character. In 1965 producers and McClory were trying to
co-operate, and McClory took part in the screenplay.
The plot begins with British secret agent James Bond (played
by Sean Connery) recuperating in English health spa after
another dangerous but successful mission. By accident, the
spa is located near RAF base that hosts pilots from
different NATO nations. One of them, Lieutenant Derval
(played by Paul Stasino) gets involved in a hijack of Vulcan
bomber that carries two nuclear bombs. This is the work of
SPECTRE, global criminal organisation that blackmails
British and US government, demanding huge amounts of money
in exchange for safe return of the bombs; if SPECTRE doesn't
get paid, the bombs would be detonated on UK and US
mainland. Faced with unprecedented case of nuclear terrorism
British secret service gathers all their top agents,
including Bond, in order to locate the missing plane and
possibly thwart SPECTRE plans. The only clue leads Bond to
Bahamas where he meets pilot's young and beautiful sister
Dominique (played by Claudine Auger), who is currently
cruising Bahamas on the yacht owned by her "uncle" Emilio
Largo (played by Adolfo Celi). Largo doesn't like this,
because he happens to be top SPECTRE operative who had
executed the operation. When Bond and his CIA colleague
Felix Leiter (played by Rik Van Nutter) begin investigating,
they would be faced with many of Largo's henchmen, including
seductive but deadly female assassin Fiona Volpe (played by
Gabriella Paluzzi).
THUNDERBALL was supposed to be the first Bond film, but
aforementioned copyright problems caused producers to choose
DR. NO instead. It turned out to be a good thing for
THUNDERBALL - in 1965 success of previous three films
guaranteed both the huge budgets and huge hype which led to
record performance at the box- office. This success was
justified, because THUNDERBALL fits all the high standards
we might expect from a Bond classic - intelligent script,
realistic characters, breath- taking stunts, spectacular
action, exotic locations and even more exotic women - all
that under superb direction and highest production values of
its time. What was unfortunate for this film is the fact
that it was made a year after GOLDFINGER. In most cases the
unavoidable comparisons between the two usually favour
former over latter. THUNDERBALL is already showing some
weaknesses that would plague Bond series in decades to come.
The script by Richard Maibaum and John Hopkins is not one of
those weaknesses. The motive of nuclear blackmail still
retains down-to-earth realism of the first Bond movies and
it is even more realistic in today's world, when more
nations possess such weapons. The plot, despite a minor hole
or two, works well. Characters, on the other hand,
don't.Character of Bond was, naturally, unchanged; evolution
of the role ceased and that meant that Connery can play him
without contributing anything original. This was supposed to
be compensated with other intriguing characters, but
THUNDERBALL, at least partially, disappoints. Chief villain
Emilio Largo is portrayed as intelligent, efficient yet
menacing, which makes him superior to the laughable villains
of later Bond films. Unfortunately, his character remains
one- dimensional and talents of great Italian actor Adolfo
Celi seem wasted (for the author of this review additional
problem is in the fact that he remembers Celi as much
superior villain in SANDOKAN and mini-series BORGIAS).
Bond girls, another important element of the formula, are
here represented with three ladies that would satisfy all
the different tastes, at least when the hair colour is an
issue. Bond's partner Domino, which represents brunettes, is
played by former Miss France Claudine Auger. Although
stunningly beautiful, Domino lack depth in character and
Auger's romantic scenes with Connery lack the right amount
of chemistry. Molly Peters, girl representing blondes, has
smaller but more effective role of Bond's nurse. Both of
them fall in the shadow of Luciana Paluzzi, Italian actress
that represents redheads. Physically attractive, yet
immoral, ready to use her body for nefarious purposes as
well as kill in cold blood, Fiona Volpe could be viewed not
just like femme fatale but also as some kind of Bond's
opposite. To make her character even more rounded, Fiona
Volpe is given some lines that could be interpreted as
screenwriters' answer to feminist accusations over sexist
stereotypes used while creating character of Pussy Galore in
GOLDFINGER.
The lack of dimension within film's character is hard to
notice, because the main attraction of the film lies in
action. Terence Young, who had directed first two Bond
films, does his job more than capably and we hardly notice
that the film lasts more than two hours. The action scenes
are perfect, especially the Vulcan hijacking - one of the
best moments in the history of Bond series. Another
interesting thing about THUNDERBALL is extensive use of
underwater photography; this film is the first to feature
underwater battle scene that would later become one of
trademarks of Bond franchise. The same scene is often
criticised for being too long, but it also provided
something quite new and spectacular for 1960s audiences.
Today's viewers are perhaps less patient, and less able to
overlook obvious gratituitousness of certain scenes (like
Bond using jetpack and thus ruining quite effective opening
scene), but they remain attractive and they don't hinder the
plot (which is not going to be the case in future
instalments). THUNDERBALL is also helped with the creative
talents of composer John Barry who provides new, original
material. The film also feature very goo title song by Tom
Jones, combined with first true Bond-style opening titles.
THUNDERBALL is not the perfect Bond film, but it still
represents the series in its zenith and provides excellent
entertainment even after more than three decades. There is
one flaw, though. True fan of classic Bond could hardly
watch this film without some sadness, knowing that the each
consecutive instalment is going to be worse than before.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for 20,000 Leagues Under the Sea (1954)
Long time ago there weren't such things as computer games,
movies, TV shows or even comic books. So, young boys and
other people yearning to experience strange new worlds of
imagination had to rely on the written word. One of the
people who delivered those worlds was Jules Verne, 19th
Century French novelist who is often regarded as the father
of science fiction genre. There were, of course, authors who
had used elements of science fiction in their works before,
but Verne is the first one whose complete opus is associated
with that particular genre. On the other hand, Verne's
novels, although definitely belonging to the genre, are in
their nature adventure stories, and thus responsible for
future misconception of science fiction as nothing more than
worthless juvenile escapism. Escapist or not, Verne's work
provides entertainment to its reader, and even today we are
still fascinated with his technological prophecies, although
many of them became obsolete with the passage of time. The
best known Verne's novel and one of the classics of the
adventure literature is 20,000 LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA, mother
of all underwater exploration novels. Its popularity among
the readers was tremendous, but the 20th Century filmmakers
were rather reluctant to adapt it to the big screen, mostly
due to the huge technical problems associated with the
production. Some of those problems were solved in 1954 when
Disney produced its version, directed by Richard Fleischer,
one of the very first films shot with the use cinemascope
technology.
The plot begins in 1868 when numerous ships are rammed and
sank by huge and unknown object. Surviving sailors bring
stories about sea monster, creating hysteria in the world's
ports. Professor Arronax (played by Paul Lukas), French
marine scholar visiting San Francisco, is asked by US
government to join expedition that should investigate the
phenomenon. Arronax boards US Navy vessel, together with his
trusted servant and apprentice Conceille (played by Peter
Lorre) and Ned Land (played by Kirk Douglas), cocky expert
harpoonist. The expedition spends many months in fruitless
search, until it finally encounters the sea monster in
violent collision. Arronax, Conseille and Land are thrown
overboard and after a while they stumble on the object of
their search. To their great surprise, they realise that the
"sea monster" is actually man-made submarine. Its crew, led
by mysterious Captain Nemo (played by James Mason) take them
as prisoners. For the next few months they would experience
numerous adventures and witness many wonders of the
underwater world. In the same time, while Arronax tries to
reason with Nemo and convince him that he should share his
discoveries with the rest of the world, Land plots escape.
20,000 LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA is embodiment of Disney at his
best - family entertainment that superbly uses brand-new
wonders of film technology. Special effects, combined with
the underwater photography, are still impressive after
almost four decades, and the "Oscar" award for them is well
deserved, especially after we take into account the use of
brand new cinemascope technology. Production design of
"Nautilus" was also very good, both original and faithful to
Verne's vision. The result is a film that should be viewed
as a very good adaptation of the science fiction classic, in
many ways comparable to the adaptation of H.G. Wells' THE
WAR OF THE WORLDS, produced one year earlier.
Of course, technical innovation and visual splendour isn't
enough for a movie to be successful. Script by Earl Felton
took some liberties with the original text, which is quite
understandable. Some of the situations are quite
recognisable from the novel; on the other hand, Felton
spiced up the characters and, in some way, improved Verne's
material. The biggest difference is the moral ambiguity;
Nemo, played by James Mason, is portrayed as genius whose
disgust with civilisation and conventional morality reaches
almost pathological levels, while, in the same time, deeply
personal and quite understandable causes of such disgust
provide strong emotional impact, making that character very
alive, believable and almost sympathetic. Land,
enthusiastically played by Kirk Douglas in his prime, is
portrayed as a "normal" and even extremely likeable man,
but, on the other hand, his actions portray him as not very
bright. Paul Lukas as narrator is shadowed by those two,
same as Peter Lorre's Conseille, rather unsuccessful and
almost pathetic attempt of comic relief.
Since the film was targeted towards family audiences, some
of the darker and more adult aspects of the story were
compensated with rather unnecessary plot additions intended
to lighten up the mood of the film. First we see Kirk
Douglas doing the song number in the beginning, and, later,
we have a pet seal as much more successful comic relief.
Those elements give some charm to the film, but in the same
time they reduce film's realism. On the other hand, Felton's
script gives a different but more powerful ending to Verne's
story. Obviously inspired by the dark realities of Cold War
and looming threat of nuclear holocaust, the violent and
spectacular finale is very effective warning about the
danger of uncontrolled scientific progress. Verne, who had
lived in an age of scientific optimism, would probably
disagree with such ending, but, on the other hand, 20,000
LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA is a film worthy enough to be part of
his ever lasting legacy.

Title
Review for Split Images (1992) (TV)
The author of this review must admit somewhat embarrassing
fact that he used to be (and sometimes still is) biased
towards certain national cinematographies. For example, in
1980s I used to consider Australian movies superior to
Hollywood. In this decade, I feel almost the same towards
Canada and its booming cinematography, both Anglophone and
Francophone. I like Canadian movies, because they almost
always look different from Hollywood - and it doesn't matter
whether they are made as an ambitious art films, or
commercial genre products. But, every now and then, I'm
reminded that non-Hollywood origin of a English- speaking
film should never be the indicator of a movie's quality.
Such was the case with SPLIT IMAGES, 1992 television
thriller made in Canada. The screenplay by Pete Hamill and
Vera Appleyard is based on the novel by Elmore Leonard,
whose fiction is often used by different film-makers in last
few decades. The plot deals with an extremely rich man who
had developed a rather strange and not very healthy hobby -
he kills people and shoots their last moments on video. Of
course, as is the case with such movies, he seems
unstoppable in his murderous rampage until one pushy female
reporter and one tough cop join force in order to bring him
down.
Perhaps the plot by Elmore Leonard, so useful to many film
authors, was really promising. Perhaps something of that
promise remained in the script. But the execution of those
ideas was inept, with the director Sheldon Larry more eager
to demonstrate new wonders of video technology than to tell
a coherent story. The use of opera music in important scenes
look even more irritating. The actors in this movie, on the
other hand, seems generally disinterested in this project,
and they mostly sleepwalk through their roles. Presence of
such good actors like Nicholas Campbell and Maury Chaykin is
almost unnoticeable. And so should be this film, condemned
to well-deserved oblivion.
Review written on September 15th 1999

Title
Review for To Live and Die in L.A. (1985)
If the current trends of Hollywood filmmaking continue, we
are probably five or six years away from the moment when the
1980s would become the next Golden Age of movie nostalgia.
Although some Hollywood products already use the last decade
as a background for their stories (mostly in ironic way,
like GROSSE POINTE BLANK and ROMY & MICHELLE'S HIGH SCHOOL
REUNION), some time should pass before the good memories of
that era overcome the bad ones. Until that happens, 1980s
would be remembered as the Decade of Greed, when the
revolutionary ideals of 1960s turned into its cruel,
materialistic opposite and the money became the only thing
that matters. Contemporary movies are good in illustrating
what was bad for the people who had to live in those times.
One of such movies, one that probably brings the essence of
1980s to the screen, is William Friedkin's TO LIVE AND DIE
IN L.A.
The money isn't just the symbolic motive in the film, it is
the major elements of the plot. Rick Masters (Willem Dafoe)
is an ex-convict who used his artistic abilities in order to
become one of the best counterfeiters in L.A. Being too
intelligent to fall into police traps, and ruthless enough
to eliminate anybody or anything that could jeopardise his
career, Masters managed to elude law for years and became
well- connected. Richard Chance (William L. Petersen) is a
Secret Service agent, adrenaline junkie whose life gets new
meaning after his partner got killed by Masters. However,
his plans of bringing the counterfeiter down meet one
obstacle after another. Finally he sets up a final sting,
but his superiors deny him the necessary money. Being
frustrated, and against the reluctance of his new partner
John Vukovich (Bill Pankow), he decides to get the money by
robbing underworld courier. Their plan backfires with almost
tragic consequences when their target turns out to be
undercover FBI agent, but Chance decides to carry out his
scheme anyway.
Like FRENCH CONNECTION, one of his previous masterpieces,
this Friedkin's movie was inspired by real life. Gerrald
Petievich, author of the novel that later served as basis
for his screenplay, spent many years working as a Secret
Service agent. That turned to be useful for the portrayal of
that law enforcement agency, not much utilised by Hollywood.
Secret Service millieu was also cleverly used in order to
bring the viewer into the Decade of Greed; the beginning
scene where the movie's hero works as a part of presidential
security detail is a nice opportunity to hear Reagan's
speech that could illustrate the political and economical
notions of those times.
Ultramaterialistic and egotistical view of the world is
shared by almost any character in the movie. Willem Dafoe
brilliantly portrays dangerous and intelligent psychopath,
whose ruthlessness and lack of any moral fibber doesn't seem
like affliction in the Reagan years; on the contrary, those
qualities actually makes Masters socially acceptable.
Compared with him, and all the other side characters that
want their "piece of the action", two heroes on the side of
Law seem like losers. Instead of being a classical good guy,
Secret Service agent Richard Chance (portrayed by William
Petersen in his most impressive role so far) is nothing more
than a lunatic whose adrenaline addiction and madness work
against his better judgement; his sidekick, who should serve
as those "better judgement" is a weakling and sentimental
fool that gets suckered in the end. In such surroundings of
moral decay, the not so happy, yet surprising ending doesn't
seem out of line (although the very last shot leaves too
much questions unanswered).
The dark atmosphere of L.A. - city of glamour and moral
decay - is nicely captured by William Friedkin's directing
skills. The tight and realistic scripts with memorable
characters (portrayed by such capable actors like John
Turturro, Dean Stockwell, Debra Feuer, Darlanne Fleugel and
Steve James) gave opportunity for Friedkin to use another
gimmick that made him famous in his 1971 masterpiece - great
car chase. That scene alone, with lot of realism, thrills
and surprise twists, is worth seeing the rest of the film.
The soundtrack, provided by now almost forgotten band "Wang
Chung", is also one of the more memorable of that decade. In
every case, TO LIVE AND DIE IN L.A. is one of the rare
movies in which Hollywood actually tries to tell some
unflattering truths about the world and succeeds in it.

Title
Review for Three Days of the Condor (1975)
One of the most immediate consequences of the social turmoil
in 1960s was the global loss of faith towards the
institutions of government. For the Americans, feeling of
mistrust into their government, born out of traumatic events
of Kennedy assassination, finally peaked immediately after
Watergate and turned into full-blown paranoia. The
unpleasant discovery of government's tendencies to use their
all- powerful resources against helpless and innocent
citizens for some hidden agenda caused a lot of anxiety.
Such anxiety influenced Hollywood too, who launched a whole
series of political thrillers about government conspiracies.
The trend, with THE PARALLAX VIEW and ALL THE PRESIDENT'S
MEN as the brightest example, was very popular for a while,
but then the audience gradually got tired of complicated
plots dealing with arcane political intrigues and subtle yet
deadly techniques of manipulation and control. However,
while the trend lasted, it produced some films that,
although hardly masterpieces, look superior to today's
attempts to resurrect sub-genre of paranoia. Nice example is
THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR, interesting 1975 thriller by
director Sydney Pollack.
The movie begins in the New York office that serves as a
front for the research division of CIA, specialised in
reading and analysing books, comics and similar material.
One of those researches is mild-manneredTurner (Robert
Redford), who goes out to buy lunch only to see all of his
colleagues brutally murdered upon return. In the state of
shock and afraid for his life, Turner contacts his
superiors, but the rendezvous intended to lead to his
debriefing ends with shooting. Barely escaping alive, Turner
is now convinced that someone within the CIA wants him dead,
probably the same person who ordered the massacre. Forced to
go underground, Turner kidnaps Kathy (Fay Dunaway),
beautiful lady photographer, in order to hide in her
apartment and figure out what is really going on.
The script by talented Lorenzo Semple Jr. (who wrote, among
the others, paranoia classic THE PARALAX VIEW), was very
good in bringing the atmosphere of anxiety and mistrust to
the screen. Unfortunately, director Sidney Pollack, who
earned a lot of respect working on entirely different types
of movies (melodramas and comedies), took the dark overtones
too seriously - the camera in film is simply too dark, and
the viewer must pay a lot of attention in order to find out
what is really going on. Pollack, on the other hand, used
some very subtle but effective techniques to depict violence
- something often ignored in today's cinemas. The characters
are well-drawn and played by stellar cast. Robert Redford is
adequate for the role, although his presence might seem too
charismatic for a ordinary CIA analyst caught in a life and
death situation. Fay Dunaway was much better in a rather
thankless role whose impact was undermined with unnecessary
romance. Max von Sydow was very effective as creepy but
cultivated professional killer with personal code of honour,
same as always reliable Cliff Robertson as Turner's cynical
boss. Despite some flaws, and despite the lack of clarity in
some segments, the plot seems realistic and plausible. At
the finale, however, this movie loses a lot of impact due to
the moralistic diatribe that came out of thin air. But, all
things considered, THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR might pass as
both entertaining and very intelligent thriller.

Title
Review for Spiral Staircase, The (1946)
One of the most interesting (or disturbing) elements of today's
popular culture is media obsession with the serial killer phenomena.
This obsession is particularly visible in the area of motion picture
industry, with multitude of serial killer films being produced by
Hollywood in the last decade. However, serial killers weren't that
unfamiliar to the filmmakers in previous decades. One of the films
that gives insight in the way Hollywood handled such material in its
Golden Age is THE SPIRAL STAIRCASE, 1946 Hitchcockian thriller
directed by Robert Siodmak.
The plot, based on the novel by Ethel Lina White, is set in small New
England town in the first decades of 20th Century. Local residents
have been recently affected by the series of murders, in which all the
victims are women affected with some kind of mental or physical
disabilities. Helen Capel (played by Dorothy McGuire) is beautiful
girl who works as a servant in the mansion of old and bed-ridden Mrs.
Warren (played by Ethel Barrymore). Since she happens to be mute since
childhood, everyone in the mansion, including Professor Albert Warren
(played by Ed Brent), Mrs. Warren's stepson, is concerned for her
safety and advise her to stay within the locked doors of the house
until the killer is caught. Mrs. Warren, on the other hand, warns
Ethel that the real danger lurks within the house, but Helen doesn't
believe her. Instead she would leave the mansion because of the young
and handsome Doctor Parry (played by Kent Smith) who wants to marry
her. But, before that happens, she must stay in the house for the
night, but soon she would find that Mrs. Warren's warning is quite
justified.
Although remade twice for the television, THE SPIRAL STAIRCASE hardly
comes to mind when people think about most important genre films in
1940s Hollywood. It may be argued that the great Alfred Hitchcock and
his work shadowed the film's reputation, but the real reason probably
lies in the fact that the film was at least a few decades ahead of its
time. Those who pay attention could see that many horror and thriller
directors in later decades have borrowed heavily from THE SPIRAL
STAIRCASE. The most obvious examples are the use of killer's POV,
strange noises in the dark being mistaken for the killer by its
potential victim and sexual activity being equal to death sentence -
two cliches almost inseparable from slasher movies. However, what
separates this film from its 1980s imitators is the lack of gore and
shock tactics. Siodmak relies on suspense, and manages to make film
truly exciting, by creating generally creepy atmosphere. His
directorial skills help this movie in overcoming even such cliched
setting of isolated country mansion in the stormy night. Even the
viewers who are accustomed to such sort of films would be genuinely
scared by Siodmak's masterful manipulation.
The most valuable of this film are characters, though. Scriptwriter
Mel Dinelli managed to create some really interesting personalities,
memorable despite their relatively short appearance in 81 minutes of
this film. Heroine is superbly played by Dorothy McGuire, although her
character doesn't say a word. But the supporting characters are also
excellent, being played by always reliable character actors. Elsa
Lanchester is truly memorable and quite believable as alcoholic cook,
and Ethel Barrymore truly shines as bed-bound yet intelligent
matriarch. Unfortunately, obligatory Hollywood romance brought
character that isn't that interesting - good doctor, played by Kent
Smith, which isn't that necessary for the course of film. But,
thankfully, and against the Hollywood conventions, his character
leaves the movie before the end and the damsel in distress has to rely
only on herself. Characters in this film are even more interesting
when we try to understand them in psychoanalytical context - THE
SPIRAL STAIRCASE actually tries to explain serial killer motives as
the consequence of masculine impotence. Use of Freudian psychology in
thrillers would become much more fashionable in later decades, thanks
to Hitchcock who made it one of his trademarks. Siodmak is in such
matters, of course, less explicit but equally effective as the great
Master of Suspense, which makes THE SPIRAL STAIRCASE one of the true
gems of classic Hollywood.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for In the Name of the Father (1993)
Old saying about "life imitating art" has a rather sinister
meaning for the author of this review. Reason for that is IN
THE NAME OF THE FATHER, 1993 film directed by famed Irish
director Jim Sheridan. Due to some bizarre, hardly
believable and now totally forgotten circumstances that
dealt with internal politics of his country, the author of
this review, in rather short, but extremely unpleasant
period of his life, had to endure the ordeal in some
frightening details similar to the one experienced by the
movie protagonist. To make things even more sinister, my
ordeal had practically coincided with the production of the
film and later, while IN THE NAME OF FATHER reached Croatian
cinemas, I had to wait for the video distribution in order
to come to grips with the dark and traumatic subject of the
movie. The most sinister fact remains that this film was
actually based on the true story.
The movie begins in 1974, during the peak of IRA terrorist
campaign. Gerry Conlon (played by Daniel Day-Lewis) is a
young petty thief from Catholic portion of Belfast who
doesn't care about politics, but that doesn't stop him from
getting into trouble, both with British police and IRA. In
order to save his life, his estranged father Giuseppe (Pete
Postlethwaite) sends him to London where Gerry continues his
life of squatting, doing drugs and comitting petty crime. In
the meantime, IRA bomb exploded in Guilford pub, leaving
five innocent people killed, and police is given broad
authorities in order to bring the perpetrators to justice.
For the task force led by Robert Dixon (Corin Redgrave),
Gerry, his countryman Paul Hill (John Lynch) and couple of
their friends represent the ideal suspects. They are all
arrested, and threatened, harassed and tortured until they
finally confess the crime they didn't commit. That
confession sends not only Gerry to the prison for the rest
of his life, but his own father is implicated and forced to
share the prison cell with him. At first, Gerry is
embittered and full of self-pitty, but seeing the stoical
and moral example of his father, he begins to change and
actually fight for his freedom. The defence lawyer Gareth
Pierce (Emma Thompson) begins long legal battle in order to
overturn the conviction.
Although the movie was based on Gerry Conlon's
autobiographical book, and although his premiere coincided
with the first major breakthrough in Northern Ireland's
peace process, IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER actually is not the
political film in the strictest of sense. The Troubles and
real life tragedy of the innocent people who were caught in
the crossfire serve only as a background for more intimate,
universal and apolitical story about two Conlons. Screenplay
by Terry George (that actually took many liberties with real
life for dramatic purposes) puts the real emphasis on the
relationship between Gerry and his father Giueseppe - and
the great emotional gap between them, the gap that would be
bridged under the cruellest of circumstances. Unfortunately,
politics does play a role in this film, and in that regard,
screenplay is somewhat weaker than when it deals with
Conlons. Sheridan does indeed give a sense of sad Northern
Ireland's reality in a very energetic and powerful riot
scene in the beginning, but the rest of this two hour film
barely rises to that standard. The second part of the film,
that actually covers Conlon's prison years, is more
formulaic and sometimes even cliched. The only exception is
the "fire tears" scene, but, although powerful, it doesn't
carry the film.
What actually carries IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER are the
superb acting perfomances. Daniel Day-Lewis is simply
splendid in the very demanding role of the careless, stupid
and unsympathetic youth that actually changes into strong,
intelligent crusader for his own cause. But the real gem in
this movie is powerful and unforgettable performance by Pete
Postlethwaite, character actor whose moving portrayal of
Giuseppe as quiet, simple but morally strong man is actually
overshadowing Lewis. Other actors are also good, including
Emma Thompson, whose role of defence attorney should have
been expanded.
The main problem I have with IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER,
problem that, I must admit, has something to do with my
experience, is in the fact that movie doesn't actually
tackle some important and universal question. For example,
story of Gerry Conlon could be used to illustrate how frail
are such noble concepts like "human rights" and "due
process" even in countries that pride themselves with
centuries of democratic standards. It could also illustrate
how powerless individual can be when he is picked by
all-powerful state, and that, under the certain
circumstances, even the Western democracies can be as mean
towards the people as totalitarian regimes. IN THE NAME OF
FATHER, by concentrating mostly on an interesting, but in a
global scale rather local issue of Northern Ireland, and on
other level, personal issue of Conlons, failed to explore
such areas. Which is pitty, because this film, although
still being good, had capacity to be really great.

Title
Review for Falling Over Backwards (1990)
Millennium, whether it was real or just a media hype for
those who had missed math classes in school, was good
opportunity for many people to ponder about changes in human
society in the last 1000 years and also a chance to think
about future trends. One of such trends, which might prove
to be the most disturbing, is the collapse of traditional
family and resulting alienation of individuals in modern
industrial societies. Generational gaps are becoming bigger
and bigger - modern people are getting alienated from their
parents; old people, instead of being treated with respect,
are usually shoved into nursing homes. Modern people are
also having problems not only with past generations, but
with future too. Industrial nations all over the world are
having big problems with declining populations - economic
conditions and urban way of life discourages people not only
from having big families, but also from having children in
the first places. Some of the dark prophets of 2000 are
already painting pictures of anti-Malthusian nightmare -
fewer and fewer people working overtime to feed multitudes
in nursing homes, only to realise that nobody would be there
to support them when they get old. Those trends might be
disturbing, but they could also provide some inspiration for
romantic comedies. Interesting example is FALLING OVER
BACKWARDS, relatively unknown 1990 Canadian film directed by
Mort Ransen and one of my personal favourites.
The protagonist of this film is Mel (played by Saul
Rubinek), Jewish schoolteacher who was emotionally
devastated with recent divorce. After a while, the
lamentations about good old times give him a bizarre idea
how to improve his life and overcome loneliness. He not only
rents a house in his old neighbourhood, but also brings his
old wheelchair-bound father Harvey (played by Paul Soles),
out of nursing home. Their life, which is hardly idyllic,
gets complicated with the presence of Jackie (played by
Julie St- Pierre), their French Canadian landlady who is
also young and attractive woman. Tension is caused not only
by her strong feminist ideas being opposed to Harvey's
traditional worldview, but also with Mel realising that he
loves her.
Everyone who makes Top 100 or Top 10 lists of best films
ever made must reconcile with the fact that such lists could
never objective or accurate. Not only because of subjective
criteria, but also because many times really excellent films
never get necessary attention. This little film, shot in
Canada for a small amount of money with the cast of relative
unknowns is one of such examples. FALLING OVER BACKWARDS
also shows that Canadian cinema can be superior to
Hollywood; romantic comedy, probably the most despised genre
among critics today, could be turned into interesting,
intelligent and truly touching film without Hollywood big
budgets and media hype. Screenwriter and director Mort
Ransen does this by creating bizarre yet everyday characters
faced with problems and situations most of us could relate
to. Humour in this film is provided by unusual, yet
believable situations, and all the characters are treated
with respect and made likeable despite having serious flaws.
The resulting "feelgood" atmosphere never descends into
usual Hollywood sappiness, though. Ransen contrasts this
feeling by referring to some very dark, disturbing and
potential controversial issues in this film - suicide,
abortion, domestic violence - but those references never get
overbearing or turn into "politically correct" sermons.
Instead, Ransen even uses them as a source of occasional
laugh or two - something that could be quite unthinkable in
films made in overly sensitive USA. Ransen also evades
taking the side in the conflict between traditional values
and realities of the modern life - the touching finale of
the film could be viewed as a victory for the both camps.
The use of characters with different ethnic background also
lacks any stereotypes, making them more natural than in
PC-infested Hollywood.
Atmosphere in the film is provided with simple but good
musical score by Milan Kimlycka, where old songs play the
role of Greek chorus. Ransen as director didn't experiment -
his directorial techniques are as ascetic and everyday as
movie locations. However, plain look of this movie doesn't
hide the depth of its content. Ransen leaves most of the
work to actors, and they use such opportunity to give
impressive and memorable roles. Most interesting thing is
this movie is a rare opportunity to see Saul Rubinek, one of
the most recognisable character actors in Hollywood films,
in a lead role. Rubinek obviously enjoyed such opportunity
and his Mel is walking the fine balance between comedy and
tragedy. Rubinek's partners are also great - Paul Soles very
effectively turns his initially grumpy character into the
voice of conscience. Julie St-Pierre, on the other hand,
manages to evade any bimboish stereotype of her character by
confronting her attractive feminine looks with tough,
pseudofeminist attitude, thus providing a lot of laughs.
FALLING OVER BACKWARDS, by being film that reconcile good
feelings with real life, as well as entertainment with
common sense, is a truly precious piece of cinema, small,
unknown Canadian film that gives new definition to the term
"hidden gem".
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Little Shop of Horrors (1986)
One of the saddest facts of modern Hollywood is almost total
absence of musicals. Two years ago, it looked like the genre
might be revived with Parker's EVITA and Woody Allen's
EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU. But now almost everyone can agree
that the musicals are nothing but history, at least as long
as Hollywood producers are concerned. The ending chapter in
that bright and shining history were 1980s, with the advent
of MTV and video-clip revolution. With the audience already
accustomed to the three-minute videos, musicals became
obsolete and too expensive form of mixing music with motion
pictures. Despite that, even in such bleak times, couple of
musicals shone, becoming the swan song of the genre. One of
them, LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS by Frank Oz, remains one of the
most memorable viewing experiences of the previous decade.
The interesting thing about that movie is its background.
The screenplay by Howard Ashman was based on his own stage
play, itself based on a movie called LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS,
1960 horror comedy by Roger Corman. The musical loosely
follows the original plot, set in the seedy part of town
called Skid Row. Local flower shop is run by Mr. Mushnik
(Vincent Gardenia), who, seeing no financial perspective,
wants to lay off two of his workers. One of them is nerdy
orphan Seymour Krelborn (Rick Moranis), who dreams about his
colleague, lovely shop clerk Audrey (Ellen Greene). However,
he hasn't got enough courage to express his love, especially
because Ellen goes out with sadistic dentist Orrin Scrivello
(Steve Martin). He finds consolation in his hobby- exotic
plants. One of them, named 'Audrey II', suddenly begins
drawing hordes of customers to Mushnik's shop. Mushnik is
happy, but not for long, because the plant begins to die.
Seymour soon finds out that the only thing that can feed the
plant is human blood. At first, it doesn't seem to be the
problem, but as the plant grows, so do Seymour's moral
dilemmas about possible plant food.
Corman's work had already earned the cult status itself and
Ashman had a difficult task to match its weird quality.
However, thanks to the efforts of composers Miles Goodman
and Alan Menken, the play very successfully used the
opportunity to turn horror comedy into musical, following
the contemporary trend of 1960s nostalgia. Cinematic
adaptation was given to Frank Oz, talented and experienced
entertainer, who had made a reputation working on THE MUPPET
SHOW. The result was splendid combination of Old Hollywood
artistry with the modern 1980s sentiments.
Apart from nostalgic costumes and settings, LITTLE SHOP OF
HORRORS is most recognisable by its music. Songs are
original, yet very in tune with the popular trends of 1960s.
Very ingenious element is the "Supremes"-like trio of three
young singers, who serve as some kind of Greek chorus. Apart
from that, musical numbers don't interrupt the normal plot
like in most other musicals - they actually enhance it. The
best example is a scene when Seymour must make a tough
decision, and the song lyrics illustrates his choice.
The actors in this movie performed beautifully. Rick
Moranis, short Canadian almost always typecast as nerdish
sidekick, here brilliantly uses the opportunity to play main
hero of the movie. His Seymour is a deeply flawed person
born in poverty, and his desire for the plastic-wrapped
middle class reality brings a lot of humour to his
ironically tragic situation. His partner, Ellen Greene, was
very experienced in playing the part of Audrey on stage, so
it shouldn't surprise anyone that the cinematic version
remains the best and most convincing role of her career -
especially her singing of _Suddenly Seymour_ when she
rejects her helium-voice, together with dumb blonde
stereotypes. However, even some supporting actors have their
share of glory, even in short appearances  - Steve Martin as
sadistic dentist, late John Candy as weird radio host, and,
finally, Bill Murray as masochistic dental patient. His
scene with Martin is so funny and so intense, that it should
be worthy of a movie itself.
Stellar performances and catchy tunes overshadowed Frank Oz
and his directorial skills. The best achievement of the
movie was the creature - cannibalistic plant designed by
Lyle Conway; Frank Oz gave the plant a mouth and that was
enough for it to have a human traits. With the help of 40
operators and suggestive voice by Levy Stubbs, 'Audrey II'
should have earned its place in the Hall of Fame for Science
Fiction monsters. Unfortunately, it wasn't meant to be
because the finale of the movie - Seymour's battle with
'Audrey II' - happened to be a little bit disappointing.
Despite that, LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS still remains one of
the most entertaining movies of the previous decade, even
for those who aren't crazy about weird musicals.

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
Among film geeks today it is quite fashionable to despise
Joel Schumacher, especially because of his magnum crimen -
ruining of Batman movie franchise. However, six years ago it
was completely different story - Schumacher was seen as a
saviour of Batman films. First two instalments in the
series, directed by Tim Burton, were often seen as too dark,
too "artsy" and under too much influence from Frank Miller's
DARK NIGHT graphic novel. Many Batman fans desired more
light-hearted and humorous approach, more in line with
popular television series from 1960s. In BATMAN FOREVER
Schumacher managed to deliver the goods and thus paved the
way for the disaster known as BATMAN AND ROBIN.
The protagonist of this film - multimillionaire and
crime-fighting superhero Bruce Wayne a.k.a. Batman (played
by Val Kilmer) - this time has to fight not one but two
supervillains that threaten Gotham City. First of them is
Harvey Dent a.k.a. Two-Face (played by Tommy Lee Jones),
former district attorney who went insane after having his
face scarred by acid. His criminal hordes are going to be
employed by another villain -Edward Nygma a.k.a. Riddler
(played by Jim Carey), scientist and former employee of
Bruce Wayne's business empire who managed to invent the
device that sucks up human brain and increases the IQ of
recipient. While Riddler and Two-Face join forces against
Batman, Bruce Wayne has to deal with some romantic problems
- he is in love with beautiful criminal psychiatrist dr.
Chase Meridian (played by Nicole Kidman), while good doctor
has hots for his charismatic alter ago. In the meantime,
Dick Grayson (played by Chris O'Donnell), young acrobat who
had his parents murdered by Two-Face, becomes Batman's
partner Robin the Boy Wonder.
Weak plot, complete lack of character development and at
least some actors who didn't look particularly interested in
their roles (this is especially the case with Val Kilmer who
wasn't able to fill Michael Keaton's shoes from two previous
films) or went over the top (this is definitely the case
with Tommy Lee Jones and Jim Carey) - all that could have
burried BATMAN FOREVER. But Schumacher somehow manages to
keep the film together, mostly by putting plenty of
spectacular action scenes which display nice special effects
and interesting production design by Barbara Ling, so
different from dark and often not so attractive Gotham
setting in two previous films. There is also much more
humour in this film, and also plenty of references to 1960s
TV show. Some of the actors are very good too - Michael
Gough is always reliable as Wayne's trusted servant Alfred,
while Nicole Kidman with her looks and undeniable charm
manages to transcend script limitations of her character.
Although Elliott Goldenthal couldn't compete with Danny
Elfman, his musical score, as well as the rest of rather
impressive soundtrack, is as pleasing to the ears as the
look of the film is pleasing to the audience's eyes.
Although hardly something that would stay long in viewers'
memory, BATMAN FOREVER is entertaining summer blockbuster,
which shows that even someone with Joel Schumacher's
reputation can make a decent film under proper conditions.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Inside Edge (1993)
When the film features Richard Lynch in the role of chief
villain, you know that you can expect nothing more than a B
grade action movie. However, since this film also featured
Michael Madsen, more than capable character actor, this time
in the role of protagonist, the author of this review
decided to give the film some benefit of the doubt. However,
the very first scenes show clear B grade action credentials
- Madsen plays Richard Montana, tough policeman who raids a
drug warehouse and make life miserable for local crime lord
Mario Gio (played by Lynch). However, the raid was only
partially successful, and Montana is getting the rap. So, he
begins his own private war against Gio, trying to penetrate
his organisation pretending to be corrupt. In the process,
he meets Gio's mistress Gina Zamora (played by Rosie Vela)
and starts relationship with her too.
Although it doesn't stink like many of the similar films
can, INSIDE EDGE is mostly forgettable B grade action
routine. Nobody in this film actually puts much effort,
including Madsen or Lynch, and this is especially case with
uninspired screenwriter William Tannen or director Warren
Clarke. The only not so forgettable element in this film is
presence of former supermodel Rosie Vela, who, apart from
showing her more than impressive looks, shows some of the
singing talent too. However, this isn't reason enough for
viewers to spend hour and half watching a film that they
would, in most likelihood, forget the next day.

Title
Review for Heart of Darkness (1994) (TV)
The author of this review belong to those heretics who don't
think that Coppola's APOCALYPSE NOW represents cinematic
masterpiece. However, although Coppola's film has some other
flaws, the greatest of them all is the disservice done to
the legacy of James Conrad, great English writer who wrote
HEART OF DARKNESS, novel on which APOCALYPSE is based. From
that day, almost any filmmaker who tries to tackle that
novel would have to face comparisons with Coppola's Vietnam
film. However, in 1993, Turner Pictures decided to make
television version of the novel, this time more faithful to
the book.
The plot is, instead of Vietnam in 1960s, set in jungles of
Central Africa in the second half of 19th Century. Greedy
European colonisers are brutally exploiting the natural
resources of Dark Continent, especially ivory. One of
companies specialised in ivory trade hires Captain Marlowe
(played by Tim Roth) for the dangerous mission deep in the
heart of jungle, to the farthest trade station. His task is
to find out why Kurz (John Malkovich), ivory merchant
stationed there, doesn't send ivory any more. Some vicious
rumours are describing Kurz as madman who turned into
charismatic and bloodthirsty leader of the natives.
This film was directed by Nicolas Roeg, well-respected
avant-garde director of the 1970s, and it was probably very
wise decision, because Roeg's specific visual style was
required to make HEART OF DARKNESS as different from
APOCALYPSE as possible. Unfortunately, the script by
Benedict Fitzgerald, although more faithful to the novel
than APOCALYPSE, still fails to avoid similarities. And
Roeg's directing style is hardly the substitute for the lack
of spectacle and sometimes it produces confusion for the
viewers. The atmosphere of absolute horror in the heart of
the jungle was well done, though. The acting is more than
superb. Tim Roth is excellent in the role of Marlowe, and
John Malkovich is also great as Kurz, although nothing can
top Brando's appearance in Coppola's film. More faithful to
the novel, and deprived of Vietnam connotations, HEART OF
DARKNESS is more depressing, because of its pessimism, so
universal for all ages and all dark corners of the world.
HEART OF DARKNESS is good film, but only those who didn't
watch Coppola before could appreciate it fully.

Title
Review for Love Potion No. 9 (1991)
Modern science, contrary to the thousands years of
idealistic philosophy, romantic poetry and fiction, claims
that the love is nothing more than consequence of certain
biochemical processes in human body. Interestingly enough,
this rather un-romantic notion was the premise for romantic
comedy. The name of that comedy was LOVE POTION NO. 9, and
it was written and directed by Dale Launer in 1991.
The protagonist of this film is Paul Matthews (played by
Tate Donovan), nerdy scientist who works in biochemical lab
together with his equally nerdy female partner Diane Farrow
(played by Sandra Bullock). Matthews doesn't have much luck
in his dealings with opposite sex, so the friends tell him
to visit Madame Ruth (played by Anne Croft), old Gypsy
fortune-teller specialised for helping people with romantic
problems. Madame Ruth is ready to improve young scientist's
by offering him "Love Potion No. 8", elixir with powerful
aphrodisiac qualities. Matthews takes it, despite warnings
about some interesting side effects, but real problems arise
when the potion gets in the hand of his partner. Both of
their lives will be turned upside down until they realise
that they are made for each other.
Ancient pop songs seem like a rather strange inspiration for
the films, and it isn't hard to imagine such films being
equally unimpressive as those inspired by video games. LOVE
POTION NO. 9, based on the "golden oldie" performed by The
Clovers, justifies that skepticism. Dale Launer's humour is
not very effective, even bellow the standards of 1980s teen
comedies, and the actors don't seem to put much effort in
their work. There is perhaps one good scene in the entire
film, but the most interesting thing about it is seeing what
popular actresses like Sandra Bullock had to do before
reaching Hollywood Olympus. However, even the Bullock fans
would do themselves a favour if they skip this one and rent
FIRE OVER AMAZON instead.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Tombstone (1993)
In the early 1990s Hollywood saw renaissance of western,
with many of films exploring the dark side of the Old West
and thus serving "politically correct" agenda by painting
revisionist picture of American history. In such
circumstances even the gunfight at O.K. Corral had their
turn, despite the fact that this event had inspired plenty
of filmmakers in previous decades. In 1993/1994, less than a
year, Hollywood major studios produced not one but two films
that dealt with Wyatt Earp. First of them was TOMBSTONE,
directed by George Pal Cosmatos.
The film begins in Tombstone, Arizona in early 1880s. Wyatt
Earp (played by Kurt Russell) is legendary sheriff of Dodge
City who retired from law enforcement in order to lead more
peaceful and profitable life. Wyatt and his two brothers -
Virgil (played by Sam Elliott) and Morgan (played by Bill
Paxton) - arrive in Tombstone where they soon come into
conflict with "Cowboys", gang of local thugs and cattle
thieves led by Curly Bill Brosis (played by Powers Boothe),
Johnny Ringo (played by Michael Biehn) and Ike Clanton
(played by Stephen Lang). As the tensions between Earp and
"Cowboys" rise, Wyatt meets his old friend, gambler and
gunslinger Doc Holliday (played by Val Kilmer). Holliday's
skills would become quite handy when the conflict erupts
into gunfight at O.K. Corral.
Kevin Jarre, original scriptwriter and director of
TOMBSTONE, got himself fired before the end of the shooting,
and producers gave the project into the hands of George Pal
Cosmatos. This didn't help the reputation of the movie,
because Cosmatos' name is usually associated with films that
feature large amounts of action scenes and hardly anything
else. Therefore, with Cosmatos in charge, all attempts to
accurately recreate historical events in Tombstone 1881 were
thrown by the window. Cosmatos was interested for
spectacular action scenes and hardly anything else and the
pace of film reflects his desire to quickly wrap up the
boring stuff like character development or background of the
conflict. Additional problem for the film is large number of
characters and actors, many of them in honorary cameos
(including Robert Mitchum as narrator) - Cosmatos simply
doesn't have the time to deal with them. Many of them appear
for a scene or two, especially Earp's women (with the
exception of Josephine Marcus, played by Dana Delany).
However, even disorganised mess of a movie called TOMBSTONE
can redeem itself with few bright moments. First of all,
since Cosmatos can't work on character development he simply
portrays Clantons and their gang as dangerous psychopathic
killers from the beginning, thus allowing Biehn, Lang and
Boothe to give amusingly cartoonish portrayals of villains.
Then, since the filmmakers abandoned any attempt to explain
Earp/Clanton conflict by presenting social, economic and
political conditions of early 1880s Arizona, their
black/white characterisation resulted in creative approach
to history, which might be seen as fun. For example,
narration explicitly names "Cowboys" as the first form of
organised crime in USA and, afterwards, costumes (which is
together with scenery and props painstakingly recreated from
actual history) and facial hygiene indicate their alignment,
in sharp contrast with "civilised", squeaky- clean Earps.
Later in the film, growing intensity of the conflict is
illustrated with some laughably trite phrases, but nothing
can match campiness of the scene in which Doc Holliday and
Johnny Ringo exchange insults in Latin.
Apart from campiness, TOMBSTONE is rescued with truly superb
acting. While Kurt Russell plays very believable Wyatt and
Sam Elliott still has presence of real westerner in the role
of his older brother, poor Bill Paxton simply can't overcome
his image of fall guy in action films. But the true marvel
of this film is Val Kilmer as Doc Holiday, who gives not
only powerful but also very original portrayal of the
terminally ill gunslinger - his Holliday is not only refined
intellectual, but also a romantic. Kilmer's role in this
film is one of the best in his career. Other actors, many of
them quite fine, only briefly appear, with most of their
roles left on the cutting floor. However, despite many flaws
and plenty of missed opportunities, TOMBSTONE could still be
recommended for all western fans, at least those who want
good old traditional stories about good and evil in these
cynical revisionist times.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for F.T.W. (1994)
Every movie star must think about the time when his or her
career may take a downturn and consequent dip into
straight-to-video territory or character roles. However,
some of those stars don't take it lightly when it happens to
them. One of such examples is Mickey Rourke, one of the most
talented lead actors in 1980s, whose career took a deep dive
in 1990s. Obviously dissatisfied with the way tabloids and
other media described his road to oblivion, he took the lead
role in F.T.W., 1994 drama by Michael Karbelnikoff, film
that could be viewed as semi-autobiographical under the
circumstances.
In this film Rourke plays Frank T. Wells, rodeo rider who
served prison sentence for the manslaughter. After the
release Wells is determined to turn another page in his life
and return to his old career. However, on the way he meets
Scarlett Stuart (played by Lori Singer), girl who works as
car mechanic. Wells is attracted to her because she has his
initials F.T.W. tattooed on her arm. She is also attracted
to him and two of them begin the relationship. However,
Wells is unaware that Scarlett is the only surviving member
of bank robbing gang. When he finds that out, he would stand
by his woman, even if it means new trouble with the law.
F.T.W. from the title stands for "F**k the World", Rourke's
answer to all those who took great pleasure in describing
him as Has Been. Unfortunately, this uncompromisingly
individualistic message was not worthy of the low-budget
exploitation film masquerading as "socially conscious" story
about losers in rural America. Rourke and Singer play their
characters very well, though, and it is quite a surprise to
see late Brion James in the role of sympathetic lawman.
However, director Karbelnikoff didn't notice plenty of
cliches in Eddie Cook's and Mari Kornhauser's script, His
directing style, heavily influenced by MTV (visible in his
previous effort, MOBSTERS), seems inappropriate for what was
supposed to be grim, realistic story, and the ending seems
even more predictable and pathetic. F.T.W. is for some
unexplained reason (probably something to do with
controversial title) absents from many video guides, but
those who don't watch this film because of it won't miss
much.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Blood Run (1994) (TV)
It doesn't look good when the film has the best scenes in
the beginning. In the case of BLOOD RUN, 1994 erotic
thriller by Boaz Davidson, the scene in the beginning is not
only the best but also the only one worth watching, at least
if male audience is concerned. The scenes of torrid sex
between two young, rich and beautiful women don't last long,
because one of the participants gets murdered. The
investigation is given to Brad Kingsbury (played by David
Bradley), violent, boozing police detective who also happens
to be bad father. He quickly finds the suspect in Tanya
Borgman (played by Anna Thomson), surviving member of the
lesbian couple. However, beautiful and sexy Borgman soon
shows that her sexual orientation isn't very strict, so
Kingsbury succumbs to her seductive abilities, endangering
his career and life in the process.
What distinguishes BLOOD RUN from myriad of other erotic
thrillers is the fact that it looks like one of the most
shameless rip-offs of BASIC INSTINCT. Director Davidson and
scriptwriter Dennis Dimster tries to counter such impression
with few shootout scenes more suitable for Hong Kong action
films. However, such efforts are in vain, because plot and
characters simply look too similar to those in Verhoeven's
film. This is especially the case with Anna Thomson, who
spares no effort in order to look identical to Catherine
Trammel from BASIC INSTINCT, including the similar outfit,
but nevertheless she fails in such task because of her too
obvious cleavage. While (male) fans of Anna Thomson would
probably enjoy this film, the rest of the audience should
avoid this cheap knock-off and enjoy the original instead.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Gone with the Wind (1939)
There are few films that represent such thankless task for
any reviewer like GONE WITH THE WIND. This epic melodrama,
directed in 1939 by Victor Fleming, should be viewed less as
a movie and more like an institution. Unlike any other piece
of seventh art, it actually became the essential part of
popular culture in this century. And this shouldn't surprise
anyone, since GONE WITH THE WIND looks larger than all the
other movies, almost in the same proportion in which an
average movie looks larger than real life. Its epic
222-minute length (this is the longest movie the author of
this review has watched in cinema) is only partly
responsible for such impression. The images of this film are
the most recognisable, the scenes are most memorable, the
protagonists are the most iconic and the lines are the most
quoted. Another example of its greatness is the fact that
the official "making of" documentary has more than two hours
of length. More than 60 years after its premiere, there are
still new generations of viewers ready to be enchanted by
its mythical quality. Thus the popularity of GONE WITH THE
WIND is perpetuated and it remains the most popular and most
beloved film of all times, almost destined to beat any
similar competition in near future, STAR WARS and TITANIC
included. Such enduring movie phenomenon also attracted
attention of thousands of critics and film scholars in the
last 60 years, so it is next to impossible to write anything
original about it.
The plot of the film, based on the novel by Margaret
Mitchell, begins in Georgia at the eve of American Civil
War. Scarlett O'Hara (played by Vivien Leigh) is a 16-year
old and stunningly beautiful daughter of wealthy
slave-owning aristocrat, equally unimpressed by armies of
young suitors and news about impeding crisis. Her heart
belongs to Ashley Wilkes (played by Leslie Howard), young
and handsome son of the neighbouring plantation owner.
Scarlett is devastated when she hears that Ashley intends to
marry his plain cousin Melanie Hamilton (played by Olivia de
Havilland). This news coincides with the official
declaration of war and Ashley, like all the other Southern
aristocrats of his generation, decides to join the ranks of
Confederate army. Scarlett, in the desperate attempt to stay
close to Ashley, marries Melanie's clueless brother Charles
(played by Rand Brooks) who would also join military ranks
only to succumb to pneumonia before any actual fighting.
Soon afterwards Scarlett decides to go to Atlanta and live
with Melanie who would greet her with open arms, blissfully
unaware of Scarlett's feelings towards Ashley. In the
meantime, Scarlett has caught attention of Rhett Butler
(played by Clark Gable), estranged son of Southern
aristocrats, who, unlike the rest of his generation, seems
unchained by the unwritten codes of Southern honour and
conventional morality. He is convinced that Scarlett shares
some of those traits and their relationship would be forged
in the dark days following Southern defeat, Northern
occupation and post- war Reconstruction.
GONE WITH THE WIND is often viewed as the best example of
filmmaking in the Golden Age of Old Hollywood, the period
marked by the lavish period productions, film studios
resembling ancient empires and stars having god-like powers
over the audience. There were certainly better or more
important films created in this period, but none of them
managed to perpetuate its magic through the decades. The
main reason probably lies in the fact that GONE WITH THE
WIND, unlike any other similar project of the period,
gathered the best Hollywood talents and almost anyone tried
to give at least some kind of contribution, starting with
four different directors and four different screenwriters,
all guided by the determined hands of producer David O.
Selznick. It seems that all those Hollywood people
subconsciously knew that their world is going to end in a
decade or two, and were driven by the desire to leave the
lasting mark on the motion picture. Result of their efforts
is a film that is the everlasting monument to the bygone era
of filmmaking.
The choice of talents for this film was nearly flawless. Two
main actors seem almost born for this role. Clark Gable
might have been not so enthusiastic about his role of Rhett
Butler, but the audiences and the critics through the
decades thought otherwise - his suave, cynical but charming
black sheep of Southern aristocracy seems convincing despite
not having recognisable Southern accent. British actor
Leslie Howard, cast as Ashley, was even less comfortable in
his role of Southern aristocrat, but he still delivers the
goods, successfully hiding an indecisive wimp under the
illusion of "noblesse oblige". But the greatest acting
achievement belongs to Vivien Leigh, British actress being
cast as Southern belle against all odds. Her skills in
displaying various emotions in a character that changes
through the years are evident, as well as her determination
to master the Southern accent. Vivien Leigh's zeal for this
role was awarded by "Oscar", and that zeal was again evident
in another "Oscar" calibre performance in A STREETCAR NAMED
DESIRE twelve years later. Olivia De Havilland was almost
equally impressive as less complex but almost equally strong
character of Melanie. Supporting actors were also very good,
including Hattie McDaniel in the "Oscar"-awarded role of
Mammy, Scarlett's slave nanny.
Superb acting talent was followed by superb production
values. Costumes and architecture of 1860s South are
painstakingly recreated, with William Cameron Menzies
enjoying benefits of special effects quite convincing for
that time. Suggestive photography and memorable images
(Scarlett watching the sunset, panoramic view of defeated
Southern army, destruction of Atlanta) follow the grand
scope of emotions. And the music by Max Steiner is also
excellent; its main theme is as legendary as the other
elements of film, still very recognisable, unlike any other
1930s film with the exception of musicals.
Like any other great movie, GONE WITH THE WIND left at least
some viewers unimpressed by its magic and some very eager to
point to its flaws. The most common and most obvious
objection to this film is its content, unacceptable for this
time and age. GONE WITH THE WIND, a movie responsible for
many popular misconceptions about American Civil War, gives
rather biased and, in many ways, historically inaccurate
portrayal of those crucial times of American and world
history. Margaret Mitchell's novel, influenced by the
romanticised and revisionist view of the Southern Lost
Cause, paints the Old South as a fairytale land of old,
chivalrous ideals and social harmony which fell prey to
evil, materialistic barbarians from the North. In this film
Southern blacks are quite content to have same rights as
cattle, and the phrases like "simpleminded darky" don't seem
insulting to them. Today's viewers, especially those who
adhere to the dogma of Political Correctness are easily to
tempted to look at GONE WITH THE WIND the same way they
would look at Hollywood movie about Third Reich based on the
writings of Joseph Goebbels. On the other hand, revisionist
and racist elements of the film are at least toned down with
the film's general humanism. Black character of Mammy works
as Scarlett's conscience, and the actress playing her broke
racial boundaries by being first black person to receive
Academy Award. (Ironically, the same actress was legally
forbidden to attend movie's premiere in the racially
segregated Atlanta cinema, which should gives another reason
to appreciate this film in its proper historical context.)
GONE WITH THE WIND also partially accuses Southern
aristocracy for the jingoism that contributed to the war and
future Southern misery. And the scenes of hundreds and
thousands of men being wasted in futile carnage suggest that
nothing, not even the Lost Cause of the Old South, justifies
war. This pacifist message, on the other hand, also
corresponded with the isolationist sentiments, so dominant
in late 1930s USA.
The less obvious flaw of the film is somewhat hidden by its
epic length. In the first hours of the film, characters and
their interaction is interesting because of the clear
historical context and important events in the background.
The plot doesn't simply revolve about Scarlett's romantic
dilemmas - she has some more important task to perform, like
staying alive and making sure that those around her survive
the hard times. But once the war and post-war hardships are
behind Scarlett, GONE WITH THE WIND in the last hour or so
degenerates into pure melodrama, closer to daytime soap
operas than to anything we usually associate with "larger
than life" movies. Thankfully, the ending, despite all its
sappiness, wraps it all up. Few memorable lines and the
everlasting image at the end restore the epic character of
GONE WITH THE WIND, great film so unlike its title.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Lunarcop (1994)
Famous SF author Isaac Asimov wrote a story in which
inhabitants of future Moon colonies think of their
artificial low-gravity home as much better alternative to
natural yet savage Earth. Lunar colonists in LUNARCOP, 1994
science fiction film directed by Boaz Davidson, might argue
with that, but they don't have much of a choice -
twenty-seven years ago Earth suffered ecological collapse
that turned entire surface into inhospitable desert. The
lucky and privileged few that had found shelter on the Moon
managed to develop "Amaranth" - serum which might change the
climate of Earth all over again. The stuff has fallen into
the hands of dangerous fanatics and lunar policeman Joe
Brody (played by Michael Pare) is being sent to Earth to
stop the disaster. On the surface of ravaged Earth he finds
small communities of survivors who are constantly threatened
by motorcycle gangs, the meanest of them being led by evil
Kay (played by Billy Drago). Brody decides to set his
mission aside for a time being and protect the villagers.
Plot that doesn't make much sense, Terrence Pare's script
that employs too many overused cliches from MAD MAX and
TERMINATOR movies, and, finally Michael Pare in the lead
role - all those are the reasons why LUNARCOP doesn't look
very good at the first glance. Director Boaz Davidson, who
used to make Israeli sex comedies in late 1970s and early
1980s, obviously can't cope well with the genre of science
fiction and his ablities are further constrained by tiny
budget, painfully visible in the scenes that feature poor
special effects. On the other hand, some action scenes are
impressive, and Billy Drago is very entertaining in another
of his many over-the-top villain roles. In the end, Davidson
manages something that many other more talented filmmakers
failed to do - surprise audience with twist ending. Because
of that, LUNARCOP, although far from being recommendable, is
a much better film than it was supposed to be.
Review written on September 20th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Crush, The (1993)
Many men dream of being the love interest of a beautiful
young girl. However, such dream can turn into nightmare,
especially when such girl happens to be emotionally unstable
minor. Protagonist of this film, 28-year old journalist Nick
Eliot (Carey Elwes) can't imagine the ordeal that waits for
him, when he rents garage in upper-class home of Forresters.
14-year old Darien Forrester (Alicia Silverstone) needs
company and Nick soon becomes her trusted friend. However,
young nymphet soon develops certain feelings for Nick and
tries to seduce him. But her efforts are in vain; Nick not
only wants to do the right thing, he finds love interest in
Amy Maddick (Jennifer Rubin), female colleague with more
appropriate age. Darien is furious and begins not so subtle
campaign of harassing and dirty tricks, with the sole aim to
grab Nick and keep it for herself. Soon, Amy's, and later,
Nick's life come into danger.
The script by movie director Alan Shapiro was ideal for the
dark, erotic thriller inspired by Kubrick's LOLITA.
Unfortunately, the producers, fearing any possible
controversy during the zenith of Political Correctness,
decided to drop any hint of erotica down the drain. Instead,
they turned the movie into just one of the many thrillers of
those times, dealing with disturbed individuals who wreak
havoc in the idyll of middle-class American families. The
only difference this time is the fact that the psychopathic
individual in question happens to be is 14-year girl. She
was played by Alicia Silverstone, teen actress who had
already became famous as the star of "Aerosmith" videos. The
fame received through those videos was enough for
Silverstone to win the 1993 Best Villain MTV award based on
the role in this movie. Although she did put some effort in
her first major film role, her talent doesn't show very
much, mostly because of the terrible, formulaic script, full
of implausible situations and standard plot devices. In
order to be really impressive villain, her character had to
be really charismatic and possess some evil intelligence -
being pretty isn't enough, when her actions don't make sense
(like putting the object of her affection in jail). Even
erotic appeal, required for this kind of movie, is suppressed
because of auto- censorship. With the exception of male
lead, Carey Elwes, other actors in this film are doing the
capable job, and the direction is more or less adequate. In
the end, THE CRUSH is watchable, but easily and justifiably
forgettable Hollywood product, who could be interesting only
for the hard core fans of Alicia Silverstone.

Title
Review for No Escape (1994)
Among the names of the cast and crew that are supposed
attract the audience to the films, producers are usually
least used. However, there are some exceptions. One of them
is Gale Anne Hurd, former spouse of James Cameron and
producer of ALIENS. Her name on the credits was reason
enough for the author of this review to actually watch
ESCAPE FROM ABSOLOM, 1994 futuristic prison thriller,
directed by Martin Campbell.
Those who had watched FORTRESS, 1993 film by Stuart Gordon,
would find some familiar scenes in the beginning of ABSOLOM.
The year is 2022 and prisons became the profitable business.
Former Marine Captain John Robbins (played by Ray Liotta)
had killed his general and got sentenced to life in maximum
security, state of the art prison called Leviticus. However,
after ofending the sadistic warden (Michael Lerner), Robbins
finds himself dumped on Absolom, small Pacific island from
which there is no escape. The prisoners like Robbins are
left to fend for themselves, and Robbins soon finds two
factions - savage, barbaric Outsiders led by brutal Marek
(Stuart Wilson) and peaceful, idealistic Insiders led by
Father (Lance Henriksen) who want to redeem their past sins
by making the island their private utopia. After a while,
Robbins would use his military talents to help Insiders in
their struggle against Outsiders.
ESCAPE FROM ABSOLOM is just another proof that producers, no
matter how good their reputation is, can't guarantee quality
of the film in the absence of talented or, at least capable,
writers and directors. Screenplay by Michael Gaylin and Joel
Gross, based on the novel PENAL COLONY by Richard Herley,
has a rather weak and hardly plausible concept - heartless
futuristic society, who had shown no concern for the
wellbeing of prisoners, still ready to spend billions on
keeping them in supertechnological chains instead of simply
killing them. However, unlike FORTRESS who had the similar
flaw, this film offers quite a different feel. Instead of
supertechnology, we have society brought down to good old
post-apocalyptic savagery, in many ways reminding us of MAD
MAX and LORD OF THE FLIES. For some time, it looks like the
film might leave the audience with something to think about
- nature of evil and violence, but then it all boils down to
predictable and cliched prison break subplot. Thankfully,
there is always enough hand- to-hand combat to make us
forget the actual plot. The actors are mostly fine - Liotta,
although not a real action hero, is believable as killer
turned into nice guy; character actors, mostly British, are
also superb. However, Stuart Wilson as chief villain is
almost laughable, proving again (same as in LETHAL WEAPON 3)
that he lacks adequate charisma for such task. Action scenes
are adequately directed by Martin Campbell and also there
aren't any female characters to slow down the action with
unnecessary romantic subplots. This film mostly is
watchable, but then, as many other similarly forgettable
action films, everything culminates in predictable yet
unbelievable and lame finale. After such finale, most of the
viewers would feel cheated, even if they hadn't got high
hopes before watching this bellow-the-average Hollywood
genre product.

Title
Review for Journal d'une femme de chambre, Le (1964)
In one of Marty Mystere comic books a shady character of a
tough mercenary reveals his intellectual side by quoting a
scene from Luis Bu¤uel film. This scene, as surreal as some
of Bu¤uel movies, strengthens the perception of Bu¤uel's
work being appreciated only by intellectuals, snobs or
art-oriented audience. Bu¤uel's lack of popularity among the
mainstream audience could be explained by his early works in
late 1920s, which branded his films as too shocking and
utterly beyond the comprehension of an average moviegoer.
This is quite a shame, since Bu¤uel in his latter years
mixed his trademark surrealism with irony and dark humour
more suitable for this cynical, nihilistic age. Perhaps the
best introduction to the works of Bu¤uel is DIARY OF A
CHAMBERMAID, his 1964 film that, at least superficially,
looks more mainstream than others. It lacks most of Bu¤uel's
surrealism and is actually a remake of a 1946 Hollywood
film.
The plot, based on the novel by Octave Mirbeau, takes place
in rural France in early 1930s. Celestine (played by Jeanne
Moreau) is chambermaid from Paris who comes to work in the
house of local middle-class family. It patron, old Monsieur
Rabour (played by Jean Ozenne) has developed a bizarre shoe
fetish. His daughter, Madame Monteil (played by Franoise
Lugagne) spends most of her time locked in the room where
she performs strange experiments while her husband, Monsieur
Monteil (played by Michel Piccoli) has a nasty habit of
impregnating every woman who works in their household. All
local men are attracted to Celestine who is viewed as
sexually "experienced" woman from big city. That includes
servant Joseph (played by George Geret), whose fascist views
are as revolting as his unhealthy desires towards little
girls. Celestine is quite aware of that, so she starts
manipulating men's desires for her own benefit.
Those who expect Bu¤uel's trademark surrealism in this film
would be greeted with quite the opposite. DIARY OF A
CHAMBERMAID is almost cinema verite film, shot in
black-and-white photography and without original music.
However, thanks to characters, written by Jean-Claude
Carriere (who appears in the film in small role of a
priest), touch of Bu¤uel is quite evident. Nobody in this
film, regardless of their class or gender, is spared from
irony, dark humour and morally ambiguous characterisation.
Although church and bourgeoisie remain Bu¤uel's favourite
targets, this film gives harsh, unforgiving portrayal of the
society in general; in case of 1930s France its
short-sightedness, selfishness and corruption paved way to
the rise of fascism and ultimate disaster. In this film
Bu¤uel is also one of the first filmmakers to explicitly
link fascism with sexual perversion - motive that would
become quite popular in European cinema of 1970s.
The acting in this film is superb. Jeanne Moreau plays a
manipulative character that deliberately projects different
image (obedient employee, bad girl, righteous avenger) to
different persons, and such task is accomplished with great
ease. The other actors are also very good, since they create
a lot of laughs without turning their characters into
caricatures. Bu¤uel's work here is, however, short of
masterpiece. The cinema verite approach made this film
rather visually unattractive. Passage of time in the film
isn't adequately hinted, so some viewers might get confused.
Finally, the last scene in the film is too cryptic, at least
for those who aren't familiar with some details of Bu¤uel's
biography. But, DIARY OF A CHAMBERMAID is still a very good
film that should serve as good introduction to the one of
the world's greatest filmmakers.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Off Limits (1988/I)
Late 1980s witnessed huge avalanche of "high concept" cop
movies, inspired by the success of the first LETHAL WEAPON.
Of course, very few had any chance to match Donner's success
and most of them turned out to be unwatchable garbage. On
the other hand, some of those movies, although less
successful, might look interesting even today. Nice example
is SAIGON, cop movie with the most preposterous "high
concept" of the era (even more outrageous than RED HEAT with
Soviet policeman taking out criminals on American streets).
Obligatory cop combination is made of Buck McGriff (Willem
Dafoe) and Albaby Perkins (Gregory Hines) - two soldiers who
work as plain clothes military policemen in war time
Vietnam. Their thankless job is to wear plain clothes and
catch deserters, drug dealers and other misbehaving
servicemen in the streets and slimy bars of Saigon. One
night they are called to investigate the murder of the local
prostitute whose last customer had the insignia of high
ranking U.S. officer. Their investigation reveal the whole
series of similar murders, but before they can find the
identity of the killer, they realise that their own lives
are in danger.
Script by Cameron Crowe and Jack Thibeau is a textbook
example of police movie clichs. Almost every element of is
here - two policemen who bend the rules, their investigation
is against all odds, their superiors are inimical and
drowned in red tape, the main bad guy is someone predictably
nice in the beginning of the film, and their dull police
routine is made interesting by a couple of standard
shootouts and car chases. Even the obligatory love interest
is thrown in the mix - in the form of a nun (played by
Amanda Pays with obvious lack of interest); apart from
(luckily) unresolved sexual tension with McGriff, she also
provides some cheap (and in the final result quite
repulsive) elements of comic relief (like the scene when she
wears habit and discusses the case in the middle of sleazy
strip bar).
Under all those stereotypes, SAIGON hides some interesting
themes and subplots that could have been explored by more
ambitious filmmakers. First, by presenting wartime Saigon as
modern equivalent of Sodoma and Gomorrah, place of utter
depravity, corruption and immense poverty, Crowe underlines
the fact seldom noted in Hollywood movies dealing with
Vietnam War - that the Vietnamese people are actually those
who suffered the most in that grim episode of recent U.S.
history. Another theme is more universal - the importance of
individual life and morality in war. McGriff and Perkins are
boy scouts who decide to pursue justice disgusted with the
deaths of few unimportant civilians, while in the same time
they witness the deaths of hundreds of their comrades every
week. What forces them to pursue such uncompromising and
unpopular course of action (instead of simply turning the
other way, like most of people in their situation would) is
never properly explained (although the lack of explanation
works better than implausible explanation for similar
behaviour in Litvak's NIGHT OF THE GENERALS). That escalates
into almost surrealistic notion that for the cause of
"justice" they should even co-operate with their mortal
enemies from Viet Cong. Motives of the Viet Cong in helping
them are even less explained, and that is another big flaw
of this movie. Finally, SAIGON presents another disturbing
truth - that the standards of morality in war totally differ
from those same standards in peace. This is illustrated in
the most powerful episode of the whole movie, in which U.S.
colonel Armstrong (Scott Glenn in one of the most impressive
roles of his career) reveals himself as sadistic pervert who
leads small army of bloodthirsty fanatics; but that officer
and his unit are actually praised by their superiors for
their exceptional efficiency at the battlefield. One of the
great ironies of Armstrong's situation lies in the fact that
his psychopathic tendencies are welcome in the savagery of
war, and in the same time condemned in the "civilised"
peaceful environment.
Unfortunately, Crowe didn't use the opportunity to dig into
this themes further. Instead he left them as a side element
to the formulaic police thriller, movie we should remember
by its unused potential instead of its own quality.

Title
Review for Emerald Forest, The (1985)
Many predict that the biggest political issues of next
century would be in the domain of ecology. Some of those
trends can be observed even today, with the environmentalist
movements gaining strength all over the globe, and even
coming to power in countries like Germany. However, in
1980s, care for the environment and long term interests of
humanity didn't look that attractive or important during the
reign of neo-conservative ideology, new Cold War and extreme
materialism. In the beginning of 1990s things changed -
environmentalism became fashionable in the era of emerging
"political correctness" so Hollywood tried to cash in. The
results were mixed, somewhere between disasters
(WATERWORLD), solid but overhyped epics (DANCES WITH WOLVES)
and interesting failures (THE MEDICINE MAN). Unfortunately,
that trend came too late for a movie that could have put all
of them to shame - THE EMERALD FOREST, ecological adventure
by John Boorman, made in 1985.
The plot of the movie is allegedly inspired by a true story.
Bill Markham (Powers Boothe) is an American engineer working
on the great dam project in the middle of Amazon jungle. One
day he brings his family to the building site, but that
little trip ends with his little son Tommy wandering in the
forest. There he gets abducted by Indian tribe known as
"Invisible People". For the next ten years, Bill spends
every spare moment to search for his son in the Amazon.
Unfortunately, the "Invisible People" are one of those
tribes that haven't got any contact with the outside world.
But that doesn't bother Tommy (Charly Boorman), who was
adopted by tribal chief Wanadi (Rui Polonah) and became
member of the tribe himself. When Bill finally meets him,
Tommy had already forgotten his parents and "civilised" way
of life. He seems happy with his life so he decides not to
listen to father's pleas for the return to civilisation.
Father and son part again, but not for the last time.
Village of the "Invisible People" gets attacked by the rival
tribe of "Fierce People" who take away all the women,
including Tommy's wife Kachiri (Dira Paes) and sell them to
the sleazy brothel owners at the outskirts of jungle. Unable
to fight guns with bows and spears, Tommy must seek his
father's help, which brings him to dangerous journey to the
heart of civilisation.
Unlike most ecological movies, that either try to shove the
environmentalist agenda to the viewers' throats or, even
worse, use ecology as cheap excuse for lame action/thriller
plots, THE EMERALD FOREST was very subtle. That shouldn't
surprise anyone, because the movie author, John Boorman,
liked nature, its beauty and dangers, long before the
environmental trends became fashionable. So, the tone of the
movie isn't preachy - the script by Rosco Pallemberg was set
in a virgin Amazon jungle threatened by an encroaching
civilisation, but Boorman was less interested in conflict
between nature and progress than in splendid opportunity to
make very personal film - classical adventure that is almost
impossible to imagine in Hollywood these days. Boorman
obviously liked what he was doing, because he chose his
teenage son Charley to play Tommy; that choice was good,
because that boy was perfect as lead character who
symbolises the innocence of the Amazon and the natural state
of man. His green eyes and innocent beauty corresponds with
the the innocent beauty of the rain forests. The nominal
lead, Powers Boothe, is shadowed by him, same as Meg Foster
as his mother, cast more because of her green eyes than
acting ability. Perhaps because of Boothe, the conflict
between the father and son wasn't as powerful and
interesting as it should have been.
The opportunity to have some father/son drama with cultural
clash themes, wasn't used in the first part, but some of the
script problems are more visible in the second. Boorman was
forced to admit that the Amazon jungle isn't that
all-friendly and blissful place, although Tommy and
"Invisible People" might see it that way. So, someone had to
represent the bad side of the Amazon, and that role was
filled by the tribe of "Fierce People" - whose villainy
might remind people of the native characters seen in the
classic Tarzan films (they are even painted black only to
illustrate their allignment). The "two tribe" concept wasn't
that simplistic, though; it is implied that the civilisation
stripped away the forest that used to be the hunting ground
for the "Fierce People", thus forcing them to go to war with
other people. However, the evil of the "Fierce People" is
underlined with the way they accept civilisation - unlike
noble and purist "Invisible People" who see white men as
"Termite People" (who eat away their world) and whose vision
of "Termite People" world is frightening (as witnessed by
Tommy in his short trip to Bill's city), they are ready to
accept the civilisation - first guns, than liquor -
corrupting and degrading themselves in the process.
Boorman brings film to the climax with the showdown in the
brothel, thus providing the audience with the standard
action scenes. But, instead of ending film immediately after
that, with the bitter-sweet note (Bill warns that the
civilisation would win in the end), Boorman provides the
audience with implausible fairy tale finale - Indian prayers
bring the flood that would take away the dam as the symbol
of the civilisation. But that scene is made even more
implausible with the addition of Bill who tries to blow up
his life's work in the process. The ending - Tommy, Kachiri
and his friends living happily ever after in a natural
paradise - is bad contrast with the end credits, that warn
the audience about sad reality of the Amazon - destruction
of the rain forests and silent genocide of the Indians.
However, despite all those flaws, THE EMERALD FOREST is not
beautiful and entertaining, but also a thought-provoking
film - one of those who were right on the spot with many
burning issues of today's world.

Title
Review for Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994)
1990s saw great renaissance of British cinema. After many
years of stagnation appeared whole new generation of
talented filmmakers, able not only to create new,
interesting films that would enchant the critical
establishment, but also to get in touch with tastes of
general audience. The latter phenomenon could be seen in the
series of British comedies that proved to be better, and in
some cases even more popular and commercially successful
than their Hollywood counterparts. One of them was FOUR
WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL, directed in 1994 by Mike Newell,
immensely popular film that even competed for Academy
Awards.
The script by Richard Curtis (best known for his excellent
work on BLACK ADDER television series) lacks the plot in
usual sense. It is composed of the scenes that show the
circle of friends - all 30-something mid-to-upper class
Britons - gathering on each other's weddings. The only one
who still hasn't tied the knot is Charles (played by Hugh
Grant), self-confessed "serial monogamist" who simply
doesn't believe that he would ever end his bachelor
lifestyle. However, everything changes when he meets Carrie
(played by Andie MacDowell), fashion editor from USA.
However, long time is about to pass before two of them
realise that they are made for each other.
Success of FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL is hard to explain at
first glance. The plot is not very solid, the length of two
hours seems a bit much for this kind of movie, and, finally,
the gags in this film are funny, but not exactly hilarious
(and that includes wedding scene scene in which famous
comedian Rowan Atkinson plays inexperienced priest). On the
other hand, director Newell had a good fortune to have a
truly stellar cast at his disposal, and that was essential
for the film which is character-driven instead of
plot-driven. Although Hugh Grant plays more-or-less the same
character he had played before (in SIRENS and BITTER MOON)
and would play again (in NOTTING HILL and countless other
comedies), his performance still carries the film. His
colleagues are equally impressive - Kristin Scott-Thomas is
very effective in her role, Simon Callow is excellent as
Charles' larger-than-life gay friend Gareth, while John
Hannah as Gareth's lover Matthew brings pathos in a powerful
scene that prevented this film from turning into
conventional Hollywood-style romantic comedy. Andie
MacDowell, although manages the role of Carrie very well, is
overshadowed by her British colleagues. FOUR WEDDINGS AND A
FUNERAL, with good acting, solid humour and adequate
proportion of crying and laughing, is nevertheless a very
good viewing experience and it could serve as a good
explanation why British romantic comedies became so popular
in the last decade.
Review written on September 21st 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Alien (1979)
When science fiction becomes topic of discussions among
people who aren't fans or even superficial connoisseurs of
the genre, they usually have very narrow definition of what
science fiction film is or what it should be. Thanks to the
influence of people like George Lucas, Steven Spielberg or
Gene Roddenberry, science fiction is considered escapist
genre about fantastic worlds almost always better than our
own. However, in the late 1970s, after debilitating fuel
crisis, unprecedented political turmoil, and unstoppable
decline of world economy, future didn't seem bright anymore.
Filmmakers suddenly began using the media of science fiction
films to express their anxiety and scepticism towards things
to come. ALIEN, second feature film by Ridley Scott, also
joined the trend, this time by using big budget resources to
resurrect almost forgotten sub-genre of SF horror, until
then strictly in the B-movie domain.
The plot of ALIEN is set in a future that might look far,
yet in the same time share many elements with the world of
today. Interstellar flight isn't some breathtaking
scientific achievement anymore and private companies use
spaceships to bring precious ore to Earth. One of such ships
is "Nostromo", whose seven-member crew spends most of the
time hibernated. After they are awaken by ship's computer,
they realise that they are still far away from Earth.
"Nostromo" received a distress signal from an unknown planet
and the crew, led by Captain Dallas (Tom Skeritt) is ordered
to investigate. They land on the planet and small expedition
finds huge alien derelict. Inside the derelict, second
officer Kane (John Hurt) finds thousands of eggs, but one of
them explodes and alien organism gets attached for his face.
Comatose Kane is brought back to the ship, but first officer
Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) don't want to let him out of
quarantine. Her decision is overridden by science officer
Ash (Holm) who breaks security procedure in order to study
the organism.
The entire concept of ALIEN - concept that can explain its
great success as horror film - is just another story of
human beings confronted with their inherent limitations.
Technology can make human life longer or easier, yet it
can't remove human imperfection, brilliantly demonstrated in
this film both on physical and emotional level. Space, which
could create sense of wonders with its inconceivable beauty,
can in the same time be the source of horrors beyond
imagination, horrors that leave puny humans as helpless
victims, despite all their superior technology and
intelligence.
To illustrate that point, director Scott hired the talents
of a Swiss artist H.R. Giger, who had created the most
notorious monster in history of cinema. Like nobody else
before and after him, Giger succeeded in making a creature
that is completely alien from anything in human experience,
yet in the same time with shapes and forms that bring back
the worst fears from our collective subconscious. Whether it
is its a huge head, encroaching tail, clawed hand or double
set of constantly salivating mouth with sharp teeth - even
the glimpses are enough to make people anxious. Scott very
cleverly decided never to show the monster in full shot,
leaving to the viewer to draw complete picture in his mind,
most probably consumed by irrational fear.
Excellent contrast to all-powerful, invincible and
unstoppable monster are imperfect humans that reluctantly
become its enemy and prey. The screenwriter Dan O'Bannon,
who had already explored those themes in his low-budget
classic DARK STAR few years earlier, created very human and
believable characters to illustrate such flaws. They aren't
scientists or astronauts, they are simple working men more
interested in simple pay check than all the wonders of
universe, more likely to use four letter words than esoteric
scientific terms. Scene immediately after their awakening
brilliantly illustrates their disenchantment with space
technology - after spending months in hypersleep and
travelling tens of light years, the first thing they do is
to gather around table, smoke cigarettes and bicker about
low wages. Those characters are also enhanced through superb
acting by one of the strongest ensemble cast in history of
cinema. Most notable is Sigourney Weaver in her debut role,
who would prove that women can carry action movie in the
sequel; here, in the first film, she is just very capable
space officer, with strong will and more sense than anybody
else, yet also consumed by terror when she must face the
deadly foe. She managed to steal the top spot from nominally
lead actor, Tom Skeritt, who plays Captain like a man who
can establish authority without raising voice, yet in the
same time burdened by indecision and lack of courage. John
Hurt is also good, although he has the least of screen time.
Ian Holm is wonderful as antipathetic bureaucrat that values
scientific results more than human life; small hints about
his character only later reveal the even more disturbing
truth. Veronica Cartwright, originally cast to play Ripley,
is also more than impressive in a quite different role of
navigation officer Lambert; at first only bickering, her
character turns into incarnation of frailty and panic.
Finally, O'Bannon's script manages to create some kind of
social stratification even in the such little universe like
"Nostromo" - two of the characters are low paid blue-collar
types that dwell in the dark and greasy lower decks. Yaphet
Kotto is excellent as Parker, bickering giant that has a
great heart; and, finally, Harry Dean Stanton gives another
subtle performance of his quiet and dim-witted, yet very
sympathetic assistant Brett.
With strong cast and good script, ALIEN also benefited from
very good director. Ridley Scott, who was at his prime in
late 1970s and early 1980s, showed great skill in creating
very distinctive visual images. ALIEN perhaps doesn't look
as spectacular as his next  masterpiece, BLADE RUNNER, but
the thick atmosphere is here, with elaborate and extremely
detailed production and costume design. Special effects are
still impressive and very convincing, even after two decades
of science fiction movies that used superior techniques. The
disturbing feel of the movie is also enhanced by haunting
score written by veteran film composer Jerry Goldsmith, one
of his best. Scott is also good in editing, when he manages
to create some of the most shocking scenes in the history of
cinema. But, ALIEN functions wonderfully as whole, not just
like a mechanical sum of all those good elements. The film
has a relatively slow pace in the first half, when Scott
allows us to meet and study characters and claustrophobic
environment they inhabit. Then the plot thickens and second
half is a frightening thrill-ride. Unlike many less talented
horror directors of that era, Scott doesn't put emphasis on
gore (although the legendary dining scene has a plenty of
it) and tries to scare the viewers by creating haunting
atmosphere and implying terrible events instead.
The fear and anxiety that viewers share with the movie
protagonists made ALIEN one of the most successful horror
films, if not the best horror film of all times. Fact that
it created numerous imitations and spawned three sequels so
far speaks enough of its quality and importance. Yet the
best recommendation for this film is the multitude of fans
that watch this movie time and time again, re-experiencing
same, often not so pleasant emotions, yet enjoying the
rarely good work of art when they see one.

Title
Review for Dr. No (1962)
Endless trailers for THE PHANTOM MENACE were telling us that
every saga had a beginning. So was the case with the most
enduring and probably the longest-running movie franchise in
history - James Bond films. That series, that had spawned
eighteen (or nineteen, depending on the count) films through
almost four decades of its existence, was famous for its
successful and almost always winning formula - spectacular
action, exotic locations, plenty of beautiful (and
promiscuous) women and impressive villains with megalomaniac
ambitions. The formula didn't change through the years, but
almost everything else did, including the actors playing the
lead character. There were five of them, but almost everyone
agrees that the original one, Sean Connery, represents the
best incarnation of James Bond. The reputation of the lead
actor followed the movies that introduced him - first five
James Bond films are regarded as classics. On the other
hand, the first among those classics, DR. NO, directed by
Terrence Young in 1962, has relatively obscure reputation,
being either ignored or not favourably compared with the
other films of the series.
Relatively bad reputation of the film shouldn't be much of a
surprise, although DR. NO happened to be a huge commercial
hit in its time, big enough to launch both the series and
the stellar career of Sean Connery. It was made on
relatively low budget, with producers very doubtful of its
future potential. Ian Fleming, the creator of the character,
wasn't too thrilled about the producers' choice for the lead
role, preferring more established actors like David Niven,
Cary Grant or his own cousin Christopher Lee to relatively
unknown Scot like Connery. The movie wasn't even supposed to
be based on the novel DR. NO; producers had been forced to
abandon their original choice THUNDERBALL because of the
legal entanglements (that novel was later adapted twice). The
insecurity of its creators and the lack of budget (at least
relative to all the latter films) mirrored itself in the
film, although Young, as a capable director, managed to hide
most of it.
The plot begins in Jamaica, when British secret agent
Strangways and his secretary get killed by some mysterious
assassins. Chief of Secret Service, mysterious and grumpy M
(played by Bernard Lee) summons one of his best men, agent
James Bond (played by Connery), who is the perfect man for
this job, equipped not only with the superior training, but
also with the code name "007" with "00" that indicates the
license to kill enemy agents without any legal procedures.
As soon as Bond comes to Jamaica, he becomes the target of
various assassins. He survives all attempts on his life and
begins discovering the reasons why Strangways was killed.
They all have something to do with the radio signals that
sabotage American space program, and the source of this
signals is most likely Crab Key, isolated island owned by
mysterious Chinese character named Dr. No. After initial
suspicions, he is joining forces with CIA agent Felix Leiter
(played by Jack Lord), Bond and Leiter's assistant Quarrel
(played by John Kitzmiller) travel to the island to
investigate. There they stumble on Honey Ryder (played by
Ursulla Andress), voluptuous shell hunter that would help
them evade Dr. No's guards.
DR. NO has the every obligatory element of the Bond formula
(action, exotic women, locations, villains) and it is as
entertaining as an average Bond film, but something is
missing. First of all, film lacks spectacle usually
associated with the Bond classics. Jamaican locations and
characters seem somewhat too real, too ordinary and many
viewers, unaccustomed to Bond, would mistake this film for a
conventional spy thriller. Realistic tone of the movie is
also underlined with the use of local calypso music (which
is also a nice opportunity to hear Jamaican sounds before
that island became famous for its reggae.) Realism is here
partly due to a limited budget (legendary Pinewood studios
were used only for the last scenes of the film, with the
sets rather lame compared to the latter Bond adventures),
and partly due to Fleming being able to influence the film
more than in all latter films. As a result, even the Bond
character is closer to original Fleming's vision - he is
cynical and scruples when it comes to achieving his goals.
Contemporary moralists (including Vatican, which issued
official communique condemning the film) were outraged with
the scenes like Bond shooting helpless enemy in cold blood
or Bond having sex with a female enemy agents before turning
her to authorities. On the other hand, DR. NO is more
realistic than other Bond films because here 007 lacks his
usual spy gadgets and must rely solely on his wits in order
to survive. And the realism also works the other way around
- Bond is perhaps meaner than in other films, but he also
gets his comeuppance by having been tortured, beaten and
humiliated more than usual.
Sean Connery was, of course, splendid in the role that
clinched his career. His Bond is a classic Bond - stone-cold
deadly killer, intelligent yet witty and loveable, able to
bring every woman to his bed. First time we hear those
immortal words "Bond, James Bond" we hear the very same
confident voice that would be a trademark of this character
for decades to come. Connery's charm is unstoppable; because
of it, we are able to enjoy his presence and take for
granted lines that would otherwise sound ridiculous and
trashy. And the script by Richard Maibaum, Johanna Harwood
and Berkley Maher was very suitable for Connery to show his
acting abilities; non-Superman Bond in DR.NO even has some
opportunity to express fear, panic and repulsion, something
we don't see very often in the latter incarnations of his
characters.
The other two obligatory characters - Bond's partner and
Bond's chief opponent - weren't that lucky. Many say that
Ursulla Andress, Swiss actress who had the honour of being
the very first Bond girl, actually happens to be the best
from the bunch. It is truth that the scene of bikini-clad
Honey Ryder coming out of sea really belongs among classic
Bond scenes. It is also truth that Ursulla Andress one of
the shinier careers among all the Bond girls. But her
character is ruined by the weak script and the writers not
able to decide whether to treat her as a tough woman and
equal partner to Bond, or just an ordinary damsel in
distress. Joseph Wiseman as enigmatic Dr. No is also very
good, but the script left too many plot holes concerning his
intentions and didn't really explain some of his actions.
The other characterisations are even worse - for example,
Quarrel as Bond's sidekick has a role that borders parody
and even some racial stereotyping. PC police of today
probably wouldn't appreciate the fact that the all the
villains, except one, happen to be dark-skinned or Asians.
DR. NO, seen by itself, is a still entertaining, but rather
inferior Bond film. However, since it was the first in the
series, it established the character of Bond, his
trademarks, recognisable musical theme by John Barry and
Monty Norman, and even some of the regular side characters
(M, Miss Moneypenny). All that makes it essential for all
those who want to be introduced to the series and all those
who are already fans of Bond films.

Title
Review for Shadowlands (1993)
Old saying about truth being stranger than fiction was often
been proven by remarkable films being based on true stories.
One of such examples is a film that turned out to be one of
the most underrated tear-jerking melodramas of its time.
This film was based on the unusual events in the life of one
of the most influential thinkers of 20th Century. Those
events were turned into stage play SHADOWLANDS by William
Nicholson and later adapted into BBC TV film in 1985
(starring Joss Ackland and Claire Bloom). Eight years later,
Richard Attenborrough, British director specialised for
biographical films, made feature film version.
The protagonist of the film is C.S. "Jack" Lewis (played by
Anthony Hopkins), British writer who became famous because
of his science fiction novels, children's books as well as
his very passionate defence of Christianity. Lewis' personal
lifestyle, however, is in total contrast with his global
fame - he lives a quiet, ascetic and uneventful life of a
Oxford professor, shares room with his equally ascetic
brother Warnie (played by Debra Winger) and spends all free
time in intellectual discussion. In 1952 his life is going
to change when he receives a letter by Joy Gresham (played
by Debra Winger), Jewish American poetess who claims to be a
great fan of his work and wants to meet him personally.
Soon, Joy comes to England bringing her young son Douglas
(played by Joseph Mazzelo) and when meeting between "Jack"
and Joy occurs, British professor is both shocked and
attracted by Joy's openness and directness. They strike up a
friendship and that relationship gradually turns into deep
platonic love. Because of that love, "Jack" would agree to
marry her in order to help her evade deportation from
Britain. Their love, as well as "Jack"'s beliefs would soon
be put to the test by Joy's illness.
Unlike previous Attenborrough's films that dealt with Great
Men of History like Churchill, Gandhi or Chaplin this
reconstruction of Lewis-Gresham love affair deliberately
avoids visual spectacle. Instead, Attenborrough, quite aware
of anything but spectacular setting, leaves most of the work
to the actors. Casting is, naturally, perfect. Anthony
Hopkins is excellent as quiet, reserved British intellectual
who would discover love in the autumn of his life. But the
best surprise comes in the form of Debra Winger, one of the
most underrated actresses of past few decades. Her manages
to show Joy Gresham as a woman who is physically attractive,
but whose main tool of seduction comes in the sharpness of
her mind. Unfortunately, both of those great actors are
unable to leave truly superb impression simply because their
roles in same way resemble their past achievements. Hopkins
looks too much like a reserved, "stiff-upper-lip" British
butler from REMAINS OF THE DAY. Winger, on the other hand in
the last segment of the film brings back memories of her
role in TERMS IN ENDEARMENT made ten years earlier. Their
interaction is, however, great, and the rest of the cast is
splendid, especially Hardwicke, John Wood and Peter Firth.
Young Joseph Mazzelo as the only other American among almost
exclusively British cast is also very good. George Fenton
also contributes to film's elegiac atmosphere with his
melancholic musical score. In the end, SHADOWLANDS should
also be praised because this film, unlike most of other
melodramas, adds intellectual and philosophical dimension to
the romance. As a film that employs our brain as well as our
emotion, SHADOWLANDS is one of the best British films made
in last few years.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Dam Busters, The (1954)
In 1980s I used to spend a lot of free time playing various
games on my ZX Spectrum home computer. Among them was THE
DAM BUSTERS, one of the rare computer simulations based on
the real historical event. The event in question was perhaps
not the important military operation of World War Two, but
it was definitely one of the more spectacular. Its dramatic
potential was, of course, recognised by the filmmakers and
some three decades before being turned into computer game,
and twelve years after the event itself, THE DAM BUSTERS
became feature film, directed by Michael Anderson.
The plot begins in spring of 1942. Hitler's war machine is
wrestling with Red Army deep in the Russian heartland, while
the rest of Europe is firmly under Axis control and it would
remain so for the time being, since Allied ground forces in
Britain are still unprepared to mount invasion. The best
Allies can do is to send hundreds of bombers over Germany
and other occupied countries in order to attack industrial
facilities, communications and infrastructure and thus
weaken Hitler's war potential. British scientist Barnes
Wallis (played by Michael Redgrave) is convinced that the
strategy isn't working and that many raids on individual
factories won't significantly shorten the war. Instead he
dreams of a single strike that would knock out entire Ruhr,
industrial heart of Germany. Ruhr is dependant on water
supplies stored by three huge dams - Oeden, Moene and Sorpe
- and if they are destroyed, the factories should
permanently stop working. Destruction of these dams requires
huge quantity of explosives, completely new bomb design and
quite new method of delivery. Wallis has solved those
problems in theory, but he would have to wait almost a year
before he receives necessary funds, resources and personnel
from military and civilian bureaucrats. While the project
enters in the final stages of R&D, RAF has picked up a
select group of best pilots and formed Squadron 617, led by
Wing Commander Guy Gibson (played by Richard Todd). Before
they carry out the attack, they must spend months in
rigorous training, because the operation requires low-level
night flying, extremely precise speed and altitude. Finally,
on May 16th 1943, Gibson and his men begin the mission,
called Operation Chastise, that would be remembered as one
of the most spectacular and daring air raids of World War
Two.
When R.C. Sheriff began writing the script for this film, he
probably thought that the event itself was interesting
enough, and that the film didn't require melodramatic
subplots or character development. It was very fortunate,
because many similar films based on true stories sometimes
suffer because of the scriptwriters' need to make them
dramatically appealing. The ascetic plot of THE DAM BUSTERS,
however, has some interesting elements - Wallis' struggle
with technical problems and red tape in the first part of
the film is nicely contrasted with Gibson's training and the
raid itself. Those two characters also have a good
interaction - veteran British actor Michael Redgrave plays
Barnes Wallis as very emotional man, extremely dedicated to
his job to the point of near madness; Richard Todd, on the
other hand, plays Gibson as the embodiment of British
"stiff-upper-lip" ideals and pragmatism. Gibson and Wallis,
however, have more in common that they are ready to admit;
Gibson's inner feelings and dilemmas are only hinted, but
that doesn't make those scenes less powerful.
The thing that put THE DAM BUSTERS in the annals of the
seventh art is the raid scene that would decades later
inspire George Lucas for the final battle in STARS WARS: A
NEW HOPE. The inevitable comparisons between those two
scenes are rather bad for Anderson's film; special effects
are unimpressive, even for 1950s standards, and the darkness
and black-and- white photography make it even less
appealing. The impression is somewhat improved with scenes
that feature some nice aerial photography and authentic
Lancaster bombers. The latter were provided by RAF, which,
in the end, received hagiographic treatment by Anderson and
other filmmakers. THE DAM BUSTERS ends with raid, being
portrayed as successful; controversies of its overall
success and true effectiveness of the Operation Chastise, as
well as the effectiveness of the entire strategic bombing
campaign, were left to future historians.
Another controversy surrounding this film came out of
filmmakers' need to make this film as historically accurate
as possible. Gibson had a black dog named "Nigger", and the
dog is not just featured and often being referenced in the
film, but its name was used as code word during the raid
itself. US version later had the objectionable word dubbed
with the word "Trigger", and some scene featuring it were
edited out, making some of the scenes incomprehensible.
Whether Gibson was genuine racist or not, we would never
know, since he got killed later in war. This little detail
could remind the 1990s audience about the fact that the
notions of political correctness we take for granted today
weren't there only few decades ago. And we could also be
reminded that even the people we consider to be the heroes
aren't always perfect.

Title
Review for Steele Justice (1987)
A few years ago, my country was embroiled in long and bloody
war, and I had lot of opportunity to see what happens with
the veterans afterwards. Usually, those who spent time on
the front lines are getting little more than tap on
shoulder, measly pension and rejection by society that
considers them basketheads and losers; on the other hand,
those who contributed to the war effort by doing nothing in
safety of the rear are ones that are massing fame, fortune
and political power. As this film shows, that sad truth is
universal, and Vietnam War wasn't exception. John Steele
(Martin Kove) and Lee Van Minh (Robert Kim) risk their lives
at the end of war, only to see corrupt South Vietnamese
general Kwan (Soon Teck-Or) taking CIA money and leaving
them for die. Twelve years later, general Kwan is a
respected businessman and unofficial leader of Vietnamese
community in Los Angeles. John Steele, on the other hand, is
an unemployed loser, who was thrown out of police five years
ago. His war comrade and former partner Lee is still in the
force, and unsuccessfully trying to connect Kwan with
drug-smuggling operations. After Lee and his family get
killed by Kwan's henchmen, Steele decides to go to war
against Kwan to avenge his best friend's death.
For many critics STEELE JUSTICE was nothing more than
routine and not very original LETHAL WEAPON rip-off, filled
with all the clichs of 1980s action cinema. Here we have
Vietnam veteran as a synonym for invincible one-man- army;
businessmen that can't make money in any other way than by
smuggling drugs; killing of partner/significant other as
motive for revenge; and final showdown in a warehouse. What
distinguishes this film from the rest of many similar
B-products is huge army of capable actors like Ronny Cox,
Bernie Casey and Joseph Campanella in supporting roles,
together with Sarah Douglas, Sela Ward and Shannon Tweed
that fill the babes quota. Unfortunately, the main lead,
Martin Kove, looks like caricature of Rambo, same as Soon
Teck-Or looks like a caricature of Fu Manchu. Although
writer and director Robert Boris tries to take subject
matter seriously, this movie occasionally slips into camp
territory. Most obvious example is a sequence when rock
music video, directed by Sela Ward's character, suddenly
turns into gunfight between Steele and Asian assassins, led
by Al Leong, Asian stuntman with long hair who made
reputation by playing cannon fodder in such movies. All in
all, although the viewer might get drowned in the sea of
clichs and bad 1980s music, STEELE JUSTICE might serve him
as mild guilty pleasure.

Title
Review for Pręt-ŕ-Porter (1994)
For the author of this review clothing is primarily the
invention that protects human body from the natural
elements. In some occasions clothes can be the source of
aesthetic pleasure, but such instances are too rare to
justify the phenomenon of modern fashion industry. Teen
models that promote anorexia, bulimia, self-mutilation and
heroin use; outfits that can be worn only by masochists,
exhibitionists and other sexual perverts; instant stardom
for people who create clothes that average person can't
afford; and billions of dollars that could be spent for
things like sheltering cyclone victims in Bangladesh - all
that can be seen as a symptom of decline of Western
civilisation and, in light of it, people might even have
some understanding for Bin Laden and his ilk. So when Robert
Altman made satirical attempt on fashion industry in 1994
film READY TO WEAR, the author of this review greeted that
effort with enthusiasm.
Like in most of the best known Altman's films, there isn't
anything resembling clear plot. Just like in NASHVILLE or
SHORT CUTS, there is a series of loosely connected subplots
dealing with large number of characters that happen to be
one place at a particular time. In this case, the place is
Paris, where crcme de la crcme of fashion industry - models,
designers and media - gather for one of two annual fashion
shows. This is an opportunity for Altman to show us whole
variety of unusual characters and present hypocrisy,
depravity and pointlessness that rule supreme in that world.
For many people, including the author of this review, READY
TO WEAR was a disappointment. Script by Altman and Barbara
Schulgasser is at times really mean towards fashion
industry, but the edge, that used to be so effective against
Hollywood in PLAYER, is missing. Perhaps this is due to the
fact that Altman and Schulgasser had less knowledge of
fashion industry than of Hollywood. Loose structure of this
film works against it - some subplots and characters are
effective, and some aren't and only makes this film longer
than it should be. Some characters (including celebrities
playing themselves in cameo roles) appear for no apparent
reason. The stories are often interrupted with
quasi-documentary footage of fashion shows and,
consequently, film looses its pace. The thing that saves
READY TO WEAR are the actors who seem to have great deal of
fun playing outrageous and often pathetic characters
(especially Richard E. Grant and Forest Whitaker as two gay
designers or Marcello Mastroianni and Sofia Loren as old
lovers). The other thing is ironic, not so subtle but
nevertheless very effective ending that would undoubtedly
please some male members of the audience. In any case, READY
TO WEAR, despite being a disappointment, still presents us
with an interesting look towards one of the most visible
phenomena of modern culture.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Across the Pacific (1942)
Thanks to the unwritten dogmas of "political correctness"
Hollywood moviemakers these days are supposed to avoid
ethnic or racial stereotypes in their films. We might argue
whether Hollywood puts considerable effort in this, or
whether overzealous implementation of those rules affects
the quality of recent films, but most of the people would
agree that Hollywood made significant progress, at least
compared with previous decades. Reputation of some older
Hollywood films is often tarnished (or controversial, at
best) because of the negative portrayals of certain ethnic
and racial groups. This is especially the case with films
made during WW2, notably those that deal with Japanese. One
of such examples is ACROSS THE PACIFIC, 1942 spy thriller
directed by great John Huston. Additional reason why this
film often gets overlooked is because Huston used cast and
crew of THE MALTESE FALCON, and many of the film scholars
see ACROSS THE PACIFIC as nothing more than much inferior
and rather insignificant follow-up to Huston's true
masterpiece.
The plot, based on the screenplay by Richard Macaulay,
starts on November 17th 1941, few weeks before American
entry in WW2. Rick Leland (played by Humphrey Bogart) is
U.S. army officer who had been dishonourably discharged from
service for embezzling regimental funds. Since soldiering
happens to be his life, he travels to Halifax in order to
offer his services to Canadians, but his bad reputation
precedes him. Out of desperation, he decides to join Chang
Kai-Shek's army and, in order to travel across the Pacific,
he boards Japanese freighter "Genoa Maru". Charming Canadian
girl Alberta Marlow (played by Mary Astor) boards same
vessel and Leland soon falls in love with her. Their
shipboard romance is shadowed by the presence of elegant,
but nevertheless sinister Doctor Lorenz (played by Sydney
Greenstreet), university professor who used to live in Far
East for 30 years and who doesn't hide his strong
pro-Japanese feelings. Lorenz is aware of Leland's
bitterness towards US government and wants to use it in
order to recruit ex-soldier for some covert activities in
Panama.
ACROSS THE PACIFIC represents craftsmanship of Hollywood
Golden Era at its best - plot is a rather interesting
combination of international spy intrigue, melodrama and
humour. Cast of MALTESE FALCON is giving another great
performance - Bogart is quite believable as disgraced
officer and has incredibly good chemistry with Mary Astor,
this time playing somewhat simpler, but definitely more
charming character than in previous film. Greenstreet is
very impressive as villain, albeit not very different from
characters he had played in many similar films. Dialogue has
a lot of great lines, including some not so subtle Freudian
references (especially when characters compare size of their
guns). However, the ending of the film is very weak -
interesting plot is drowned in cheap melodrama and not very
believable method of providing obligatory Happy End. Perhaps
Huston is not to be blamed for this, since he left the
shooting in order to go to war and left directing to Vincent
Sherman who was not up to the task.
Depiction of Japanese characters, although questionable for
our standards, may be useful for those who want to study
inter-racial relations in 1940s America. Japanese are
portrayed as evil, insidious and utterly alien to American
society. Attempts of integration or assimilation are bound
to fail, which is suggested with scene in Panamanian cinema
featuring Japanese immigrants preferring technically
inferior movies from their old country to more glamorous
Hollywood. Moviemaker's scepticism towards individuals
overcoming their cultural and racial background is also
underlined with the character of Lorenz's henchman Joe
Totsuiko (played by Victor Sen Young) who wants to look and
sound more American than Americans themselves only to become
a caricature; in the final scenes, Doctor Lorenz, who made a
great deal of superiority of Oriental culture, fails
miserably in his attempt to follow example of his Japanese
role models. This worldview might look unacceptable for most
of today's audience, but it is presented very skilfully,
which is another reason why ACROSS THE PACIFIC should be
seen as something more than simple WW2 propaganda.
Review written on September 21st 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Piano, The (1993)
Last decade of this dying century was rather harsh for many
people who used to live in my part of the world, especially
if those people were civic-minded intellectuals or
technocrats. For them, it was natural to seek happiness
somewhere else and one spot on the other side of the globe
became very popular. New Zealand, with its nice climate,
thriving economy and plenty of job opportunities, became
sort of promised land for many people who wanted to improve
their life. Perhaps some of them would change their mind and
not see New Zealand as paradise on Earth after watching
PIANO, Award-winning 1993 melodrama by Jane Campion.
The heroine of the film, set in 1852, is Ada (played by
Holly Hunter), beautiful woman who was sent from Scotland in
order to be wed to Stewart (Sam Neill), New Zealand colonist
and wealthy landowner. With her, Ada to the cold, rainy and
muddy colony brings her 9-year (presumably illegitimate)
daughter Flora (Anna Paquin) and huge piano. For Ada, piano
is very important, because since the age of 6 she refused to
speak and the music is her only form of expression. However,
Stewart doesn't see the importance of the piano for his
bride, and he leaves her instrument on the beech. Bains
(Harvey Keitel), Stewart's neighbour, rough, illiterate man
who had adopted Maori ways, falls in love with Ada and
realises how important piano is for her. So he trades gives
some land to Stewart in exchange for piano, and later
arranges for Ada to give him piano lessons. He than offers
her to get her piano back, in exchange for sexual favours.
Ada complies, but soon Stewart finds the truth and all leads
to dramatic and violent finale.
In its time, THE PIANO was a film adored by critics, and it
is very easy to explain why. Superb cinematography by Stuart
Dryburgh with its use of blue and grey tones gives a right,
depressive tone of the film, with very good contrast
provided by warmer colours during the love scenes. Costumes
by Janet Patterson give the right period feel. Finally,
acting is excellent. Holly Hunter deserved her "Oscar", no
matter how her role of a cripple looked like standard
Academy choice for best performance. Anna Paquin, who, by
receiving the golden statuette with the age of 9, broke
record for youngest Award winner, is also very good,
although overshadowed by her better and more experience
co-worker. But the true gem of the film is Harvey Keitel,
who spares no effort in order to portray the complex and
transforming character of Bains as realistically as
possible. Sam Neill, who got the thankless role of a
husband, hardly can do anything to match their talent.
Finally, the entire feel of the film is provided by an
excellent musical score by Michael Nyman, one of the best
and most memorable in the recent decade.
Unfortunately, having many good or excellent doesn't mean
that the movie must be good or excellent as a whole. In case
of THE PIANO, it happened most probably because the writer
and director Jane Campion had the right ideas in her
"Oscar"-awarded screenplay, but lacked the ability to make
it understandable to the audience. This story was very
romantic in nature, displaying the conflict between the
individual and conformist society, and even more universal
one, conflict between passion and reason. However, for me,
this film was actually done great disservice with the
overkill of feminism (quite understandable, because the film
was made during the peak of Political Correctness era), and
by making the character of Ada too bizarre and unbelievable.
Also, the character of Flora could have easily been left out
of picture. Jane Campion makes confusion even greater with
some bad editing during the film, and by some sudden and
gratuitous violence and pointless, although visually
impressive finale that lacks any emotional catharsis, at
least when the author of this review is concerned. Many of
those flaws would be easier to tolerate if Campion had
worked a little bit harder to make this film pleasing to the
eye. Her naturalistic approach only made those flaws more
obvious. Despite that, THE PIANO is still good film to
watch, but only if we can stop thinking that it should have
been much better.

Title
Review for Blown Away (1994)
1990s would remembered as the era of binary movie events in
Hollywood - two movies dealing with the same subject, or, to
be precise, same "high concept". In Summer 1994, that "high
concept" was "mad bomber action thriller". In few weeks,
"thrillride of the summer" actionfest SPEED was followed by
rather action thriller BLOWN AWAY, so disappointing that
most of the people these days associate the title with the
1992 thriller in which Nicole Eggert did few nude scenes.
The movie begins in the prison in Northern Ireland, where
Gaerity (Tommy Lee Jones), IRA terrorist with the great
talent to make lethal explosive devices from almost any
material, escapes from prison. He comes to Boston, where he
accidentally notices Jimmy Dove (Jeff Bridges), dedicated
bomb disposal expert within Boston police. Few people except
Gaerity know the Dove's violent past, when he used to be IRA
terrorist before becoming sick with violence, betraying
Gaerity and emigrating to America where he changed the name
and started using his experience for good purpose. Gaerity
holds Dove personally responsible for his captivity and
begins the campaign of bombing terror, directed specifically
at Dove's colleagues, friends and relatives. Dove, who is
just going to retire and start family, now must confront the
mad bomber.
While SPEED doesn't even try to bother with plot and
characters, using them only as an excuse for long and
spectacular action scenes, BLOWN AWAY tries to be more
conventional and provide the action with some back story.
And that is the main reason why it is inferior to SPEED.
Badly written plot and badly written characters are
sometimes worse than no plot and no characters at all.
Screenplay by John Bateer and John Rice, barely touches the
complicated issues of Northern Ireland, using the tragedy
only as the cheap backstory for even cheaper drama. The plot
is, of course, full of implausibilities. The main one is the
fact that movie fails to explain how the single individual,
no matter how brilliant he is, can produce thousands of
deadly devices and hold entire city at bay. Those questions,
same as in the case of SPEED, could be forgotten while the
action goes on, but the pauses between action scenes are
filled with cliched and predictable situation that should
provide some background to the characters. Because of them,
movie seems a little bit too long, and boring at times. The
most annoying element of the film, however, is Tommy Lee
Jones in the role of mad bomber. His acting is so
over-the-top that potentially fascinating villain turns into
pathetic caricature of himself. This role is in painful
contrast with the strong performance given by that same
actor in FUGITIVE. The film have few bright points, though.
Some of the action scenes are fine, which should be credited
to director Stephen Hopkins (PREDATOR II, JUDGEMENT NIGHT).
And Forrest Whitaker really shines in minor role of Dove's
colleague. But, all in all, BLOWN AWAY is a film that was
justifiably shadowed by its more famous, yet hardly
unforgettable competitor.

Title
Review for And the Band Played On (1993) (TV)
Some may argue that movies made for cable television belong
to the limbic world between commercial cinema and commercial
television, which allows their authors to use all their
creative energy without full limitations of those two
industries. On one hand, cable movies are less restrained by
censorship. On the other hand, they are less restrained by
commercial considerations. So, it shouldn't surprise anyone
that some of the best or most impressive pieces of American
cinema in 1990s came from that domain. One of such cases is
AND THE BAND PLAYED ON, 1993 HBO docudrama directed by Roger
Spotiswoode.
The movie is based on the book by Randy Shilts, gay activist
who chronicled first years of AIDS epidemic. The author of
this review had read excerpts from that book many years ago.
Shilts, who died from AIDS himself in 1994, made quite
compelling read, telling the true yet intriguing story about
few unknown heroes - doctors, government officials, gay
activists, scientists - who were trying to cope with new,
frightening disease. Although non-fiction, book was full of
real, vivid characters and dramatic situations, and it
looked like a good screen material .
Among many characters in the movie, chief protagonist is Dr.
Don Francis (played by Matthew Modine), CDC expert for
infectious diseases. At the beginning of the film we see him
still troubled by his traumatic experiences during the Ebola
epidemic in Central Africa 1976. Few years later, his team
is faced with another, less visible, yet equally deadly
medical mystery - young, healthy people, mostly homosexuals
are having their immune system destroyed. While the number
of casualties slowly rises, Francis desperately tries to
find the cause and suspects the unknown virus. In the
meantime, gay activist Bill Kraus (Ian McKellen) tries to
raise awareness about "Gay Related Immune Defficiency", both
in the gay community and among U.S. administration. But the
odds are against him - in 1980 Ronald Reagan becomes
President and new, conservative administration is unlikely
to help gay minority by financing desperately needed
research. Research is even more hampered by the rivalry
between Pasteur Institute in Paris and group of American
scientists led by Dr. Robert Gallo (Alan Alda).
Although faithful to the book, and, as a consequence, almost
two and half hours long, this film never becomes boring.
Spottiswoode keeps the perfect pace, and the editing
provides great drama. But the most important asset of this
film are the actors - many of major Hollywood stars agreed
to appear in cameos. They all work very hard and their roles
are something to be remembered, even when they pop up only
for a second. Even Matthew Modine, who can be rather
irritating in other films, is impressive here as hero.
However, the most impressive role is played by Ian McKellen
as Bill Kraus, the most tragic figure in this sad epic.
Musical score by Carter Burwell helps to set atmosphere and
make this film distinctive from any average television
product with the similar themes.
The movie, although very impressive, could have been better.
The ending, with Elton John's song and long series of shots
featuring most important AIDS victims, seemed somewhat out
of place. The film had already told everything the viewer
had to know, and this remainder at the end looked
over-sentimental and too direct. But, despite that flaw,
this is still very good piece of cinema. The audience
recognised that - in, Croatia, for example, AND THE BAND
PLAYED ON was the only film ever to be released in cinema
theatres after being in video distribution first. So far,
this is the most informative and compelling film ever made
about AIDS, and I hope that one day its reputation would
surpass unjustifiably praised PHILADELPHIA.

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
There are probably many ways to classify connoisseurs of
modern cinema. One of them is to divide them into two very
distinct camps - those who worship Oliver Stone's 1994 film
NATURAL BORN KILLERS as the ultimate cinematic masterpiece
of its time and those who think of it as nothing more than
celluloid equivalent of an horse manure on hot desert road.
The author of this review usually avoids extreme opinions
and tries to reach middle ground whenever possible. However,
in the case of NATURAL BORN KILLERS such efforts were
fruitless. I was forced to take one of those extreme stands
and I took the latter one.
There are many reasons why my dislike of NATURAL BORN
KILLERS takes dimensions beyond those reserved for usual
Hollywood stinkers. One of them is the fact that Oliver
Stone used all two hours of this film as an opportunity to
show the world that he could master all visual techniques of
filmmaking. This demonstration includes use of both colour
and black-and-white photography, 35mm and Super 8, various
film stock, slow-motion, fast-motion, all possible camera
angles and all possible ways camera can record light.
Unfortunately, rapid editing is also part of this
demonstration and the ultimate impression comes in the form
of nausea for many unfortunate souls who were introduced to
NATURAL BORN KILLERS in theatres (same effect is less
visible among those viewers, who were wise to watch this
film on video, in much safer environment of their own
homes).
Of course, some of Stone's supporters claim that the
aforementioned nausea was the aim of this film. This nausea
was supposed to be the only way for Oliver Stone to deliver
his Message to masses, who would miss it in the hands of
more conventional director. This Message, however, was
supposed to come from the original script by Quentin
Tarantino - dark satire about American media obsession with
crime and violence. Unfortunately, this script came to the
hands of Oliver Stone and two of his co-writers - Danny
Veloz and Richard Rutowsky. Their treatment of Tarantino's
text was probably equal to the way Jack the Ripper had
treated London women, so Tarantino disowned his screenplay.
The protagonists of this film are two outcasts - Mickey Knox
(played by Woody Harrelson) and his girlfriend Mallory
Wilson (played by Juliette Lewis). Starting with Mallory's
abusing father Ed (played by Rodney Dangerfield) two of them
engage in the series of random killings. Since they always
leave a witness after their killing sprees and since they
always take credit for the murders, this pair of serial
killers is turned into media celebrities. They are equally
hounded by psychopathic lawman Jack Scagnetti (played by Tom
Sizemore) and scruples TV show host Wayne Gale (played by
Robert Downey Jr.). Their capture and trial is not the end
of their killing spree nor of media madness - Wayne Gale is
coming to prison, run by sadistic warden Dwight McClusky
(played by Tommy Lee Jones) in order to make exclusive TV
interview with Mickey that would lead to the new cycle of
violence.
If we are to believe Oliver Stone and many of the critics
who hailed this work as masterpiece, NATURAL BORN KILLERS
was supposed to be something like a wake-up call to America,
celluloid protest against media-induced national obsession
with crime and violence, condemnation of the culture that
turns psychopathic killers into heroes of popular culture.
Unfortunately, Stone's film, despite the intentions of the
author, turned into something quite different. Unable to
resist his urges to turn this film into his life-long
personal crusade against Establishment, and lacking any
sense of subtlety, Stone watered down his original
intentions by redirecting his anger and unleashing his
creative demons on too many targets at once - media, law
enforcement, family, society and civilisation in general. In
the end, this film totally misses the point and turns into
the exact thing Stone wanted to criticise - by showing
Mickey and Mallory as heroes, romantic rebels whose loves
transcends traditional morality, Stone glamorises violence,
murder and all the most virulent forms of sociopathic
behaviour.
The last and most sinister aspect of NATURAL BORN KILLERS
revealed itself to the author of this review in real life.
Few years ago I witnessed rather unpleasant scene involving
certain menacing but obviously drugged-out individual who
was trying to intimidate persons around them by publicly
proclaiming his love for NATURAL BORN KILLERS. This little
incident corresponded with series of media reports about
real life acts of violence being inspired by NATURAL BORN
KILLERS (or, to be more precise, their perpetrators trying
to diminish their own responsibility by putting all the
blame on Stone's work). And all those reports, hyped out of
proportions (like Columbine massacre and alleged MATRIX
influence), can serve certain political agendas - agendas
that manifest themselves in strengthened censorship,
suspension of individual rights and other measures that
would increase power of the same institutions Stone tried to
attack in his film. When this happens, failure of NATURAL
BORN KILLERS would be complete.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Remains of the Day, The (1993)
One of the most common complaints against producer Ismail
Merchant and director James Ivory is that their films look
the same. Actually, phrase "Merchant-Ivory film" began to
enter dictionaries as description for "adaptation of
Victorian or Edwardian novel about socially repressed
stiff-upper-lip middle or upper class Englishmen". However,
every now and then Merchant and Ivory make the film that
strays from that formula. One of such occasions was THE
REMAINS OF THE DAY, 1993 adaptation of novel by Japanese
writer Kazuo Ishiguro, set in England during the last
decades of British Empire.
The screenplay was written by Merchant-Ivory's long time
associate Ruth Prawer Jabhvala. Film begins in 1958 when
luxurious country manour called Darlington Hall gets sold to
American congressman Lewis (played by Christopher Reeve).
Lewis has spent some time in the manour before WW2, so he
wants to gather as many of the original staff as possible.
One members of the staff is long-time butler Stevens (played
by Anthony Hopkins), who begins travelling England in search
of his former co-workers. During the travel he remembers
pre-war days in Darlington Hall, when he was employed by the
Lord Darlington (played by James Fox), politically
well-connected aristocrat with pro-German sympathies which
grew stronger with incoming world conflict. Stevens, same as
his old father (played by Peter Vaughn) was the man
completely dedicated to his duty towards his master, and
nothing outside his small world mattered to him, not even
the increasing numbers of men in black shirt who began
arriving to the estate. When new housekeeper Miss Kenton
(played by Emma Thompson) arrived in Darlington, her rather
different temperament and worldview caused initial friction
with Stevens. But two of them gradually develop love for
each other, but Stevens was bound by tradition and unable to
express his feelings.
According to the old saying, the best love stories are those
about unrequited, impossible or unhappy love. THE REMAINS OF
THE DAY, one of the most melancholic films made recently,
perfectly fits this description. To make the tragedy even
less bearable, the love in this film was present but never
consumed. However, Jhabvala and Ivory weren't satisfied by
making this film as simple melodrama about love squashed by
societal pressures. They actually took great pains in order
to describe and represent such pressures, making THE REMAINS
OF THE DAY into film which is both melodrama and
sociological study. Ivory paints both fascinating and
utterly bleak picture of men who are trained all their life
to supress their feelings and most natural desires for the
utterly pointless and worthless ideal of "duty". In doing
so, Ivory employs same subtlety and stiff-upper-lip
philosophy of his protagonists. So, the inner life of the
protagonists is never explicitly portrayed and instead we
receive only hints in order to reconstruct the drama
afterwards. This slow approach turns very effective in few
scenes that feature protagonists who allow feelings to
manifest through simple but powerful gestures.
This approach was perfect for Anthony Hopkins, whose role of
emotionally repressed butler shares some resemblance with
his best known performance in SILENCE OF THE LAMBS. Hopkins
plays Stevens as a character who almost never changes the
expression of his face or the tone of his voice, but small
gestures instead can speak volumes. Such strong performance
is also given by Emma Thompson as a woman who looks like his
emotional opposite yet nevertheless succumbs to the same
societal pressures. Two of them managed to overshadow
everyone, including James Fox as their pompous aristocratic
master, alienated from the outside world.
Nostalgic and melancholic feeling of the film is somewhat
compromised with the filmmaker's need to put this powerful
intimate drama into historical background. So, THE REMAINS
OF THE DAY receive another, political dimension. Through the
character of Lord Darlington, British aristocrat alienated
from real world, Ishiguro, Jhabvala and Ivory try to explain
reasons which led Britain to pre-WW2 appeasament policy
towards Hitler. In their opinion, government was dominated
by aristocrats, conservative and totally alienated from the
real world and thus more than willing to accept any option
that would guarantee their rigid class privileges - and
Nazism was exactly such option. Lord Darlington is presented
as one of such fools, whose initially innocent Germanophilia
later develops into full-blown Nazism, including racial
purification of his staff. Naturally, such people wouldn't
have anything against Hitler taking over Europe and their
influence on British government explains betrayal of
Czehoslovakia in Munich 1938 - diplomatic disaster which
practically made WW2 inevitable one year later. This view,
although rather popular among amateur historians, is not
quite correct. British appeasament of Hitler in late 1930s
was motivated more with pragmatic than ideological reasons -
British and French governments were impressed with the speed
and scope of German pre-war re-armament and with their
militaries lagging behind, appeasement was seen as buying
time for re-armament of their own. Also, appeasament wasn't
only advocated by aristocrats - majority of population of
Western democracies prefered to sacrifice some unknown
countries in Eastern Europe in order to avoid going back to
trenches.
THE REMAINS OF THE DAY perhaps owe this political dimension
to the times when they were made. In 1993 world's media was
still bombarded with images of war-torn Bosnia and many
comentators criticised British and French policy of
appeasing Milosevic, drawing parallels to 1930s and Hitler.
Jhabvala and Ivory offer alternative to this suicidal and
morally bankrupt policy in the form of American congressman
who, same as his country in 1990s, favours tough
uncompromising line against world thugs. This is probably
the weakest part of the film, since it is not historically
accurate. USA in 1930s were more concerned with problems of
Great Depression and increasingly isolationistic, with
government and public even less likely to meddle into
European affairs. Without that uncessary excursion into
pre-WW2 politics and with authors completely concentrated on
more down-to-earth drama, THE REMAINS OF THE DAY could have
became true masterpiece. However, even this less than
perfect film might be more than satisfying to the fans of
period melodramas.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for High Crusade, The (1994)
Roland Emmerich might be criticised of many things, but
lacking enthusiasm for his films is not one of them.
Unfortunately, although enthusiasm often happens to be one
of the major ingredients of success, it is never the only
one. In case of Emmerich, his constant efforts to realise
childhood dream of toping STAR WARS and making the best
science fiction film of all times never produced desired
results. Emmerich failed even when satisfying with the role
of producer, like in the case of THE HIGH CRUSADE, 1994
German science fiction directed by Klaus Knoesel and Holger
Neuh"user.
Failure of this film was especially painful for the fans of
Poul Anderson, whose popular 1960 novel was the basis for
the script. The plot begins in the year 1345 in England,
when the group of English noblemen led by Sir Roger of
Jernyngham (played by Rick Overton) just begins to prepare
to go on the crusade and liberate Holy Land from the
Muslims. In the midst of their preparations, an alien
spaceship lands and attacks their castle. However, it turns
out that even the technologically superior aliens aren't
good match for the sheer brutality of medieval knights - Sir
Roger and his men manage not only to repeal the attack but
also to take control of the ship. Crusaders, equipped with
this miracle of alien technology, want to go to Jerusalem
and fulfil their mission but the crusade they are going to
take part would lead them much further.
The basic concept of the original novel - first contact
between medieval knights and extraterrestrials - probably
looked quite silly to the filmmakers, so they decided to
make film into comedy. Unfortunately, they also believed
that the concept would be not only silly but also funny
enough to make audience laugh throughout the whole movie.
This was not the case, partly because the whole concept had
one important flaw - humour based on cultural clash didn't
connect with the modern audiences. For them both the
extraterrestrials and the medieval knights were equally
alien. So THE HIGH CRUSADE ended like a disorganised and not
very funny mix of MONTY PYTHON AND HOLY GRAIL, LES
VISITEURS, at times very impressive special effects and not
very convincing aliens. The general impression of film is
somewhat improved thanks to the very good cast (although at
times underused, like in the case of MTV's host Jay Cokes)
led by John Rhys-Davies who is very good in the role of
Brother Parvus. However, THE HIGH CRUSADE is nevertheless
hardly anything more than often boring and incredibly
unfunny farce and another proof that good literature seldom
results in good films.
Review written on September 22nd 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com -
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Enter the Dragon (1973)
When I was growing up in 1970s, boys in my school used to divide into
two groups, based on their action movies preferences. The first one,
myself included, liked movies that featured spectacular car chases, lots
of machinegun fire and huge explosions. The latter one preferred Hong
Kong martial arts flicks, probably because they could (or, to be more
precise, thought they could) imitate its stunts in the real life.
Decades later, while refining my own cinematic taste, I began to
appreciate and actually like those movies, probably because of
overexposure to shoot-em-up idiocy of 1980s ramboids. Yes, most of the
Kung Fu and other "martial arts" flicks were cheap, they had predictable
and formulaic plot, and asked very little of production values aside
from martial arts skills. But, in the same time, those movies had their
own rules and in the hands of capable director could become a terrific
guilty pleasure and source of relaxation.
The best of those movies, one that passed the test of time and managed
to keep its own cult status after quarter of century was ENTER THE
DRAGON. Made in 1973 in a joint Hong Kong - Hollywood venture, it was
intended to bring Bruce Lee's skills and Kung Fu philosophy to the
Western audience. It succeeded, but it is still debatable whether by its
own merit or by the unfortunate and mysterious death of Bruce Lee that
immortalised the myth about that actor.
Lee plays a quiet Shaolin monk who is a martial arts expert. He is
approached by Interpol official who asks him to join tri-annual martial
arts tournament that is held on a remote island, owned and controlled by
Han, renegade Shaolin monk. Interpol suspects that the martial arts
business is just cover for narcotics, gun-running and prostitution
operations and Lee must find the evidence necessary for authorities to
intervene. Lee accepts the mission because of personal reasons -
O'Harra, Han's brutal bodyguard was responsible for the tragic death of
Lee's sister years ago. The island is also destination of two colourful
martial arts experts from US - Williams (played by Jim Kelly) is Black
activist running from the racist police, and his friend Roper wants to
make money in order to pay gambling debts.
The plot of ENTER THE DRAGON was in many ways influenced by James Bond
(the 007 franchise itself would return favour by using Kung Fu elements
in THE MAN WITH THE GOLDEN GUN two years later). The main hero was faced
against a power-hungry megalomaniac on a remote island, alone against
whole army of bad guys. On the other hand, Lee was more believable hero
than Bond; deprived of guns and super-tech gadgets, he had to rely only
on his personal skills in order to survive. In the same time, the plot,
although extremely thin, allowed him even some internal battles -
between the natural instinct to avenge his sister and his own
anti-violent philosophy. The latter provided some opportunities to
evaluate Lee's acting skills and some new elements to his impressive
screen presence.
Although two other main actors - John Saxon being the obligatory good
white guy and Jim Kelly being the obligatory black good guy - were
intended to share top spot with Lee, they served as nothing more than a
comic relief. It is a real shame to see Kelly, definitely the worse
actor than Saxon, to steal the scenes from him only because his lines,
being the worst possible blaxploitation cliches, sound so damn over the
top. Other actors, not including Shih Kien who turns Han into typical,
although not very convincing Bondian villain, are nothing more than fist
fodder for Bruce Lee (among them is young Jackie Chan).
Fighting scenes are still impressive today as they were 25 years ago,
although they mostly lack gore associated with that genre. In many way
they are also more realistic (they were personally staged by Lee
himself), demanding only a blow or two to incapacitate or kill the
opponent. I'm not a martial arts expert nor the martial arts fan, but
comparing those scenes with typical scenes today I simply can't avoid to
appreciate the difference from today's movie fights when masses of
bloody pulp manage to get up from the floor and win in the end.
So, despite all the obvious flaws that preclude this movie of being Top
100 of All Times, ENTER THE DRAGON is a incredibly entertaining piece of
cinema and the martial arts flick that can be enjoyed even by those who
don't like that particular genre.

Title
Review for Goodfellas (1990)
The most common (and in many cases the only) complaint
against Francis Ford Coppola's 1972 masterpiece THE
GODFATHER is glamorising of Mafia, which is presented as an
institution guided by ancient tradition and virtues like
honour, loyalty and solidarity more suitable for some
gentler, kinder ages. Martin Scorsese, another Italoamerican
moviemaker, confronted that perspective with his own, more
down-to-earth vision of Mafia in 1973 MEAN STREETS, movie
that dealt with lower echelons of organised crime.
Unfortunately for Scorsese, his film was unspectacular and
too artsy to compete with Coppola's influence on Mafia
portrayals in the movies. Seventeen years later Scorsese
returned to mean streets of New York with another film that
dealt with darker side of American organised crime. This
film was GOODFELLAS, epic black comedy which is today
considered as one of the best and most influential films of
1990s.
GOODFELLAS owes some of its initial success and popularity
to the fact that it was based on the true story, told in
best-seller book WISEGUY by Nicholas Pileggi (who would
co-write the screenplay for the film). The book, as well as
the film, chronicled thirty years in the life of Henry Hill
(played by Ray Liotta), Irish-Italian criminal from New
York. At the age of 13 he gets recruited in the criminal
organisation of Paulie Cicero (played by Paul Sorvino),
local mob boss, and gradually climbs up the ladder starting
with small errands. After couple of years, together with his
best childhood friend Tommy De Vito (played by Joe Pesci),
he joins the crew of expert thieves led by Jimmy Conway
(played by Robert de Niro). Three of them spend years as
best friends and associates, gathering enormous wealth from
their criminal enterprises that would culminate with one of
the most spectacular robberies in American history. Wealth,
influence and privileges of men connected with Mafia are
enough for Henry Hill to seduce his future wife Karen
(played by Lorraine Bracco), who would afterwards remain
loyal to her husband despite infidelities, domestic abuse,
arrests and would even be accomplice to his own private drug
dealing business. But the perfect world of "wiseguys"
gradually begins to fall apart - Tommy's unpredictable
outbursts of homicidal violence, Jimmy's reluctance to share
his part of the loot with partners and, finally, Henry's own
drug habit would lead to his downfall and make him question
his loyalty to the friends.
GOODFELLAS is an excellent example of a film that represents
work of a film genius in his full glory. Scorsese managed to
create a vision which is effective and complete despite
being full of contradictions that would ripped the film
apart in the hands of less talented filmmaker. World
depicted in this film is both ordinary and fascinating.
Scorsese spares no effort to show us all the violence,
hypocrisy and inherent paranoia of organised crime, yet it
manages to make it both seductive and funny. After being
exposed to two and half hours of the film and three decades
of criminal history (based on some notorious real life
events), the audience understands why the characters chose
such dangerous life paths, trading the superficial and
short-lasting glamour and prosperity of a criminal to the
dullness and poverty of honest citizens. Scorsese also
manages to break viewer's moralistic inhibitions by showing
truly revolting material - scenes that depict personal
tragedies, broken homes, human depravity, violence,
bloodshed and murder - in all their uncompromising reality,
but in a manner that would make it amusing and funny to the
audience. With the use of ironic soundtrack, manipulative
shots, character's dialogue or narrator's commentary,
GOODFELLAS represents the new standards of black humour that
would became very popular few years later during Tarantino
era.
Even if we don't pay attention to skills with which
potentially disturbing material becomes eye pleasing and
entertaining, we should admit that Scorsese displays his
talents of truly original and creative filmmaker. First, we
might notice unusual structure of the plot - relatively
minor subplot is used as movie's ironic prologue. Then,
instead of single narrator, Scorsese switches to the second
character as narrator in the middle of the film only to
switch back to the original shortly afterwards. This
multiple points of views, both in terms of narration and
various subjective shots, only lengthens the ironic distance
towards characters and their situation. Same ironic distance
comes with extremely effective choice of soundtrack.
Nostalgia for good old times is illustrated with
easy-listening 1950s pop songs, while depression, paranoia
and bad times find their expression in more neurotic rock
songs of late 1960s and 1970s. But the soundtrack is most
effective when it is used as ironic comment - almost
pastoral, easy listening tunes make strong and very ironic
contrast to the scenes of violence and bloodshed. However,
thing most associated with this film is couple of continuos
shots that feature characters moving through large rooms and
interacting with dozens if not hundreds of people. Such
scenes, although they require very great skill and patience
during their shootings, became very popular among other
directors in 1990s. Fragmentary character of the screenplay,
which doesn't have straight plot and instead bases film on
series of loosely connected vignettes, gives another
interesting opportunity for Scorsese. He uses this structure
of film to experiment, and most successful of such
experiments is hilarious "A Day in Life" segment near the
end of the film.
Another essential element of GOODFELLAS is large but superb
collection of great acting talents. The most respectable
among them is Robert de Niro, but his character, who happen
to be most quiet and business-like member of criminal trio,
gets overshadowed by two of his friends and colleagues. Joe
Pesci deserved his "Oscar" for supporting role of homicidal
psychopath Tommy, and his lines, including ad-libs, probably
represent the most memorable element of the film. Ray
Liotta, although equally talented, perhaps doesn't look as
the best choice for narrator and nominal hero of the film.
Liotta's Henry Hill looks somewhat too Hollywoodised and
glamorous among this bunch of low-level street thugs.
Liotta, on the other hand, improves general impression by
very realistic and menacing portrayal of drug addiction.
Lorraine Bracco is, on the other hand, very effective and
believable as Karen Hill, wife who gradually descends into
same moral cesspool as her husband. Paul Sorvino is also
very effective as patriarch mafioso, and among the
supporting cast most memorable is Chuck Low as pestering
small-time gangster who unknowingly digs his own grave.
As a combination of clever sociological study, black humour
and innovative filmmaking GOODFELLAS became something only
the truly great films could do - work of art and excellent
popular entertainment in the same time. Because of this
achievement, and also because of the great influence on
future filmmakers, this cinematic gem deserves its rightful
place among the best films of 1990s.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Tora! Tora! Tora! (1970)
For many people, especially those who were confused by
complicated politics of Cold War and its traumatising
consequences like Vietnam or nuclear race, previous global
conflict - World War Two-  was considered to be the "good"
war. For the last half a century, that sentiment was shared
by Hollywood. Reasons are simple - that conflict affected,
directly or indirectly, almost every country on the globe,
thus providing material for interesting drama and
spectacular action. But, most of all, World War Two could be
seen as the last global conflict between clearly defined
forces of Good and Evil. Such simplistic formula is precious
for Hollywood screenwriters, and the fact that the most of
the audience already knows who to cheer for, makes their job
much easier. As a result, very few Hollywood movies actually
tried to approach events of World War Two from the
perspective of cold, objective historian. One of such rare
exceptions is TORA! TORA! TORA!, spectacular 1970 US-Japan
co-production about the event that still haunts relations
between those two nations.
The subject matter of the film, as well as the approach, is
clearly indicated in the opening titles. The purpose of the
movie is to give detailed description of the Japanese attack
on Pearl Harbour, based solely on documents and verified
historical accounts. That historical event is still very
traumatic for American people, despite the fact that it
paved the way to the great national triumph. So, it was very
unusual from the American authors not only to to co-operate
with their Japanese colleagues, but also to even give them
opportunity to express their own view on the subject.
Perhaps it was because the never ending Vietnam nightmare
brought any well-established truths into doubt. In any case,
the result is perhaps the most honest movie ever to be made
about WWII.
TORA! TORA! TORA! is actually combination of two movie that
document the event from two perspectives - Japanese and
American. Each segment is written directed by different
directors (Japanese by Kinji Fukasaku and Toshio Masuda,
American by Richard Fleischer), yet works very good as a
whole. First it documents political events that led to the
Japanese decision to attack; then the long Japanese
preparations for attack and unsuccessful American attempts
to predict and prevent their hostile intention; finally, we
see the attack itself and its immediate and devastating
consequences. In those segments we could see a huge contrast
between Japanese and Americans. Japanese are presented as
hard working, patriotic, brave and intelligent warriors that
carefully prepare for their daring raid, leaving nothing to
chance. Americans are, on the other hand, portrayed as bunch
of incompetent idiots, with few exceptions whose common
sense can't defeat sheer idiocy of military and political
red tape.
In entire film, there was very little room for some strong
roles. As in many other docudramas, the characters are here
simply to illustrate historical facts, not to work as
mechanism of plot. The only exception is So Yamamura who
gives very realistic, yet humane portrait of Admiral
Yamamoto, Japanese fleet leader who organised the attack
against USA despite having more than serious doubts about
bringing his country to war. However, the most attractive
thing in TORA! TORA! TORA! are the scenes of the attack,
spectacle that was recreated with great care for the
authentic details. That couldn't be done without use of
genuine locations and equipment, especially planes. Another
thing that helped the authenticity of this movie were
"Oscar"-winning special effects, that make the scenes of
utter destruction very convincing, even by today's
standards. Historical accuracy, something seldom seen in
Hollywood, recommends this movie to any viewer who would
want to learn something about World War Two.

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
Countries and legal systems that take the Rule of Law
principle seriously, had forbidden judges and juries to make
judgements in all matters that could involve them
personally. Luckily, movie reviewers aren't burdened with
such legislation. Otherwise, small pool of very special
movies would be forever ignored by this reviewer. In case of
STAR WARS, 1977 science fiction epic by George Lucas, the
consequences would be even more severe, because that film is
very special for tens of millions, if not hundreds of
millions of fans. In any case, objectivity is something
seldom seen in STAR WARS reviews, because undisputed
majority of reviewers rate it as one of the best, if not the
best film of all times. Those who don't usually have some
difficulties in hiding their artistic snobbery.
The author of this review must also concede his inability to
use cold, objective standards in reviewing this film. Like
so many previous reviewers, I must note that I watched STAR
WARS for the first time twenty years ago, and that I
remained enchanted by the experience ever since. Perhaps it
was childlike fascination with, until then unimaginable,
wonders that happened long time ago, in a galaxy far away.
Or perhaps it was the rush I felt minutes before the opening
shots, with my expectations already pumped up by serialised
comic books and novelisation I had read before. Anyway,
watching of STAR WARS was one of the most important movie
going experiences of my life. And it was also unmatched for
many years to come, because very few movies managed to have
such a strong impact on me like George Lucas' epic.
STAR WARS wasn't just important movie for me (or the
millions of fans who probably share the same sentiment). It
was the defining moment in the history of modern cinema.
Until than, American motion picture industry was in a limbo;
social turmoil in 1960s practically destroyed the Old
Hollywood, and new authors filled the void, mostly by using
Hollywood's financial and technical resources to create
serious, "personal" or "artsy" movies. As a result,
audience, traumatised of dark reality of Vietnam and
Watergate, didn't want to see the same dark and serious
content on the silver screen. George Lucas with its science
fiction epic was among the first to come into rescue. The
audience responded with unprecedented enthusiasm, and huge
financial success of the movie, later backed by supplement
industry of toys, books, comics, role playing games and
other merchandise, slowly began to change the face of
Hollywood. Serious, adult movies with artistic ambitions
faded into oblivion, and were replaced by industrial
products of "blockbuster" philosophy.
One of the biggest casualties of that trend was the science
fiction movie genre. Until 1977, science fiction movies were
mostly in B-production domain. In late 1960s, bigger budgets
for science fiction didn't look so strange anymore, thanks
to the great success of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY. But the same
success coincided with the surge of pesimism, and Hollywood
science fiction was as bleak as the rest of its production -
mostly dark, dystopic movies. However, in 1977 STAR WARS
showed once and for all that this genre can be inspiration
for popular movies, even among the audience that usually
doesn't like it. As a result, seriousness in cinematic
science fiction began fading away, although some good, dark
and cult quality SF and continued to be filmed until early
1980s. After that, science fiction continued to be
considered a synonym for family entertainment.
Ironically, the man responsible for STAR WARS was in its
time considered to be member of "New Hollywood" generation
of young movie authors who made "artsy" and "personal" films
in early 1970s. George Lucas established himself with the
dystopic SF movie THX 1138, and nostalgic drama AMERICAN
GRAFFITI. Both movies were considered "personal" in its
time, despite latter one becoming very popular. In a sense,
STAR WARS is an also very "personal" film, and the thorny
way to the final production shows that commercial
considerations were against it, not for it. But unlike many
"personal" movies of the era, its "personality" was in line
with the wishes of the general audience.
The plot, set "a long time ago, in a galaxy far away",
begins in a time of civil war. The evil Empire is threatened
by rebels who want to restore the old Republic. In order to
quash any opposition, the Empire had built Death Star,
superweapon powerful enough to destroy whole planets. The
information about Death Star, acquired by Rebel
intelligence, is being transported by Princess Leia Organa
(Carrie Fisher) when her ship gets intercepted by Imperial
cruiser. Princess is arrested by Imperial warlord Darth
Vader (played by David Prowse and voice by James Earl
Jones), but the information is being sent to nearby desert
planet of Tatooine via two humanoid robots - C3PO (Anthony
Daniels) and R2D2 (Kenny Baker). Those two robots are sold
to the family of Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), young
restless man who wants to leave his farm and become space
pilot. His adventure begins when R2D2 escapes, because the
information must reach mysterious local hermit Obi Wan
Kenobi (Alec Guiness). Old man is actually the last
surviving Jedi knight, member of the ancient order that
defended Republic through the use of mystical Force. After
some hesitation, Luke agrees to join Obi Wan in his mission
to save the Princess, while the old man would teach him the
ways of the Force. Their small band comes to the colourful
spaceport of Moss Eisely, where they hire the spaceship
owned by rogue pilot Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and his furry
sidekick Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew).
Critics who don't like the movie, especially those who can't
forgive Lucas for his contribution to the quashing of "New
Hollywood", are prone to point the lack of originality. On
the surface, they might be right; Lucas himself admits that
he found a lot of inspiration in the lore of Old Hollywood -
westerns, WWII aviation movies, old SF cliffhanger serials
of the 1930s and 1940s; yet the most obvious element would
be Akira Kurosawa's samurai classic THE HIDDEN FORTRESS. On
the other hand, those who had spent last two decades
studying the movie to death would say that the inspiration
for STAR WARS went even further - into collective
subconscious of Western civilisation (hinted by some mild
Tolkien references). The others would find the author's
element within the story - STAR WARS could be seen as an
anti- establishment film; young, long-haired, easy going,
nature-loving heroes are fighting against old, uptight and
oppressive forces who use supertechnology in most demonic
purposes.
Even out of its historical or social context, STAR WARS is
an impressive as a strictly technical piece of the seven
art. George Lucas' direction is very good, with the clever
editing and a well-paced segments between action and
dramatic buildup. Characters are well-drawn and deliver all
the necessary ingredients, both for the space opera and
Hollywood blockbuster. We have a "coming-of-age" hero,
damsel-in-distress (somewhat toned down due to the popular
feminist trends of the time), reluctant helper, benevolent
mentor, diabolical villain and, finally, comic relief in
form of two non-human characters. Some of the actors are
very good - Alec Guiness in his most famous role to date,
James Earl Jones whose voice is enough to cause unease,
Peter Cushing as an incarnation of pure evil in human form.
Unfortunately, the same can't be said for the main leads -
among the main trio of Mark Hamill, Carrie Fisher and
Harrison Ford, only the last one had the character
three-dimensional enough to launch his further acting
career.
The thing that looked like the most important segment of
STAR WARS phenomena during its initial release was the new
level of special effects technology. Often comparisons with
2001: SPACE ODYSSEY, another ground-breaking SF film, were
citing the sheer number of effects as a proof of the Lucas'
superiority over Kubrick. However, the special effects by
John Dykstra and John Stears are indeed impressive, even
after two decades (although 1997 Special Edition did improve
them significantly), yet they aren't the most remembered
trademark of the movie. That honour should definitely go to
the "Oscar"-winning soundtrack by John Williams, whose work
on STAR WARS is probably the brightest gem in his brilliant
career.
Newer generations of viewers might be somewhat deprived of
the enchantment that still holds those lucky enough to
witness STAR WARS original release. Yet, even if they are
immune to the George Lucas' magic they should watch this
film nevertheless, perhaps only to become familiar with
something that is essential part of contemporary culture.

Title
Review for Night of the Running Man (1994)
Ever since the times of Hitchcock, many thrillers were
using, with more or less success, the formula of ordinary
people caught in extraordinary situations. NIGHT OF THE
RUNNING MAN, 1994 low-budget thriller by Mark L. Lester,
used the same concept. Its protagonist is Jerry Logan
(played by Andrew McCarthy), ordinary cab driver from Las
Vegas. One night he stumbles on the man who has just stolen
million dollars from Mafia. That money ends in his
possession, but Jerry has lived long enough in Las Vegas to
know what happens to people who had crossed Mafia. He
immediately starts planing to leave town. His fears are
quite justified, because Mafia after him sends David
Eckhardt (Scott Glenn), their most brutal and sadistic, yet
also very intelligent and capable hitman. Jerry is leaving
Las Vegas, pursued by the man who stops at nothing in order
to catch his prey.
Screenplay, written by Lee Wells, who had also written the
novel, probably looked good on paper. It had believable,
realistic characters and had potential for a thrillride
that, unlike most of similar movies, doesn't insult viewers'
intelligence. Unfortunately, that screenplay got into the
hands of Mark L. Lester, director who had been unable to
remedy its flaws nor enhance its virtues. Result is a
formulaic thriller, cut into two half of different qualities
- first part, who establishes the characters is good, while
the other one is bad. The actors are rather good - Scott
Glenn is an excellent as mean, but efficient villain, and
John Glover brings even some comic relief in this quite
serious film. Unfortunately, the nominal lead in the form of
Andrew McCarthy is rather uninspired. Also, the film is
filled with some unnecessary subplots (including awfully
implausible romance) and some sex scenes, which (unlike the
scenes of naturalistic violence) are quite gratuitous. All
in all, although it had good potential for being at least
solid entertainment, THE NIGHT OF THE RUNNING MAN is nothing
more than justifiably forgettable piece of exploitation
cinema.

Title
Review for Spy Who Loved Me, The (1977)
Some films are good illustration how people's tastes and
movie preferences change through the years. Once upon a
time, the author of this review used to live in a blissful
world of childish ignorance. During that time, he honestly
believed that STAR WARS is the best motion picture ever
made, and that nothing on this world could match its quality
and impact. However, even in those times, there was a movie
that threatened the top spot of STAR WARS in this reviewer's
heart. It wasn't as spectacular or influential as STAR WARS,
but it managed to entertain me as no other film before. Its
name was THE SPY WHO LOVED ME, tenth film in the James Bond
series. For many years, I considered this film not only
among the best films ever made, but, naturally, the best
Bond film ever made. I had to wait for years before I had an
opportunity to change my mind after my movie-going
preferences matured and had an opportunity to watch classic
Bond films with Sean Connery. When I changed my mind, I
changed it by 180 degrees - THE SPY WHO LOVED ME was a
silly, unimaginative attempt by Bond franchise to cash in on
the contemporary trend of the 1970s. Then, years have passed
and things changed again. After a while, I began
appreciating this film again, and now, although I can't say
that it represents one of the best films ever made, it still
remains very good piece of entertainment.
Story begins with the mysterious disappearance of the
British nuclear submarine. In response to the crisis,
British government sends their best secret agent, James Bond
(Roger Moore), to investigate. His quest leads him to the
new, revolutionary submarine tracking system, that is put on
sale by few shady characters in Cairo. Bond comes there,
only to realize that his KGB counterpart, Major Ania Amasova
(Barbara Bach), wants the same thing, for the same reason -
somebody snatched a Soviet nuclear submarine too. While two
of them try to steal the precious data from each other and
in the same time evade professional killer nicknamed Jaws
(Richard Kiel), their respective government forge temporary
alliance. Bond and Amasova are now working together, faced
not only with their own unresolved sexual tension, but also
with some past issues - Bond had killed Amasova's colleague
and lover. Their investigation leads him to Stromberg (Curd
Juergens), oil tycoon who is obsessed with the underwater
life and who might be the link to the mystery of
disappearing submarines.
Like all of the first four Bond films with Moore as
Connery's replacement, THE SPY WHO LOVED ME finds its
inspiration in the popular cinematic trends of the 1970s.
While the previous two unsuccessfully tried to exploit
popularity of blaxploitation and kung fu films (and
MOONRAKER would two years later be more successful with
science- -fiction), this one pays homage to Steven
Spielberg's JAWS and the short- lived sub-genre of
underwater adventure. This might indicate the lack of
originality among the film-makers, but THE SPY WHO LOVED ME
was something quite opposite. Script by Christopher Wood and
Richard Maibaum was the first with plot that didn't have
even nominal resemblance to Ian Fleming's novel with the
same name. That gave film-makers enough freedom to make the
film as contemporary as possible. Unlike Fleming's Cold War
days, Soviets and West actually co-operate in the spirit of
detante; in the aftermath of oil crisis shipping tycoons are
the real nemesis of the free world; Bond's girl is his equal
in the era of feminism; finally, even immortal Bond musical
theme received disco treatment.
THE SPY WHO LOVED ME, because it was made in synchrony with
the moods, fashions and worldviews of the contemporary
audience, actually managed to fulfill almost impossible task
for a post-Connery Bond film - its reputation became almost
equal to the reputation of the classics. That shouldn't
surprise anyone, because this Bond has all the ingredients
of the classic formula - beautiful women, exotic locations,
daredevil stunts, spectacular scenes, impressive villain,
high-tech gadgetry and plot that deals with saving the world
from evil megalomaniacs. The concept is spiced with large
quantities of humor, and also by a lot of movie reference
jokes (one scene is direct allusion to LAWRENCE OF ARABIA,
while the other segment references BATTLESHIP POTEMKIN).
This Bond was good and entertaining, but it doesn't mean
that it was perfect. The special effects, while impressive
at some points (especially those dealing with Stromberg's
supertanker), are unscuccessful at others (blue screen ski
chase, that was saved by real-life stunt in the last shot).
The chief villain, played by not too enthusiastic Curd
Juergens, had undeveloped character and was definitely
bellow Bond standards. In that regard, it was from the
scriptwriters to spare his main sidekick Jaws for another
film. However, the biggest mistake was casting of Barbara
Bach as Anya Amasova; her lack of acting abilities was
almost painful at times, and her stunning look barely
manages to hide it. But, despite those flaws, THE SPY WHO
LOVED ME still remains a very good film, one of the best
Bonds ever made.

Title
Review for Rain Without Thunder (1992)
As those familiar with off-topic flame wars on the Usenet
know by now, very few political issues can be as divisive
and emotionally charged as the issue of abortion. This is
especially the case in USA, with the never ending abortion
debate escalating into acts of violence which, if we are to
believe some analysts, could turn into civil war in a
foreseeable future. Of course, debate of such magnitude
spilled over on the screens, sometimes with mediocre
(CITIZEN RUTH), bad (Schloendorf's screen adaptation of
HANDMAID'S TALE) and sometimes with good results (IF THESE
WALLS COULD TALK by Nancy Savoca and Cher). The best film
among them, RAIN WITHOUT THUNDER, 1992 drama by Gary
Bennett, is probably the least known of them all.
Same as in Margaret Attwood's novel HANDMAID TALE, the plot
of this film is set in the near future and it extrapolates
some present-day trends. The year is 2042. Many years ago
"pro life" conservatives managed to win their fight, change
US Constitution and thus enable legislatures to outlaw
abortions. Allison Goldring (played by Ali Thomas) and her
mother Beverly Goldring (Betty Buckley) are serving prison
sentences under Unborn Child Kidnaping Act, after trying to
evade abortion laws by perfoming operation in Sweden.
Reporter (played by Carolyn McCormick) is following the
story and through the interviews with the people who are
familiar with the case, as well as with different
politicians, clergymen and other celebrities, we are
introduced to the future America where the concept of
women's abortion rights is laughable.
While the author of this film, like the authors of almost
all other films with the same subject, takes liberal "pro
choice" stand, RAIN WITHOUT THUNDER is hardly a propaganda
movie. On the contrary, using the mock documentary style to
portray bleak distopic future, allows viewers to draw their
own conclusions. Not only that, this film shows "pro life"
America as still democratic country - with the people being
able to speak freely and have different points of view. RAIN
WITHOUT THUNDER also suggests, unlike Attwood's novel (the
novel got nod by the film-makers in the form of future
"Attwood Society"), that the "pro life" regime would be
introduced gradually and democratically. "Pro lifers" are
given the chance to explain their views and extrapolate on
the practical implementation of those views. What makes this
film very scary (at least for "pro choice" viewers) is the
fact that many times their arguments make perfect sense -
instead of gun-wielding fanatics and religious maniacs, they
are presented as down-to-Earth politicians, lawyers and
bureaucrats.
Of course, this film still isn't perfect. The world, if we
don't count some new and exotic slang words didn't change
much in fifty years. The fashions and technology is the
same, and film didn't try to explain why USA became
non-abortion country, and other countries (like Sweden)
didn't. Some plot developments in the last part of the
movie, although plausible, seem too melodramatic. And the
last nightmare scene was hardly necessary - the authors had
already made their point. But, despite those flaws, RAIN
WITHOUT THUNDER is still a rarity among American movies in
last few years - a film with intriguing, socially important
subject, and in the same time intelligent, ingenious and
thought-provoking.

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
In 1980s cyberpunk was definitely the most popular sub-genre
of literary science fiction, with plenty of new, young and
talented writers exploring new, dark but fascinating high-
tech world of near future. However, for some strange reason,
the attempts to recreate this world on the screen (with some
notable exceptions) usually fell flat. Not even William
Gibson, the father of the sub-genre, could escape this sad
fate, as demonstrated in JOHNNY MNEMONIC, 1995 screen
adaptation of his best known short story, directed by Peter
Longo.
The plot is set in 2021, in a world run by multinational
corporations, where the information is the most valuable
commodity. Because of the hackers, the most precious
information is not transmitted via Internet, but by human
couriers with implanted memory chips in their heads. One of
those couriers is Johnny (played by Keanu Reeves), whose is
greedy and agrees to double capacity of the chip and risks
having his own brain melting down. While he carries
information from Beijing to Newark, rival corporation has
hired yakuzas led by Takahashi (played by Takeshi Kitano) to
steal the information from his head. The only shelter for
Johnny is the underworld ruled by LoTeks led by J-Bone
(played by Ice-T).
Even those accustomed to the good literature turning into
bad films would be unpleasantly surprised by JOHNNY
MNEMONIC. Gibson, who wrote and produced the film, wasted
almost entire screen potential of his short story. New
characters and subplots were introduced, mostly in order to
provide film with an interesting cast (that includes
Japanese cult director Takeshi Kitano, rock star Henry
Rollins and German actress Barbara Sukowa) and bring
ecological and "politically correct" anti-technological
angle to the story. But all those efforts failed miserably,
not only because those subplots seemed to be artificial
distraction to the story, but also because of the terrible
miscast of wooden Keanu Reeves as protagonist (whose flat
performance is even worse compared to Dolph Lundgren's
hilarious portrayal of homicidal preacher) and tragic choice
of director. First-timer Peter Longo, who had worked on
videoclips, proved to be unsuitable for feature film. Action
scenes are unattractive and repetitive, while special
effects are bad and often turn into boring display of cheap
pyrotechnics. The whole atmosphere of cyberpunk world is
missing from JOHNNY MNEMONIC, and anachronistic soundtrack
by Michael Danna and Brad Fiedel doesn't help either.
Because of all that, JOHNNY MNEMONIC is one of the worst
cinema failures of 1990s, and the audience really doesn't
have to find out why the fans of the original story
nicknamed this project "Johnny Moronic".
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Flesh & Blood (1985)
Most of the books belonging to Fantasy genre tend to base
their imaginary worlds on medieval Europe, often painting
them in most positive light and portraying Middle Ages as
simpler, kinder and gentler time than our own. This
perception of Middle Ages seems to be dominant in popular
culture including Hollywood, despite plenty of historical
books that use another, more appropriate term for that
period - Dark Ages. Although Hollywood had its share of
films that approached medieval Europe with more realism,
hardly anything can surpass FLESH & BLOOD, 1985 historical
adventure by Paul Verhoeven, Dutch director known for large
quantities of naturalistic sex and violence in his works.
The plot begins in some unidentified country of Western
Europe in 1501. Arnolfini (played by Fernando Hilbeck) is
nobleman who had been exiled from his city. He returns with
an army and takes the city back with a help of cutthroat
mercenaries, led by Captain Hawkwood (played by Jack
Thompson). Those mercenaries get carried away while raping
and plundering after the successful battle, so Arnolfini
decides to get rid of them with the help of treacherous
Hawkwood. Among mercenaries forced out of the city without
arms and loot is a band led by experienced Martin (played by
Rutger Hauer) who swears revenge on Arnolfini. Opportunity
for that arises when Arnolfini arranges political marriage
between his young bookworm son Stephen (played by Tom
Burlinson) and princess Agnes (played by Jennifer Jason
Leigh). Future spouses are to be introduced to each other
during the hawking trip, but their caravan gets attacked by
Stephen's band. Before Stephen can do anything about it his
father is seriously wounded and future bride abducted, so he
must again use Hawkwood's services against his former
comrades. In the meantime, Stephen falls in love with his
beautiful prisoner, while his band takes shelter in isolated
country castle.
FLESH & BLOOD is the last Verhoeven's film made in Europe
and it shows. Unbound by Hollywood standards of censorship,
he filled the movie with incredible amounts of extremely
graphic violence and gore (which probably didn't cause much
problems with MPAA censors giving it R rating for American
distribution) and equally large amounts of sex and nudity
(which probably did). But large amounts of such scenes, and
some of them might be quite revolting (for example, one of
the most romantic scenes in the film happens bellow two
decomposing corpses), isn't exactly gratuitous. The idea of
Verhoeven and his co-screenwriter Gerard Soeteman was to
present Middle Ages as times when the human life was short,
hard and in constant danger of famine, plague and war (which
would, in one form or another, hit protagonists of this
film). Soeteman and Verhoeven argue that it was quite
natural for people to make some sense out of their miserable
lives by succumbing to all possible forms of
self-gratification, even those that might be most deplorable
to us who live in more civilised and enlightened times. Same
goes for the alternatives that went into another extreme in
the form of religious fanaticism. In order to present those
times with as much authenticity as possible, great deal of
work was invested in creation of late 15th Century costumes
and props, and Spanish locations provide very good scenery.
Basil Poledouris, author best known for his work on another
quasi-historic epic CONAN THE BARBARIAN, provided excellent
soundtrack. On the other hand, Verhoeven took too much
poetic license with some medical issues, thus compromising
credibility of the events in the last segment of the film.
However, medieval characters by being authentic created
certain problem for Verhoeven. Since all of them were, from
our standpoint, bad, it was hard to create believable
conflict. Verhoeven solved this problem by setting the plot
in time of Renaissance, when the old medieval world collides
with the forces of science and enlightenment. Those who are
familiar with this period of European history might find
plenty of references to the people and events of Renaissance
Italy - Stephen mentions Leonardo da Vinci as his role
model, Arnolfinis are based on Medicis, Hawkwood on real
life English mercenary leader of the same name, and Agnes is
described as "Prince Niccolo's" daughter - reference to
Niccolo Machiavelli and his "Prince", the book that seems
inspired by Agnes' actions in this film. This conflict
between Dark Ages and Renaissance is transformed in the
conflict between Stephen, noble who represents law, order
and civilisation on one side, and Martin who represents
primordial human instincts on the other side. Two of those
men are fighting for the love of Agnes who can't really make
up her mind until the very end of the film.
The acting in this film is very good. Rutger Hauer, who used
to play in many early Verhoeven films, has rather difficult
task of bringing complex and not very likeable character
closer to audience. His Martin might look superficial and
not very well written at first sight, but in a relatively
short time he must pass through various transformations -
from loving father to bloodthirsty soldier of fortune; from
passion to jealousy and murderous rage and vice versa.
However, this role relies more on Hauer's Bad Boy charisma
acquired in BLADE RUNNER than on some genuine breathtaking
acting effort. Naturally, his job was definitely
overshadowed by young Jennifer Jason Leigh. Her role of
Agnes was one of the first in which she displayed not only
her remarkable talent but also her taste for the roles of
women subjected to terrible ordeals. While most of the male
audience would appreciate her willingness to appear
completely nude in front of the camera, those who appreciate
good acting would be pleased even more. Her Agnes is one of
the most unconventional female characters we had opportunity
to see in modern cinema - young, innocent virgin who
suddenly becomes forced to make some rather practical
decisions and whose feelings take second place to her
interests. Tom Burlinson as the third part of love triangle,
seems somewhat shallow in comparison with Hauer's charisma
and Leigh's intensity, but this is all compensated with
great supporting cast where late Brion James and Bruno Kirby
are doing nice job, as well as almost unrecognisbale Jack
Thompson.
All in all, FLESH & BLOOD is not the film for the everyone,
but those who are able to overcome their squeamishness would
be awarded by one of the most underrated gems of 1980s.
Review written on September 25th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Diary of a Hit Man (1991)
Hit man being caught in the existential crisis is a concept
that is quite common for today's Taratinoesque comedies. But
it was used even before, and, believe it or not, in dead
serious stage plays. One of such stage plays is INSIDER'S
PRICE by Kenneth Pressman. In 1991 same author adapted his
play for the big screen in a film DIARY OF A HIT MAN,
directed by Roy London.
The hit man in question is Dekker (played by Forrest
Whitaker). He is professional assassin who is good at his
work, yet, who feels less and less satisfied with his career
and way of life. Like many people in his situation, he wants
out, but it isn't so easy. First he must do the very last
job, that should settle him financially for good. That job
is Jain (Sherilyn Fenn), beautiful woman, and the contract
was put on by her half-crazed husband. When he finally meets
her, Dekker finds out that he is attracted to the woman and
that he simply can't pull the trigger.
Movies based on stage plays are sometimes very recognisable,
because the scripts almost always put more emphasis on
characters than the action itself. DIARY OF A HIT MAN isn't
much different. Although the plot isn't limited on one or
few isolated places, theatrical feel is still present.
Mostly because some of the actors work really hard,
sometimes forgetting that they don't play at the stage. But
the main actor, always reliable Forrest Whitaker, plays the
character of a hit man with excellence, making his anxiety
and transformation quite believable. Unfortunately, most of
the other actors aren't so good, especially Sharon Stone,
who was wasted in small and rather unnecessary role. Director
Jerry London doesn't excel either, making this theatrical
film even cheaper-looking than it actually is. The plot is
also sometimes confusing, because the characters aren't
well-drawn. All in all, DIARY OF A HIT MAN is a film with
good idea, but poor execution, and hitmen suffering from
existential crisis were doomed to fall into domain of
Tarantino.

Title
Review for Conan the Barbarian (1982)
Disparity between popular and critically acclaimed movies
isn't something that should catch any reviewer by surprise.
On the other hand, sometimes things get a little bit
personal. In my case, I was puzzled by the low rating of a
movie I consider one of my favourite masterpieces of seventh
art. CONAN THE BARBARIAN by John Millius is, in humble
opinion of this author, one of the top ten motion pictures
ever made. However, whenever I mention that movie to the
average moviegoer, they show either disdain, ignorance or
indifference.
Unenviable status of CONAN THE BARBARIAN among movie lovers
puzzled me for years. At the beginning I was close to the
conclusion that I had been trying to find artistic
justification for my ultimate "guilty pleasure". However,
years passed and my movie taste developed enough for me to
distinguish true art from commercial trash, but my affection
for CONAN stayed the same. Finally, I was beginning to make
my own pet theory about Millius' masterpiece and that theory
can be summed up in a phrase "wrong time".
However, it looked like a good time for Dino de Laurentiis,
Italian movie producer who saw mega-success of Donner's
SUPERMAN as an impulse to start making his own movie
adaptations of popular comic books. His previous attempt in
that direction, FLASH GORDON, was successful despite being
chewed by critics, then allergic to 1970s camp.
Unfortunately, when De Laurentiis decided to make another
comic book adaptation he chose the wrong hero.
Unlike squeaky clean characters of Superman, Flash Gordon or
even Buck Rogers, Conan the Barbarian actually didn't belong
to G-rated world of simple morality virtues of late 1930s
and early 1940s. His character was indeed invented in 1930s,
but the dark imagination of tragically deceased author
Robert E. Howard (1906- 1936) kept Conan outside pulp
fiction mainstream. It was only in 1960s when, thanks to L.
Sprague de Camp and other authors, Conan was rediscovered
and later served as some kind of adult alternative to
Tolkien-inspired stereotypes in fantasy genre. However,
Conan reached the peak of its popularity in the media of
comic books, using the new standards of depictions of sex
and violence in order to make his character popular among
male teeenagers.
De Laurentiis knew that the campy and ironic approach
towards Conan's character wouldn't work. So, he needed some
real 1970s author to deal with 1970s phenomenon. The choice
fell on John Millius, one of the biggest names in so-called
"New Hollywood" of 1970s. Millius was perfect, because the
vision of Conan as lonely but free character in amoral world
was in line with Millius' own individualistic and
libertarian views.
According to many Conan purists, the plot is inconsistent
with the "canon" of Conan novels and comic books. In other
way, it uses many of Conan stories in order to make the
story both original and faithful to the works of Robert E.
Howard.  The story begins in time of Conan, some 12000 years
B.C. when the continents of Africa, Europe and Asia were
single land mass, and when many ancient but corrupt
civilizations shared the space with barbarian tribes. One of
such tribes becomes target of a raiders led by evil sorceror
and demigod Thulsa Doom (Jones) who kill all the adults and
take children into slavery. One of those children is Conan
who, thanks to years of hard work, grows up to be muscular
and extremely strong slave. Such qualities later lead him to
the career of gladiator, and, after earning freedom from his
master, he begins his personal crusade for revenge. The
quest leads him to the city of Zamora where he strikes
friendship with thieves Subotai (Lopez) and beautiful
Valeria (Bergman). After succesfully stealing jewels from
the Temple of Snake, they are approached by old King Osric
(Von Sydow), whose own daughter (Quenessen) became the
follower of Thulsa Dooom, now the leader of growing and
dangerous cult on the way to global domination. Conan
accepts the offer to return the Princess to King, although
his friends doubt his real motives.
>From the perspective of an average moviegoer, who expected
some escapist mind- blowing adventure, CONAN THE BARBARIAN
might have been a disappointment or mediocre piece of work.
Instead of an adventure, the movie is an epic story where
the plot and characters tend to be more important than the
visual and other attractions. However, the movie doesn't
lack those attractions - there are fewer action sequences
than in an average action/average movie, but they are
beautifully shot and choreographed. Also, the movie authors
paid great attention towards detail, in a quantities
unpreccedented from von Stroheim's time. Although the world
of Conan is fictious, the Millius cleverly portrayed it as
mythical vision of Bronze/Iron Age Europe, using many actual
historic details of that, in Hollywood movies generally
ignored, time period. Amounts of blood, gore, sex and nudity
that may be gratuitous in any other film , here,
paradoxically, give great deal of historical realism to the
film that is basically a mythical fantasy. But the biggest
attraction of all is Basil Poledouris' musical score, so
beautiful and perfect, that even some of the biggest critics
consider it one of the best in history of cinema.
The acting attractions are very few, but there are some
wonderful parts. CONAN THE BARBARIAN is now mostly
remembered as Arnold Schwarzenegger's first major movie
role, that later catapulted his career. Although the future
star received one of first "Razzie" anti-awards for his
performances, I must say that his role in CONAN is perhaps
the best in his career. He didn't just worked hard to make
his character as physically identical to Conan as possible,
but emotionally as well. His role is quite serious, and
lacks one-liners that would later become Schwarzenegger's
trademark. Schwarzenegger's acting partners in this movie
weren't that lucky in their later career. James Earl Jones
was probably most successful of them all, and it's thrilling
to see him here in atypical but brilliant portrayal of the
ultimate bad guy. Apart from Max von Sydow, almost everyone
else - Gerry Lopez,  Sandahl Bergman and Valerie Quenessen -
sailed to oblivion, although their parts were adequate at
worst.
Apart from the major misunderstanding between the commercial
audience and artistically ambitious movie creators, CONAN
THE BARBARIAN suffers from another, more serious problems in
his approach towards viewers. Some critics are prone to
appraise this film not on its artistic merit, but on its,
sometimes questionable, ideology. Screenplay was written by
Oliver Stone in his best screeenwriting years, but also in a
period before his attempts to become cinematic conscience of
America, and for some, his referrences to Nietzsche
philosophy are enough to brand the screenplay fascistoid.
Portrayal of Thulsa Doom's cult in a movie might be
interpreted as influenced by Nietzsche's unflattering views
on Christianity, thus making movie more anti-Christian than
some more harmless but more hyped cases (like LAST
TEMPTATION OF CHRIST, for example). However, John Millius
was definitely more involved in the screenplay, and
political overtones were lost or hidden behind Millius' own
individualistic philosophy. Anyway, even if the movie does
have some hidden "message", that message wouldn't prevent
mature viewer to enjoy in a cinematic masterpiece that is
very rare to find these days.

Title
Review for Terminal Velocity (1994)
The outcome of the latest bloodbath in Balkans would
probably look like the ultimate humiliation for many
Russians. But, actually, the worst humilitation for that
former superpower lies not in the field of international
politics, but in the field of popular entertainment. Once
mighty empire is reduced to the source of stereotyped
villains and cheesy plotlines for uninspired and unoriginal
Hollywood filmmakers. One of such examples is TERMINAL
VELOCITY, 1994 action thriller by Deran Sarafian.
The movie protagonist is Ditch Brodie (played by Charlie
Sheen), maverick skydiving instructor who takes a flight one
day in order to give parachuting lessons to beautiful
stranger named Chris Morrow (Nastassja Kinski). During the
flight, he flirts with her, but simple glancing away is
enough for her to disappear from plane. The body is found on
the ground, but Ditch is convinced that he had put her
safety on. Faced with the manslaughter charges, he begins
investigation of his own that would lead him to Chris, who
seems to be alive and well. But it doesn't seem that it
would be for long, because both of them are involved in
conspiracy involving smuggling gold, and former KGB
operatives who want to overthrow Russian government and
restore Communism.
To be frank, I didn't expect much from this film yet I was
disappointed. It wasn't the preposterous formulaic plot
(certain mutant crossbreed between NORTH-NORTHWEST and Jan
de Bont's SPEED), nor the cardboard characters the viewers
don't care for. It wasn't even the not so original directing
(one particular action scene is actually literally borrowed
by Renny Harlin's DIE HARD 2). It wasn't Charlie Sheen,
whose charisma and couple of wisecracking lines actually
saved this film, turning it into unintentional comedy. The
biggest disappointment was Nastassja Kinski, who obviously
chose wrong film for her great comeback into the movie
industry. Although she looks charming, she is anything but
believable as tough intelligence operative, Russian to make
things even more interesting. Villains are more convincing,
as usual, although the main ones - played by James
Gandolfini and Christopher MacDonald - doesn't look like
Russian at all. However, although definitely and justifiably
forgettable, TERMINAL VELOCITY is a film that can provide
some entertainment for not very demanding audience.

Title
Review for Close Encounters of the Third Kind (1977)
Steven Spielberg is now considered as one of the Hollywood
deities, because of the rare capability to deliver both huge
commercial hits, like JURASSIC PARK, and "Oscar"-awarded
critical triumphs like SCHINDLER'S LIST. However, in the
1970s Spielberg built his reputation by creating works of
art that could slip in both categories. One of them is CLOSE
ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND, extremely popular and
influential science-fiction spectacle. Unfortunately, it had
a bad luck to be released in the same year as STAR WARS.
Although both films have a lot in common (ground-breaking
special effects, brilliant score by John Williams) their
future was different; one became an unstoppable cult
phenomenon, and another almost forgotten and stuck forever
in its shadow.
When Spielberg began work on that project, he was already
established as a bright new Hollywood star due to his
previous commercial hit, JAWS. Together with other young
directors of his "New Hollywood" generation, like Kauffman,
Carpenter, Hill and Millius, he exploited the great creative
freedom of 1970s, when even the mainstream producers dared
to experiment. Ironically, it was Spielberg himself whose
later commercial success would established new unwritten
rules of "blockubuster" philosophy. But in the mid 1970s,
many things were different; Spielberg was young and eager to
use Hollywood resources for his very personal and artistic
movie.
Although very personal, Spielberg's screenplay was partly
based on the book "UFO Experience" by Dr. J. Allen Hynek and
in many ways inspired by the popular urban mythology of
extraterrestrial visitors to Earth that began to grow in the
world after WW2. Spielberg was not only inspired by the
mythology, but his movie also gave the mythology itself a
huge boost, unmatched until the contemporary era of X-FILES
and the Roswell anniversary. That was partly because he made
the movie very realistic using the authentic UFO-related
incidents as the element of the plot. The story begins with
one of such incidents - team of international scientists
come to the Sonorra Desert in Mexico to find the U.S. Navy
planes of who went missing decades ago during the famous
Flight 19. Such events coincide with the UFO incident
witnessed by Roy Neary (Richard Dreyfuss), power company
worker from Muncie, Indiana, who later becomes obsessed with
his experience. Because of his obsession he loses his job,
family and sanity, but his loss is nothing compared to the
experience of Jillian Guiler (Melinda Dillon), single mother
whose son becomes the victim of alien abduction. In the
meantime, the scientists decipher the strange signals from
outer space and U.S. government, in co-operation with the
French, led by Lacombe (Francois Truffaut) begin with the
preparation for ultra-secret project. When the news of the
poison gas leak in the middle of Wyoming reach Neary, he
finally sees some sense in all his visions and begins the
perilous journey toward the centre of endangered area. There
he is joined by Jillian who shared the similar visions. Two
of them must break through military pickets and reach their
destination to find whatever is there.
Spielberg here shows great mastery by using the very same
techniques of JAWS to make completely different effects. The
slow, gradual yet very disciplined series of dramatic
incidents - "close encounters" - is set in order to bring
the viewer to the great revelation in the finale. But,
instead of the fear and horror we had to endure during the
JAWS, we are now overwhelmed by the sense of boyish wonder.
Throughout the movie the viewer knows that something big,
magnificent and wonderful is about to happen, and great
magician Spielberg delivers his promise in the end. The last
sequence, with its, even in this age, impressive special
effects by the great virtuoso Douglas Trumbull, would leave
many mouths open.
One of the great virtues of this film is its optimism.
Aliens, who almost always get portrayed as the monsters in
science-fiction cinema, are here benevolent and harmless
creatures and the first contact between them and humanity is
a beginning of something wonderful. It is very ironic, when
we consider that the two classic SF movies that visually
inspired Spielberg actually told quite different story -
Howard Hawks' THING and Byron Haskin's WAR OF THE WORLDS
presented extraterrestrials as the threat to the mankind.
Spielberg's humane approach and faith in the future also
lies in great contrast to the pessimistic mood of its era;
the only hint of the contemporary gloom is post-Watergate
portrayal of government as conspiratorial towards the
public. But, even such government is much more harmless
compared to the murderous and chain-smoking Men in Black
that became the stereotype thanks to X-FILES and its more
cynical and disturbing visions.
There lies the main, and probably the only flaw of this
great picture - lack of conflict, and consequently, lack of
drama. The movie has few excitements or even action scenes
(especially the last that may be an interesting homage to
Hitchcock's NORTH BY NORTHWEST) but generally, almost
everyone - Neary, Jillian, government, aliens - are the good
guys. Despite such shortcomings, the actors were good and
manage to bring multidimensionality to their simple roles.
Richard Dreyfuss is very convincing as a ordinary, yet nice
guy, who sinks into insanity only to rediscover himself in a
grand finale. Melinda Dillon was, on the other hand,
nominated for "Oscar" as a struggling mother, yet she was
overshadowed by Teri Garr as Neary's long-suffering wife
Ronnie. Apart from visual wonders of this film, Spielberg's
semi-official composer John Williams again excels by his
beautiful music, this time using the simple melody both as
the element of a plot, and as the basis for his score.
The aliens, who are the main subject of this film, were
visually very convincing. Too convincing, one of my
acquaintances in the UFO-researching circles said. According
to him, the depiction of extraterrestrials as grey-skinned
little people with big eyes was so accurate, that it managed
to freak out powerful government figures interested in
suppressing the truth about UFOs. So, they later approached
Spielberg and ordered him to make another movie with alien,
this time designed to be anything but the real life. The
result was E.T., for many years the biggest commercial hit
of all times, yet less inspirational for UFO enthusiasts.
Anyway, whether the viewer believes in existence of
extraterrestrials or UFOs, CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD
KIND remains the great movie, and one of the rare uplifting
experiences in modern cinema.

Title
Review for 48 Hrs. (1982)
Let me introduce you to an average cop movie of 1980s. The
main hero is a rogue macho cop, who never goes by the book
but whose success in taking out bad guys saves him from the
wrath of his superiors, mostly embodied in black captain. At
the beginning, our hero sees his partner/colleague/friend
killed by the main bad guy, so his job becomes personal. His
one-man-show investigation is strenghtened by the presence
of another cop/friend/helper who must win his trust, often
in a series of embarrassing "buddy buddy" incidents. Their
mutual quest almost always gets into dead end, before they
get their act together and manage to take out bad guys in a
final showdown. Overuse of such formula in previous decade
is probably the reason why 48 HRS., action thriller by
Walter Hill, doesn't look as original and refreshing as it
did during its premiere in 1982.
The plot follows the formula noted above. Violent and
dangerous criminal Ganz (James Remar) escapes from the
prison farm with the help of his Indian friend Billy Bear
(Sonny Landham). Their next stop is San Francisco, where
they murder one of their old associates, thus bringing
attention of the police. Detective Jack Cates (Nick Nolte)
takes part in their arrest, but the action ends
disastrously, with two of the cops dead and Cates' own gun
in the hands of brutal murderer. Feeling personally
humiliated, and with the reluctant approval of his bosses,
Cates begins the manhunt on the city streets, but he
desperately needs some inside information about Ganz. Such
help comes in the form of Reggie Hammond (Eddie Murphy),
black and smooth-talking convict who has some personal
interest in seeing his old buddy Ganz behind bars. But, in
order to assist Cates, Hammond demands to be on the streets.
Cates reluctantly agrees to bring Hammond out of prison for
48 hours; during that time two men must find the criminals,
before they kill each other over black/white and cop/convict
issues.
Although many times re-used by less talented filmmakers
(including Hill himself in disappointing RED HEAT six years
later and with even more disastrous results in the 1990
sequel ANOTHER 48 HRS.), the plot works very well. That is
hardly surprising, since the screenplay was written by
authors like Steven E. De Souza, Roger Spottiswoode or  Jeb
Stuart - many of them would later earn a lot of respect by
providing scripts for popular action movies of the 1980s.
Walter Hill, one of the screenplay co-authors, was still at
the prime of his directorial career and he utilised the
script to the fullest extent. His editing techniques and
perfect sense for the movie pace (ideal combination of
action scenes and "buddy buddy" dynamic) overcome the genre
clichs. Even the overused San Francisco scenery works very
well in this film, together with the good music soundtrack
(although the main theme by James Horner would later be
recycled by the composer in some 1980s movies).
However, the most appealing thing about 48 HRS. is one of
its two leads. Eddie Murphy, although second-billed, simply
outshone any other cast members - even such capable actors
with previous Hill experience, like James Remar, David
Patrick Kelly and Brion James. In this movie Murphy clearly
established his on-screen personality of clever,
fast-talking and self-confident urban black that would later
help him to dominate the box-office and even keep afloat
some movies that would otherwise sink. Watching Murphy
deliver such personality - rarely successful combination of
an action hero and comic relief - is a real joy; especially
in the most memorable scene when he, pretending to be a cop,
shakes down an entire racist redneck bar. The scene looks so
natural for Murphy, that the viewer could easily forget that
it was staged. His partner and nominal lead, Nick Nolte, is
so inferior and passive in that scene, and that impression
would remain with him for the rest of the film. So, thanks
to the domineering presence of his emerging lead, 48 HRS.
was bound to be remembered more as an Eddie Murphy vehicle
than good action movie by its merit. Perhaps without Murphy,
this movie would be easy forgotten and all of his flaws and
clichs (like completely unnecessary subplot involving
Cates' girlfriend) more easily revealed. But, whether it
owes its quality to Murphy or something else, 48 HRS.
deserves to be praised anyway.
(Special note for "trekkies": Denise Crosby, later known as
Lt. Tasha Yar in STAR TREK: THE NEXT GENERATION could be
seen in 48 HRS. in the role of bat- wielding roommate).

Title
Review for Buono, il brutto, il cattivo, Il (1966)
Even in the heavenly realm of the Best Movies Ever Made
there are titles that happen to be more obscure than others.
THE GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY is one of them. For most of
the people it is nothing more than a cool title. Obscurity
of this film is easy to explain - it was made decades ago,
its length is epic and it belongs to the much despised genre
of spaghetti westerns. Most of the people would have trouble
connecting words like "spaghetti western" and "epic", unless
director in charge happens to be Sergio Leone. THE GOOD, THE
BAD AND THE UGLY, made in 1966, represents the final segment
in his celebrated Man With No Name movie trilogy.
Unlike most of the final segments in movie trilogies, THE
GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY might be viewed as a prequel to
first two films - A FISTFULL OF DOLLARS and FOR A FEW
DOLLARS MORE. The plot is set in American Southwest during
the Civil War. Tuco Ramirez (played by Eli Wallach) is a
Mexican bandit with a bounty on his head. That means that he
is targeted by many bounty hunters and similar shady
characters interested in quick cash. The smartest of them
all is Man With No Name a.k.a. Blondie (played by Clint
Eastwood) who not only manages to capture Tuco but also
finds a way to make him more profitable. After handing Tuco
over to authorities, Blondie arranges his escapes, shares
the prize money and repeats the scheme in the next county.
After a while, the partnership goes sour and Tuco is left in
the desert without a penny. Furious Tuco begins tracking
down his former partner, but before he gets his revenge, an
unusual set of events would cause him to reconsider. Both
Tuco and Blondie find out about huge pile of stolen
Confederate gold, but each of them knows only a part of the
exact location. So, two of them decide to set aside the past
differences and strike another partnership in order to get
their hands on the gold. However, before they find this
treasure, they must face the battling armies that stand in
their way. But the deadlier obstacle to their plans comes in
the form of Angel Eyes (named Sentenza in Italian version,
played by Lee Van Cleef), ruthless but efficient
professional killer who also knows about the hidden gold.
Same as in the first two parts of the trilogy Sergio Leone
paints a revisionist picture of the Old West. Instead of
using its primordial state as the perfect setting for the
archetypal and simplistic fight between Good and Evil, Leone
shows Old West as a place where the lack of civilisation
leads to the utter lack of morality. Friendship, loyalty,
common decency and even the human life means nothing in this
world; its characters are guided only with their most
primordial instinct or, as it is much evident here, pure
greed. Therefore, the line that separates heroes from
villains in this piece is blurred - they all have the same
motives and same lack of scruples. Such moral ambiguity is
underlined even in the title of the film, quite ironic in
the context of the story and its characters. Leone used such
motives in the first two films, but this time it gives it
another dimension. The story is set in the broader context
of American Civil War and the murderous quest by three major
protagonists is dwarfed by the sheer amount of carnage and
destruction that goes around them. In their quest for the
gold they might kill dozens of people, but the war kills
thousands. Leone's pacifist and anti- militarist stance in
this movie was not just in tune with the opposition towards
Vietnam War, quite popular stance among late 1960s European
intellectuals. It was also inspired by the events in
European past that found way to reflect them in this film.
The movie was shot on location in Spain, country which
endured its own civil war, with atrocities and destruction
not very different from those depicted in some of the
movie's most memorable scenes. The battle scene in the film,
although one of the most spectacular in the history of
western and although it features uniforms weapons and
military equipment of 1860s America, is actually more
inspired by the traumatic experiences of Italian military in
20th Century, especially WW1 and utter pointlessness and
bloodbath symbolised in twelve Battles of Isonzo 1915-17.
Background of Civil War not only puts moral alignment of the
characters in another context, it also gives opportunity for
Leone to paint brighter or darker shades in their
characters. Epic scope of the story allows Leone to also
give some hints about their background. In doing that, Leone
is playing with old western conventions. Angel Eyes is named
Bad solely because he wears black hat; only later we see
finally justify that perception when we see him as ruthless
and sadistic. Lee Van Cleef obviously enjoyed playing this
role, so different from righteous Colonel Mortimer from FOR
A FEW DOLLARS MORE; there was only one good thing about
Angel Eyes - he always adhered to his own code of
professional killer. Clint Eastwood, the star of this
vehicle plays the character which is the only link with two
other films. Since this is a prequel, there is a little
place for some evolution of the character. Eastwood is great
as usual, playing the same immoral yet capable, intelligent
character we enjoyed seeing in first two films. There is,
however, some opportunities for Eastwood to show some subtle
hints about his character's humanity, especially in the last
segments of the film. Eastwood and Van Cleef are, however,
dwarfed by the third major actor - Eli Wallach who found the
role of his career in Tuco. Unlike the previous Mexican
bandit role he had played in THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN, Wallach
gives great texture to his character. His Tuco is neurotic,
clumsy, not very bright and he would be considered a
laughing stock without his deadliness with pistols. By the
usual western standards, he is not very nice person, but
Wallach finds a way to make him likeable to the audience. In
the end, even Leone gives opportunity to this character to
tell his side of the story, in a memorable verbal exchange
with his brother, played by Luigi Pistilli. This scene not
only features Tuco's humanity, but also gives opportunity
for Leone to implement his Marxist views in showing the
poverty as the major cause of the crime.
Apart from the actors (including the supporting cast), THE
GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY, excels in flawless direction.
With this film Sergio Leone finally matured as serious movie
artist and developed his own style which many critics called
"baroque". The film lasts more than two and a half hours
(even longer in Italian version), but not a single scene
looks unnecessary or overlong. Leone's directorial skills
are at his finest, and he is equally effective in long
panoramic shots (which lose much of its impact on TV, being
subjected to pan&scan butchery) and his trademark short
extreme close-up. Superb editing mixes those elements in
perfect combination. But the most memorable element is, of
course, the music. Ennio Morricone, in his long and
hyperproductive career worked with many directors, but none
of them used his talents as much as Leone. Entire scenes in
the film are staged around Morricone's music, and not the
other way around. Those themes are not self- serving - they
provide the atmosphere of the film and, according to each
scene, this atmosphere might be sentimental, melodramatic
and sometimes even ironic (including the title theme, most
recognisable, which gives humorous angle to certain events
on the screen). Morricone's soundtrack is one the most
powerful in the history cinema and it alone is the reason
why this film should be so highly appreciated.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Warriors, The (1979)
Labelling is sometimes everything. In original MAD MAX, the
opening title set the plot of the movie in near future, thus
making it one of the science fiction classics, despite the
future world being almost exactly like our own. Walter Hill
wanted the same opening title for his action classic THE
WARRIORS. Producers weren't thrilled by that idea and
consequently the movie lost all of its futuristic overtones.
On the other hand, producers were right on the mark; Walter
Hill was accused of actually promoting some disturbing
trends that were quite visible in contemporary America. To
make the movie even more distant from future, plot was
loosely based on ANABASIS, historical book written by
Xenophon, Greek mercenary soldier who had described his
adventures in ancient Persia 2400 years ago.
Instead of ancient Persia, movie begins in contemporary
Coney Island, where Cleon (Dorsey Wright), leader of the
Warriors, local youth gang, gets invitation to the great
gathering of all youth gangs from the city. The gathering,
organised by Gramercy Park Riffs, most powerful gang in the
city, is taking place in Bronx. That is far away from
Warriors' home territory, but small and unarmed delegation
of the Warriors gets there safely thanks to the general
truce. On the gathering, Cyrus (Roger Hill), charismatic
leader of the Riffs, announces his grand plan to unite all
the gangs and take over the city. Crowd is enthusiastic, but
the small gang of Rogues, led by psychopathic Luther (David
Patrick Kelly) uses the opportunity to assassinate Cyrus.
Police simultaneously raids the gathering, and in the
commotion Warriors get blamed by the killing, and their
leader gets killed by Riffs. The remaining eight, led by
Cleon's lieutenant Swann (Michael Beck), must now try to get
to Coney Island, but this time unprotected by truce and
instead being chased by all the gangs.
Upon its release, despite the controversies and even some
youth riots that were allegedly inspired by it, THE WARRIORS
enjoyed immense popularity and very quickly received some
kind of a cult status. However, despite being one of the
best movies of that year, and being directed by talented
action director Walter Hill at the peak of his career, the
movie failed to leave as strong impression to the future
generations as some other cinematic achievements of that
same year. The reason for that probably lies in a fact that
this movie aged very quickly. If Walter Hill's idea was to
warn the public about problems of urban America, he failed
miserably. The future was much worse than his vision. The
youth gangs, as presented in THE WARRIORS, are far from
shadowy armies, able to take over entire cities. Their
members seem more interested in unorthodox fashion and their
little petty feuds than such prosaic, and for the public
more annoying, matters like crime. In their vocabulary, word
"arms" is reserved for small knives and blunt objects, and
only few of them use heavy artillery like handguns. They
even have their own, very strict and detailed laws, upheld
more strictly than some governments do with their own. Many
people in American cities would be more than happy to see
their young criminals behaving like those in THE WARRIORS.
Some of the critics who accused Hill of actually praising
youth crime had a lot arguments in their favour.
Despite those objections, THE WARRIORS have all the elements
of a very good film. The plot is simple, and serves as good
basis for numerous action scenes. The fights are brilliantly
choreographed and quite realistic, although there isn't much
bloodshed or gore in the movie. Editing is superb, events
happen at quick pace, with the exception of middle, when
boring moralistic exchanges between Swann and his
would-be-girlfriend Mercy (Deborah van Valkenburgh) drag the
plot from straight action to social drama territory. The
soundtrack by Barry de Vorzon is very suggestive and
recognisable. Yet, the trademark of this film are the actors
who showed great talent, although most of them later sunk
into anonymity. Best known of them is David Patrick Kelly,
whose superb and original performance in this film later
subscribed him to the roles of psychopathic villains.
Michael Beck as cool, almost statesman-like leader of a
gang, is also very good, and James Remar gives good contrast
as his hot-shot contender for top spot. All in all, this
movie is perhaps dated, yet in its hour and half can give a
lot more entertainment than most of the contemporary movies.

Title
Review for Cold Steel (1987)
One of the unwritten laws of 1980s action films says that if
something bad could happen, it should happen on Christmas
Eve. COLD STEEL, 1987 film directed by Dorothy Ann Puzo, is
not an exception. It begins when LAPD detective Johnny
Modine (played by Brad Davis) gets his Christmas celebration
spoiled with the news about his father's death. It is the
work of psychopathic junkies who slashed old man to death
while robbing his jewellery store. Johnny is determined to
find the responsible and get his revenge, even if it means
the end of his police career. However, Johnny doesn't know
that the murder was actually part of sinister revenge plot
directed against him. Leader of murderous thugs is his
former friend and colleague Isaac (played by Jonathan Banks)
who blames Johnny for the incident that left him crippled
many years ago. Before he gets to Isaac, Johnny must
overcome many obstacles, including Kathy (played by Sharon
Stone), attractive but mysterious woman with hidden agenda.
Anyone who watches COLD STEEL would realise why this first
film by director Dorothy Ann Puzo also happens to be her
last. In hour and half of its length, Puzo managed to stuff
all possible cliches of 1980s cop movies, including car
chases, explosions and shootouts that, instead of making
this film more attractive, only reveal its limited budget.
Film is even more unattractive because of the dark
photography and terrible 1980s soundtrack. Same goes for
Sharon Stone whose good looks do little to compensate the
awful acting in one of the more embarrassing roles of her
career. Brad Davis, on the other hand, brings perhaps too
much pathos to his lead character, but that, same as very
entertaining performance of Adam Ant as Isaac's British
sidekick, brings COLD STEEL to at least tolerable levels of
mediocrity.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for African Queen, The (1951)
As I wrote in some of my earlier reviews, I encounter
somewhat embarrassing phenomenon when I watch cinema
classics. There are films that are universally lauded and
cherished as great achievements of seventh art. These are
movies I'm supposed to like and appreciate. But more often
that I would like, I find that some of those films don't
meet my expectations, made sky-high through the decades long
hype. These films, naturally, have some qualities, but those
qualities are not enough to justify their cult status. One
of such examples is THE AFRICAN QUEEN, 1951 romantic
adventure by John Huston.
The plot of the film, based on the novel by C.S. Forester,
is set in German East Africa in September 1914. In a remote
jungle village of Kundi, Reverend Samuel Sayer (played by
Robert Morley) and his spinster sister Rose (played by
Katherine Hepburn) are running Methodist mission. The only
link to civilisation comes in the form of "African Queen",
small river steamer that occasionally brings supplies and
mail. Its owner and captain is Charlie Allnut (played by
Humphrey Bogart), rough Canadian who would warn Sayers about
the war that erupted in Europe. Soon after his departure,
German troops enter village, burn houses and capture
inhabitants for the purposes of forced recruitment and slave
labour. Sayer is so devastated with the shock that he
suffers nervous breakdown and dies few days later. When
Allnut revisits now ruined mission, he finds Rose to be
alone. He volunteers to bring her to safety. He wants to
wait for the end of war in his jungle hideout, but Rose has
different plans. She not only wants to come to the
British-controlled territory, but also comes to the crazy
idea to use Allnut's supplies of explosive to sink large
German gunboat standing in their way. Allnut reluctantly
agrees with her and this is the beginning of the long and
perilous journey.
THE AFRICAN QUEEN was constantly hailed as masterpiece, and
often referenced as movie that finally brought well-deserved
"Oscar" to Humphrey Bogart. But, this film is disappointment
nevertheless - hardly a zenith in the careers of Bogart and
Huston. Of course, there are some good elements, mostly in
the script written by Huston and John Agee. The script uses
good old motive of "opposites attract" by putting two
totally opposite characters in unusual circumstances and
gradually showing the evolution of their relationship, as
well as the evolution of characters themselves. We watch
those characters - uptight, stiff-upper-lip British spinster
and rough and insensitive Canadian riverboat captain -
finding not only that they have more in common that they had
to admit, but also finding romantic attractions towards each
other. Both of the actors who portray protagonists - Bogart
and Hepburn - were past their prime when they made this
film, but they gave superb performance nevertheless, often
using humour to make their on-screen chemistry more
believable.
Unfortunately, when movie doesn't deal with Allnut and Rose,
it gets rather disappointing. The journey itself is
interesting, with many realistic problems and even more
realistic solutions. But the realism of the film is severely
undermined with melodramatic scenes in the latter part of
the film, followed by even more melodramatic, unbelievable
deus ex machina ending. It is even more so with extremely
dated special effects that fail to connect footage shot on
locations in (then) Belgian Congo and British Uganda with
characters obviously shot in London studios. Some of viewers
who are sensitive about "political correctness" would frown
upon not so favourable, even racist, treatment of natives in
this film.
The biggest problem I have with this film is, however, the
lack of historical accuracy. The film suggests that Germans
in East Africa at the start of WW1 had the upper hand, as
well as intention and resources to conquer the whole
continent, using the same brutal force and employing same
methods as Nazis would use in WW2. Nothing could be farther
from the truth. German colonies were scattered and isolated
from mother country, manned by small garrisons and generally
destined to be easily taken over by superior forces
stationed in bordering Entente colonies. It happened with
each of German overseas territories, with the exception of
German East Africa. Local commander, General Paul von
Lettow-Vorbeck, was putting stiff resistance to Entente and
lasted until the capitulation of mother country in 1918,
mostly using the hit and run strategy. That earned him the
reputation of one of the most successful guerrilla
commanders in history, and that success is impossible to
explain without at least some support from local natives.
German forces in East Africa perhaps were as savage as
depicted in this film, but such savagery was probably common
to their Entente counterparts; native Africans had no reason
to favour one colonial master over another. THE AFRICAN
QUEEN, one of the rare that actually deals with this exotic
theatre of WW1, fails to take that into account - flaw that
would be corrected only quarter of century later by
Jean-Jacques Annaud in his NOIRS ET BLANCS EN COULEUR.
Historical inaccuracies, bad special effects and script
flaws aside, THE AFRICAN QUEEN is still entertaining film
which is worth watching. Mostly thanks to excellent
performance of Bogart and Hepburn; two of them would make us
forget that the same story was later told in much better,
yet less celebrated films.

Title
Review for Braveheart (1995)
Historical epic as a genre was almost banished from
Hollywood in early 1990s. For many critics, scholars and,
most importantly, film producers, it was a thing of the past
- something that could have attracted crowds only in the era
of black-and-white television and non-CGI special effects.
But in 1995, same as in the case of DANCES WITH WOLVES five
years ago, there came the man who decided to use of all his
energy and talents of actor, producer and director in order
to revitalise that particular genre. And, same as in the
case of DANCES WITH WOLVES, he was awarded for his effort
with "Oscars". The name of the film was BRAVEHEART, and the
name of its director and main actor was Mel Gibson.
The plot chronicles the life of Scottish warlord and folk
hero William Wallace (1272 - 1305). In his time, English
king Edward I "Longshanks" (played by Patrick McGoohan) has
almost completely subdued entire British Isles, including
Scotland, whose proud inhabitants are now subjected by "ius
primae noctis" and various other forms of humiliation and
oppression by English knights. Although English had killed
his father many years ago, young Scottish commoner William
Wallace (played by Mel Gibson) doesn't care about politics
and wants only to have peaceful life with his new bride
Murron (played by Catherine MacCormack). Murron's death
changes that and Wallace takes arms and, together with small
but dedicated band of followers, begins guerrilla campaign
that would systematically destroy almost every English
garrison in the country. Through time, more and more people
join his ranks and in 1298 Wallace's rag-tag army scores
surprising victory against English knights in the Battle of
Stirling Bridge. But the newly won freedom is endangered by
the internal squabbles between Scots themselves, especially
nobles under pretender Robert the Bruce (played by Angus
MacFadyen), who wouldn't like to have a simple commoner as a
national leader.
BRAVEHEART was only the second film in the directorial
career by Mel Gibson, so it wouldn't be fair to compare it
to the better known genre classics directed by David Lean or
Anthony Mann. However, even when we apply such criteria
BRAVEHEART is more than decent historical epic that takes
new and refreshing approach to the genre. The most
noticeable element of this approach is naturalism. While
older Hollywood films set in medieval Europe used to give
fairytale-like vision of picturesque castles, splendid
costumes and knights in shining armour, Gibson shows us the
extremely unpleasant world of poverty and feudal injustice
where might made right and life was hard, short and brutish.
This general unpleasantness is especially underlined in the
scenes of battle, where hand-to-hand combat is
naturalistically displayed in all its gory details, never
seen since Verhoeven's ultra-naturalistic FLESH & BLOOD.
Compared with this naturalistic approach, most of Old
Hollywood epics look like stage plays. BRAVEHEART also
employs humour at the right places, not only to make bloody
realities of medieval British Isles more bearable to
sensitive audiences, but also to underline its down-to-earth
atmosphere, so different from previous historical epics.
What makes BRAVEHEART "larger than life" is his protagonist.
Mel Gibson obviously invested plenty of his energy and
talent in bringing the mythical figure of William Wallace
and, as a result, character of 15th Century poems is
transformed into superhuman being that resembles late 20th
Century comic book hero. Wallace is more than superior to
his enemies, both physically and mentally, yet he is able to
show his sensitive, more vulnerable side. Naturally, when
the character is based on epic poems, most of historical
accuracy is going down the drain (which was the case with
almost every historical epic from Hollywood in 1990s).
However, even those who don't particularly care about
history or are willing to give poetic license to
scriptwriter Randall Wallace might think that he went over
the top in idolising Wallace, especially in the second part
of film when Scottish superhero manages to seduce Princess
Isabel (played by Sophie Marceau) and make her a child.
Because of that the disbelief is hardly suspended, and final
scenes aren't as effective as they should be.
Mel Gibson as an actor is truly wonderful, and he is also
helped by small army of very good British and Irish actors.
Most memorable of them all is Patrick McGoohan, whose cold,
calculated and evil medieval monarch is one of the most
effective villains seen in contemporary cinema. Brendan
Gleeson (who would later become famous for his role in
Boorman's GENERAL) is also very good as Wallace's trusted
companion, as well as Ian Bannen is effective as
leprosy-stricken King John Balliol. David O'Harra is very
entertaining as Wallace's Irish ally, and Angus MacFadyen
brings a lot of anxiety into his conscience-stricken
character of Robert the Bruce. Women in this film have
rather thankless roles, especially Marceau as
one-dimensional French princess. Catherine McCormack as
Wallace's wife was more interesting, but she was eliminated
from the picture early on. From the technical point of view,
the film is also very good. Photography by John Toll brings
a lot of Scottish natural beauty to the screen. On the other
hand, the musical score by James Horner employs too much of
modern-day instruments for period piece set in medieval
times.
Although mostly welcomed by critics and audiences alike,
BRAVEHEART was often criticised for homophobia and other
forms of extreme conservatism. The main reason for that was
the fact that Gibson, among many historical facts, chose to
be faithful only to those related to sexual orientation of
"Longshank"'s son Prince Edward (played by Peter Hanly). He
is not only presented as a villain, but also as one of the
less competent in villain's camp - and portraying of
homosexuals as villains or inferior to heterosexuals is
almost unforgivable sin in "politically correct" Hollywood.
To make things even more obvious, Good Guys in this film are
the total opposite of effeminate and incompetent Edward -
rugged macho men of mountains who are more practical and
efficient because they tend to employ conservatives' common
sense instead of fashionable theories of ivory tower
liberals. However, although the message of this film might
look right-wing, it owes more to leftist ideology of various
national liberation movements in 20th Century. According to
that ideology, oppressed classes (workers, peasants) are
better suited to fight for national freedom because their
members has less to lose in that struggle and, as such, they
are more radical, less willing to make compromises and more
efficient; on the other hand, privileged classes
(aristocracy, bourgeoisie) are more likely to betray the
cause of freedom and be in cahoots with foreign oppressors
in order to keep their privileges. This Marxist worldview is
presented in BRAVEHEART without any subtlety.
In the end, whether the audience is patient enough to
discover hidden meanings or simply wants to enjoy
entertaining historical epic, BRAVEHEART is more than
adequate choice for all fans of this recently resurrected
genre.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Bucket of Blood, A (1959)
Roger Corman is today best known as the producer who nursed
many future giants of American cinema into maturity. But his
own achievements as writer and director are somewhat
obscure, hardly known outside small circles of cult cinema
aficionados. This could be partially explained with the fact
that many of Corman's films happened to be shot with
laughably low budgets and in just few days, and such
circumstances naturally affected quality of Corman's work.
On the other hand, some of those films later earned cult
status among lovers of B-cinema. The best known among them
is 1960 black comedy LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS, which had the
honour of being turned into Broadway musical and mainstream
Hollywood remake. One year before Corman made another,
somewhat lesser known but even better black comedy A BUCKET
OF BLOOD.
Film begins in bohemian cafe frequented by beatniks,
pretentious artist wannabes, drug dealers and undercover
police officers. Walter Paisley (played by Dick Miller) is
young nerdish busboy who has two dreams in life - one is to
become great artist and fulfil ideals expounded in beat
poetry by one of cafe's regular guests, Maxwell Brock
(played by Julian Burton); another is to impress Carla
(played by Barboura Harris), beautiful girl who frequents
the caf with her artistic crowd. Unfortunately, Walter
lacks the talent and pursuit of his dreams only gets him to
trouble with his boss Leonard Di Cenzo (played by Anthony
Carbone). One faithful night, however, Walter's luck changes
when he accidentally stabs landlady's cat. In order to cover
his deed, he wraps cat's remains in the plaster, but the
result is mistaken for genuine sculpture by the artistic
crowd in Di Cenzo's cafe. Sculpture known as "Dead Cat"
becomes praised for realistic details and Walter is suddenly
heralded as talented young artist. Everyone, including his
boss, pressure him to continue making similar works of art.
Unfortunately, Walter still lacks the proper talent so he
again must use unconventional methods to produce sculpture
and, as a result, people start disappearing.
A BUCKET OF BLOOD could easily be described as "best film
ever made in less than five days". In some other cases this
phrase would indicate not so enviable quality of the film,
but in case of Roger Corman this is the ultimate compliment
to his talent. Despite time constraints and low budget, this
legendary filmmaker managed to produce one of the most
entertaining B-films of all times, but his ingenuity didn't
manifest only in quantity of macabre humour but also managed
to transcend the limits of cheap exploitation cinema by
taking satirical approach to some amusing realities of
present day world. His view on Beat phenomenon is something
more than satirical comment on subcultures of 1950s America;
his approach towards individuals who want to rise above
their sad, meaningless existence by following popular
cultural trends could be applied to many similar subcultures
that emerged before and after. Furthermore, in the character
of Paisley we might find Corman's very unflattering
self-portrayal - a hack filmmaker with high, unreachable
artistic ambitions.
Corman's long-time collaborator and talented screenwriter
Charles B. Griffith supplies the film with easily drawn but
memorable character, as well as sharp and memorable lines.
One of the most hilarious examples could be found in the
poems by Maxwell Brock. Poetic monologue, recited by Julian
Barton while Paul Horn plays saxophone in the background is
not just one of the most effective movie openings, but also
a great text (some of my friends learned it by heart, just
like the fans of PULP FICTION know Jules' sermon by heart).
The acting is also excellent and surpasses LITTLE SHOP OF
HORRORS. Dick Miller, one of the most recognisable character
actors in American cinema, is great in his only lead role.
His partners also shine - late Barboura Harris transcends
Love Interest stereotypes by making believable impression of
true art lover; Anthony Carbone creates a lot of laughs in
scenes of macabre humour and, finally; Julian Burton is
excellent as true representative of beatnik royalty.
Unfortunately, A BUCKET OF BLOOD has some problems with less
then inspired ending, but this should probably explained
with shooting schedules than with Griffith's or Corman's
lack of talent. Jazz music by Fred Katz is great, including
guitar numbers that give surreal atmosphere to this film.
All in all, A BUCKET OF BLOOD is probably one of the best,
albeit underrated black comedies ever made.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
One of the great things about movie reviewing is the
diversity of opinion. One man's masterpiece is another man's
junk, both of them are entitled to express their views and
this is how the things are supposed to be. However, the
author of this review, although he tries to live by those
principles, recollects some situations when he was tempted
to sacrifice his personal dissent for the sake of
conformity. One of such situations happened with the film
which is now considered to be one of the greatest films ever
made and which happens to hold top spots in Internet Movie
Database polls for years. Sheer numbers - high marks, plenty
of people giving those high marks and the amount of time
when the film holds the top spot - often give impression of
the overwhelming force that single, dissenting reviewer
shouldn't oppose. Thankfully, when I first encountered THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, 1994 prison drama by Frank Darabont, I
wasn't aware of that. Initial high rating in Internet Movie
Database didn't impress me; I thought that the enthusiasm
for the film is equal to those that elevated titles like THE
ROCK into Top 10 of IMDb and that it would vanish through
time. I was wrong, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is now one of
the most popular films of the past decade, but that
nevertheless didn't prevent me from keeping maintain my
original appraisal of the film.
Frank Darabon't screenplay for THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is
based on the Stephen King's story RITA HAYWORTH AND THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, Plot begins in 1946 when young
Portland banker Andy Dufresne (played by Tim Robbins) gets
sentenced to life imprisonment for the murder of his wife
and her lover. Dufresne maintains his innocence but for the
next few decades he would have to deal with more practical
issues in Shawshank prison, all observed through the eyes of
Ellis Boyd "Red" Redding (played by Morgan Freeman), another
"lifer" who runs prison's black market and who would
gradually become Dufresne's best friend. For the first years
of his imprisonment, quiet ex-banker is ridiculed by general
prison population and often assaulted by the gang of prison
rapists led by Bogs (played by Mark Ralston). His fortune
changes when he offers his accounting services to sadistic
prison guard Captain Byron Handley (played by Clancy Brown).
Soon his boss, Bible- thumping yet utterly corrupt warden
Samuel Norton (played by Bob Gunton) hires Dufresne as his
personal accountant, and in exchange for his help with
embezzlement, kickbacks, tax evasion and other illegal
activities, he gets library job and other privileges. But
Dufresne also uses his new position in order to improve the
prison library and help making life easier for other
prisoners. However, although the life behind bars gets
better through the years, Dufresne doesn't stop dreaming
about freedom.
At first glance, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION looks like a very
good film and could be hardly associated with first-time
director. The dark, depressive atmosphere of the prison
affects the viewers through the efforts of cinematographer
Roger Deakins, soundtrack composer Thomas Newman and good
use of old, defunct real life prison locations. The acting
is also great. Tim Robbins is good as quiet, enigmatic
character whose agenda remains the mystery until the very
end, while Freeman gives truly superb performance as cynical
prisoner who is going to experience change of heart. Two of
them have great chemistry together, but the supporting cast
is also very good and it ranges from veterans like James
Whitmore in very touching role of an old "institutionalised"
prisoner to Bob Gunton who often played villains, but hardly
so convincingly as in this film. But the best thing about
THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is Darabont's decision to employ
old-fashioned film techniques and not allow time constraints
to stand in the way of the storytelling. His indirect
approach, based on narration and quick flashbacks, works
fine in this film, allowing the audience to envision decades
spent behind bars more easily.
Taking all this into account, the author of this often
wondered whether his disappointment with THE SHAWSHANK
REDEMPTION had something to do with the subject matter and
the prison experience from his own past. However, after a
while, I came to the conclusion that there isn't direct
connection between the two. Fortunately, my time behind bars
was negligibly short compared with the protagonists of this
film and circumstances were completely different. So, the
reasons why I don't share other people's enthusiasm for this
film come from my perception of flaws in the film itself.
First, although the characters in this film are memorable,
they nevertheless belong to prison movie cliches - sadistic
guards, gang rapists, corrupt warden, protagonist's mentor
who "runs" the prison. Cliches later come in some scenes
that are supposed to be "meaningful" (like Dufresne playing
Mozart via loudspeakers) but in the end look trite and
overmanipulative. All that culminates in the last segments
of the film when Darabont tries too hard to wrap things up
with a neat little happy ending, which comes at the expense
of realism and looks too much like a deus ex machina. So,
what was supposed to be gritty but uplifting prison drama
ends like a standard Hollywood fairytale. However, THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is terribly overrated, but its pluses
nevertheless outweigh minuses so the potential audience
shouldn't be discouraged from watching it and making their
own mind about its quality.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Rapa Nui (1994)
At times Hollywood leaves impression of being run by
lunatics, drunks and other people who lost their most basic
mental abilities. This was especially the case in 1990s,
when big studios pumped obscenely large amounts of money
into projects that were doomed to flop from the start. Kevin
Costner's WATERWORLD is usually the best known example of
Hollywood's egos run amok, but the production team of Kevin
Reynolds and Kevin Costner can't be accused of starting that
unfortunate adventure without any sense of caution. One year
before they made WATERWORLD, they tested the uncharted
waters of ecological action spectacle by making somewhat
less ambitious and less expensive project called RAPA NUI.
The plot of this film is based on the legends and historical
speculations about Easter Island in Southeast Pacific, the
most remote part of the world that was ever settled by human
beings. Dutch explorers, upon discovering those islands in
1722, found impressive statues but the the local population,
made of stone-age cannibalistic savages, seemed incapable of
erecting them. The movie tries to give the explanation for
this by setting the story few decades before the arrival of
Europeans. The island is so far away from the other lands
and that the descendants of Polynesian settlers forgot their
roots and believe that they are the only people in the
world. Lack of external conflicts doesn't mean that there
aren't tensions within the community - the society is
divided into two classes based on racial features -
aristocratic "Long Ears" and plebeian "Short Ears". The
class and racial tensions has begun to escalate because of
the population explosion; the island is simply too small to
provide the needs for the people. Old and senile king
Ariki-mau (played by Eru Potaka-Dewes) is less concerned
with those problems, because he thinks only of erecting
bigger and bigger statues in order to placate gods. His
grandson Naro (played by Jason Scott Lee) has other things
on his mind, since he fell in love in "Short Ear" girl
Ramana (played by Sandirine Holt). Love that crosses class
divide happens in worst of all times, since "Short Ears"
like Make (played by Esai Morales) are less and less
enthusiastic about "Long Ears" rule, which slowly but
inevitably paves the way for brutal civil unrest.
RAPA NUI definitely belongs to the same category as
multitude of other films with strong environmental message,
which used to be made during the zenith of Hollywood's
"political correctness" in early to mid 1990s. What
distinguishes this film from those films is the manor in
which the message is delivered to the audience. Namely,
filmmakers wisely chose to set the plot in a time before
arrival of Europeans, thus sparing the viewers from
"politically correct" cliches of evil European civilisation
destroying the nature. RAPA NUI shows that less advanced
native cultures, which are supposed to be more "in tune"
with the nature, can be equally or even more deadly to the
environment than their modern-day equivalents. What is even
more remarkable about this film is the fact that the whole
story can be seen as powerful allegory about the current
state of human civilisation as a whole,. The little spot of
land in the middle of endless sea is more-or-less in the
same situation as our lonely little rock in dark cold
universe, and in the ecologically induced class struggle
between "Long Ears" and "Short Ears" we might see reflection
of the escalating conflict between rich and privileged
states of the First World and numerically increasing yet
constantly impoverished multitudes of the Third World.
Unlike other films that try to shove the Message down our
throats by, RAPA NUI successfully shows how greed, ignorance
and unbalanced approach towards environment can bring down
entire civilisation.
Unfortunately, most of the viewers have to digest this
message in the context of plot, characters and situations
that sometimes look too cliched or simplistic, or simply out
of place. One of the examples is the triathlon scene, which
looks like it was added into the film only to provide some
testosterone- filled action in otherwise depressive movie.
The writer and director Kevin Reynolds nevertheless manages
to keep things under control, helped by ethnically diverse
and very capable cast. Despite many flaws, RAPA NUI is a
film that can leave a strong impression on any viewers, and
after WTC bombings, when the future of our world seems so
uncertain, this impression is definitely going to be even
stronger.
Review written on September 21st 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Streetcar Named Desire, A (1951)
People, as well as institutions, often become victims of
their own triumphs. World of cinema doesn't lack such
examples. Many artists suffer because the rest of their,
otherwise good, career gets unfairly compared with their
single and often accidental masterpiece. Great movies often
get so praised only to have their reputation declining when
they fail to meet big expectations created by overzealous
critics and film scholars. In may ways, this phenomenon
occurred with A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE, powerful
"Oscar"-awarded 1951 drama, directed by Elia Kazan. Half a
century after its premiere the original power of the film
declined, being diluted with numerous parodies and homages
(the latest being Almodovar's TODO SOBRE MI MADRE), and many
talents associated with this film slid into relative
obscurity, not being able to repeat its success.
The film is an adaptation of the Pulitzer Prize winning 1947
stage play by Tennessee Williams. Plot is set in the French
Quarter of New Orleans where Blanche DuBois (played by
Vivien Leigh), small time schoolteacher and daughter of once
wealthy land-owning family from Mississippi, comes to calm
her nerves, stressed after the loss of family property. At
least, this is the story told to her sister Stella (played
by Kim Hunter) who seems to be happily married to Stanley
Kowalski (played by Marlon Brando) brutish, uneducated
working class Polish American. Blanche, posing as refined
aristocrat, simply can't stand ape-like Stanley who, in
return, can't stand ageing southern beauty that brought
discomfort to his harmonious marriage. Friction between the
two rises as times go by, and intensifies with Stella's
pregnancy, Blanche's seduction of Stanley's shy and
mild-mannered best friend Harold "Mitch" Mitchell (played by
Karl Malden). When Stanley discovers some unflattering
details of Blanche's past the conflict would reach its
violent climax.
A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE is often viewed as one of the most
important milestones in the history of American cinema.
Based on the powerful play, but also a very controversial in
its time, this film introduced some topics that used to be
taboo in Old Hollywood - female sexuality, nymphomania,
domestic violence and, finally, rape. Even after being
thoroughly reviewed by censors (who did everything to tame
the raw and shocking original, including removal of all
references to homosexuality), A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE was a
film quite shocking for its time. Director Elia Kazan, known
for the groundbreaking character of his socially conscious
films like GENTLEMAN'S AGREEMENT, also used this film as an
opportunity to comment on the social conflicts in post-WW2
America, when the romantic visions of American rural and
WASPish past clashed with down-to-earth reality of
industrial, urbanised and multicultural present.
This film wasn't groundbreaking just in the reality it
presented; it was also groundbreaking in the way it
presented such reality. Kazan was fortunate to master the
play on the stage and twice fortunate to bring most of the
original stage cast for the film adaptation. Among them
excelled the actors who had embraced the new Method style of
acting, so popularised by Kazan in his films. The best known
was, of course, Marlon Brando. When we look into his first
major film role, the intensity of emotions displayed and raw
strength of performance seems earth shattering in comparison
with everything Hollywood had to offer before. For the newer
generations, A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE is an excellent
opportunity to see young Brando, quite different from the
roles he played in last few decades. His role of Stanley
Kowalski was for many years considered the best in his
entire career, until, of course, Don Vito Corleone in
Coppola's GODFATHER changed all parameters. In this film
Brando doesn't just show a very complex character; he also
revolutionises the way male sexuality is displayed on
screen. His biceps's, lustful looks and tendency to have
bare chests explain why Brando happened to be one of the
first major female heartthrobs of 1950s America - something
almost inconceivable today, when we picture as nothing more
than overweight eccentric caricature of himself. Brando was
also fortunate to have some of his stage partners back on
screen. Kim Hunter is marvel to watch, as a woman caught
between conflicting loyalties, troubled by her social
obligations and obvious and very primordial lust she feels
for her husband. Unfortunately, she didn't manage to build
equally impressive career on her "Oscar"-awarded triumph.
Karl Malden, another member of the original cast, again
proves his excellent qualities of character actor in the
role in the role of deceived, shy but still most likeable
character; his performance was also awarded with "Oscar".
But the most memorable (and most parodied) performance of
them all belongs to Vivien Leigh. Her role of Blanche
dubious was often portrayed as a parody itself; the
character of aristocratic Southern belle strikes certain
resemblance to Vivien's Leigh best known incarnation in GONE
WITH THE WIND. But this resemblance are only superficial -
Blanche DuBois is much more complex, troubled and fragile,
and her once all-conquering beauty and irresistible charm is
rapidly becoming the thing of a past. Leigh made a terrific
job of detailing her gradual, but inevitable decline into
madness. This "Oscar"-awarded performance becomes even more
devastatingly powerful when we take into account that the
real life of an Vivien Leigh in later years in many ways
resembled the life of the character.
Thanks to the excellent text and superb actors, Kazan
managed to create a very good film, but he still failed to
turn it into genuine and everlasting masterpiece. Kazan
worked very hard to improve the stage production with the
benefits of the new medium, but A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE
still looks less like an original film, and more like a
stage play adapted for screen. Almost entire film takes
place in very limited space, and the scenes that show the
outside seem to come out of the picture. With a film almost
exclusively concentrated on the four major characters,
anyone else is distracting, even the boy whose brief
appearance would trigger some well-hidden impulses in
Blanche. The musical soundtrack by Alex North, although
revolutionary for Hollywood through its use of jazz, isn't
particularly impressive. Finally, modern day viewers simply
couldn't avoid noticing some rather awkward treatment of
some grim subjects due to the different censorship
standards. A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE is nevertheless still
essential film for anyone who wants to be familiarised with
20th Century cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Mask, The (1994)
Comic book industry has suffered a sharp commercial decline
in the last decade. One of the reasons for that can be found
in the rapid development of computer graphic technologies
that brought whole new dimension to interactive video games
and Hollywood films. Two-dimensional paper world of comic
books simply can't compete with them and the adolescents,
who used to keep the industry alive, are turning away
towards alternative forms of entertainment in which their
favourite characters, even the most outrageous ones, look
more alive and more attractive. One of such examples is THE
MASK, movie adaptation of Dark Horse comic book, directed in
1994 by Charles Russell.
Protagonist of this film is Stanley Ipkiss (played by Jim
Carrey), mild-mannered bank clerk who is not particularly
happy with many aspects of his life, especially those
related to opposite sex. One day a beautiful night club
singer Tina Carlyle (played by Cameron Diaz) comes to his
bank and Stanley hopelessly falls in love with. But the
visit to the night club ends with Stanley being bounced and
spending the rest of night walking by the sea. There he sees
a strange ancient mask that features face of Loki, Norse god
of mischief. When Stanley puts the mask on his face, he gets
transformed into Mask - a new character with a green face, a
person who does almost any thing Stanley would never do.
While doing that he brings attention of both police led by
Lt. Mitch Kellaway (played by Peter Riegert) and crime
syndicate led by Dorian Tyrell (played by Peter Greene).
There are few comic actors like Jim Carrey whose comedic
talent is such that he can carry movies that would otherwise
be unwatchable. THE MASK is one of those rare instances
where Jim Carrey's overwhelming talent actually had to
compete with something else. The outrageous and cartoonish
character of Mask was simply impossible to put on the screen
without massive display of latest CGI technologies. In the
end the special effects became the most important element of
the film and everything else - plot, characters, settings
etc. - was just an excuse for their display. Unfortunately,
those scenes tend to be too short and between them viewers
have to deal with the weak script by Mike Werb and
anachronistic characters and situation that might look like
they were time-warped from 1940s. Although Carrey really
tried his best (and usually succeeds) in bringing life to
the comic book characters, his efforts weren't enough to
rescue this film from sinking into oblivion. Those who
remember THE MASK these days usually don't think of Carrey
or ground-breaking CGI effects; the main reason why this
film gets mentioned is Cameron Diaz in her first major movie
appearance, in which she displays somewhat rounder shape
than we are accustomed to see from Hollywood actresses. In
the end, those viewers who aren't big fans of Carrey, Diaz
or comic books probably won't miss much if they don't watch
this film.
Review written on September 29th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Untouchables, The (1987)
Some films are remembered for quite unexpected reasons. Few
months before THE UNTOUCHABLES would come into former
Yugoslavia cinemas in 1988, soundtrack album by Ennio
Morricone was released in music stores. The themes from that
soundtrack became very popular among music supervisors for
different radio and TV shows. Almost all of those shows
dealt with mounting economic and political problems of the
crumbling federation, and Morricone's disturbing music
corresponded with a anxious atmosphere in the eve of bloody
break-up. Notably cheerful exception was a TV broadcast when
the old Communist was interviewed about his past; Al
Capone's theme was playing in the background, which was very
subtle way for the show's creator to express their opinion
about dying Communist regime.
The plot of the movie is set in dark moments of another
federation which, unlike former Yugoslavia, survived hard
times. The year is 1930, and America pays heavy price for
its experiment with Prohibition. Illegal, yet lucrative
business of bootlegging made Al Capone (Robert de Niro)
undisputed leader of the Chicago underworld and most
powerful man in the city. However, despite his public
businessman personality, Capone keeps his supremacy by
brutal violence, not caring about the lives of innocent
people. After small girl died in one of such incidents,
Federal government decides to stop the violence by creating
special task force. The force is led by Eliot Ness (Kevin
Costner), Treasury Department official whose zeal is in
great contrast with his inexperience in law enforcement. His
debut raid on Capone's warehouse ends in embarrassing
fiasco, and Ness now knows that he can't rely on notoriously
corrupt local police. The rare exception among Chicago cops
is old Malone (Sean Connery), who lost career because of his
honesty. Ness gets the idea to create unit of few, yet
capable and reliable lawmen that would battle Capone's
all-powerful organisation. He and Malone recruit two more
men - Treasury accountant Oscar Wallace (Charles Martin
Smith) and Chicago rookie policeman George Stone (Andy
Garcia) - and they become hitting Capone's operations hard,
earning the nickname 'The Untouchables' by the press.
When the film originally appeared in cinema, expectations
were quite high, partly because of very effective
soundtrack, partly because of Sean Connery finally getting
his long-deserved "Oscar", and finally because all major
critics praised creative genius of director Brian de Palma.
Unfortunately, the final product was good, yet far bellow
the expectations. As years went by, THE UNTOUCHABLES began
fading into oblivion, and newer generations of viewers would
probably have some problems in understanding its original
success. Same can be said for some old viewers, especially
the fans of TV series UNTOUCHABLES. The series, although
based on non-fiction book by Oscar Fraley and Eliot Ness,
was a great departure from the historic truth and offered
one-dimensional picture of Prohibition-era Chicago, by
confronting virtuous law enforcement supermen with soulless
gangster scum. Thirty years did almost nothing to connect
THE UNTOUCHABLES myth with history, and the screenplay by
Pullitzer Prize winning playwright David Mamet went even
further from established facts.
In David Mamet's vision Eliot Ness is embodiment of all
American virtues - upholding law, dedicated to the job,
loving husband and father. Kevin Costner, with his Gary
Cooper image, was perfect for that role and it shouldn't
surprise anyone that THE UNTOUCHABLES launched his career of
major movie star. Unfortunately, Robert de Niro wasn't so
good in the role of his archenemy and despite all his
efforts (even buying and wearing the identical underwear
that Capone used to wear) he fails to capture the true
spirit of Capone on screen. Instead of vicious gangster, we
got a bad caricature of Benito Mussolini. The notorious
bludgeoning scene, obviously incorporated to give Capone's
character some viciousness, doesn't improve such
impressions. The only really developed character in the
movie is Malone, brilliantly played by Sean Connery. Motive
of policemen who must break the law in order to uphold it,
hinted by Mamet's script, would probably be unnoticed in the
movie if it weren't for Connery.
Director de Palma, on the other hand, didn't care much about
the characters and story. For him, this was just another
exercise in mannerist film-making and another victory for
those who prefer style over substance in art. The movie
looks great, thanks to production designs of Patrizia von
Brandenstein and William A. Elliott, costumes by Giorgio
Armani and  Stephen H. Burum's photography and all the other
that took great care to capture the period details. Yet,
most impressive and most memorable part of the film is the
famous Showdown at the Steps scene, de Palma's intentional
homage to Einstenstein's BATTLESHIP POTEMKIN. The scene is
visually stunning, de Palma's manages to go over the top, by
featuring couple of sailors only to make his reference even
more obvious. All in all, THE UNTOUCHABLES can be seen as
conventional and satisfying period thriller, and failed work
of art in the same time.

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
It is common knowledge that the reputation of some films,
even the classic ones and those generally regarded as
masterpieces, change through times. But few films suffer
because of wear as original version of PSYCHO did. Simply,
being one of, if not the, most influential film of all times
is a great burden that could produce serious, sometimes even
devastating, impact on its watchability among the newest
generations of film viewers. In the last thirty- nine years
multitudes of filmmakers had seen this film and were very
influenced by it. Those influences found way to produce
themselves in the various rip-offs, homages, spoofs
scattered all over the globe and in all kind of genres,
including even video-clips. So, today it is really hard to
find a living soul that could be spoiled about the major
plot points of PSYCHO (and it would happen even without
three unnecessary sequels and utterly pointless 1998
remake).
Thanks to that, PSYCHO is actually the film most often
associated with the name of its director, the great Alfred
Hitchcock. And, ironically, when it was originally released,
it was considered to be the most un-Hitchcockian of them
all. It was shot in 1960, at the zenith of Hitchcock's
career, yet it lacked many of his distinctive trademarks.
Hitchcock shot it very quickly and very cheaply, using his
second-hand crew, cast of the relative unknowns and even
distributed it as nothing more than cheap exploitation
B-thriller. Hitchcock even didn't use his trademark
technique of building suspense and instead simply shocked
the audience with totally unexpected plot twists, and
depictions of violence and sexual innuendo that was very
daring for its time.
Plot of the film, based on the novel by Robert Bloch, begins
in Phoenix, Arizona, where Marion Crane (played by Janet
Leigh) works as office clerk in real state agency. Marion is
utterly unhappy with her life, mostly because her lover Sam
Loomis (played by John Gavin) can't marry her because of
huge alimony owed to his ex-wife. One hot day Marion acts on
impulse and steals 40,000 US$ from one of agency's clients.
She begins her long road trip towards Sam's hometown in
California. Along the way she would make a stop at isolated
motel. There she meets the manager, lonely, sometimes odd
but basically friendly Norman Bates (played by Anthony
Perkins) whose major problem in life seems to be his
physically and mentally ill mother, living in nearby gothic
house. Her short stay in Bates motel is terminated when she
gets fatally stabbed under shower. Norman, convinced that
his pathologically jealous mother committed the crime, hides
the body and all traces of Marion. However, Milton Arbogast
(played by Martin Balsam), private detective sent by the
agency to retrieve the stolen money, tracked Marion to the
motel. And Marion's sister Lila (played by Vera Miles) is
also more than eager to find what actually happened to her
sibling.
PSYCHO is not just the one of the most popular or
influential films of all times. It is also one of the most
studied films, with each shot and elements being subject of
at least half a dozen monographs or even books. So, everyone
who tries to review PSYCHO has a really hard task to be
original. However, some things must be told, even at the
risk of being repetitive. So, PSYCHO was very revolutionary
film for its time. It was the first major Hollywood film to
feature women dressed in underwear; the first major
Hollywood film to feature toilet bowls and flushing water,
but the most original thing was Hitchcock's use of
protagonist who is to be killed half way through the movie.
Such practice was unheard of until that time, and it is
rarely used even today. That shouldn't surprise anyone - few
people could imagine emotional shock and disturbing effect
such demise had on the audience. The killing of Marion Crane
per se, and not the blood, gore and suspense, make PSYCHO
one of the scariest movies of all times (or to be precise,
used to make it the scariest movie of all times, since the
shock value is long gone among audience these days).
That killing was depicted in one of the most memorable
scenes of all times. The legendary shower scene lasts 45
seconds, but in reality was shot in a week. For some people
this scene, most remembered and most often quoted element of
the film, is the embodiment of cinematic perfection.
Brilliantly edited, with excellent use of black-and-white
photography, Bernard Herrmann's music and many tricks that
cheated censors, this scene puts audience on the emotional
roller coaster. In those 45 seconds viewers first satisfy
their voyeuristic instincts, only to be shockingly reminded
of the human mortality when the movie protagonist becomes
totally helpless, naked and unshielded. The same scene also
paved the way to future use of stereotype of "sex=death",
cliche that made PSYCHO the great grandfather of all slasher
horror movies.
However, the real horror of PSYCHO doesn't lie in the
graphic or shocking depictions of murders. What is most
disturbing in PSYCHO is the utter lack of foreshadowing. The
audience, same as the unfortunate heroine, didn't know where
the real danger was coming from. Slasher movies, same as
PSYCHO, scare the audience because the danger doesn't come
in the form of monsters or supernatural beings; the killings
are committed by ordinary people next door, people who might
be friendly and nice and people who might even not be aware
of their own homicidal tendencies. Such was the role of
Norman Bates, played superbly by young Anthony Perkins. That
actor portrayed conflicting emotions and made the audience
care for his character, and won sympathies that stayed until
the end. Perkins played the role of his life, but,
unfortunately, his acting triumph doomed his career -
afterwards he was often typecast, playing cheap imitations
of the same, mentally troubled character.
PSYCHO might be the most influential, but it is definitely
not the best film of all times. It was splendidly paced,
superbly directed by the master and still remains one of the
most memorable viewing experiences. Even the time seemed to
be kind to it, and without its own overexposure, PSYCHO
might be truly enjoyed by new generations. However, the
ending, same as with few other great Hitchcock's films,
represents a disappointment. The last, terrifying scene that
revealed the true horror of Bates' insanity, is ruined when
Lila, the last of the protagonists, escapes the fate of
their predecessors with the conventional yet unbelievable
deus ex machina. This scene is followed with the scholarly,
detailed yet overlong expose given by psychiatrist Dr.
Richmond (played by Simon Oakland) whose expert opinion
actually insults the audience - he just tells us what we
already know. Perhaps such scene was needed for 1960s
audience, unaccustomed to bizarre forms of psychotic
behaviour, but today it slows the film that would end
perfectly just with the last shot of imprisoned Norman Bates
sitting and not harming a fly.
PSYCHO might be not perfect, but it is still watched and
maintains its reputation, despite the fact that even those
who watch it for the first time know everything about it.
This strange fact is the ultimate viewing recommendation.

Title
Review for Jaws (1975)
George Lucas is often blamed for the great decline in the
quality of American movies, because the success of his STAR
WARS in 1977 introduced the concept of blockbusters to
Hollywood producers, and redirected most of the studios'
capital towards utterly expensive, sometimes lucrative but
usually artistically insufficient movie products. Lucas
might be one of the people responsible for that, but the
very first summer blockbuster was shot and distributed two
years before his - JAWS by Steven Spielberg, one of the most
successful and most influential films of all times.
At the time of the production, Spielberg was still young and
relatively unknown director, far from being critics' darling
and successful crowd-pleaser. The producers, David Brown and
Richard B. Zanuck, were actually quite sceptical towards him
when they hired him to direct movie adaptation of Peter
Bentley's best-seller novel about man-eating shark that
terrorises small town on New England coast. Their suspicions
proved almost correct, because the production of JAWS was
plagued by rising budget, huge technical difficulties
associated with the shooting at sea, problems with casting
and, finally, rows between screenwriter and director. In
many ways, production of JAWS resembled the production of
ill-fated WATERWORLD twenty years later. Many people
actually questioned producers' sanity, because the film
needed almost impossibly high earnings in order to cover its
expenses. But, unlike WATERWORLD, miracle happened. JAWS was
not just the first film to break 100 million US$ mark in
box-office totals; it turned out to be one of top grossing
films of all times, where it remained for many years,
together with many other films created by Lucas and
Spielberg. Its popularity among the audience, surprisingly
in tune with the perception of critics, could be witnessed
by endless references and homage, from disco-tunes of John
Williams' musical score in 1970s, till plenty of horror
films still being inspired by it today, like Harlin's DEEP
BLUE SEA.
The plot takes place in the small island town of Amity, off
the coast of New England. Its beaches are very popular among
tourists, including group of young, carefree students that
spends a pleasant evening there. One of them is Karen
Watkins (played by Susan Blacklinie), who flirts with a boy
and goes skinny-dipping, only to never come out of water
again. Investigation is led by Martin Brody (played by Roy
Scheider), former New York cop who took the job of police
chief in small community only to evade violence of large
urban centres. When he finds the dismembered remains of a
girl on the beach, he is almost certain that the large shark
was perpetrator. He wants to close the beaches, but the city
administration, led by Mayor Larry Vaughn (played by Murray
Hamilton) is against it, fearing for the precious tourism
dollars. Brody reluctantly agrees to file the incident as a
boating accident, but later regrets his decision after few
more fatal incidents. City fathers are still stubborn, even
after marine biologist Matt Hooper (played by Richard
Dreyfuss) warns them that they have man-eating and very
territorial Great White shark in their waters. Brody is
willing to take his advice and company, and decides to hire
services of Quint (played by Robert Shaw), eccentric
fisherman and local shark expert, who would lead their
little shark-hunting expedition.
JAWS is often called one of the best horror films of all
times. It is quite understandable, since very few movies
manage to cause so intense feeling of anxiety and fear among
the audience. The fear felt by the viewers is a reflection
of subconscious fear of the Unknown. And the deep, blue and
dark depths of the ocean are perfect embodiment of the
Unknown. People watching this film are more than aware that
some unspeakable horrors lurk in those deeps and that any
man entering the water runs the risk of being nothing more
than a helpless victim. What makes this film even more
effective than other horror films was the fact that it dealt
with nothing supernatural or exotic; the audience knows that
creatures like Great White sharks exist in the oceans and
that some unfortunate people occasionally do indeed suffer
the gruesome fate of the fictional victims in this movie.
And, in this film, unlike many horrors and, same as in the
real life, nobody is immune - children, pets and even the
protagonists can be killed. The element of realism, very
rare in horror genre, made this film very effective indeed,
and it is quite understandable why many people, author of
this review included, feel rather uneasy when they enter
ocean water for a swim (although the streets and roads are
more life-threatening places, according to statistics). It
is somewhat ironic that JAWS as a very un-cliched horror
still uses the very popular horror cliche of "sex equals
death" in its opening.
The realism of the menace is just one part of the
explanation for the success of JAWS. The other part of the
answer lies in a way that Spielberg used to portray that
menace. Faced with huge technical difficulties and accidents
involving underwater equipment, together with a relatively
crude and still undeveloped special effects, Spielberg was
using many simple, but ingenious and very effective ways to
portray the fictional sea monster. He used unusual shooting
angles, but the best and most effective method was in not
portraying the monster at all. We actually don't see the
shark until late in the movie; before that we saw it only
through its own POV or actions that very convincingly give
away its huge size and incredible physical strength (one of
the most memorable and effective scenes is an entire pier
being pulled towards the ocean). When we finally see the
monster, the result is fantastic, since the otherwise
down-to-earth fish (relatively speaking, of course) had
already been connected with the scariest results of our
imagination.
The most important factor that contributed to the realism of
the film are, naturally, the characters. And this film
introduces them gradually, in orderly but very effective
action. First the deadly but magnificent menace of the dark
ocean deeps is contrasted with the quiet, every- day life of
semi-rural would-be utopia. Roy Scheider, one of the best
Hollywood actors of the 1970s (and, unfortunately, almost
forgotten now), plays the role of his life. His Brody is a
dedicated family man, whose need to protect his wife and
children led him to small town where the biggest crime
happened to be children vandalising picket fences. Every
action or choice he makes in this film, even the wrong one,
like leaving the beaches open, was motivated with the need
to protect his job and family bliss provided by it. Then we
are introduced to Richard Dreyfuss as rich and arrogant, but
in the same time very valuable scientific expert. Dreyfuss
played this role very well, in many ways trying to become
Spielberg's alter ego and he is often most remembered for
this particular role. It is ironic that the actor himself
forgot about it, according to the anecdote that later led to
the movie trivia reference in 1987 film STAKEOUT. But the
most memorable performance comes from Robert Shaw. His
Quint, rude working class eccentric whose rugged, easy-going
personality hides tragic secret from the past, is one of the
most vivid characters in the history of cinema. The late
actor's contribution to this film is even more important
when we take into account that the credit for most memorable
words in the film - legendary USS Indianapolis story (itself
being based on real life history, another element of realism
in this film) - must go exclusively to him. All three actors
had wonderful interaction, both in the scenes of male
bonding and exciting but very realistic and believable
action scenes.
Those three giants of course, shadowed other actors.
Lorraine Gary was good as Brody's wife, but the script
didn't give her much material. Murray Hamilton was wonderful
as mayor; at first he is a creep whose actions and
mishandling of the crisis was motivated only by greed; at
the end he reveals himself as normal, caring human being.
Lee Fierro as Mrs. Kintner also delivered few powerful
scenes in short space. The acting talent was accompanied by
the talents of almost anyone else in this film, especially
Verna Fields with its perfect editing and John Williams with
his effective, "Oscar"-awarded and now all-too-familiar
musical score. Talents of those two combined provided some
of the scariest and most memorable scenes in the history of
film.
Unfortunately, even the greatest of all films age through
the time and JAWS, the first film of modern Hollywood era,
didn't escape that fate. Compared with plenty of similar,
more recent films with bigger budgets and modern special
effects technology, it seems somewhat obsolete. It is
especially so in some of the night scenes, with sometimes
annoying use of "day for night" techniques that provide too
dark picture. On the other hand, such minor flaws were not
the authors' fault and insistence on them would look like
unnecessary nit- picking. All technical insufficiencies of
JAWS are still being, same as they always were, compensated
with excellent story, atmosphere and characters that work
now as effectively as they worked quarter of a century ago.
JAWS is one of those rare films that really deserved its
commercial success and its place among the best films of all
times.

Title
Review for Little Man Tate (1991)
One of the surest ways for the Hollywood actors to win the
"Oscars" is playing the characters burdened with some
terrible affliction. On the other hand, serious dramatic
movies about the opposite - talented people - are quite
rare. LITTLE MAN TATE, 1991 directorial debut by Jodie
Foster is one of such films.
The movie deals with Fred Tate (played by Adam Hann-Byrd),
eight-year old child prodigy who is blessed with high IQ and
many talents, like mathematics, music and painting. For his
single mother and cocktail waitress Dede (Jodie Foster),
Fred is normal child that is supposed to have normal
childhood like everybody else. But, his intelligence has
estranged him from the peers in school, and, finally, it
brings attention of Dr. Jane Grierson (Diane Wiest),
psychologist specialised for gifted children. She wants Fred
to join her summer camp for gifted children. Dede
reluctantly agrees, but soon the tension would erupt between
her and Dr. Grierson, who wants Fred to have special
education, away from his mother.
In many ways, LITTLE MAN TATE has a lot of autobiographic
elements for Jodie Foster. She, same as the protagonist in
the movie, was a child prodigy, becoming a huge film star at
the age of twelve. But, unlike many other child stars, she
was intelligent enough to know that stardom doesn't last
forever and she temporarily left Hollywood in order to
finish proper education. Her return later led to the
triumph, with two "Oscars" for THE ACCUSED and SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS. Enjoying the great respect as one of the most
mature stars in Hollywood, her directorial debut was
universally praised by the critics. Perhaps, they went
overboard with praises - film is good, but it is basically
television drama material, with rather simplistic plot that
deals with the struggle between the heart (childhood) and
mind (adulthood). Scott Frank's script takes the side of
heart, often portraying the intelligent children as
obnoxious ("Math Magician", brilliantly played by P.J.
Ochlan) or their mentors as emotional cripples who lack the
ability to enjoy the life. The acting, on the other hand is
superb - Jodie Foster has a rather low key performance,
overshadowed by young Adam Hann-Byrd and always reliable
Dianne Wiest. Many of the actors in short, but effective
scenes, manage to overcome the limitations of the weak
script. Foster as director, on the other hand, is quite
capable to make this film entertaining and touching despite
its flaws. In its time, Foster was praised for her debut.
Now she should be praised even more, because GOOD WILL
HUNTING, more recent and more acclaimed film dealing with
the same subject, really pales compared with LITTLE MAN
TATE.

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
Great works of literature seldom produce a good material for
films, and the career of Stephen King is living proof for
that. However, some transitions between the written word and
silver screen image are better than other and, again,
Stephen King is a nice example for that phenomenon.
Interestingly enough, among dozens of novels and short
stories adapted for films and televisions usually those not
belonging to his favourite genre of horror proved to be good
source for films. One of such examples is DOLORES CLAIBORNE,
1995 drama directed by Taylor Hackford.
The plot is set on the small island off the coast of Maine
and begins when one of her residents, feisty old housekeeper
Dolores Claiborne St. George (played by Kathy Bates) becomes
target of criminal investigation, following the suspicious
death of her long-time employer, bed-ridden wealthy old
widow Vera Donovan (played by Judy Parfitt). To make things
worse for Dolores, the investigation is led by Detective
John Mackey (played by Christopher Plummer), mainland
policeman who had been investigating her twenty years before
after equally suspicious death of her husband. Everyone is
convinced that Dolores killed the old woman, and that might
include even her daughter Selena (played by Jennifer Jason
Lee), successful journalist who comes from New York
following anonymous tip. When two women finally meet, the
issue of Dolores' guilt or innocence is going to be settled
together with painful memories and ghosts of the past that
haunts their lives.
Taylor Hackford and his scriptwriter Tony Gilroy are among
those rare filmmakers that managed to successfully tackle
with King's fiction. Dark, menacing atmosphere of King's
home state of Maine - the perfect setting for the unpleasant
and often depressive subjects of family abuse that this film
tackles - is brought here due to the clever use of Gabriel
Beristain's photography and Canadian coastal locations.
Hackford also manages to give depth to the characters by
using flashbacks and non- linear story structure. The actors
are doing wonderful job - Kathy Bates is excellent in her
complex role, as well as Jennifer Jason Lee, as well as
Christopher Plummer as near-psychopathic detective. The most
impressive work was, however, done by David Strathairn in
the role of Dolores' mean husband. All that would guarantee
a very good film, but in the last segments Hackford seems to
lose pace and David Elfman's musical score becomes somewhat
too irritating. And, same as with many Hollywood films that
had great potential, ending is formulaic and represents a
disappointment. However, despite that, and despite the fact
that depressive viewers might do themselves a favour if they
watch something else, DOLORES CLAIBORNE is a good film not
only compared to the majority of King's screen adaptations.
Review written on September 19th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Black Widow (1986)
In the early 1990s it seemed that Hollywood producers like
to make two very distinctive types of thrillers. One,
obviously inspired by smashing success of Demme's SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS, dealt with demonic yet efficient and
hyperintelligent serial killers. Another one, spawned by
BASIC INSTINCT, used, or to be more precise, shamelessly
exploited sex or sexual themes in the plot. The former one
is still popular, the latter one have already reached its
peak and turned to straight-for-video land. However, more
than a decade ago, and long before such explosion, there was
a movie that fused both of those elements, and did it more
seriously. It was BLACK WIDOW by Bob Rafelson, that used a
very old film noire motives and gave it a completely new and
modern twist.
The villain in this movie is Catherine (Theresa Russell),
beautiful, charming and intelligent woman that seduces and
marries a whole bunch of wealthy men only to have them
mysteriously die few months later. After collecting
inheritance money, she disappears, takes new identity and
begins her deadly scheme all over again. Her modus operandi,
however, brings the attention of Alexandra Barnes (Debra
Winger), workaholic Justice Department investigator. After
obsessively tracking down Catherine all over the country,
Alexandra finally reaches her at Hawaii. Catherine there
wants to pull the same stunt on Paul (Sami Frey), local
tycoon. Knowing that she would have to catch Catherine red
handed, Alexandra meets her and tries to strike a
friendship, not knowing that Catherine has some suspicions
too.
One of the things seldom seen in Hollywood is a thriller
that has two strong female leads. In case of BLACK WIDOW
that shouldn't surprise anyone, because the screenplay
writer Ronald Bass prefers strong female characters in his
works. In BLACK WIDOW both of the female leads are portrayed
as superior to all the men they encounter - Catherine as a
skilful sex manipulator that could fool anybody, and
Alexandra as hard-working law enforcer always step ahead
from her colleagues. Very good performances by Theresa
Russell and Debra Winger give their characters a lot of
contrast to each other - Catherine is rich, beautiful and
cool, and Alexandra is poor, plain and always nervous. But
when they finally meet, sparks fly and unusual attraction
develops between them, only to be finally and explicitly
addressed in one very scene.
Unfortunately, good characterisation don't solve all the
problems, and one of the problems in BLACK WIDOW is
unconvincing plot. There are too many loose ends and some
implausibilities, including totally clichd ending scene.
Sami Frey as exotic foreigner and potential love interest is
also very bland. Other actors are more than fine, although
they have limited screen time - especially Nicol Williamson,
James Hong and Terry O'Quinn. Photography by Conrad L. Hall
is very good, and it has a very good use of beautiful
Hawaiian scenery. Musical score by Michael Small with its
dark themes is a nice contrast to the visual beauty of film.
Editing is good, and Rafelson's direction spotless. However,
although definitely worth watching, BLACK WIDOW at the end
leaves a bitter taste of missed opportunities.

Title
Review for Woman of Desire (1993)
Among multitude of erotic thrillers, that had been released
in the early 1990s, WOMAN OF DESIRE is interesting only
because it was directed by Robert Ginty, star of the B-grade
action films of the previous decade. Those who tend not to
be nostalgic about 1980s can find very good reason in the
type of movies that made Ginty the star. As director, Ginty
did very little to improve that impression.
The protagonist of the movie is Jack (played by Jeff Fahey),
yacht skipper that falls madly in love with Christina Ford
(played by Bo Derek). However, she has relationship with
rich and powerful Jonathan Ashby (Steven Bauer). One stormy
night, the tragedy occurs and Jack is accused of rape and
murder. However, his good friend Walter J. Hill (Robert
Mitchum) happens to be very good lawyer, so Jack might even
prove his innocence in the end.
Belonging more to the genre of courtroom drama than erotic
thriller, WOMAN OF DESIRE distinguishes itself from similar
films by having almost all characters behaving like total
idiots. Unfortunately, this film isn't comedy and any laugh
is unintentional. The characters are totally antipathetic
and irritating and soon we stop caring what would happen to
them. The actors that play them don't help either. That is
especially the case with Jeff Fahey, whose Jack is so stupid
that even the character played by Fahey in LAWNMOWER MAN
looks like a genius in comparison. His partner Bo Derek, on
the other hand, shows that she didn't age enough to cease
being the sex goddess, but that is small compensation for
her apparent lack of acting talents. Ginty, on the other
hand, tries to bring some life in the movie by using many
flashbacks and strange angles of shooting, but in the end it
gets only irritating to the already bored and dissatisfied
viewer.

Title
Review for Clear and Present Danger (1994)
Those who don't approve current "humanitarian" bombing of
rump Yugoslavia often refer it as "Clinton's War". Whether
their argument is valid or not, the fact remains that U.S.
administration, and its chief executive, have enormous
powers at its disposal. Those powers, as any other, can be
abused and the consequences of those abuses can be
disastrous or even apocalyptic, not only for those directly
affected, but for the rest of world, America included. One
of the rare Hollywood movies that tries to cover that
subject and deal with the murky line between long-term
national and selfish political interest is CLEAR AND PRESENT
DANGER, 1994 spy thriller and third in the series of movies
based on the novels by Tom Clancy.
The movie begins when U.S. Coast Guard intercepts the yacht
of wealthy American businessman and discovers the evidence
of massacre. It turns out that the businessman used to be
close friend of President Bennett (Donald Moffat), while in
the same time having links with Colombian drug lords.
Infuriated because of his friend's death, President orders
secret war and assassination campaign to be conducted
against drug cartel led by Ernesto Escobedo (Miguel
Sandoval). In the meantime, CIA analyst Jack Ryan (Harrison
Ford) becomes the deputy for his mortally ill boss, Admiral
Greer (James Earl Jones). While investigating the series of
violent events in Colombia, that start claiming toll in
American lives, he discovers the evidence of US government's
complicity. Facing both by drug lords and unscrupulous
politicians and top bureaucrats in Washington, Ryan would do
anything in his power to uncover the scandal and save his
country and men from harm.
Although having the screenplay written by three different
authors (John Millius, Donald Stewart and Steve Zaillian),
CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER, like very few movies in
contemporary Hollywood, has a very complex, yet interesting
and compelling plot. Unlike other two movies about Tom
Clancy's hero Jack Ryan, this one doesn't present the bright
post-Cold War picture of the world dominated by omnipotent
American technology and military might. On the contrary, the
film shows that even that power has limits, and biggest
limit of them all is the fact that behind the super-weaponry
lies the hand of human who can be imperfect and incompetent.
As a result, unlike most of the films in the action genre,
this one is dark, depressive and sometimes even disturbing,
and the happy ending is hardly unambiguous.
Director Philip Noyce, whose best work so far is an
excellent thriller DEAD CALM, worked with the script very
well. Action scenes are very well shot, and movie cleverly
paced, not allowing boredom for the viewers through the
almost two and half hours of its time. Characters, on the
other hand, seem a little bit card-board, but in films like
this, they are secondary element. Anyway, this film has
great acting names in small roles, but although they don't
put their best efforts (including Ford, who probably
couldn't do much with such straightforward hero), they do a
fine job. Balance between cerebral and physical action is
very well done. Unfortunately, film in the end changes its
character - interesting, thought-provoking political
thriller is downgraded with the finale in which we must
suspend disbelief and see humble CIA bureaucrat Jack Ryan as
Rambo-style action hero. The impression is even worsened
with melodramatic scenes in the end, when Jack Ryan shows
his patriotic moral superiority of a civil servant over
pragmatic politicians. Those who know how the real world
operates would have some trouble believing those scenes in
the end. But, even with such flaws, CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER
is a very fine piece of seldom seen brain candy from
Hollywood.

Title
Review for Visiteurs, Les (1993)
In 1993 the biggest grossing film of all times was Steven
Spielberg's JURASSIC PARK. Although it made a lot of money
outside US markets, the audience in many countries seemed to
feel guilty about enjoying just another product of American
cultural imperialism. So, in the mid 1990s many non-US film
industries presented their own products, proudly noting that
they had beaten JURASSIC PARK at their own box-offices. In
case of France, that product was LES VISITEURS, 1993 comedic
fantasy directed by Jean-Marie Poire and written by
Christian Clavier.
The plot begins in 12th Century France where Count Godefroy
de Montmirail (played by Jean Reno) saves the life of King.
For that, he is awarded by permission to marry his beloved
Frenegonde (Valerie Lemercier). Unfortunately, the witch
poisons his wine with hallucinogens, so Godefroy kills
Frenegonde's father. With Frenegonde deciding to go to the
convent, desperate Godefroy and his trusted servant
Jacquasse (Christian Clavier) seek the help of wizard who
would bring them back in time and prevent the tragedy. The
senile wizard botches the spell and sends them to 20th
Century instead. There they must confront not only the
strange world, full of wonders and dangers - they are faced
with their own descendants, that look exactly like them. One
of them is Jacquasse's descendant Jacquart (also played by
Christian Clavier), who managed to turn the caste tables and
now owns ancient Godefroy's castle.
LES VISITEURS happened to be rude awakening for all of those
who grew up on Anglo-American pop culture only, and expected
any French movie to be noble artistic endeavour compared
with Hollywood products. That shouldn't surprise anyone,
since it was hard to expect that non-commercial oriented
product could beat Spielberg. Poire and Clavier, of course,
knew better and decided to make their film just like any
average Hollywood hack - "high concept" comedy, few
computer-generated special effects, and lots of gags with
the most hilarious ones, as usual, wasted in trailers. The
humour, that should rely on the conflict between medieval
and modern world often sinks to toilet levels. The plot is
too complicated, considering that screenwriters don't pay
much attention to it. Christian Clavier also doesn't help
much with his own obnoxious Jim Carey-style over-acting. On
the other hand, Jean Reno, until that role associated
strictly with Besson, proves that he is capable comedian.
This film is still funny, and those viewers who are somewhat
more familiar with French and European history would
appreciate it even more. But, the end result is still one
big disappointment - excellent idea wasted in third-rate
effort.

Title
Review for Ostre sledované vlaky (1966)
Few weeks ago our national television have premiered BETTER
TOMORROW, and official TV guides had labelled this film as
American. Of course, even the most ignorant people would
hardly mistake Hong Kong for American federal state so this
move should be explained as an attempt to draw as many
audience to TV sets as possible. General audience today
perceives only American films to be worth watching. Few
decades ago it was the same, but there were few dissenting
voices that were pointing the fact that non-American films
can be entertaining too, and some of them even superior to
Hollywood products. One of the best arguments for that is
the Czech cinema. Even the Communism couldn't prevent Czechs
from creating films that later turned out to be pleasant
viewing experience for the audience outside festival
circles. There were two areas that brought fame to Czech
cinema - children's films and comedies. In the case of the
latter, it was mostly due to the fact that Communist rulers
of Czechoslovakia discouraged film-makers from creating
serious films about obvious shortcomings of their socialist
utopia. However, the long tradition of Czech humour, forged
through the centuries of foreign rule, proved to be too big
challenge even for the most diligent censors. Czech
comedies, with their focus on the ordinary life of
individuals, used indirect approach to criticise the state
of the society in general. That approach was somewhat less
indirect in early to mid 1960s, when the wave of
liberalisation, that would culminate in Prague Spring,
created some of the most successful and memorable films in
the history of Czech cinema. One of such films is CLOSELY
OBSERVED TRAINS, 1966 comedy by Jiri Menzel, which won
"Oscar" for best foreign film.
Plot of the film, based on the short story by Bohumil
Hrabal, is set in Autumn of 1944. Bohemia is occupied by
Nazis, but not for long, because Germany is losing on all
fronts. But the prospect of liberation doesn't seem to
bother ordinary people, at least those employed in
Kostomlaty rail station. One of them is Milos Hrma (played
by Vaclav Neckar), young trainee who has just began to
follow family tradition and earn his living by working in
government service. He is introduced to the job by Hubicka
(played by Josef Somr), womanising train dispatcher whose
constant success with opposite sex causes the envy of an old
and obese station manager Max (played by Vladimir Valenta).
But Max is not the only one sexually frustrated; in such
atmosphere of debauchery Milos is painfully reminded of his
own problems in relationship with conductress Masa (played
by Jitka Bendova), caused by his sexual inexperience. In the
meantime, war is still going on, and Hubicka, who is
involved in resistance movement, has a big ammunition train
to stop.
Those unfamiliar with East European films would have some
difficulties with the beginning of CLOSELY OBSERVED TRAINS.
The interesting prologue (very funny and almost prophetic,
when we consider that this film was made two years before
Warsaw Pact invasion) is followed by scenes in which black
and white photography looks unappealing and the tempo is
slow, with director Menzel often focusing on some often
pointless naturalistic details. However, viewer who is
patient enough to adapt to the film's unusual and often
minimalistic style would be rewarded with an excellent
comedy. The characters are perfectly drawn and the actors
are doing the great job in bringing them to life with small
gestures. Vaclav Neckar is great as protagonist, but even
the actors in supporting roles are great, like director
Jirzi Menzel in hilarious cameo of a young doctor. Vlastimil
Brodsky, one of the best Czech character actors, is simply
brilliant in the role of collaborationist bureaucrat (and
his character could be read as the metaphor for aparatchicks
of Communist Czechoslovakia). Humour, which is often very
dark, brilliantly corresponds with the realism of the film;
characters talk and behave like people we would expect to
see in such circumstances. Humour and hedonism is their way
of combating the sinister reality of war, foreign occupation
and poverty it brings to people.
Unfortunately, the dark overtones of this comedy are
broadened in the last part and CLOSELY OBSERVED TRAINS
slowly turns into drama. Hubicka's transformation from
hedonistic womaniser into dedicated resistance fighter isn't
quite explained. The subplot dealing with German ammunition
train still provides good opportunity for a laugh or two. On
the other hand, we have an unnecessary symbolism - Milos
sexual maturity as metaphor for his political self-awareness
looks too much like similar cliches in many WW2 films made
in former Yugoslavia. Menzel ends film rather abruptly,
without proper epilogue and with the unusual, but rather
realistic combination of tragedy and comedy. Even with the
flaws that deprived CLOSELY OBSERVED TRAINS of being the
true masterpiece, this is still a great film that truly
deserved its Academy Award. Those who would like to enter
the magic world of Czech cinema should use it as starting
point.

Title
Review for Crow, The (1994)
There are some movies that present a rather difficult
dilemma towards the reviewers. Those dilemmas are often
associated with circumstances not directly related to the
film itself. One of the examples is THE CROW, 1994 dark
fantasy film directed by Alex Proyas. Instead of being
remembered by its own merit, this is film that will always
be associated with the tragedy that happened during its
shooting - the accident that claimed the life of its lead
actor, 28-year old Brandon Lee. As it usually happens with
stars who perish in their youths, they become immortal and
legend of THE CROW also grew from many rather sinister
coincidences. Brandon Lee was the only son of Bruce Lee,
legendary star of 1970s kung fu movies, whose death was also
premature. And the story of THE CROW is also macabre one,
based on dark underground comic book. All that ensured that
THE CROW would almost immediately get cult status, many
critics raved about it, and such status was kept for the
next five years. But now, we are faced with the question -
is it really worth it? Or is it cruel to trash movie for
whom some people literally gave their lives?
The plot of the film is rather simple one, and it shouldn't
surprise anyone, since it is based on a comic book by James
O'Barr. In Detroit, city that resembles dark, gothic visions
of Burton's BATMAN, night before Halloween is called
"Devil's Night" because local hoodlums, led by evil Top
Dollar (Michael Wincott), organise mass arsons in
residential areas. During one of such instances, rock
musician Eric Draven (Brandon Lee) is killed together with
his fiance in the eve of their wedding. But one year later,
the crow, which, according to legend, leads the souls of the
dead to another world, brings Eric back from the grave. Now
he is back on earth in order to make things right and avenge
his own death and the death of the loved ones. His revenge
would be witnessed through the eyes of Sarah (Rochelle
Davis), little girl who used to be Eric's friend.
Brandon Lee was killed before the movie had been finished,
and it shows in the final product. Filmmakers used variety
of techniques - stunt doubles, special shots and new,
computer-generated graphics - in order to hide that fact,
but those efforts, although very effective and commendable,
still failed. And, as a result, the main character - The
Crow - simply isn't as charismatic and effective as it
should have been. The screenplay by David J. Schow and John
Shirley did another disservice to his character, because it
provided him with corny, forgettable lines and made other,
minor characters, more memorable. Brandon Lee as an actor is
capable in his last role, although his action routines are
more effective than his acting. Still, this film showed that
he had a lot of potential, and the his death, in the light
of this fact, becomes even more tragic. The acting belongs
to minor actors, and this film features plenty of them -
Ernie Hudson as sympathetic detective, Michael Wincott,
Michael Massee, David Patrick Kelly and Jon Polito as
villains, Rochelle Davis as Sarah.
However, the acting can't hide the fact that this film is
less about story and characters and more about visuals and
atmosphere. Proyas, who had begun his career directing
videoclips (which became rather disdainful background these
days) employed a lot of talent in order to make this film
heavy with the dark atmosphere of gritty, rainy megalopolis
without hope for its inhabitans. This atmosphere is helped
with the very effective cinematography by Dariusz Wolski and
impressive musical score by Graeme Revell. On the other
hand, like many directors who came to Hollywood from
videoclip industry, Proyas has some problems in direction of
action scenes, especially when they engage more than few
characters. On the other hand, scenes of Crow's revenge on
individual villains are quite effective, although heavy
metal tunes often seem annoying.
So, finally, I can finish this review by stating that THE
CROW doesn't deserve its cult status. But, in the same time,
it must be praised as very good film, better than most of
the Hollywood products in comic book adaptation category.
And, last, but not least, THE CROW is more than sufficient
cinematic epitaph for Brandon Lee.

Title
Review for Timecop (1994)
For many people with the scientific background, concept of
time travel seems more suitable to fantasy than to science
fiction genre. It seems that Hollywood filmmakers share that
opinion, because almost always the films dealing with time
travel usually don't bother with such boring problems like
time travellers killing their own parents before their own
conception etc. Sometimes those films touch such problems,
but the time travel is more often than not just a background
for standard adventure or mindless action. TIMECOP, 1994
action film directed by Peter Hyams, falls within that
second category.
Based on the Dark Horse comic books, screenplay by Mike
Richardson and Mark Verheiden demands that the viewer
suspends a lot of disbelief. In 1994, time travel is
discovered and U.S. government sets up TEC - elite secret
unit of superagents, whose only job is to prevent the people
from abusing the technology and changing past for their own
purposes. After his loving wife Melissa (Mia Sara) dies,
Washington D.C. policeman Max Walker (Jean-Claude Van Damme)
would join that force. Ten years later, Max Walker discovers
that powerful and greedy Senator McComb (Ron Silver) already
sends his henchmen into the past to steal money in order to
bring funds for his presidential campaign. Walker goes back
to 1994 in order not only to prevent the conspiracy, but
also to save his own wife.
Apart from big plot holes involving time paradox, scientific
gaffs (carbon dating of gold) or huge implausibilities,
TIMECOP is a rather entertaining film. Peter Hyams, who
directed it, can make his way through SF material (starting
with his 1980 space opera OUTLAND), knows the limitation of
material and does standard action routines, indulging
himself with few experiments with photography. Jean-Claude
Van Damme as protagonist is quite tolerable, although his
acting talent is always comes second to his martial arts
abilities. The real winner in that contest is Ron Silver as
corrupt senator, in role very similar to the one he had
played in LIVE WIRE. This time it is real fun watching him,
especially in the scene when he meets younger version of
himself. However, although TIMECOP has required amount
action scenes, few rather impressive shots, couple of
well-choreographed fights and relatively good looks, it is
still mediocre piece of Hollywood cinema. Those who aren't
easily insulted with cliches and disregard for scientific
facts might still enjoy it, though.

Title
Review for Breakheart Pass (1975)
In the 1970s Charles Bronson was a synonym for the action
movies about a man who could eat bad guys for breakfast,
regardless of the circumstances. The name of Alistair
MacLean was a synonym for novels whose elaborate and
complicated plot served only as an excuse for numerous and
spectacular action scenes. The combination of two happened
to be BREAKHEART PASS, 1976 Western directed by Tom Gries,
director who obviously liked both of those concepts.
The movie begins on the train destined to Fort Humboldt,
distant U.S. army post in the Rocky Mountains. The fort is
plagued by diphtheria, and territorial governor, doctor,
priest and small detachment of soldiers are going to deliver
the medicine and other supplies. U.S. Marshall Nathan Pearce
(Ben Johnson) boards the train, together with his prisoner,
former doctor and wanted murderer John Deakin (Charles
Bronson). Soon after the train begins its journey through
mountainous wilderness, strange and frightening things start
to happen; some of the passengers are getting killed and it
turns out that almost nobody on the train is what he seems
to be.
In the first half, BREAKHEART PASS looks less a like
action-oriented Western and more like an Agatha Christie's
whodunnit mystery. It is also painful opportunity to watch
capable character actors like Richard Crenna, Charles
Durning and Ben Johnson unsuccessfully trying to breath some
life in their one-dimensional roles. Same is with Bronson's
late wife Jill Ireland, whose character should have been
left out of script. Of course, the viewer knows that, since
this is a Charles Bronson movie, his character won't stay
the bad guy until the end of the film. So, one huge element
of surprise is wasted. Luckily, in the second half Bronson
gets teamed up Ed Lauter, more believable as his sidekick,
and director Tom Gries saves the day with few impressive
action scenes, with the stunts co-ordinated by legendary
Yakima Canutt. All in all, BREAKHEART PASS is an average
Bronson actionfest, with the good Canadian exteriors and
Jerry Goldsmith's music as additional attraction.

Title
Review for Mephisto (1981)
Few days of popular revolt were enough for Serbia to
transform from most despised genocidal pariah nation into
new and popular member of European democratic community,
with Western diplomatic establishment lifting sanctions and
pouring bucketloads of aid money to the same people who had
been mercilessly bombed only a year ago. This new
development wasn't exactly welcomed by Serbia's neighbours,
where people claim that the fall of one man can't redeem the
crimes of millions who had directly or indirectly supported
his policies. Although such notions can be best explained by
envy or old irrational Balkans hatreds, they have some merit
- horrors of history simply can't be explained by couple of
psychotic, evil or scruples individuals who took reign at
the wrong place and in the wrong time. Leaders who conducted
genocide, ethnic cleansing or waged aggressive wars would
have been powerless without plenty of individuals willing to
support or carry out their policies. That includes Hitler
and Nazism, and it is even more interesting to find out that
such phenomenon actually occurred in one of the most
enlightened and civilised nation of the Western world, with
plenty of rather ordinary, decent and sometimes even
liberal-minded folks ready to stand behind Nazi banner.
While Hollywood films dealt with Nazism in recent years,
they usually concentrated solely on its most horrific and
obvious aftermath in the form of Holocaust, and failed to
deal with the causes of such phenomenon. On the other hand,
European cinema was traditionally more able to explore this
dark territory, with filmmakers unafraid of coming with some
rather unpleasant conclusions. One of those filmmakers was
Hungarian Istvan Szabo, whose drama MEPHISTO was awarded
with "Oscar" in 1981.
The plot of the film is based on the novel of German emitter
Klaus Mann, written in 1936 and partially inspired by the
biography of real life figure - famous German stage actor
Gustaf Gruendgens. His alter ego in this film is named
Hendrik Hoefgen and played by Klaus Maria Brandauer. The
film begins in late 1920s, when Hoefgen is talented but
still relatively unknown and frustrated actor in provincial
theatre in Hamburg. sharing Communist beliefs with most of
his friends and colleagues. After the marriage to Barbara
Bruckner (played by Krystyna Janda), well-connected daughter
of bourgeoisie family, his fortunes begin to change. He
comes to Berlin and begins working in prestigious State
Theatre. His career would reach new peak when he astounds
everyone with his brilliant performance as Mephisto in stage
version of Goethe's "Faust". The same performance brings
attention of General (played by Rolf Hoppe), bigwig in
rising Nazi party, who sees enormous propaganda potential in
Hoefgen. When Nazis come to power, some of Hoefgen's
friends, including his wife, emigrate, while others, like
his colleague Otto Ulrichs (played by Peter Andorai) want to
organise resistance. But Hoefgen seems blind to those
development - intoxicated with stage success, he can't
imagine his life of career outside Germany and for him Nazi
regime is like any other. Hoefgen decides to stay and
collaborate with Nazis, and for that he is rewarded with
prestigious position of State theatre manager, luxurious
villa and various other privileges. But after some time
Hoefgen, who had discarded his youthful ideals, friends,
wife and mistress, would realise both the real nature of
Nazi regime and the real price of his collaboration.
Seeing that the film was made by Hungarian director during
the Cold War, many critics would like to think of MEFISTO as
a drama with subtle, but very not so implicit anti-Communist
context. They might be right, because 1930s dilemmas of
Gustaf Gruendgens/Hendrik Hoefgens are, more or less, same
as the dilemmas that many Hungarian artists had after the
failure of 1956 uprising. Those people had two basic
alternatives - one was to remain in their country, continue
their respective careers as nothing had happened and
therefore legitimise the oppressive regime in exchange for
the existential security. The other choice was to emigrate
and enjoy freedom beyond borders of their homeland, but the
price for that freedom was unemployment, poverty and
anonimity in countries that didn't share their language -
the most important tool of the acting trade. Same as Klaus
Mann in the original novel, Szabo and his scriptwriter Peter
Dobai extensively covered pros & cons, creating many
interesting and impressive characters in the process. But it
would be wrong to think about MEFISTO in the context of Cold
War Hungary - the topic of the film is universal, despite
Szabo using Hungarian, German and Polish cast and thus
giving distinctively Mitteleuropean flavour to the film (the
technique he would later use in COLONEL REDL and HANUSSEN).
Furthermore, dilemma faced by the protagonist of MEFISTO
isn't limited to fascism, communism or Mitteleuropa - we
could find them even in the most democratic countries of the
world, for example, among leftist radicals on 1960s American
campuses who embraced right-wing values and turned into
greedy business executives during Reagan's years. Another
interesting thing about MEFISTO is Szabo's decision to give
period "feel" to the movie without usual cliches about
decaying democracy in Weimar Germany - there is very little
violence in this film or references to inflation,
unemployment and other socio-economic ailments that had
contributed to Hitler's rise to power. Protagonists of this
film are actors who live in their little artistic ivory
towers, separated from mere mortals and paying only lip
service to the developments outside world (in a same way
that many Beverly Hills celebrities couldn't care less about
things that go on Los Angeles ghettos). Perhaps the most
radical (and in the context of Communist-controled East
Europe subversive) element of Szabo's film is the character
Hanks Miklas (played by Gioergy Cserhalmi), actor who
sympathises Nazis out of his genuine beliefs, for which he
is ready to sacrifice his own life.
This excellent psychological and sociological study of
conformism couldn't have been made without Klaus Maria
Brandauer, German stage actor who seemed perfect for this
complex and very demanding role. His Hoefgen is multilayered
person, torn between conflicting loyalties and various faces
he must wear in both private and public. Brandauer fleshes
out almost every detail of the said personality, hinting his
inner weaknesses and lack of principle from the first scenes
- Hoefgen is loyal to nobody but himself and he simply tries
to act his way to success. Szabo utilises Brandauer's talent
throughout the film - one of the example is the scene which
establishes similarity between Hoefgen's career of actor and
Hoefgen's career of theatrical bureaucrat in Nazi Germany.
For Brandauer it was the role of the lifetime that would
pave the way to Hollywood (where he unfortunately didn't
manage to rise above villanish or supporting roles).
Brandauer had the good fortune of being together with truly
stellar cast, although some of them, like Andrzej Wajda's
long-time associate Krystina Janda had to settle for minor
and somewhat undeserving role. However, the only actor who
seems on the same level with Brandauer is Rolf Hoppe in the
role of General (who is obviously modelled on Hermann
Goering). This General in the early, introductory scenes
seems refined, hedonistic and not too burdened with Nazi
ideology, in some way even similar to conformist Hoefgen.
Only in the latter segments of the film Hoppe establishes
true nature of that violent and ruthless regime through the
actions of General. Unfortunately, in the later segments of
the film Szabo have abandoned subtlety to certain degree and
used some rather unecessary scenes. The ending also seems
forced, confusing and somewhat too "artsy". However, MEFISTO
is still a very good film with a intriguing and disturbing
message that is relevant even for our, seemingly
non-totalitarian times.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Jamón, jamón (1992)
Everyone knows that good marketing can sell bad films, but
this phenomenon isn't limited to the plebeian masses. Even
the critics might fall for couple of well-thought
catchphrases and give raving reviews to films that don't
deserve it. That slogan can be something like "outrageous
sexy comedy coming from the country of Pedro Almodovar".
This is the only way to explain why JAMON, JAMON, 1992
comedy by Spanish director J.J. Bigas Luna, won all those
festival prizes.
The plot takes place in small Spanish town where young Jose
Luis (played by Jordi Mola) works in the underwear factory
owned by his parents. His 18-year girlfriend Sylvia (played
by Penelope Cruz), who works in the factory, is pregnant so
Jose Luis decides to propose her. Jose Luis' mother Conchita
(played by Stefania Sandrelli) sees this as unacceptable,
since Sylvia's mother Carmen (played by Anna Galiena)
happens to be notorious local prostitute. In order to break
the engagement Conchita hires services of local stud and
underwear model Raul (played by Javier Bardem) who is
supposed to seduce Sylvia. However, her scheme doesn't go as
planned - Conchita falls in love with Raul, Jose Luis finds
solace in Carmen, while Jose Luis' father begins making
moves on his son's fiancee.
JAMON, JAMON was supposed to be comedy but is actually a
drama. Lack of humour is just one of its problems - Bigas
Luna desperately tries to compensate laughs with series of
outrageous romantic twists more suitable for South American
soap operas. His attempts to give some "cool" visual
identity to the film through Freudian images or explicitly
sexual images barely keep our attention because of their
repetitiveness. Acting is fine, but commanding screen
personality of Javier Bardem, as well as girl- next-door
charm of Penelope Cruz seem wasted. The ending sacrifices
dramatic plausibility for the sake of "meaningful" final
shot and therefore only underlines the impression of a movie
which could be perfectly described by the phrase
"artsy-fartsy".
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Wild Bunch, The (1969)
There are various ways people can show their appreciation of
truly great films. The author of this review has found one
interesting example in local newspaper few years ago. THE
WILD BUNCH, 1969 anti-western classic by Sam Peckinpah was
to be aired on national television. TV section editor
obviously wanted to warn audience not to miss this cinematic
gem, so he took rather interesting and unconventional
approach. Instead of simply putting the film description
with photograph, he hired an artist to draw the most
memorable scene of the film in comic book fashion, with
characters saying the most memorable lines. Similar practice
was later abandoned in this newspaper, but THE WILD BUNCH,
being one of the most important films in history of cinema,
surely deserved such treatment.
The plot, based on the Oscar-nominated screenplay by Sam
Peckinpah, Waylon Green and Roy N. Sickner, begins in South
Texan city of San Rafael in 1913. Group of bandits, dressed
in U.S. Army uniforms and led by middle-aged Pike Bishop
(played by William Holden), comes to town in order to rob
railroad company offices. But their raid is nothing more
than an excellent opportunity for railroad's company
unscrupulous executive Harrigan (played by Albert Dekker),
who gathers bunch of bounty hunters and sets up an ambush.
In a violent shootout Pike and three of his comrades escape,
but they are pursued by bounty hunters, who receive aid from
Deke Thornton (played by Robert Ryan), Pike's former partner
who had agreed to betray his friend in order to get paroled
out of jail. Pike seeks shelter across the border, in
Mexico, which is in the middle of revolution. Local warlord
who calls himself Generalissimo Mapache (played by Emilio
Fernandez) needs new, modern weapons in order to get an
upper hand in his fight against Pancho Villa, so he hires
Pike and his gang to steal those weapons from U.S. Army
train. One of Pike's partners is Angel (played by Jaime
Sanchez), young Mexican who doesn't feel comfortable with
the idea of giving guns to someone who is oppressing his
people.
It is impossible to write a history of modern cinema without
mentioning THE WILD BUNCH. The most common reason is
Peckinpah's realistic depiction of violence, quite
revolutionary for late 1960s. Although Arthur Penn came
first with squibs and "death ballet" scene in BONNIE AND
CLYDE two years earlier, Peckinpah actually perfected those
techniques in THE WILD BUNCH and combined with the excellent
photography by Lucien Ballard, thus creating
blood-splattering images that were quite shocking for 1969
audiences. Controversies over the limits in which the
filmmaker can depict violence on the screen later allowed
Peckinpah to get himself honoured by Monty Python parody.
However, today all that seems rather tame, but many of
latter-day directors who excelled in blood-and-guts action
scenes, including Walter Hill and John Woo, owe its success
to Peckinpah's combination of speed editing, blood
splattering and slow motion shots.
However, there is one important difference between THE WILD
BUNCH and most of the other films that contains such levels
of on-screen violence. Carnage in this film makes perfect
sense in the context of the story, characters and, finally,
the subject of the film. Peckinpah uses new techniques (and
lower censorship standards of the time) to unburden his soul
and create a disturbing and uncompromising but also an
original vision of the state of the Old West. Unlike Sergio
Leone, who was an outsider and confronted myths of old
idealistic Westerns with realistic yet ironical approach,
Peckinpah grew up in American West. His debunking of Western
myths has more personal motivations and Peckinpah remains
dead serious about things that bother him. For him, the
twilight of the Frontier was a sad event and the
civilisation, instead of bringing peace and prosperity,
brought nothing but greed, hypocrisy and complete breakdown
of all moral order. This is perfectly demonstrated in the
opening scene, featuring outlaws as impeccable, disciplined
and gentlemanly soldiers, while the lawman happen to be the
worst scum of the earth. The progress, is symbolised with
new, modern equipment - automobiles, automatic pistols, pump
shotguns and machineguns - which is almost exclusively used
as the tools of destruction or torture. And that violence
and destruction is impersonal and indiscriminate - innocent
bystanders, women and children get killed in the same manner
as soldiers, bounty hunters and bandits. Very often violence
in this film is irrational and self-destructive, from acts
of retarded young bandit who stays in railroad office in the
beginning until the last memorable scene. Homicidal madness
is everywhere and characters often act against their better
judgement, only adding to slow-evolving but inevitable
escalation of conflict and violence. Another thing that
bothers Peckinpah is the corrupting influence of the
civilisation, which manifests itself in children. Almost all
the violence in the film is seen through the eyes of
children, who get themselves bewildered and, in the final
acts, even take active participation, which would only lead
to another cycle of increasing carnage in the future.
The Old West, in its romantic, primordial state is
symbolised by the protagonists - tired old men who are aware
that their best days are gone and who unsuccessfully try to
adapt to new, frightening times. William Holden was the
perfect choice for the role of the outlaw who is confused
and who finds only sense of life in the old, over-idealised
code of honour, same code that would lead him to the
powerful last stand. Everyone else - Ernest Borgnine, Robert
Ryan, Ben Johnson, Warren Oates and Edmond O'Brien - is in
the same league; old men whose characters are the dying
breed, "ancient race" from Leone's ONCE UPPON A TIME AT
WEST, and whose last moments in the film resemble their own
careers, going downhill in rapidly changing Hollywood that
don't need screen legends any more. There is deep sadness
and melancholy in their performances which humanises this
film, that would otherwise be remembered as nothing more
than almost pornographic depiction of senseless, irrational
violence.
THE WILD BUNCH is, like the majority of films, also a
product of its time and the influences of Vietnam War could
be found in its content. Peckinpah in this film captures the
spirit of America coming to grips with its worst national
trauma and fills the screen with images from Southeast Asia
battlefields. We see foreign advisors aiding corrupt and
bloodthirsty third world dictators, boy soldiers dying like
flies and, finally, hundreds of innocent people getting
caught in the crossfire and foreshadowing of another war
which is supposed to show the ultimate destructive potential
of the new technology. Perhaps today's audience, people who
grew up after Cold War or had another, more romantic vision
of Vietnam and similar carnage in Ramboid movies, won't
understand this aspect of film. But they would nevertheless
enjoy it in an excellent piece of cinema that connects the
classic and modern in the best possible way.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for While the City Sleeps (1956)
Thanks to his classical masterpiece M, made in 1931, German
director Fritz Lang was often referenced as one of the first
filmmakers to use now very popular motive of serial killers.
Quarter of century later, during his final years in
Hollywood, Lang also used that motive, but in somewhat
unusual genre context. WHILE THE CITY SLEEPS, his 1956 film,
deals uses phenomenon of psychopathic serial killer as
nothing more than background for straightforward journalism
drama.
Film begins one night in New York, when young woman falls
prey to young serial killer (played by John Drew Barrymore).
This story is picked by New York Sentinel newspaper, news
service, photo service and television station - all
belonging to old Amos Kyne (played by Robert Warwick). The
same night Kyne dies and leaves this media empire to his
spoiled and incompetent son Walter (played by Vincent
Price). Walter Kyne is aware of his unpopularity among
father's trusted associates and wants to establish his
authority by creating feud among top executives. He offers
top corporate position to the executive whose organisation
scoops the news about identity of serial killer first. That
creates inter-departmental rivalry with back-stabbing and
all kinds of manipulation. Seasoned reporter Edward Mobley
(played by Dana Andrews) is disgusted with all that, but he
also takes part in efforts to catch the killer. His idea is
to publicly offend the killer and thus provoke his violent
reaction, this time against his own fiancée Nancy (played by
Sally Forrest), which should be used as bait.
WHILE THE CITY SLEEPS had its share of more than capable
actors, quite respected and talented director at its helm
and quite intriguing set of subjects - corporate intrigues,
role of the media in modern society, sexual frustrations,
homicidal urges and other forms of human depravity. Yet the
end result is quite disappointing; Lang obviously lacks
coherent vision and movie meanders from one subplot to
another, never dealing with each of them sufficiently. The
general impression of the film relies heavily on good
casting, especially Dana Andrews as cynical, often boozing
but clever and honest professional. His performance is
especially touching in view of actor's well-publicised real
life problems with alcohol. Other actors shine in supporting
roles - Ida Lupino is quite convincing as female sexual
predator, as well as Thomas Mitchell who plays old, yet
still ambitious news editor. Vincent Price, on the other
hand, plays corporate villain, quite uncharacteristic for
his usual villainous roles, although that character doesn't
appear enough to leave lasting. WHILE THE CITY SLEEPS gives
an interesting insight into ways 1950s Hollywood dealt with
some popular subjects of today, but the general value of
this film is far bellow standards expected from someone like
Fritz Lang.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for From Here to Eternity (1953)
Hollywood was always treating film as an industry, but these
days its products are becoming increasingly predictable. Few
words about plot, names of the people involved and years of
viewing experience - all that can enable you to predict
general outlook and the overall quality of the movie. PEARL
HARBOR, newest action spectacle by Jerry Bruckheimer and
Michael Bay, is the latest example, being mercilessly
badmouthed even before the principal photography began. One
of the reasons for such campaign is the fact that the film
deals with the historical event already covered by Hollywood
in previous decades. In two cases, such coverage produced
classic films, awarded with "Oscars", and Bruckheimer is
going to have huge problems matching their quality. While in
the case of TORA! TORA! TORA! his project has some realistic
chances of being better (at least in special effects
department), only the bravest could predict PEARL HARBOR
being in serious competition with FROM HERE TO ETERNITY,
1953 drama by Fred Zinnemann. This film was awarded with
eight "Oscars", and its reputation of Hollywood classics was
never in doubt, not even after few uninspired television
remakes in 1970s and 1980s.
FROM HERE TO ETERNITY is based on the best-selling novel by
James Jones, American author deeply influenced by his own
experiences in US military at the Pacific Theatre in WW2.
The plot is set in 1941, at the time when USA was still out
of war. Young US Army private Robert E. Lee Prewitt (played
by Montgomery Clift), former bugler, has been transferred
into infantry unit, Company G. Its commander, Captain Holmes
(played by Philip Ober) is boxing coach and he wants
Prewitt, soldier with reputation of good middle-weight
boxer, to fight in regimental boxing team; good results in
boxing competition would ensure Holmes' promotion. Prewitt,
deeply traumatised by the boxing accident that had left his
friend blinded, is adamant that he wouldn't fight; Holmes
responds by ordering his NCOs to make Prewitt's life in
company miserable and thus make him to change his mind. The
only NCO that doesn't take part in intimidation campaign is
Sergeant Warden (played by Burt Lancaster), experienced,
tough but fair career soldier who actually runs the company.
Warden, however, has some flaws - one of them is lust
towards Karen Holmes (played by Deborah Kerr), beautiful
wife of Captain Holmes. He starts relationship with her,
despite her reputation of "easy lay" and despite risking 20
years of military prison for adulterous affair with
superior's wife. In the meantime, Prewitt is introduced to
New Congress "social club" by his friend Private Maggio
(played by Frank Sinatra) and there he falls in love with
Alma a.k.a. Lorene (played by Donna Reed), one of the
"hostesses". Their romance, as well as the destiny of all
protagonists, would be affected with incoming Japanese raid
on Pearl Harbor.
FROM HERE TO ETERNITY was considered great in its time
because it, among other things, dealt with some
uncomfortable subjects previously ignored in Hollywood.
Although screenwriter Daniel Taradash (later awarded with
"Oscar" for his effort) took great pains to tone down or
edit out all questionable material from 800-page book, the
content of the film still looks brave for its time, breaking
taboos by depicting the serial adultery, prostitution,
rampant alcoholism and showing US military to be infested
with corruption and incompetence. Because of that, producers
were denied co-operation by US Army during the production,
which was the first such incident in Hollywood-US military
relations after WW2. The depiction of US Army in this film,
as well as in the novel, is unflattering but historically
accurate. Because of the widespread isolationist sentiments
and notion of country being safe from invasion, US Army in
the first years of WW2, unlike the Navy and Marines, was
neglected - small, made out of soldiers who had enlisted
only to escape poverty and never expected to earn their
living in actual fighting, inexperienced and under-equipped
in comparison with other great military powers of the time.
When stationed in tropical tourist paradise, like the
protagonist of this film, US military succumbed to hedonism
and war came as really nasty surprise that made such
shortcomings quite obvious.
The film, however, deals more with the shortcomings of
characters than with the shortcomings of the institutions as
a whole. Actually, FROM HERE TO ETERNITY, like any good
drama, doesn't feature perfect characters - almost any of
them is affected with an affliction or character flaw. In
order to portray that, Zinnemann had to rely on really good
actors, and FROM HERE TO ETERNITY was blessed with great
acting talent. Montgomery Clift is grand as Private Prewitt,
character whose pride and conviction, instead of being
virtue, turns out to be the source of doom for him. That
doom could be foreshadowed by the almost always-painful
expression on Clift's face - his character, even when he
looks happy, is constantly bothered with something. Burt
Lancaster plays character that requires less acting ability,
and more of his personal charisma; he is good acting choice
for Sergeant Warden, though, since that character, despite
being affected with unhealthy lust towards woman legally out
of his reach, is the closest to the criteria of the
conventional Hollywood hero. Those criteria are later met
when Warden in the end of the film chooses duty (and Army as
surrogate family) over marriage with Karen. Deborah Kerr is
also great since the inner pains of her character provide
good contrast with her physical attractiveness. The most
interesting female role belongs to Donna Reed, who plays
character very different from those who would later make her
icons of 1950s values. The most memorable acting job was, of
course, given by excellent Frank Sinatra in "Oscar"-awarded
role of Private Maggio; his character, which initially looks
like some kind of comic relief, later underlines the
pessimistic, depressing atmosphere of the film with its
tragic fate. Ernest Borgnine is also great in the memorable
role of sadistic Sergeant "Fatso" Judson.
FROM HERE TO ETERNITY is a film that relies heavily on
well-developed characters and superb actors playing them.
Zinnemann focused film around them, and although his work in
that regard was superb - especially the way he handles
parallels between two movie romances - film is not visually
attractive enough to be considered true masterpiece. Few
action scenes in the end are well- done, as well as famous
romantic beach scene (now overcliched, and very brave and
erotic for its time), but the film is hurt by the use of
black-and-white photography. Use of colour, together with
more shots of the Hawaii countryside, would have provided
effective contrast between heaven outside setting and hell
inside movie's troubled protagonists. On the other hand,
that lack of attraction won't prevent FROM HERE TO ETERNITY
to remain true classic and very high standard for all future
films dealing with Pearl Harbor.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Godfather: Part II, The (1974)
The real importance of any movie can't be adequately
appraised solely by the box- office success or critical
response, or even combination of both. Movies, no matter how
popular or critically acclaimed, cease to be important when
the passage of time erases them from collective memory. Only
those films that defy such oblivion are really grand, and
the nice example are first two movies of the Godfather Saga.
Their grandness can be seen not only in their quality and
the influence that had over the generations, but also by the
endless debate that lasts among the critics and film
scholars until this day. The debate was created due to the
fact that the second movie of the Saga, THE GODFATHER: PART
II, represents one of the first examples of now generally
despised practice in modern Hollywood - making sequels out
of the successful, great movies. Such practice earned the
utter disdain of contemporary critics because the sequels
almost always fail to meet the hard standards of its
predecessors, and, more often than not, succeed only in
tarnishing their great memory. However, in 1970s, during the
golden age of so-called "New Hollywood" such rule wasn't
universal, and some films turned out to be even better than
the first in the series. THE GODFATHER: PART II by Francis
Ford Coppola is often referred as one of them.
Reason for the high status of THE GODFATHER: PART II lies in
the fact that the sequel to THE GODFATHER, very personal
movie, was authored by the very same author with very same
personal agenda. While the other sequels usually serve as
nothing more than easy way for unimaginative producers to
cash on previous successes, THE GODFATHER: PART II was a
nice opportunity for Coppola to experiment, correct some
possible flaws or even answer to critics of his previous
work. Luckily, in the atmosphere that encouraged creative
freedom, Coppola also used the immense resources of big
Hollywood studios, whose chiefs gave him an utmost control
of his work. The biggest and most serious objection to THE
GODFATHER was Coppola's allegedly apologetic portrayal the
Mafia - portrayal that would encourage similar more or less
apologetic movie stereotypes in decades to come. Coppola was
accused of showing organised crime more noble and less
violent than it actually was - his Mafiosi are shown as
dedicated family men, opposed to narcotics and any
unnecessary violence, and in some way even better
alternative to legitimate government. In his second part of
the saga, Coppola intended to use the story of the first
part to paint more realistic and, consequently, much darker
picture.
The plot of the movie is rather complex, thanks to the
revolutionary yet ingenious idea by Coppola to mix two
stories. First one begins roughly one decade after the
events of the first GODFATHER, with Michael Corleone (Al
Pacino) now tightly in control of the Corleone crime family,
left to him by his late and charismatic father Vito in the
previous film. The second story deals with young Vito
Corleone (Robert de Niro), first as boy forced to flee to
America from Sicilian Mafiosi who had killed his entire
family, then as young immigrant who must turn to crime in
order to feed his wife and children. Those two stories are
connected by good editing and Coppola's directorial
techniques (the example in the beggining is the scene when
9-year old Vito Corleone that morphs into another scene,
with Vito's 9-year old grandson), although at times the
transition isn't so smooth or symbolic.
The story of young Vito Corleone seems more pleasing for the
viewer, and is definitely more fascinating. Coppola
obviously enjoyed recreating the harsh life of his Italian
American ancestors, and he even indulged himself with the
little humouristic episode that would remain the sole
uplifting piece in this otherwise extremely grim and
pessimistic movie. Robert de Niro was perfectly cast as
young Vito, and his legendary method acting techniques -
like living in Sicily in order to perfect the use of local
dialect and accent - are here in full swing. Vito Corleone
in his early years is as charming as he was charismatic in
his GODFATHER incarnation. Sympathetic portrayal in the
previous movie wasn't accidental - Corleone is shown as
basically honest human being who is simply driven to the
other side of law by harsh circumstances. Ironically,
Corleone was actually the victim of Mafia in his youth -
first, by losing his family, then by losing his job (his
employer being forced to find job for mafioso's relative) -
but he became first the member, than the leader of that very
same organisation nevertheless.
His son Michael in the latter story is shadow, not only of
his father, but of his own self being presented in THE
GODFATHER - generally nice guy who transformed from
idealistic youth into pragmatic maturity. Michael's plan to
carry on with his father's ambitious plan brings disastrous
results - he loses his family, the most important thing and
the very reason he decided to follow the father's criminal
footsteps in the first place. Lacking father's charisma,
Michael leads the family with the iron hand, thus alienating
his closest relatives - his sister Connie (Talia Shire) left
her own children and turned to debauchery; her wife Kay
(Diane Keaton), disgusted with the loss of her freedom and
ideals, plotted the vengeance of Medean proportions; his
weak and neglected brother Fredo (John Cazale) decided to
prove his own identity by betrayal.  Even the most loyal
member of the family - adopted brother and family councillor
Tom Hagen (Robert Duvall) can feel Michael's loss of
affection and desperately tries to regain it by speaking
Italian, without any significant result. This segment is
probably the darkest, least sentimental and most brutal part
of the Godfather saga; Coppola obviously didn't like the
object of his presentation and even the photography by
Gordon Willis illustrates that - while the outside is
sharply lit, the interiors of the Michael's luxurious
buildings are mostly dark, symbolising the corruption and
decay of his criminal empire.
Unfortunately, that segment was probably the weakest -
weaker than the prologue and THE GODFATHER. The main reason
lies in the screenplay by Coppola and Mario Puzo, and the
plot that lacks coherence. This segment introduces two new
major characters - Michael's underboss Frank Pentangelli
(Michael V. Gazzo) and Jewish mobster Hyman Roth (Lee
Strasberg). Those two men has some serious inconsistencies
in their characterisations. Pentangelli is at first simple
street thug, only to be revealed as well-read cultivated man
in the film's finale. Roth is also inconsistent - his
character, based on Meyer Lansky, real life underworld
legend, is someone too clever and experienced to allow
himself to engage in something as doomed as investing in
Cuba at the brink of the revolution. Those flaws are
somewhat compensated with the great actors in those
characters' roles. That can't be said for other plot
problems - lack of clear explanation for the conflict
between Michael and Roth, and many subplots dealing with the
real life events and anecdotes dealing with Mafia (Valacchi
testimony in the Senate and JFK assassination). Finally, the
lack of originality is revealed at the end, when Coppola
almost recreates his multiple massacre scene from the end of
THE GODFATHER.
Despite repetitiveness and lack of originality, THE
GODFATHER: PART II remains truly grand movie. Production
design by Dean Tavoularis is superb (especially in the first
segment); same can be said for the costumes by Theadora van
Runkle (expensive white suit serves as wonderful character
trait by Don Fanucci), but most of all the music by Nino
Rota and Carmine Coppola is almost perfect. The lead actors
are wonderful - Pacino, De Niro, Keaton, Shire, Cazale,
Duvall, Gazzo, Strasberg, as well as those in supporting
roles (Bruno Kirby as young Clemenza, Gastone Moschin as Don
Fanucci, G.D. Spradlin as Senator Geary).
At the end of the day, perhaps even such great,
"Oscar"-worthy film can suffer from dreaded "sequel
syndrome". However, those flaws didn't prevent it from
becoming a true classic, one of the pillars of modern
cinemas, with its quality seldom matched. After almost
quarter of century new viewers should be able to enjoy it -
both those who didn't see THE GODFATHER and those who did.

Title
Review for Beverly Hills Cop (1984)
As people grow older they tend to see their younger days
through the rosy glasses of nostalgia. So, now 1980s are
becoming the next golden age, and, consequently, Hollywood
films made in that "golden era" are becoming fashionable
again. This probably wouldn't please majority of film
critics who see 1980s as the darkest period of American film
history when general low quality of movies used to be in
sharp contrast to high artistic standards of the previous
decade. Decline of the quality was often blamed to the big
studios and producers who found new ways to make their films
profitable, mainly by concentrating more of their efforts on
advertising and less on the quality of actual films. The
result was the situation we have till this day - overhyped
"event" films that make good results on the box-office only
to perish from people's memory after a year or two. However,
some of 1980s films that represent such blockbuster
philosophy in its essence are actually quite good. One of
them is BEVERLY HILLS COP, 1984 action comedy directed by
Martin Brest and often mentioned as the best 1980s film
featuring Eddie Murphy.
In this film Murphy plays Axel Foley, undercover Detroit
policeman whose tendency to ignore police procedure often
causes rows with his superior, Inspector Todd (played by
Gilbert R. Hill). Another such row would develop when Axel's
childhood friend Mikey Tandino (played by James Russo) gets
killed by professional assassins. Axel is determined to
investigate the murder, but his boss wouldn't let him, so he
takes vacation and decides to find the killers on his own.
Trail leads him to Beverly Hills, where Mikey used to work
as security guard in art gallery run by elegant but sinister
art dealer Victor Maitland (played by Stephen Berkoff). Axel
suspects that Maitland deals in something other than art,
but local police is not only sceptical but also disapproves
Axel's unorthodox methods of investigation. Lieutenant
Bogomil (played by Ronny Cox), in order to keep Foley in
check, assigns two of his detectives - Detective Billy
Rosewood (played by Judge Rheinhold) and Sergeant Taggart
(played by John Ashton) - to monitor his every move.
Streetwise Axel, of course, won't allow that those two
distract him from his true mission.
BEVERLY HILLS COP was produced by Don Simpson and Jerry
Bruckheimmer and, naturally, has all the their trademarks.
The plot is simplistic and rather predictable, characters
are mostly cartoons, but all this is compensated with
spectacular car chases, shootouts and general mayhem
together with the loud soundtrack (almost all the songs, as
well as the title theme by Harold Faltermeyer, turned out to
be very popular hits of 1980s). But the secret of BEVERLY
HILLS COP success is one man - Eddie Murphy. In the
beginning, this film was supposed to be quite serious police
thriller, but Murphy single-handedly turned into comedy by
enabling his loudmouth, streetwise character to deliver
laughs in almost every scene. Because of that, role of Axel
Foley is now considered one of the best in Murphy's career.
The rest of the cast was also good, especially many bit
players like Paul Reiser, Bronson Pinchot and Damon Wayans,
who would start building their own successful careers in the
years to come. Direction of Martin Brest, on the other hand,
is the least noticeable element of the film and this is
probably one of the film's advantages - plot develops
neatly, without overdistracting MTV-style scenes that used
to plague its sequel.
Additional reason why we should pay attention BEVERLY HILLS
COP is because this film illustrates some of the general
sensibilities of 1980s America. A lot of humour is based on
the sharp contrast between eroding industrial heartland of
America, represented in impoverished, blue-collar America,
and booming, rich and sophisticated Beverly Hills whose
yuppie inhabitants, law enforcement included, lost any touch
with "real" world and old American values. As a result,
foreigners penetrate and subvert America from within -
either as Japanese businessmen who buy American companies
or, in the case of this movie, European gangsters who under
cover of expensive clothes poison American children. British
actor Stephen Berkoff thus plays a distinctively English
villain - a cliche that would become almost obligatory in
1990s Hollywood. Ironically, the movie franchise later
suffered because of American chauvinism - Eddie Murphy
reportedly turned down proposed sequels with plots happening
in various cities across of the world, which was rather
unfortunate decision, judging by two less than stellar
sequels with plots situated in Beverly Hills.
One of the most amusing aspects of its film is the way it
treats homosexuality before "political correctness" became
Hollywood's latest dogma. Some of today's oversensitive
audience might get offended by implicit gay bashing in
scenes when Murphy's characters meets or impersonates gay
characters, usually portrayed as quasi-feminine caricatures.
Then again, those viewers who follow Tarantino's example and
start seeking hidden homosexual subcontext might find plenty
of scenes of male characters bonding and expressing love for
each other.
Review written on September 22nd 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Ghostbusters (1984)
In the late 1980s and early 1990s I watched incredible
multitude of Hollywood movies and that was probably the
period that finally shaped my moviegoing preferences. That
process was anything but painless, and now I feel uneasy
anytime someone mentions phrase "high concept". If such
phrase is accompanied with the words like "comedy by Ivan
Reitman", I shudder. However, despite such Pavlovian
reflexes, I am ready to admit that Reitman occasionally did
rose above the levels of mediocrity. First, in the last two
decades he produced some remarkable films (early works by
David Cronenberg, ANIMAL HOUSE by John Landis), and,
finally, once he did direct a comedy that actually can make
people laugh. Such event happened in 1984 with GHOSTBUSTERS,
one of the biggest commercial hits of that season. The movie
not only produced a successful cartoon franchise (and also
abominably bad 1989 sequel, directed by Reitman), ZX
Spectrum computer game (which the author of this review
liked to play years before he had an opportunity to watch
the movie itself), but it also stood the test of time.
Movie protagonists are three scientists - Doctor Peter
Venkman (Bill Murray), Doctor Raymond Stantz (Dan Aykroyd)
and Doctor Egon Spengler (Harold Ramis) - who study the
paranormal phenomena at university. However, their research
isn't appreciated by the university administration and all
three of them are finding themselves on the street. Out of
desperation they decide to cash their field of expertise and
soon they start brand new business of exorcising ghosts,
apparitions and similar beings from the haunted buildings of
New York. Their enterprise coincides with the sudden
increase of paranormal phenomena all over the city, so with
the huge demand for their services, trio of Ghostbusters is
getting famous. One of their clients, beautiful musician
Dana Barrett (Sigourney Weaver) have seen some strange
things in her apartment, but womanising Doctor Venkman seems
to be more interested in her than business. That is about to
change, when the newcomer to the group, layman Winston
Zeddemore (Ernie Hudson) warns about possibility of ghosts
being the messengers of the Apocalypse. In the meantime,
both Dana and her nerdy neighbour Louis Tully (Rick Moranis)
are being possessed by evil spirits, who prepare the arrival
of evil Sumerian demigod.
High concept of this film - mixing paranormal with comedy -
doesn't seem too original these days. However, compared with
similar films like FRIGHTENERS, Reitman's fantasy seems to
be incredibly fresh and entertaining. First of all, the cast
is simply superb - the lead trio is played by experienced
comic actors. Bill Murray is excellent as womanising
scientist, with a lot of lines that seem ad-libbed. Dany
Aykroyd is good as his more serious, but also flawed
colleague (his cigarette is nicely drawn character trait).
The only "sterotyped" scientist is well-played by Harold
Ramis, who keeps his serious demeanour even in most
embarrassing situations. Rick Moranis is also good as an
accountant. Even the actors who aren't usually associated
with comedies are good - Sigourney Weaver in one of her
first big non-ALIEN roles (and one of the most erotic in her
career) and William Atherton as pushy Federal bureacrat. All
those roles are spiced with witty, intelligent dialogue and
sometimes really funny jokes.
Unfortunately, those jokes are too few to build a movie
around them and at times the screenplay, written by Ramis
and Aykroyd (obviously interested in paranormal, judging by
his producing of PSI FACTOR television series), brings the
pace of the movie at stall. Luckily, wjen the humour fails,
director tries to compensate it with good special effects.
Those effects, by Richard Englund, are fine and might still
impress people even after more than a decade of constant
improvements in that field. This technique - covering the
lack of plot with visual attractions - is all too common
(and mostly unscuccessful) in today's Hollywood, yet Reitman
in this case managed to pull it off. Production design by
John DeCuir is also fine and adds a lot to the spooky feel
of the movie. Musical soundtrack by Elmer Bernstein Jr. is
disappointing, unlike the title song by Ray Parker Jr.,
which used to be a great hit in its time. All in all,
GHOSTBUSTERS could hardly be called a masterpiece, yet it
remains as one of the more entertaining pieces of cinema of
the previous decade.

Title
Review for In the Mouth of Madness (1995)
Some time ago the author of this review met certain
individual rumoured to be of questionable mental sanity. The
man in question seemed normal from the outside, but the
source of rumour claimed that he couldn't because he had
spent all of his free time reading books by Stephen King.
Few years later I remembered this anecdote when I watched IN
THE MOUTH OF MADNESS, 1995 horror directed by John
Carpenter.
Protagonist of this film, tough and cynical insurance
investigator John Trent (played by Sam Neill) is hired to
find Sutter Cane (played by Juergen Prochnow), mysterious
author of wildly popular horror novels that are prone to
cause interesting mental side-effects among some of their
readers. The novelist has recently vanished together with
the manuscript of his latest novel, and the publishers want
him found before enraged fans realise that the said item
won't arrive to bookstores. Accompanied by Cane's editor
Linda Styles (played by Julie Carmen) they begin the search
for the missing author and end in the sleepy little town of
Hobb's End. The real problem is in the fact that the said
town doesn't exist anywhere else than in Cane's imagination,
which apparently began to literally, invade real world.
There are many great novels by Stephen King that turned into
major disappointments on the big screen. It seems that even
the film that tries to approach Stephen King through the
parody of his work can't escape such curse. Instead of
comedy we are presented by utterly serious by-the-numbers
horror in which the series of shocking and brutal scenes
increases viewer's unpleasantness as rapidly as the
protagonist loses his ability to differentiate between real
and fictional world. In the second half of film scriptwriter
Michael de Luca makes another mistake by introducing motives
inspired by the works of H.P. Lovecraft, another great
writer of horror genre. In some cases, this combination of
horror parody and horror homage could have worked, but John
Carpenter, once considered to be the greatest film director
of the genre, sticks by his trademark 90-minute format. As a
result, the plot develops too rapidly, the characters are
undeveloped (or not particularly interesting, like in the
case of the one played by Julie Carmen) and the ending is
rather predictable. Although there are few interesting bits
and pieces (like Orthodox church being chosen as the symbol
of utter evil - the detail which would definitely bring
attention of the audience in Southeast Europe), the general
of impression left by IN THE MOUTH OF MADNESS is
disappointment, unworthy of Carpenter, King or Lovecraft.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Salon Kitty (1976)
In 1970s, many European intellectuals, especially those on
the left political hemisphere, became obsessed with the rise
of Fascism. Which wasn't so hard to expect, because the
social turmoil of 1960s and economic decline of 1970s seemed
to be the breeding ground for many dangerous ideologies. In
such times, when political involvement could be associated
with noble passion, many filmmakers tried to warn the
present generations of dangers that lurk ahead by giving the
look of pre-war Europe and circumstances that led to
phenomena like fascist Italy and Nazi Germany. Of course,
there were authors who jumped on the bandwagon for other,
less noble reasons. For them, moral depravity of Fascism
could be explained to the audience by explicitly showing
sexual depravity of those era. Which, naturally, made some
of those films very popular among teen audience.
One of such filmmakers was Italian director Tinto Brass, who
later made career shooting expensive, stylish soft porn.
SALON KITTY, his 1976 film, is very losely based on the
novel by Peter Nordern, book that deals with bizarre yet
true story that took place in the first years of WW2. In
1939, Walter Schellenberg, one of the heads of Nazi
intelligence service has set up the elite, exclusive brothel
in Berlin with clientele comprised of top Nazi officials and
foreign diplomats. None of the customers knew that the girls
were all Nazi agents, and that all the rooms happened to be
bugged. The most bizarre thing is the fact that not even
Kitty, nominal madame of the brothel, didn't know the real
purpose of that enterprise.
Screenplay by Tinto Brass, of course, simplifies the story
and changes few names. Schellenberg is now Wallenberg
(Helmut Berger), ambitious Nazi official who wants to use
the brothel in order to blackmail his way to the top. Kitty
Kellerman (Ingrid Thulin), apart from being madam, has a
second job as a cabaret singer. Caught in the net of
depravity is sweet, innocent girl Margerithe (Theresa Ann
Savoy) thrown into brothel. There she falls in love with
customer Hans Reiter (Bekim Fehmiu), disenchanted pilot of
Luftwaffe. When Margerithe discovers that her lover had been
executed for defeatist speeches he made in the brothel, she
finds out that the place is bugged. She informs the madam of
the real situation, and both women decide to confront
Wallenberg.
Those who tend to bash Benigni for exploiting Holocaust as
the topic of comedy would probably go bananas watching this
film, that uses the darkest pages of European history for
cheap sexploitation. But, although SALON KITTY doesn't
happen to be anything more than rather more stylish and
expensive soft porn (although not very successful; some of
supposedly erotic scenes are quite unappealing), it does try
to have more multidimensional characters and even something
resembling dramatic conflict - this time between
power-hungry and scruples Wallenberg and hedonistic
womanhood symbolised by Kitty. Unfortunately, Brass seems to
overuse other cinematical references, probably thinking that
he could repeat the successful interaction of Berger and
Thulin in Luchino Visconti's THE DAMNED, but the most
noticeable and irritating is Ingrid Thulin's unsuccessful
attempt to imitate Lisa Minelli's musical numbers from
CABARET. All in all, SALON KITTY is failure, although with
some very interesting moments.

Title
Review for Scorned (1994)
For the outside observers white-collar job in big
corporation might look like a perfect embodiment of the
American dream, but in the beginning of 1994 erotic thriller
A WOMAN SCORNED such dream reveals its sinister side. Truman
Langley (played by Dan McVicar) is too aware how tin is the
line between success and failure in the ultra-competitive
dog-eat- dog world of corporate America. When the chance for
promotion comes, it must be pursued at all costs and without
any scruples, even if it means prostituting his own wife
Patricia (played by Shannon Tweed) to the bosses. His
efforts nevertheless fail, a new position is given to Alex
Weston (played by Andrew Stevens) and disgraced Langley
commits suicide. His wife wovs to avenge him and does so by
taking new identity and posing as a French tutor to Weston's
teenage son Robey (played by Michael D. Arenz). She
carefully manipulates her way into the Weston's home and
start using her seductive abilities on Alex, his son and
even his wife Marina (played by Kim Morgan Greene) in order
to turn the family members against each other and make their
lives a living hell.
All those who watched Curtis Hanson's thriller THE HAND THAT
ROCKS THE CRADDLE might have noticed that the film lacked
erotic dimension. This was about to be compensated in this
low budget exploitation thriller that used similar plot but
completely different set of acting talents. This time the
chief villain is played by Shannon Tweed, the queen of 1990s
erotic thrillers, and she puts her physical attributes and
irresistible on-screen charm to the good use. Although the
plot gave some opportunity for the ambitious writers to
explore dark Machiavelian realities of corporate America and
dysfunctional families, the script by Barry Avrich was
simplistic yet adequate for this kind of film and gave
enough material to those who trash elements in modern cinema
(like a woman managing to seduce all members of American
nuclaer family). Unfortunately, the direction by Andrew
Stevens is often messy and the inadequate ending, more
appropriate for different kind of low budget movies, ruins
opportunity for A WOMAN SCORNED to become trash classic of
1990s. This way it could be recommended only to the die hard
fans of Shannon Tweed.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Planet of the Apes (1968)
The author of this review has rarely greeted a film with
higher expectation than in the case of original PLANET OF
THE APES. I have been hearing great things about the film
decades before being able to see it for the first time. My
expectations weren't discouraged by the fact that I was able
to see the important Final Scene or with the utter
disappointment in the form of 1970s TV series. When I
finally watched the film for the first time, I was
nevertheless forced to admit that PLANET OF THE APES falls
deep bellow my expectations. Afterwards, when I had the
opportunity to watch the film for the second or third time,
or had the misfortune to watch some of the four sequels, I
managed to have my opinion about the film improved, although
not very much.
The plot of the film is based on the novel by French author
Pierre Boulle who had been fortunate enough to have his
previous work, BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI, turned into one of
the greatest films of all times. In 1968 it seemed that this
happened for the second time - PLANET OF THE APES was the
first science fiction film to transcend the usual fan base
and become an interesting cultural phenomenon of its time.
Genre aficionados later never failed to mention this film as
one of the milestones in the history of science fiction
cinema. For them, THE PLANET OF THE APES is the film that
made an important leap from the realms of genre ghetto into
the world of mainstream cinema, mostly due to employing the
previously escapist genre to talk about important issues of
its time and thus paving the way for the intelligent and
socially conscious brand of science fiction cinema that
would dominate Hollywood until the arrival of Spielberg and
Lucas.
Genre credentials were given to the film by Rod Serling,
famous creator of THE TWILIGHT ZONE, who paired up with
Michael Wilson, screenwriter previously targeted by 1950s
witch-hunts, who would contribute to the plot with his
experiences. The film begins in the U.S. spaceship that is
about to spend thousands of years travelling through space
until it finds a new solar system. The crew, led by Colonel
George Taylor (played by Charlton Heston), is going to spend
much of this time in hyper- sleep before it awakes and start
a new human civilisation on the new planet. The plan,
however, doesn't go as it should be - the only female part
of the crew has died during the travel, the spaceship
crashes into the lake, and Taylor, as well as two of his
companions - Landon (played by Robert Gunner) and Dodge
(played by Jeff Burton) - now must fight for survival on an
alien and presumably hostile planet. However, the crew soon
finds that the planet is populated by a race of humans who
appear to be mute and not very intelligent. It soon appears
that the humans are not the dominant species on the planets
- the real masters are the intelligent apes who hunt and
imprison them. Taylor is the only survivor of the raid, yet
he is shot in the throat and unable to speak when he is
being imprisoned. He is nevertheless peculiar enough to
arouse interest in the chimpanzee scientist Zira (played by
Kim Hunter), as well as her fiance, archaeologist dr.
Cornelius (played by Roddy McDowall). Their interest is
rewarded when Taylor finally manages to establish
communication. But for the authorities, embodied in the
powerful orangutan Dr. Zaius (played by Maurice Evans),
Taylor represents the threat to established order of the
apes' world and therefore has to be eliminated.
Original PLANET OF THE APES might be criticised for many
things, but hardly for not being an entertaining and
thought-provoking science fiction film. From strictly
technical standpoint, the film is more than adequate - the
action scenes are intense, while the architecture, clothes
and artefacts of the ape society still manage to create a
sense of wonder despite having recognisable human origin.
The apes are among the most convincing aliens in the history
of science fiction cinema and the "Oscar" for the make-up is
well deserved. Finally, Schaffner manages to establish the
pace of the movie, keeping it a short, yet giving it an epic
scope, thus giving the feel of "larger than life" film to
the PLANET OF THE APES.
However, the most important element of PLANET OF THE APES
comes in the context that is going to be missed by
contemporary audience. This film is undoubtedly a product of
its time. Created in 1968, one of the most turbulent years
of American history, PLANET OF THE APES was heavily
influenced by the conflicts that threatened to tear American
society apart and end the Western civilisation - the never
ending nightmare of Vietnam War, radicalisation of the race
issue in the era of civil rights and, finally, the
escalating struggle between the new progressive ideas of the
young and conservative order embodied in the old generation.
All those themes - racism, bigotry, and, more than anything
else, human ability to destroy the world - are present in
this film. The script goes even further than the most
radical filmmakers in the era when radicalism used to be the
norm and the sight of protagonist laughing at the sight of
U.S. flag was not the unforgivable atrocity as it is today
(even before WTC massacre, which gave whole new dimension to
the ideals of patriotism). For filmmakers, the mankind is
not only the victim, but also the cause of the evils in this
world. Screenplay cleverly brings this thesis in the
powerful finale, in which all tables are turned. The
protagonist, for whom we were supposed to root for, was
suffering terrible humiliation from the hands of racist and
bigot apes that are supposed to represent all the worst in
humanity. When he is finally free and unconstrained, he
shows his true nature by using violence in order to achieve
his ends, thus justifying his ape oppressors who saw him as
a dangerous freak. In view of this, even the powerful final
scene, which was supposed to clear this point, as not as
powerful as it should be and it could have remained on the
cutting room floor without damaging the film.
Because of this radical departure from dominant
anthropocentric point of view, PLANET OF THE APES was often
seen as one of the most important films in the history of
science fiction genre. However, because it approached the
issues seriously, it also required more scrutiny and this is
exactly the reason why it fails to reach criteria necessary
to be viewed as a truly grand film. While some corners might
be cut in a light-hearted fantasy like STAR WARS, the
"science" in the whole concept of "science fiction" prevents
us from having the proper suspension of disbelief necessary
to truly enjoy this film. There is simply too much of
implausibility for that, ranging from the fact that three
Adams and one Eve would be sent to start new Eden to the
obvious fact that the apes speak perfect English and
understand Latin alphabet, yet our hero still believes that
he is not on Earth. Because of this, what was supposed to be
one of the defining films of 20th Century can be seen as a
trash. This impression is enhanced by the presence of Linda
Harrison, whose character doesn't usher a word during the
whole film and whose acting ability is proportional to the
quantities of textile she is wearing. Her presence in the
film, although at times pleasing to the eyes of male
audience, is almost insulting in the same company with
talented actors like Heston, Kim Hunter, James Whitmore and
especially Roddy McDowall, whose role of Cornelius would
afterwards be one of the rare things worth watching in
sequels and subsequent TV series.
The first incarnation of PLANET OF THE APES is, regardless
of its apparent flaws, a very good film, that could be
enjoyed in appreciated even by those who might not see it
worthy of its cult status.
Review written on September 17th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for RoboCop (1987)
When science fiction is discussed by people not accustomed
to the genre and its concepts, they usually associate it
with fantastic tales about little green men and space operas
in distant futures and galaxies far away. In reality, some
of the best and most influential works of science-fiction
had its basis solidly in the Here and Now. The most
elaborate imaginary worlds of the future were actually built
by simple yet logical extrapolations based on the current
trends, like Orwell did in his dystopic masterpiece 1984.
Last decade, one of such dystopic worlds was created for the
purpose of ROBOCOP, SF action thriller, known today as the
great Hollywood debut of talented Dutch filmmaker Paul
Verhoeven.
The plot is set in a very near future that hasn't seen much
change from the Reagan Years. America is run by powerful and
greedy corporations of the military- industrial complex who
thrive through the Star Wars projects and low intensity
conflicts in Latin America. In the mean time, industrial
heartland of America has decayed and once proud city of
Detroit is a pile of abandoned steel-mills and factories,
drowned in poverty and rampant crime. Local authorities,
with their financial power drained through industrial decay,
low-taxes and laissez-faire economics, is forced to turn
public services to private companies. One of them is Omni
Consumer Products, who now runs Detroit Police Department.
However, despite the best efforts, policemen can't cope with
the well-armed criminals and Dick Jones (Ronny Cox),
vice-president of OCP offers new solution - powerful,
heavily-armed and almost indestructible ED 209 robot.
Spectacular presentation of ED 209 abilities, however, turns
into bloody disaster and the Old Man (Dan O'Herlihy) is
willing to listen to the alternative plan by young, hot shot
yuppie executive Morton (Miguel Ferrer). His idea is to
combine the body of deceased police officer with the high
tech equipment, armour and weaponry and create the
invincible cyborg that would rid the city of criminals. The
body needed is Murphy (Peter Weller), good police officer
who died at the hands of a vicious gang of street punks, led
by Clarence Bodiker (Kurthwood Smith). The experiment
succeeds, and Robocop project is put in motion with
formidable results. However, Officer Lewis (Nancy Allen),
Murphy's former partner, recognises the body and the human
part of Robocop starts to remember his true identity.
Superficially, the plot of the movie looks like a
combination of comic book clichs: noble man dies only to be
resurrected as a superhero; he fights the bad guys and has
his moment of doubt/weakness before he takes his revenge in
a final spectacular showdown. On the other hand, very clever
script by Edward Neumeier and Michael Miner uses such weak
plot in order to spice it up with a destructive satire of
1980s America (like the name used for the latest model of
American car). Especially effective is the use of fictious
three-minute-news in order to illustrate the future world;
two anchors, played by the real-life newsmen Mario Machado
and Leeza Gibbons, present the grim tales about wars,
disasters and human misery with a cheerfulness that strikes
a frightening chord with "news as entertainment" policy of
today's media.
Paul Verhoeven also contributed to this film, offering an
outsider's perspective to the absurdities of Reagan's
America. His background - European welfare-state, with its
own "gentler, kinder" version of capitalism - was a huge
contrast to the dog-eat-dog ultra-individualistic yuppie
culture that flourished in the Decade of Greed. Verhoeven
was probably having a lot of fun by inflating the elements
of those era to the levels of absurdity; it also emphasised
the satirical point of the movie with his trademark use of
over-the-top violence. Nice example is the scene in the
beginning when the unfortunate OCP executive gets
machine-gunned into a small pieces, and the next minute his
friend and colleague uses the opportunity to suck to the
boss. Nausea with the physical violence is effectively
combined with the dark humour. Same is with the very
gruesome, yet funny death scene in the end that can serve as
Verhoeven's comment on environmental problems.
Although ROBOCOP easily falls into the category of "author's
film" and the name of Verhoeven is the first to be
associated with it, the other artists also left their
distinctive mark on it. Peter Weller was very good in his,
somewhat limited role of machine that turns into human; with
its cool, stoical presence of good policeman and good father
he was ideal for the role that Verhoeven himself considered
the retelling of the Jesus Christ story. Nancy Allen is also
very believable in her very un-feminine and very realistic
portrayal of Robocop's trusted sidekick, high above the
usual clichs of women in action movies. However, those who
play the bad guys are, us usual, stealing the show.
Kurthwood Smith is excellent as a sadistic punk whose
glasses give away the intelligence that would bring his
criminal career above the street level, unlike his colourful
stooges (played, among others, by reliable character actors
like Ray Wise and Paul McCrane). Ronny Cox is also shadowed
by him as a creepy corrupt executive, the role he would
repeat in TOTAL RECALL.
Another strength of this movie also lies in a tight (and
"Oscar"-nominated) editing by Frank J. Urioste that gives a
movie, despite a lots of content, very fast pace in its 102
minutes. The visual design of the movie is also very
elaborate, with pieces of futuristic architecture of
corporate and technology in stark contrast with the decay of
industrial wasteland. However, the most recognisable element
of the film is Basil Poledouris' musical score, with its
epic theme that is somewhat inferior to his masterpiece in
CONAN THE BARBARIAN, yet very effective. All in all, ROBOCOP
is one of those rare movies that manage to be funny and
entertaining, yet thought-provoking and dead serious in the
same time.

Title
Review for Jason's Lyric (1994)
Originality is probably the most important characteristic of
any filmmaker that aspires for greatness. Without it the
films rely on formulas and cliches and start looking
indistinguishable from each other. That happens even with
the titles characterised by certain level of social and
political consciousness, and the good example might be given
by 1990s films that chronicled life of black youths in urban
America and often looked too similar to John Singleton's
BOYZ N THE HOOD. In his 1994 debut JASON'S LYRIC director
Doug McHenry tries somewhat different approach.
The plot of this movie is set in Houston's black
neighbourhood and tells the story of two brothers. The older
Jason (played by Allen Payne) is intelligent, and
responsible hard- working young man who rejects promotion
from his television repair shop only in order to be close
and take care of his mother Gloria (played by Suzzanne
Douglass). The other person Jason takes care of is his
younger brother Joshua (played by Bookeem Woodbine), whose
life revolves around petty crime and substance abuse.
Jason's life begins to change after he meets beautiful girl
Lyric (played by Jada Pinkett) and starts romantic
relationship with her. This opens new horizons for Jason and
he begins to think about moving out of the ghetto and
starting a new life. But the concern for his brother and
memories of tragic childhood incident involving his drunken
father Maddog (played by Forest Whitaker) is going to stop
him until it is too late.
The most important thing about JASON'S LYRIC is the script
by Bobby Smith Jr., which almost turns romance into major
plot element. This is quite an interesting approach,
especially for the often misogynist black ghetto sub-genre.
Unfortunately, the idea to have romantic black ghetto film
is compromised from the start, as soon as the character of
Lyric becomes related to the all-too-familiar world of
gangs, violence and local drug lords and the story ends in
rather predictable way for this kind of movies. Another idea
- to give some biblical overtones to the script via Cain vs.
Abel story - is also compromised with the heavy-handed
approach. However, the film is saved with excellent acting
(especially great Forest Whitaker in small but significant
role) and good direction. All in all, JASON'S LYRIC
represents failed yet refreshing experiment that
nevertheless can be seen as a decent film of its own.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Pump Up the Volume (1990)
Age of Internet should be remembered as the first time in
history when those unprivileged, unpopular or simply ignored
got more or less equal opportunity to have their say in the
matters of this world. But even before this time, such
people had found ways to express themselves. One of such
ways was in the form of pirate radio stations. PUMP UP THE
VOLUME, 1990 teen drama by Canadian author Allan Moyle, is
dedicated to such media.
The hero in this movie is Mark Hunter (Christian Slater),
high school student whose parents brought him from trendy
megalopolis of New York to suburban Arizona. Without
friends, and feeling isolated, this nerdy student at day at
night finds comfort by operating pirate radio station
operating from his room. Every night at 10 PM he begins with
programme, playing rock music and uses the medium to express
his feelings and opinions about many things that bother
teenagers, including the oppressive administration of his
school. Gradually, his on-air personality of Hard Harry
begins getting the cult following, but when one of the
viewers commits suicide while listening to his programme, the
authorities become interested. Nora Diniro (Samantha
Mathis), one of the students at school, is also trying to
seek for Hard Harry and his true identity.
People who watch this film from today's perspective might be
tempted to conclude that the pre-Internet times used to be
the golden age of teen-adult relations. Teenagers were
simply being oppressed, and their rebellious rather seldom
expressed itself in violent or dangerous forms. But today, a
teenager that preaches rebellion and uses media to spew
anger towards world and injustice is more likely to cause
unease than sympathy, especially after some overhyped
examples of high school shootings in USA.
For Canadian author Allan Moyle, this film had a lot of
autobiographical elements and explored themes very similar
to his 1980s film TIMES SQUARE. Unfortunately for the
commercial prospects of the film, but fortunately for the
viewers who like the movies that make them think, Moyle took
this film and its subject seriously. Probably too seriously
for MTV crowd, that was too cynical or too scared to
seriously ponder about problems expressed in Hard Harry's
speeches. For some people, this film might also look sadly
outdated - teenagers in previous two decades became most
important target group of entertainment industry, and as
such, their rebellious instincts became suppressed in the
hedonism. On the other hand, outdated solution of the film
might be still compensated with the fact that it asks the
right question, in more ways than one superior to its much
more celebrated companion, 1989 black comedy HEATHERS.
Difference between contemporary and today's perspective of
the film and its topics can be seen through the different
perspective of Christian Slater, its lead. In the early
1990s Slater was promising bright star of teen movies. At
the end of the decade, Slater is bad boy of tabloid media.
However, in this film he really shines with his great acting
potential. Samantha Mathis also shows talent, and the
chemistry between the two is great (and it was repeated six
years later in BROKEN ARROW). Because of such chemistry, we
can almost forget the fact that it was used in rather
unnecessary romantic subplot that brought the taste of
commercialism into the movie that didn't need such
compromises.
However, despite its flaws, PUMP UP THE VOLUME is the very
good film that deserves praise because it makes people think
-something seldom seen in Hollywood these days.

Title
Review for Die Hard: With a Vengeance (1995)
There are plenty of people who have good reasons to hate
terrorists, and American filmmaker John McTiernan is one of
them. In 1993 his film THE LAST ACTION HERO had to have its
publicity campaign redesigned because of the first WTC
bombing. Two years later, McTiernan's film DIE HARD: WITH A
VENGEANCE, the third instalment in the series started by
1988 DIE HARD, suffered at the box-office because the US
public after Oklahoma City bombing didn't appreciate a plot
dealing with mad bomber blowing half of New York city.
Today, after New York has suffered even worse terrorist
outrage in real life, watching of DIE HARD: WITH A VENGEANCE
is probably unbearable for American audience.
The protagonist of third DIE HARD film is still New York
policeman John McLane (played by Bruce Willis), reluctant
hero who always happens to land in the wrong place at the
wrong time, wreck various terrorist schemes and saves his
family in the process. This time McLane is in worse shape
than in previous two films - wife left him, he had started
to drink, and, as result, is expected to be kicked out of
NYPD. His career is, at least temporarily, rescued by a
terrorist who targeted McLane himself - after the series of
bombings all over New York City, police receives a call by
someone who calls himself Simon (played by Jeremy Irons) and
wants to play game with the detective. McLane must complete
the series of bizarre and often life-threatening tasks, and
Simon would in exchange give the locations of various
explosive devices scattered all over New York City. McLane
is in his quest joined by black storeowner Zeus (played by
Samuel L. Jackson) and two of them slowly discover the true
motive of Simon's actions and diabolical plan that lies
behind the whole mayhem.
Seeing that DIE HARD created whole new sub-genre of action
films, McTiernan and his scriptwriter Jonathan Hensleigh not
only abandoned the DIE HARD formula, but also turned it
upside down. Instead of having action at a single, usually
claustrophobic location, they scatter it all over town and
forcing protagonists to rush from one location to another.
This was an excellent opportunity for numerous exciting and
breath-taking action scenes in which McTiernan again showed
his great talent for this brand of filmmaking. For a while,
viewers are so overwhelmed with spectacular on-screen action
that they forget the fact that the main character is reduced
to cardboard cut-out of himself, at least compared to two
previous films. Some supporting characters are much better,
though - Samuel L. Jackson brings a lot of "buddy buddy"
dynamic to the relationship between Zeus and McLane, while
British actor Jeremy Irons obviously has a lot of fun
playing suave and deadly villain, although he can't compete
with Alan Rickman in the first film. Unfortunately, the film
looses pace in the last segments, the action, albeit
spectacular, is rather predictable and the film nearly
collapses in the finale. The ending, that could have been
perfect with Bad Guys winning (and thus leaving the room for
further sequels and providing McLane with adequate
archrival), is totally uninspiring and lacks any kind of
catharsis seen in previous two films. However, although DIE
HARD: WITH A VENGEANCE represents a huge disappointment for
all those who had expected high standards of original film
(and even compared to 1990 sequel), it is still a good
example of a talented action director displaying his talents
in an entertaining way. It is a shame that for millions of
people this film is not as entertaining as it was only five
weeks ago.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Wicker Man, The (1973)
When people are discussing the greatest horror films, they
often mention 1970s as the golden age of that particular
genre. Big studios were eager to spend their money on such
films and brand new talents earned the respect of mainstream
critics. As a result, many films from that period, like
Spielberg's JAWS, Friedkin's EXORCIST and Carpenter's
HALLOWEEN, became big commercial hits, critics' darlings and
their reputations through the later decades remained
untarnished, even after multitude of bad sequels or even
worse rip-offs. In the shadow of these big horror films lies
THE WICKER MAN, 1973 low-budget British film by Robin Hardy,
which remained almost unknown outside small circles of
horror genre aficionados.
Plot of the film begins when police sergeant Neil Howie
(played by Edward Woodward) comes to Summerisle, remote
island off the western shores of Scotland. His task is to
investigate mysterious disappearance of a local girl.
However, he finds out that the islanders are very
uncooperative - they claim that the girl actually doesn't
exist. Howie, who happens to be devout Christian, is even
more shocked to find out that all the islanders not only
tolerate open sexuality and similar un- Christian forms of
behaviour, but also practice ancient pagan religion. Despite
that, his zeal leads him to continue investigation and
islanders reluctantly admit that the girl has died few
months ago. Howie doesn't take their word for granted, and
the empty grave as the result of exhumation only validates
his suspicions. Howie is even more disturbed with the
prospect of girl being alive, presuming that the old pagan
tradition includes human sacrifice. He continues
investigation, this time racing against time, since the
great annual festivities are set for the next day.
One of the reasons why THE WICKER MAN remained in relative
obscurity until this day is in its unconventionality.
Hardy's film looks strange and unusual, not just by the
Hollywood standards, but also compared with horror genre as
a whole. Those who expect straight horror film would be
surprised with the way Hardy treats the story that would
otherwise belong to cheap exploitation territory. Instead of
shocking us with fear, or gradually building suspense and
terror, Hardy builds genuine drama by strong contrast
between two opposing worldviews. On one side we have Howie,
which is supposed to be conventional hero and embodiment of
all that is decent and righteous in the Western
civilisation, and we sympathise with his struggle to
establish law and order; on the other side, pagan islanders
are portrayed as bunch of depraved savages that show almost
sadistic pleasure in insulting our hero's deep religious
beliefs. But, through the course of the film, the picture
changes when we are introduced to the schoolteachers, postal
workers, and finally, local magistrates who share their
neighbour's pagan beliefs; the society of Summerisle is
shown to be as orderly as Christian societies on the
mainland, and the islanders are very serious about their
beliefs. Howie, on the other hand, proves to be ignorant
bigot whose presence might present danger to this utopian
community. This conflict, which in some ways reflects the
social turmoil between the Old and New in 1960s, gets
resolved in the emotional final scene, which might be seen
as some sort of reconciliation between those two conflicting
worldviews.
THE WICKER MAN, thus, must be praised as one of the rare
horror films that allow viewers to think about important
issues and make their own conclusions. Unfortunately,
interesting ideas and thought-provoking script is somewhat
downgraded with somewhat unpolished execution. Instead of
using conventional musical soundtrack, Hardy employed the
talents of Paul Giovanni and folk band Magnet (or
Lodestone). The songs, that might have been fashionable in
1970s, look extremely outdated now, and often cause
unintentional laughs, turning this film into black comedy.
Same effect is caused with faux documentary style of showing
islander's everyday life, including their religious
practices at the end - which corresponds with the BLAIR
WITCH style producers' note in the film's opening title. On
the other hand, thanks to the sloppy editing scenes that
feature (all female) nudity are not erotic at all. The most
noted is the scene featuring naked Britt Ekland singing "Say
How Do"; use of body double is painfully obvious.
Sloppy editing and corny music are, on the other hand,
compensated with the great acting talent of Edward Woodward,
who would later gain charisma by playing lead character in
THE EQUALIZER. The ordeal his character has to endure
provided him opportunity to express broad range of emotions
- from initial revulsion towards paganism, inner struggle
with his own sexual desires and final test of his beliefs at
the end. His screen personality has dwarfed everyone else,
including Christopher Lee who, when playing island's
unofficial leader, Lord Summerisle, uses more his already
established charisma of Dracula-like elegant villain than
some genuine acting effort. Britt Ekland and Ingrid Pitt, on
the other hand, are here just to provide adequate amount of
T&A (effort that failed, as noted above). Luckily, they
don't slow down the plot, which goes very neatly and leaves
the audience with unexpected, unconventional ending and
images that would remain long in their memory.
THE WICKER MAN is perhaps slightly flawed, but in its
essence very intelligent and engaging film that definitely
deserves more recognition. On the other hand, it might look
somewhat insulting to Christians and pagans alike; the other
viewers might be disturbed by its content (although
incredibly tame for cynical 1990s). For me, the most
disturbing thing about THE WICKER MAN is the distinct
possibility of this film being considered by some modern-day
Hollywood hack producer as a material for 1990s style remake
- the fate that gives new meaning to the word "horror".
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Galaxis (1995)
Former Danish fashion model Brigitte Nielsen could be viewed
as a true renaissance woman of late 20th century. Apart from
modelling, she explored her talents in many other areas -
poetry, pop music and television talk shows. She also tried
acting, but apart from appearing in few 1980s action films
she was and still is far from being a movie star.
Explanation for that could be found in TERMINAL FORCE, 1995
science fiction film directed by William Mesa.
The plot revolves around sacred crystal that can give power
over the entire universe. Evil Kyla (played by Richard Moll)
and his evil hordes would stop at nothing in order to get
that crystal, and peace-loving planet of Sintaria is one of
their victims. However, there is another such crystal
located on Earth, and this is the reason why Jed Sanders
(played by John H. Brennan), archaeologist from Los Angeles,
gets in the trouble both with evil aliens and gangsters to
whom he owes money. Thankfully, Ladera (played by Brigitte
Nielsen), brave woman-warrior from outer space, is coming to
Earth in order to protect him and wreck Kyla's plans.
After somewhat promising beginning, the plot of TERMINAL
FORCE becomes set in Los Angeles - town which is the most
popular alien landing site, at least if we are to believe
Hollywood filmmakers. This is just one of the many cliches
featured in TERMINAL FORCE, movie that uses its
science-fiction plot as an excuse for not particularly
attractive action scenes and few CGI explosions. However,
even with such cliches and laughably small budget this movie
could have been at least bearable. Unfortunately, the
producers made a fatal mistake by casting Brigitte Nielsen
in the role of alien lady superwarrior. Although the script
did everything in order to make her character similar to the
robotic protagonist of THE TERMINATOR, Nielsen's lack of
acting is nevertheless very apparent. The only remarkable
thing about this otherwise forgettable exploitation film is
a cameo role of cult director Sam Raimi who appears in the
opening scenes.
Review written on September 29th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Fortress (1993)
In the mid-1980s, following the splendid debut in Hugh
Hudson's GREYSTOKE and relative success of first HIGHLANDER
film, it looked like Christopher Lambert's acting career
might go somewhere. But, it wasn't meant to be, which became
obvious following HIGHLANDER II. In this decade Christopher
Lambert became associated with films with low budgets and
even lower quality. Very often such films were science
fiction, which meant that the fans of that genre learned the
hard way what to evade anything starring Christopher
Lambert. Whether it was because of real lack of talent,
terrible miscasting or simple bad luck isn't important - the
end result was almost always horrible. The same can be said
for FORTRESS, 1993 science fiction film directed by Stuart
Gordon, director who created cult following with his 1980s
horror gorefests like REANIMATOR and FROM BEYOND.
The movie is set in 2018. For some undisclosed reason, USA
introduced strict population control and couples are barred
from having more than one child. Jake (Christopher Lambert)
and Karen Brennick (Lori Laughlin) broke that law and are
caught by authorities on the border. Sentenced to 31 years
in prison, they are both thrown into Fortress, privately
owned correctional facility, equiped with state-of-the-art
futuristic technology and run by computer called Zed.
Although equiped with gismos that regulate every aspect of
inmates' lives and make any escape impossible, prison
authorities often use violence. Jake survives many ordeals
and earns respect of some inmates which would help him when
he begins planing the escape. Such escape should become
necessity, because the warden Poe (Kurtwood Smith) begins
showing unhealthy interest in Karen.
After rather intriguing beginning and some interesting
special effects that depict the futuristic settings of
prison, this film soon starts sinking into mediocrity. The
reason is in the screenplay that quickly degenerates into
whole series of prison movie clichés and situations that are
painfully predictable. By the time Brennick begins his
escape from Fortress, those situations not only begin to
look predictable, but utterly implausible too. Of course,
film never tried to explain why the country that lacks
resources to support its present population happens to spend
bucketloads of money on ultra-expensive supertechnology with
sole intention of keeping alive most useless and dangerous
members of the society. The initially interesting plot is
done even more wrong by stereotyped characters, played by
not too interested or talented actors. Lori Laughlin,
although physically attractive, shows the acting ability of
sequoia. Kurtwood Smith as prison warden is rather
uninspired, capable of solid, yet forgettable performance.
Lambert's performance is also good, but even the bigger
talent couldn't help this film, destined to end in oblivion.

Title
Review for Stranger Among Us, A (1992)
Sydney Lumet is the director whose work happens to be of
varied quality. He is praised for some of the most important
films of the previous decades, like TWELVE ANGRY MEN,
SERPICO or THE VERDICT. But, in the same time, almost any of
such pearls is followed by stinkers that hamper Lumet's
reputation. A STRANGER AMONG US, 1992 rip-off of Peter
Weir's WITNESS, belongs to the latter category.
The heroine of this movie is Emily Eden (Melanie Griffith),
tough lady cop who sometimes shows too much enthusiasm in
battling bad guys on the streets of New York. During one of
such actions, her partner Nick (Jamey Sheridan) got hurt and
as a result, she becomes depressed. In order to help her
recover, bosses give her rather easy task of locating
missing jeweller who belonged to Hassidic Jew community.
Emily starts investigation and soon realises that the case
involves murder. Concluding that the perpetrator belongs to
community, she decides to go undercover. That isn't easy,
because her modern manners are colliding with traditionalist
ways. Things get even more complicated when she develops
feelings for young cabalistic scholar Ariel (Eric Thal).
Using Peter Weir's formula isn't the greatest flaw of this
film. Even the lame and unispiring crime mystery subplot
works to the certain extent. But the worst insult to
viewer's audience is terrible miscasting of Melanie
Griffith. The author of this review never liked this actress
very much, but she was at least tolerable in some of her
roles. Role of Emily Eden, unfortunately, isn't one of them.
First of all, she can't pass for tough NYPD street fighter,
and her attempt to pass for Orthodox Jewish woman isn't much
better. Screenplay by Robert J. Avrech makes things even
worse with some formulaic red herring subplots (scene
involving two Italian gangsters was almost too painful to
watch). But, on the other hand, other actors are more
convincing (Lee Richardson as an old rabbi, Thal as Ariel
and charming Mia Sara as his intended bride), and the
photography by Andrzej Bartkowiak very effectively creates
atmosphere of warmth when the scenes take place in Hassidic
community. Also, the film might educate viewers about
Hassidic culture. That is the only thing that prevents it
from turning into total waste of time.

Title
Review for Money Movers (1979)
In the 1980s the author of this review used to be in love
with the booming and blooming Australian film industry. The
video stores were full of tapes with the latest Australian
films, and the former Yugoslav television aired almost any
miniseries that it could get - all of that usually superior
to the similar Hollywood products. The first crush in that
romance occurred few years earlier, when former Yugoslav
television had been introducing the new Australian cinema in
a weekly series of television premieres. My taste at the
time was too unrefined for to appreciate their quality, so
they mostly slipped out my memory. However, there was one
notable exception - MONEY MOVERS, 1978 crime thriller by
Bruce Beresford, the most commercial and Hollywood-like of
all those movies, but also superior to many similar films
made on the other side of Pacific.
The screenplay is based on the novel by Devon Minchin, yet
the beginning credits tell that the plot was based on the
actual events. In any case, the authenticity of the movie is
quite moot point, because writer and director Bruce
Beresford throws nitty-gritty realism to our face. Security
firm specialised in the transport of money and other
valuables becomes the target of repeated hits by armed
robbers. Its owner, Lionel Darcy (Frank Wilson) is worried
because the failure to secure the transports could mean the
end of his business. His worries multiply when he gets
anonymous tip that the firm is going to get hit from the
inside. That also worries Eric Jackson (Terence Donovan),
one of Darcy's trusted employees who was planning exactly
the same thing for the last five years. Those events
coincide with the appearance of a new, young and seemingly
inexperienced employee Leo Bassett (Tony Bonner). Darcy's
suspicions and some other strange events also bring the
attention of a local crime boss Jack Henderson (Charles
'Bud' Tingwell), who would also like the piece of an action.
Good thing about cinematographies that have a relatively
short pool of actors or cinematic opportunities for them is
the fact that some really good artists don't hesitate
playing the small roles. Here, in MONEY MOVERS, those small
roles are illuminated by the great bunch of more than
capable actors like Ed Deveraux, Terence Donovan or Bryan
Brown. The script and good direction of Bruce Beresford
allows them all to shine in a tiny hour and half of non-stop
action and intrigue. The plot is really intriguing, allowing
some interesting twists and surprise, although Beresford
does reveal most of its cards in the beginning. Also,
despite the huge amounts of pulp material - sex, violence,
bad language, police corruption (in many ways than one) -
its use doesn't seem to be gratuitous. By providing such
naturalistic elements, Beresford draws us into the picture
and allows us to forget any possible flaws of
characterisation. Everything culminates in extremely violent
and cathartic finale, although direction of the action
scenes would be better in the hands of someone like Walter
Hill or George Miller. But, despite all those shortcomings,
MONEY MOVERS should be watched as refreshingly entertaining
piece of underrated cinema.

Title
Review for Wild One, The (1954)
Generational conflicts were constant of the human history,
but Hollywood became aware of them only in 1950s. In that
time, new generations, that were enjoying unprecedented
post-war prosperity had hard time to adapt to the values
cherished by their parents who grew up during the hardships
of Depression and WW2. The first major film to deal with
such phenomenon is THE WILD ONE, 1953 drama by Laslo
Benedek, also known as the great grand-daddy of biker films.
Plot, which is based on real events in Hollister, California
in 1947, deals with "Black Rebels Motorcycle Club", gang of
leather-clad bikers that spend all their time roaming around
small towns in California searching for fun. But, sometimes,
instead of fun they find trouble and that would happen when
they come to small town of Wrightsville. At first, citizens
are only slightly annoyed by bikers who cruise up and down
the main street only to spend their time and money in the
local bar. Harry Bleeker (played by Robert Keith), town's
only policeman, doesn't intervene after first minor
incidents, since he hopes that the bikers would just go
away. But it doesn't happen because Johnny (played by Marlon
Brando), unofficial leader of the bikers, falls in love with
his daughter Kathie (played by Mary Murphy). In the
meantime, rival group of bikers, led by Chino (played by Lee
Marvin) comes to town and Bleeker finally decides to do
something, but it is too late to prevent the escalation of
violence.
Events presented in this film might have seemed shocking to
1950s audience or parents could think about bikers in THE
WILD ONE giving bad example to their children (which led to
this film being banned in some countries). But, the audience
of today would have to watch this film extremely carefully
to find any trace of nonconformist tendencies in its script.
This film is actually very conservative, taking the side of
the "squares" and using their fears to provide strong "law
and order" message. Lawlessness, even in its mildest forms,
will always escalate into violent anarchy, so social rules
must be obeyed, no matter how absurd, expensive or
unenforceable they might seem.
Conservative message of the film was muted thanks to the
fact that the bad guys actually looked quite appealing, at
least compared to their conformist adversaries. Marlon
Brando in his black leather jacket and cynical look became
the embodiment of Bad Boy, and the image he radiated in THE
WILD ONE became one of the most recognisable visual icons of
1950s youth rebellion, equal only to James Dean or Elvis
Presley. Brando contributed to the reputation of this film
not only with his looks, but also with great acting
abilities. His role of Johnny, young man doomed by his
machistic pride, is one of the rare things worth watching in
this, otherwise forgettable exploitation films. The other
thing is Lee Marvin in brief but unusual role of his rival
who provides additional fun for those who like to seek for
the hidden homosexual overtones in the relationships between
movie characters. Actually, this film, which is awfully
dated, provides a lot unintentional laughs. Without them,
THE WILD ONE, with its overcliched and sometimes ridiculous
characters and situations, plot holes, script flaws and
generally bad acting, could be less than pleasant viewing
experience.

Title
Review for Gremlins (1984)
Some films can function properly only at very specific
times, whether it is a particular hour, day, month or even
decade. This was usually the case with many 1980s
blockbusters - so called "event" movies that made great
success only to sink into oblivion as soon as the novelty
wore off. Today even those who feel certain amount of
nostalgia towards 1980s can have difficulty remembering
those films or remembering why did they like them in the
first place, mostly because those films seem utterly dated.
One of the films that didn't escape such fate was GREMLINS,
1984 juvenile horror comedy directed by Joe Dante, which is
hardly surprising because it had been out of its time during
its American release. With story and atmosphere best suited
for Christmas season, this film was originally planned for
release in December 1984, but the studio bosses, afraid of
competition during summer season, pushed for the earlier
release, making this film anachronistic almost in the moment
of its conception.
The plot begins in Chinatown, where eccentric and mostly
unsuccessful inventor Randy Peltzer (played by Hoyt Axton)
came in order to buy some special Christmas gift for his
family. He finds that gift in the form of "Mogwai", exotic
but loveable little creature that seems to be the perfect
family pet. His owner (played by Keye Luke), however,
doesn't want to sell it and Peltzer has to buy it from his
less scrupulous grandson who nevertheless issues warning to
the buyer - "Mogwai" mustn't be exposed to sunlight, water
or fed after midnight. When Peltzer returns to his home in
small town of Kingston Falls, his son Billy (played by Zach
Galligan) is enthusiastic about new pet called "Gizmo" and
try not to break the rules. However, the inevitable happens
when "Gizmo" gets presented to Billy's friend Pete (played
by Corey Feldman) - few drops of water are enough for
"Gizmo" to spawn few more "Mogwais". At first, Billy is
happy about five pets for the price of one, but those new
"Mogwais" soon show their true nature - first by physical
metamorphosis into ugly "Gremlins", then by engaging into
random acts of violence and destruction. Before Billy can do
anything to contain the plague, the leader of "Gremlins"
gets to the nearest pool and continues the procreation,
creating hundreds of new little monsters in the process.
Soon the whole town gets overwhelmed by miniature sociopaths
and Billy and his beautiful co-worker Kate (played by Phoebe
Cates) must fight the uphill battle in order to stop the
mayhem.
During the release of GREMLINS Joe Dante enjoyed reputation
of Steven Spielberg's disciple and this is probably the main
reason why many critics tend to dismiss this film as nothing
more than an example of Spielbergian 1980s formula. At first
glance those critics seem to be right, because GREMLINS has
all the proper ingredients - simplified, sentimental "feel
good" story that celebrates American way of life, plenty of
action and violence (yet toned down for the purposes of
family viewing) and, finally, the cute little toy-like
creatures designed to sell toys. What is even more
important, it is not technically the best example of
Spielbergian film - the opening is too long and too slow,
some characters (like the one played by Judge Rheinhold)
don't seem to serve any particular purpose (same as the
narration by Hoyt Axton) and the final showdown is not
particularly impressive or cathartic. But Joe Dante is
nevertheless very capable director who seemed the best
choice for this combination of action, humour and horror. He
knows how to create suspense, which is evident in the scenes
in which Gremlins begin their reign of terror. In this film
he also had various talents on his disposal, ranging from
seasoned and always capable soundtrack composer Jerry
Goldsmith to the creature creator Mark Walas. The special
effects were also very good, and new viewers who watch
GREMLINS today might learn a lot about Hollywood's
capabilities in pre-CGI era.
Screenplay by Chris Columbus might seem formulaic, but even
the casual observers might recognise the layers of satire
and social criticism in it. First of all, there are plenty
of dark overtones in the story that seem rather peculiar for
Christmas film (like Kate's re-telling of a traumatic
episode from her childhood). Furthermore, small town of
Kingston Falls is in many way burdened with problems that
pre-occupied many less fortunate Americans in Reagan's years
- while scruples yuppies (symbolised in underused Judge
Rheinhold's characters) are getting filthy rich, honest
hard-working blue-collar Americans are losing their jobs or
see their firms taken over by foreigners, which in turn
creates xenophobia, wonderfully portrayed by Dick Miller in
his role of Murray Futterman. Even the protagonist and his
family aren't spared of satirical or critical comments -
nice little suburban mom transforms into Rambo-like killing
machine when her kitchen gets invaded by few unfortunate
Gremlins while her son dreams of using Gizmo's instant
procreating ability in order to sell the prodigies and get
rich. However, this potentially subversive content is most
probably going to be missed by contemporary audience, most
probably because of the moralistic ending that brings
GREMLINS back to the realm of Spielbergian formula. Despite
being 1980s Hollywood blockbuster in its nature and, as
such, less interesting to today's viewers than to those
seventeen years ago, this film is still good piece of cinema
that could provide good deal of cinema craftsmanship and
entertainment.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for High Noon (1952)
The more I think about classical westerns, the more I come
to the strange conclusion that classical westerns actually
weren't westerns at all. For most people, western is nothing
more than simple action/adventure story set in the Old West.
But the films that turned into classical westerns were
anything but simple; even when they fulfilled the
action/adventure criteria, they actually were multi-layered
dramas, with complex characters, subplots and raised issues
that could cause some serious head-scratching even for the
causal viewers. Such films used mythical setting of Old West
in order to ask some hard questions and discover unpleasant
answers about dark sides of American history, as well as the
state of human civilisation in general. One of such films
was HIGH NOON, 1952 film directed by Fred Zinnemann. This
film is often regarded as one of the best and most
influential films of all time.
The film is set in Hadleyville, small, dusty town in New
Mexico. Will Kane (played by Gary Cooper) is its
much-respected marshal, who has just retired in order to buy
store and live happily ever after with Amy (played by Grace
Kelly), beautiful Quaker girl. Two of them have just
married, when the terrible news comes from rail station.
Frank Miller (played by Ian Macdonald), convicted killer who
had been brought to justice by Kane, has just been pardoned,
is arriving on the noon train. Miller is being awaited by
three of his friends, and their intentions towards
ex-marshal are quite clear. After some hesitation, Kane, to
the great surprise of everyone, decides to stay in town and
face his enemies. But, while the clock is ticking, he finds
that good citizens of Hadleyville simply aren't prepared to
risk their lives and help Kane in the inevitable conflict.
When people today talk about HIGH NOON, they usually mention
it as a first, or at least, best known example of "real
time" plot technique. The events depicted in HIGH NOON are
set in a time span that corresponds with the running time of
the film. Such technique wasn't new, but other filmmakers
use it relatively rarely. Mostly it is due to some
limitations it puts on the story and characters, which often
make those films look like stage plays. But, it wasn't case
with HIGH NOON. Its director, Fred Zinnemann, knew how to
make a good and very effective movie out of this.
That happened mostly thanks to the great script by Carl
Foreman (whose later works would include a masterpiece like
THE BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI). The plot showed its universal
value by being used in many later films, including even an
interesting science fiction version in OUTLAND by Peter
Hyams. Reason for that lies in the fact that it uses the
universal theme of world's collective unconscious - a Lone
Hero that is about to defend the community/world from Evil.
Foreman's script goes further than that and brings another
motive - the conflict between idealistic Man As They Should
Be and conformist Man As They Are. And, after being exposed
to such conflicts and its consequences, viewers are
presented with heretical question: Is the community/world
really worth saving? Foreman gives an answer, symbolised in
gesture that was very controversial in its time and often
copied in the films made in later decades.
It was often noted that HIGH NOON could be seen as a
metaphor for the dilemmas that faced eminent figures in
Hollywood of its time. In the early 1950s, at the zenith of
anti-Communist hysteria, many actors, directors and
screenwriters were called by Senate Committee in order to
testify about alleged Communist influence in Hollywood.
Those who came in front of the Committee were often asked
questions about their own political convictions or
convictions of their colleagues and friends. If they
co-operated, they had to name names and they knew that even
the most innocent innuendo about someone's leftist leanings
could brand such person a Communist and practically end his
career in Hollywood. If they didn't, if they stood by their
friends or by the principles that personal political
convictions per se shouldn't brand anyone a criminal they
branded themselves a Communists. Such choice - between going
the easy way and betraying noble principles and the sense of
duty on one hand, and going the hard way and maintaining
this principle at all cost - could be seen in this movie
very well. Ironically, such uncompromising depiction of
conformism vs. noble ideals, and some other things, brought
a negative reputation to Foreman. He was soon blacklisted as
alleged Communist and had to write his best screenplays
under pseudonym, being rehabilitated only years after his
death.
This dramatic conflict, which is in the essence of HIGH
NOON, isn't just external confrontation between idealistic
marshals and his conformist and hypocritical citizens. This
conflict is also inner one; Foreman didn't portray Kane as
some kind of perfect, all-conquering hero. He has some
doubts, at first he succumbs to better judgement, being
blinded by the prospect of better future. But deep down he
knows that, even if he escapes the killers, he could never
escape his own conscience. This inner struggle is seen
through the almost always-painful expression by Gary Cooper,
playing one of the best roles of his life. The actor, who
had suffering from bleeding ulcer during the shooting, made
a splendid job by using his unfortunate health condition in
order to enhance the power of his performance.
The other actors are great too, especially those who play
supporting characters and provide many different and
interesting perspectives on the situation. Lon Chaney Jr.
gives short, but memorable speech as Kane's old mentor.
Thomas Mitchell is excellent as hypocritical leader of the
town. On the other hand, Grace Kelly, in one of her first
role, looks more like a plot gimmick, made in order to
embody ideals of Old West virtues than as a real and fresh
character. Katy Jurado, as no-nonsense and down-to-earth
Mexican saloon owner, compensates Grace Kelly's lack of
acting experience by providing her strong opposite.
The role played by Lloyd Bridges, although well played,
should have been left out of the picture. Harvey, Kane's
young and ambitious deputy, only complicated story that was
perfect in its simplicity. This is one of the major flaws in
this film that would otherwise be hailed as true
masterpiece. The other one is the title song, written by
Dimitri Tiomkin and sung by Tex Ritter, which is nice by
itself; unfortunately, it is overplayed during the whole
course of picture and gets really tedious. Luckily, those
flaws don't negate the strong impact this film would have on
the viewer, the impact that inspired many future filmmakers
and made HIGH NOON one of the most important pieces of
American film legacy.

Title
Review for Soft Deceit (1994)
Thanks to countless billions of souls that tried to atone
their sins through financial contributions, Catholic Church
has accumulated a great wealth through the centuries.
However, these days spiritual values aren't so strong, and
that includes protagonist of SOFT DECEIT, 1994 thriller
directed by Jorge Montesi. Adam Trent (played by Patrick
Bergin) is a professional criminal who managed to steal
millions of dollars from the Church funds. He is caught by
police, but few years behind bars are going to pass quickly
with the knowledge of loot safely stashed away. On the other
hand, influential Church officials want the money back and
the police, under political pressure, sets up a sting
operation for that very purpose. The mission is given to
atractive lady detective Anne Fowler (played by Kate Vernon)
who organises Trent's escape from prison, hoping that the
criminal would lead her to his stash. However, the things
don't go as planned - Trent seems to always be one step
ahead of its pursuers, and Fowler realises that she started
to fall in love with attractive criminal.
Script by Jorge Montesi and Roy Sallows had many interesting
possibilities, especially those arising from the constant
mind games and sexual tensions between two major
protagonists. Unfortunately, most of that potential got
drowned beneath the sea of cliches and terribly uninspired
performance by Kate Vernon, actress whose good looks didn't
match her acting abilities, at least in this film. As a
result, SOFT DECEIT, despite few bright moments, is not the
film that should be viewed as anything more than forgettable
cinema product.
Review written on September 20th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Enid Is Sleeping (1990)
Old proverb among show business people says that a comedy is
a serious business. Watching the declining quality of
American cinematic humour in the last decade, the author of
this review tends to agree. The best comedies are those that
were made with some serious efforts. One of those is ENID IS
SLEEPING, relatively obscure 1989 comedy that succeeds to
entertain the audience despite being based on rather
outdated idea.
Set in a small New Mexican town of Las Moscas, this film is
tale about Enid (Maureen Mueller), woman that has a unique
talent to make a life miserable to anyone around her,
including her husband Harry (Judge Rheinhold) and her long
suffering younger sister Jane (Elizabeth Perkins). After a
while, two of them try to seek refuge in each other, but
when Enid catches them in flagranti, hell breaks loose.
Acting in self-defence, Jane accidentally kills her sister.
Luckily, Harry happens to be a cop, so he devises a plan to
get rid of the body. As usual, things don't work out as
planned, and dead Enid continues to torment Jane and Harry
with same ferocity as live one.
Although many viewers would tend to associate this film with
WEEKEND AT BERNIE'S, ultimate cinematic disaster dealing
with similar theme, this dark situation comedy works beyond
its "high concept". This is probably due to the fact that
almost anyone involved in the production gave his or her
best. Screenwriters A.J. Tipping, Maurice Phillips and James
Whaley created solid script, and Phillips as director was
superb, both in pacing and wonderful use of New Mexican
locations. But the biggest job was done by wonderful cast.
Elizabeth Perkins outshines anyone with her adoring
portrayal of weak, victimised woman suddenly turned into
criminal. Judge Rheinhold (another 1980s comedian whose peak
was BEVERLY HILLS COP series) is also very good as her
pathetic partner, same as Jeffrey Jones, Brion James and
Michael J. Pollard in minor roles. But, probably the most
charming element of the film is beautiful, sentimental
musical score by Craig Safan that works as some kind of
semi-ironic commentary of the events in the movie. Although
the film does have somewhat disappointing ending, the end
result is really funny and entertaining film.

Title
Review for Total Recall (1990)
One of the most popular concepts in 1990s science fiction is
virtual reality. Rapid development of computer technology is
most evident in more and more realistic special effects in
Hollywood movies and television. Future world where
computers would be able to fool other human senses doesn't
require much imagination. In such world it would be very
hard, almost impossible for humans to distinguish real world
from those created in computer simulations. There were many
novels, comic books, movies and TV shows based on such
concept, MATRIX being most successful of them. However, such
concept isn't new; it used to be explored many decades ago
in the works of Philip K. Dick, one of the most important
and influential science fiction writers of 20th Century.
Dick in his stories and novels often wrote about different
realities created with supertechnology of the future, and
consequent loss of the identity among human beings. Some of
those fears found the way to manifest themselves into
extraordinary films. Dick was one of few giants of science
fiction literature lucky enough to have not one, but two
great science fiction films. First one is BLADE RUNNER, 1982
cult classic, and another, that stood in its shadow for the
past ten years, is TOTAL RECALL, 1990 film directed by Paul
Verhoeven.
Plot of the film is loosely based on Philip K. Dick's short
story "We Can Remember It for You Wholesale". The year is
2084 AD and Doug Quaid (played by Arnold Schwarzenegger)
seems to have everything he needs in life - a good home,
steady job of construction worker and beautiful wife Lori
(played by Sharon Stone). However, his idyllic life is
troubled by dreams he has each night; in those dreams he is
on Mars, in company of beautiful and mysterious brunette.
Because of such dreams, he wants to travel to Mars, but he
can't afford it. Such problems are usually solved by
"Rekall", company specialised for inserting false memories
into people's minds. Quaid goes there and orders two weeks
of false memories about his being on Mars. Routine procedure
goes terribly wrong because somebody had already implanted
false memories into his mind. Quaid is suddenly being
attacked by his friends, co-workers and even his wife; they
are all operatives of all-powerful Agency, whose top
official Richter (played by Michael Ironside) spares no
effort to kill him. It seems that Quaid used to be secret
agent of Vilos Kohaagen (played by Ronny Cox), ruthless
governor of Mars colony, and had his memory erased after
betraying him for the sake of Mars freedom fighters. Quaid
must travel to Mars in order to solve the mystery of his own
identity and find the girl of his dreams.
Filmmakers took great liberty with original story, but,
luckily Dan O'Bannon and Ronald Shusett, experience writers
of science fiction cinema classics, were members of
script-writing team. As a result, TOTAL RECALL has an
original, exciting, intelligent and thought-provoking
script, one of the best produced in Hollywood in the last
few decades. Most interesting aspect of the film is the idea
that the sufficient level of technology can erase any
difference between objective reality and subjective
perception of the world. For most filmmakers today, the best
mechanism is virtual reality. For Dick in the story, and
screenwriters in this film, such mechanism was somewhat more
primitive technique of implanting false memories. Such
technology, although crude, exists today (at least, if we
are to believe reports about alleged alien abductees being
manipulated into fabricating their stories under hypnosis),
so it isn't hard to imagine its widespread use in the next
hundred years. Suspension of disbelief is even easier when
it comes to that technology being misused for some nefarious
purposes, like in this movie. But the most disturbing
consequences of such practices is human inability to
distinguish reality from fantasy - if memory can be
manipulated, and people can't trust their own past, they
consequently can't trust their present. The hero of this
film is constantly faced with such dilemma - are
all-important events in this film real or just his fantasy?
Movie leaves this question unanswered, forcing the audience
to watch it many times in order to find subtle clues. This
unanswered question could have spawned the very same endless
debate as the Android controversy in BLADE RUNNER.
Unfortunate thing for the reputation of TOTAL RECALL (and
good for its quality), was the fact that execution of this
script had been left to Paul Verhoeven, author of ROBOCOP,
another hidden gem of science fiction, made three years
earlier. Verhoeven was never associated with cult science
fiction, at least not with science fiction as infantile
entertainment, dominant trend in 1980s. Verhoeven always
used Hollywood resources to paint subversive picture of some
disturbing trends of contemporary America, always disguised
as standard commercial films. TOTAL RECALL, perhaps, wasn't
so radical or obvious like ROBOCOP. However, some elements
of 1980s are still present in Verhoeven's vision of the
future - some unknown yet recognisable variation of Cold War
is still fought somewhere in the background, corporate greed
at the utter expense of Have Nots still dominates the
economy, raw consumerism still dominates the culture and the
killing of helpless civilians and summary executions are
normal modus operandi of the legitimate government. This
grim picture is, on the other hand, well hidden with the
huge amounts of action, and consequent huge amounts of
violence. That violence is most graphically depicted - few
films are able to show people literally stepping over dead
bodies to achieve their goals. Verhoeven even manages to
insult feminists with scenes of nudity and with almost
all-important female characters being portrayed as whores.
The audience, however, barely has time to think about that,
because Verhoeven turns the film in one big roller-coaster
ride, using non-stop action through superb editing.
Verhoeven did great job not only in directing very good and
memorable action scenes, and neatly tying them with
thought-provoking and intelligent plot. He also managed to
create specific atmosphere of the film, which was supposed
to make huge Dickian contrast between bright
supertechnological future and its grim consequences for
human beings. Production settings of futuristic Earth and
Mars colony are quite believable, and special effects, still
good after having to compete with CGI for almost a decade,
provide many memorable scenes, especially at the spectacular
end of the film. Verhoeven obviously took great care about
details, providing some amusing product placements (ads for
"Mars Today") and interesting in-jokes and pop culture
references. Always reliable Jerry Goldsmith provides another
very good musical score, quite appropriate for this film,
quite in rank with his previous classics like ALIEN and STAR
TREK.
Some critics were led to disregard TOTAL RECALL because its
lead actor was Arnold Schwarzenegger, until that time always
associated with brainless action films (or, to be more
precise, what mainstream critics used to call "brainless
action films"). In this film he again plays unstoppable
killing machine with almost superhuman abilities, but there
is difference; this time the machine happens to be very
human. Quaid is man who is suddenly forced to swap his
boring, but safe existence with constant life for life and
the struggle to find his true identity, and, above all, he
is never sure whether he lives in a dream. Such trials and
tribulations were nice opportunity for Schwarzenegger to
show some of his, usually unused, acting abilities. His role
shadowed everyone else, mostly because they had limited
screen time. That happened even with great character actors
like Ronny Cox (who actually replayed his role of corporate
villain in ROBOCOP), Michael Ironside and even with his
nominal partner Rachel Ticotin. Some, on the other hand,
provided great episodes - Ray Baker was nice as sleazy
"Rekall" executive and Mel Johnson Jr. gave quite humorous
performance as Martian cabby. But the most memorable
supporting role was played by Sharon Stone; her portrayal of
Quaid's treacherous wife prepared her very well for the role
of Catherine Trammel in BASIC INSTINCT, the most ultimate
Bad Girl of 1990s cinema.
Of course, there are some that aren't pleased with TOTAL
RECALL for quite different reasons. Most obvious flaw in the
movie could be found by subjecting the movie to the basic
scientific nit picking. The ending, although spectacular,
seems unrealistic and as well as some scenes in Mars colony.
However, those who like to defend TOTAL RECALL might
disregard those nit-picks by seeing scientific
implausibilities as quite believable in the context of
Quaid's dream. All in all, TOTAL RECALL is well paced,
entertaining and thought-provoking piece of science fiction
cinema, a truly superb, yet disregarded gem of that
particular genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Raw Deal (1986)
According to Hollywood, being forced to live in rural
America is fate worse than death. And this is exactly the
thing that happened to the protagonist of RAW DEAL, 1986
action thriller directed by John Irvin. In the beginning we
are introduced to Mark Kaminsky (played by Arnold
Schwarzenegger), sheriff in small North Carolina town who
used to be FBI agent before being kicked out for roughing up
suspect. Dull and monotonous rural life is something
Kaminsky can handle, but this is not the case with his
sensitive wife Amy (played by Blanche Baker) who finds
comfort in alcohol. In such circumstances Kaminsky is
approached by his old friend and FBI agent Harry Shannon
(played by Darren McGavin) whose son had been killed by
goons belonging to Chicago mob boss Patrovita (played by Sam
Wanamaker). Shannon wants to bring down Patrovita and his
organisation, but he needs outsider for the job, since FBI
and law enforcement have always been compromised by leaks.
Kaminsky agrees to help him, stages his own death, assumes
new identity and comes to Chicago in order to join ranks of
Patrovita's gang. He manages to impress Patrovita's
lieutenants by spectacular display of physical force, which
is something Patrovita needs in the new war against his
former partner Lamanski (played by Steven Hill). Kaminsky
seems to enjoy mobsters' trust and collects valuable
information from the inside, but his mission becomes
complicated after meeting with Monique (played by Kathryn
Harrold), beautiful woman with gambling problems.
RAW DEAL is one of the more obscure titles in Arnold
Schwarzenegger's filmography, but it is not as bad as such
obscurity would indicate. Made immediately after TERMINATOR
and COMMANDO, this film obviously tried to exploit
Schwarzenegger's new image of unstoppable one-man army. The
main problem with this comes from the script by Gary de Vore
and Norman Wexler. The genre of police thriller and the
urban Chicago setting are not suited for the carnage we
expect from Schwarzenegger's characters in 1980s movies.
Screenwriters and director John Irvin seem aware of this and
until the very end this film looks surprisingly good -
characters seem realistic, mostly due to the presence of
very talented ("over-qualified", cynics would say)
supporting actors who do a fine job (with the exception of
Steven Hill of LAW & ORDER fame in more than thankless role
of Jewish mobster). Even the story works good, with few not
so predictable twists and even some bad dialogue is
tolerable. However, the film begins to crumble when
Schwarzenegger's character prepares to single-handedly take
down scores of armed opponents in a scene that is almost
shot-by-shot remake of similar segment in COMMANDO. What
happens after that scene borders on parody, with our
unstoppable hero casually mowing down thugs and driving in
the same time, accompanied by "Satisfaction" by "Rolling
Stones". Depending on the viewers' previous expectations,
some would be satisfied with the spectacular armed
confrontation that finally delivers Schwarzenegger's
trademark goods, while others would be disappointed by
cheesy scenes that compromised otherwise serious film. In
any case, when the end credits come, RAW DEAL looks like a
mildly entertaining little exploitation film that
nevertheless leaves the general impression of plenty of
wasted potentials.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Mr. Jones (1993)
Richard Gere is a really great actor, but sometimes his
presence of the screen can be really annoying. It usually
happens because of his tendency to torpedo many promising
roles with his overacting, often inappropriate for the
occasion. However, while many conventional roles are simply
too conventional for Gere, there are roles that look like a
perfect fit for his usual screen personality. Many of those
roles deal with some forms of mental illness or deficiency -
fertile ground for Academy Awards, judging by the last few
decades.
Of all mental illnesses, manic-depressive psychosis (or
"bipolar disorder", as refered in modern American medical
literature) is probably the most suitable for actors who
want to push their limits. While the intellectual abilities
of the patients are untouched, that illness is characterised
with sometimes sudden, sometimes gradual mood swings that
vary between manic euphoria and almost catatonic depression.
In this film Richard Gere plays Mr. Jones, one of the people
who are suffering from that illness. But when we are
introduced to Mr. Jones, we see that he doesn't suffer at
all - we are exposed to his manic side, his "highs", and he
look like someone who enjoys life more than most of us.
Problem is that his euphoric outbursts often lead him to
trouble, like when he tries to fly off the construction
site, or conduct philharmonic concerto by himself. As an
aftermath of those incidents, he is always brought back to
psychiatric ward, and medical staff tries to control his
condition with various drugs. Doctor Libbie Bowen (Lena
Olin) is trying to treat him, but soon she finds that she
has more than professional interests in her patient.
British director Mike Figgis has already made reputation by
often dark and depressing dramas and thrillers like STORMY
MONDAY or INTERNAL AFFAIRS. In MR. JONES, his tendency
towards depressive subject was watered down due to the
script by Eric Roth and Michael Christopher. Two writers
decided to make this film light, despite its serious and
potentially very depressive subject. As a result, the
audience finds very little about the main character - at
least when he has his "bad" days. We also find very little
about the nature of the illness itself, and the dilemmas
psychiatrists must make when they deal with patients.
Finally, in order to make this film as formulaic as
possible, we are given unecessary and quite disappointing
romantic subplot.
But, it actually doesn't matter much in the end. Richard
Gere in this role behaves like a fish in the water and
literally chewes the screen with his acting. Of course, his
personality overshadowed anyone else, including his partner
Lena Olin, but we are still able to notice more than good
supporting roles, most notable of them being one played by
Delroy Lindo. In the end, film ends predictably, but for
most of its 114 minutes, audience isn't bored, mostly thanks
to Figgis' capable directing and good production values.
Hardly a masterpiece, and nothing more than a solid piece of
formulaic Hollywood entertainment, MR. JONES is still the
film to be recommended, and not just to Richard Gere fans or
those who like melodramas.

Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)
In today's world of journalism, dominated by television,
Internet and "news as entertainment" business philosophy,
printed newspapers are considered to be the thing of the
past. Same thing happened to the perception of journalists
as fearless crusaders for truth and justice in this cynical
age. As a result, once thriving subgenre of journalism
movies almost disappeared from Hollywood. THE PAPER, 1994
drama by Ron Howard, represents one of those precious films
that deal with realities of life of modern newspaper
reporters.
The screenplay of THE PAPER, written by brother David and
Stephen Koepp, follows 24 hours in lives of reporters and
editors in "New York Sun" tabloid newspaper. The nominal
protagonist of the film is Henry Hackett (played by Michael
Keaton), workaholic editor who loves his job. But long
hours, low pay and uncertain future of the tabloid lead him
to think about new career. His pregnant wife Martha (played
by Marisa Tomei) urges him to think about better-paid but
more boring job in respectable "New York Sentinel"
newspaper. In the meantime, rapidly developing story about
two black teenagers being arrested for racially motivated
murders would represent another opportunity for Hackett to
use his skills of investigative reporter. Results of his
investigation, on the other hand, would later lead to
dramatic confrontations with bullish managing editor Alicia
Clark (played by Glenn Close).
Judging by some of American newspaper movie reviews, Koepp
brothers in their screenplay managed to paint rather
convincing picture of the life in modern editorial offices.
According to medical statistics in many countries, news
reporters and editors have shorter average lifespan than
those belonging to other professions and THE PAPER explains
the causes of this phenomenon - deadline, editorial
pressures and consequent stress that leads to chain-smoking
and alcoholism, and, naturally, all that has devastating
effects on reporters' personal lives. Ron Howard is faithful
to this gritty picture laced with black humour, but he
nevertheless adds some Hollywood touch with few moralising
scenes and melodramatic finale that went over the top with
some of the cliches (including notorious "Stop the presses!"
line). However, THE PAPER compensates these flaws with truly
great ensemble cast that relies more on character actors
like Keaton, Tomei, Close, Robert Duvall and Randy Quaid
Tomei than standard Hollywood stars. Because of them,
realistic atmosphere of modern-day editorial offices isn't
lost. THE PAPER, therefore, is a film that should be
recommended as skillfully done example of almost forgotten
dramatic subgenre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for In the Line of Duty: Manhunt in the Dakotas (1991) (TV)
IN THE LINE OF DUTY is the critically praised series of
television movies dealing with the real-life incidents that
claimed lives of law enforcement officers in USA. THE
TWILIGHT MURDERS, another one from the series, is dealing
with the case of Gordon Kahl (played by Rod Steiger), old
farmer from North Dakota who would rather spend a year in
prison than pay taxes to the despised U.S. government. After
being released, he still refuses to pay taxes and the
warrant is issued for his arrest. When the U.S. marshals
come to arrest him, it turns out that Kahl isn't alone. Many
poor farmers in rural Northwest share his extremist
anti-government beliefs, and the routine operation turns
into shootout that would leave federal officers that. That
brings FBI on the scene, and Agent Mayberly (Michael Gross)
is supervising the manhunt. However, his efforts seem
fruitless, since Kahl still has many supporters, some of
them even in the local law enforcement.
After BETRAYED, 1988 thriller by Costa Gavras, Hollywood
mostly ignored the disturbing trends of rising right-wing
extremism in the American Northwest, and that remained so
until Oklahoma City bombing, when media hype brought
right-wingers back into spotlight. Until that time, only the
television movies like this one bothered to pay attention to
that phenomenon. Unfortunately, THE TWILIGHT MURDERS is
still routine and formulaic television film, that uses
sensationalist real life content in order to cover lack of
originality in the script. Sometimes, like many American TV
movies, it creates drama where drama shouldn't be. On the
other hand, film is steadily directed by Dick Lowry, and Rod
Steiger does good job potraying Gordon Kahl. On the other
hand, Michael Gross as his pursuer is quite wooden and his
interaction with some of the actors is terrible. However,
film does deal with potentially thought-provoking social and
political issues, so hour and half spent in front of the
screen shouldn't be the total waste of time.

Title
Review for Logan's Run (1976)
In Spring of 1982 the biggest television event in former
Yugoslavia was the series of five science fiction films
being premiered on Belgrade state television. Among them
four were MGM classics made in late 1960s and 1970s - 2001:
A SPACE ODYSSEY, LOGAN'S RUN, WESTWORLD, DEMON SEED (fifth
was relatively obscure Croatian 1976 period horror
IZBAVITELJ). Those four films left strong and lasting
impression on the author of this review, reaffirming his
love of science fiction and helping him to shape his taste
in the movies, and also learning him to distinguish good
from bad examples of the genre. The impact was even
stronger, thanks to the fact that many of those films were
re-aired shortly afterwards, as part of daytime educational
program (and uncut, which should give you rather insightful
look into the censorship standards of former Yugoslavia). On
the other hand, although all those four films happened to be
great, there was only one that found special place in my
heart. It was LOGAN'S RUN, 1976 science fiction spectacle by
Michael Anderson.
The plot of the film is based on the 1967 novel by William
F. Nolan and George Clayton Johnson. It begins in the year
2274, in a world depopulated by industrial pollution where
the survivors live in the huge city under the dome. This
last remaining piece of civilisation is actually a nice
place to live - advanced machines, controlled by omni-potent
Computer, fulfil all existential needs, leaving inhabitants
to spend all their lives enjoying technological luxury, free
sex, hallucinogenic drugs and other exotic forms of
entertainment. However, due to the population limit, all
citizens must end their life at the age of thirty, being
subjected to spectacular quasi- religious ritual of Carousel
that offers vague hope of "renewal". Those who try to escape
Carousel and live past their thirtieth birthday are known as
Runners, and their capture and immediate execution is a job
for the police force known as Sandmen. Logan 5 (played by
Michael York) is a Sandman who is given a special task by
Computer - he must locate mythical place that shelters
Runners, known as Sanctuary, and destroy it. Logan, in order
to achieve that task, must pretend to be a Runner and thus
infiltrate the underground network of people who help
Runners in their escape. Logan gets in touch with beautiful
Jessica 6 (played by Jenny Agutter), one of the members of
that group, and slowly builds her trust. She leads him to
Sanctuary and Logan along the way falls in love with her,
begins questioning his own life as a Sandman and decides to
become Runner for real. But, Computer has sent another
Sandman, his former best friend and colleague Francis 7
(played by Richard Jordan) who would hunt two of them even
if it means going outside allegedly impenetrable city
limits.
LOGAN'S RUN is often referred as the best example of a
science fiction movie that didn't age very well. This is
most evident in the area of special effects. In 1976 MGM
spent huge sums of money for the special effects that were
state-of-the-art for its time and actually won an "Oscar".
But, only a year later, STAR WARS would set much higher
standards and make LOGAN'S RUN look cheap and laughable. We
become aware of film's age in the beginning, when the
audience, which is introduced to the futuristic city by
spectacular panoramas, actually sees rather pathetic
miniature models. Such impression is somewhat improved later
in the film, especially in the scenes featuring Washington
D.C. of the distant future.
But the problems for LOGAN'S RUN aren't limited to the
obsolete visual effects. Characters are sometimes given
lines that seem unrealistic, directed more towards the
audience than to each other. Music by usually reliable Jerry
Goldsmith is of variable quality -after the effective
opening theme that combines classical orchestration and
electronic instruments, he goes to more standard territory.
And Anderson as director uses that music on the wrong
scenes. The acting is, to put it mildly, bellow standards
you might expect in science fiction classics. Michael York
is not the best casting choice for the protagonist, looking
somewhat too intellectual for tough, macho hero of
futuristic action drama. His partner Jenny Agutter has
rather thankless role of classic damsel in distress, and she
is better remembered for her good looks and skimpy clothes
(and lack of in couple of moments, brief but well-
remembered by male science fiction fans in their early
teens). However, even her thankless role is well played, at
least compared with terrible acting by Farrah Fawcett in
episodic role that became legend of its own. Late Richard
Jordan, on the other hand, is excellent as Logan's
friend-turned-nemesis, bringing raw, masculine humanity to
his character, including some homoerotic overtones. His
total opposite is equally superb Peter Ustinov who gives
dignified portrayal of half-senile, almost childlike Old
Man.
But all that flaws, that turned LOGAN'S RUN into "that film
that didn't age well", "that 1970s schlock" and MST fodder,
are not so important for the overall impression of the film.
At least when we consider how different this film is from
science fiction cinema of today. Now we expect science
fiction films to feature CGI graphics, cool soundtracks and
spectacular action, which makes plot and characters less
important. But in 1976, before Lucas and Spielberg began
their infantilisation of American cinema industry, Hollywood
science fiction was built on different principles.
Interesting ideas, plots and characters were more important
than cool special effects. LOGAN'S RUN was made on those
principles, as a film that allowed viewers to use their
heads, as well as their senses, making them think long after
the end credits.
LOGAN'S RUN, like any good, thought-provoking vision of the
future, is actually built on some trends in the present. The
authors of original novel, written in 1967 (mediocre
according to most on-line critics, and, the author of this
review, after reading the sequel, tends to believe them),
were inspired by social turmoil of late 1960s and
counter-culture of younger generations, violently opposed
towards establishment of the older generations. They saw
this revolt as a consequence of unprecedented economic
prosperity and technological advances, making younger
generations, now unaffected by hardships of the past, less
motivated to take responsibility for their lives as their
parents had done. In the future, role of parents (and
welfare state) is taken by omnipotent technology and the
tables are turned - the younger generations now belong to
establishment; hedonism and instant self- gratification is
supreme social value and those who preach family, work and
responsibility are considered dangerous subversives. A
decade later, young rebels of 1960s grew older, world
economy was hit by fuel crisis, but hedonism was still
reigning supreme and the vision of the future in LOGAN'S RUN
was still very believable. And the idea of mandatory age
limits was not so alien to the generations that grew on
slogans like "Don't trust anyone over thirty".
This vision of future is, of course, hardly utopian. Script
by David Zelag Goodman, same as the novel, sees the brave
new world of LOGAN'S RUN as dehumanised, totalitarian and
sterile. Material wealth of this new world is by definition
limited, and so are the boundaries of space, as well of
creativity. Despite filmmakers' efforts to make the world as
exotic as 1970s America, we could still see monochromatic
fashion, so typical for typical totalitarian, oppressive
dystopias of classical science fiction. And the humanity in
this world, same as in classical story THE MACHINE STOPS by
E.M. Forster, is so accustomed to supertechnology that it
becomes doomed when this supertechnology begins failing (as
it happens in this film). What is more disturbing is the
fact that we might see seeds of this dystopia in our lives -
recently Y2K phenomenon was supposed to cause effects
similar to the ones seen in the last scenes of the film.
Perhaps some viewers wouldn't like the alternative to this
dystopia, which offer conservative worldview. Hedonism and
instant self-gratification ultimately lead to moral and
physical decay, as well as life without obligations, which
in the end becomes empty and pointless. Instead, people
should return to the ideals of glorious past (symbolised in
Washington D.C.) and re-embrace family, work and
responsibility. Those who follow such path, like the hero of
this film, would be rewarded with valuable experience of
past generations and thus get ability to beat corrupt,
decadent system. Taking this into account, the ending of the
film, often referred, as unbelievable embodiment of bad SF
stereotypes, actually becomes quite effective. The film ends
on positive note - although the powerful finale still leaves
one important question unanswered. Would society as a whole
be as successful as Logan and manage to survive its
transformation from bunch of decadent pleasure- seekers into
responsible human beings?
Whether LOGAN'S RUN happens to be conservative reaction on
the excesses of 1960s and 1970s or not, might be debatable.
But it still remains very interesting and entertaining piece
of classic science fiction cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Basketball Diaries, The (1995)
Although historical examples and even some current events
provide plenty of examples in which violent acts are
inspired by various things, including ancient religious
texts, in 1990s Hollywood movies and other forms of popular
culture seemed to be the sole source of the violence in
American society. At least this was the impression given by
media crusade, inspired by the series of school shootings in
late 1990s America, for which the young perpetrators had
allegedly found inspiration in violent films from Hollywood.
Among various titles the one is particularly singled because
of the scene that actually featured one of such shootings -
THE BASKETBALL DIARIES, 1995 teen angst drama directed by
Scott Kalvert.
The shooting is nothing but the vision in the mind of the
film's protagonist Jimmy (played by Leonardo di Caprio),
16-year old boy who lives in Manhattan with his mother
(played by Lorraine Bracco). Jimmy is star of St. Vitus,
seemingly unbeatable high school basketball team, and
everyone expects that he would continue his stardom in NBA.
However, Jimmy, being rebellious teenager, has increasing
problems adapting to the repressive and hypocritical
atmosphere of Catholic high school, as well as dealing with
his own broken home and best friend Bobby (played by Michael
Imperioli) dying from leukemia. In order to escape from it
all Jimmy finds refuge in casual sex and drug use. The
latter proves to be his undoing - his basketball skills
quickly vanish, he leaves school and home and is soon forced
to leave on the street where he commits various crimes and
sells his body in order to pay for his heroin habit.
Based on the autobiographical novel by former heroin addict,
rocker and poet Jim Carroll, THE BASKETBALL DIARIES provide
uniquely naturalistic and explicit portrayal of the
destructive capabilities of heroin addiction. Leonardo di
Caprio, in its uncompromising and convincing portrayal of
promising teenager who ends up like a basket case would
forever silence all those who see him as nothing more than a
pretty boy. His strong performance is matched by equally
impressive supporting roles. Lorraine Bracco excels in the
role of Jim's mother, especially in one particularly moving
scene that feature final split-up of the family, while James
Kirby stands out with the extremely effective portrayal of
creepy basketball coach. Juliette Lewis is also very
convincing in the role of street junkie, and that role
becomes even more interesting when we know that the actress
had some real-life drug problems after the production of
this film.
THE BASKETBALL DIARIES had misfortune of being released in
the same year as two otherfilms that dealt with similar
subjects - Danny Boyle's TRAINSPOTTING and Larry Clark's
KIDS. While the former dealt with the dark world of heroin
addiction with much more details and style than THE
BASKETBALL DIARIES, the latter was much more convincing in
the depiction of modern teenager's alienation from society.
This is actually major problem of the film - script by Bryan
Goluboff (which set the plot in modern day instead of late
1960s like the novel) switches direction in the middle;
until that moment it is an honest and intriguing portrayal
of young man and his relationship with society; afterwards
it turns into sometimes oversimplistic anti-drug film.
Director Scott Kalvert also tends to show his videoclip
author's root too much. The happy ending also seems a little
bit cliched, although it owes more to real life than to the
filmmakers' lack of imagination. However, despite not being
among the best film that deal with this grim and disturbing
subjects, THE BASKETBALL DIARIES is nevertheless a
remarkable film that just had misfortune of getting wrong
reputation.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Good Policeman, The (1991)
Protagonists of police films come in various shapes and
forms, but hardly any of them resembles protagonist of THE
GOOD POLICEMAN, 1991 thriller by Peter Werner. Isaac Seidel
(played by Ron Silver) is not an ordinary cop - he is
actually commissioner for New York Police Department.
Despite his lofty position he stayed in touch with the
situation in the lower echalons, thanks to the semi-private
unit of "Paladines" who help him sort out the trouble both
within and without his organisation. As a result, almost
everyone in the Big Apple - media, mayor, politicians,
church and even some elements of the organised crime -
either loves him or respect him, and he even has time to
lead children's baseball team. However, as usual in such
circumstances, there are those who aren't particularly
satisfied with the current state of affairs, namely some
members of Mafia and FBI agents who feel uncomfortable with
close relations between Seidel and organised crime. When
Seidel tries to prevent mafia war, his own life will be in
danger.
Despite somewhat preposterous concept (official burdened
with every day responsibility of running tens of thousands
of policemen has enough time for detective work of his own),
THE GOOD POLICEMAN looks a fine film at first glance. Ron
Silver and Tony Lo Bianco play their roles very well, and
the musical soundtrack by Stephen Endelman is very
effective. Unfortunately, the script by David Black and
Jerome Garyn seems unfinished - many important characters
are only fleshed out and not sufficiently explored, creating
impression that THE GOOD POLICEMAN is nothing more than the
pilot for rejected TV-series. The ending is predictable and
cliched, and the romantic subplot involving Seidel's
chlidhood love is too distracting. THE GOOD POLICEMAN is
nevertheless watchable, but disappointing film which again
reminds us that the good films rely on something more than
original concepts alone.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Cuba (1979)
Once upon a time, the author of this review used to live in a country now
known as former Yugoslavia. It was a country based on compromise between
East and West, and in good old days of the Cold War it presented some kind
of interesting mixing of opposing ideologies, allowing its government and
people to thrive. However, for the rulers of that country, being left alone
wasn't enough - they wanted to belong to something bigger. So, former
Yugoslavia was the one of the founding members of Non Aligned movement and
their diplomacy spent enormous energy in order to please numerous Third
World countries, their leaders and ideologies.
CUBA, Richard Lester's movie dealing with Cuban Revolution, was on the
programme of Belgrade Film Festival in the early 1980s. Later, the movie was
in regular cinema distribution. However, in mid-1980s, when the movie had to
be aired on national television, something interesting happened. The Cuban
Embassy in Belgrade intervened and issued diplomatic protest, claiming that
the movie "offends the Cuban revolution and people". The same movie was,
however, banned by some Latin American governments for being pro-Castro, but
that didn't matter. Pressured by government, chiefs of Belgrade television,
despite having the movie listed in daily newspaper, decided to air something
else. The replacement movie was CAESAR AND CLEOPATRA (1943) with Claude
Rains and Vivien Leigh. This time the Egyptian Embassy was enraged and
issued its own diplomatic protest, claiming that the film presented
Egyptians as people "who bend to foreign invaders".
The moral of this story is clear: although followers of "political
correctness" preach otherwise, it is simply impossible for any artist to
make the work that couldn't offend certain group of people. Why do I mention
this anecdote in this review? Because the makers of CUBA made exactly the
same mistake.
There are too many examples of Lester trying to be nice to too much people.
His main hero, Major Dapes (Connery) is a professional soldier who very
unprofessionally turns against its employers, but he is basically a nice
guy. Alejandra Pullido (Adams), factory owner, is a bitch towards the
workers, but she is basically a nice girl. Her husband Juan (Sarandon) is
worthless playboy, but he is bacically a nice guy. General Bello (Balsam) is
corrupt scum, but he is basically a nice guy. Americans support dictatorial
and rotten regime, but they are basically nice guys. Fidelistas sometimes
machinegun down dozens of innocent people, but they are basically nice guys
etc.
In order to make all those people nice, Lester tries to portray them as
interesting human beings, thus slowing the pace of the movie. As a result,
nothing happens, at least not the things you could expect in a country on a
brink of revolution. Finally, when the inevitable takeover finally occurs,
Lester illustrates it with a totally gratitutios and highly implausible
scene of a tank battle. In order to make things worse, the end scene is one
of thousands of CASABLANCA rip-offs.
Acting is, however, nice. Sean Connery, although doing his usual action
routine in the end, happens to be very convincing romantic hero. Jack
Weston, on the other hand, is wasted as comic relief. Brooke Adams is
totally unconvincing as Latin beauty, but Chris Sarandon saves the day.
Other actors, playing NASHVILLE-like episodes, contribute a lot, making this
bore of a movie at least watchable.
CUBA is, basically, movie made a decade too late - it was more suitable for
1968 when the world's sympathies were definitely more on the left side.
However, it still can be a lot of fun.

Title
Review for Geronimo: An American Legend (1993)
Whenever U.S. government starts meddling into other
countries' affairs, under the pretext of supporting human
rights or preventing political, religious or ethnic
persecution, the other side is ready to use mantra that says
"Look who's talking! What have you done to the Indians?"
However, even the Americans themselves are ready to use that
dark chapter of their own national history when it suits
their purposes. Hollywood is just another example, with its
revisionist westerns, made in early 1990s. Those movies
tried to exploit the emerging wave of Political Correctness,
coinciding with the 500th anniversary of Columbus' discovery
of America. One of such examples is GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN
LEGEND, 1993 western directed by Walter Hill, film that
deals with one of the last conflicts between American
natives and white settlers.
The hero of the film is Geronimo (played by Wes Studi),
leader of Apaches, fierce warrior tribe that used to give
hard time to white settlers during the second half of 19th
century. When the movie begins, in 1885, Geronimo and his
Apaches made peace with U.S. government and try to live
peacefully in Arizona reservation. However, broken promises,
injustice and violence against his people would make
Geronimo restless. With not more 30 or so of his followers,
he escapes reservation and begins guerrilla campaign. General
Crook (Gene Hackman), commander of U.S. Army forces,
respects Geronimo and knows that even his 5,000 force isn't
enough to catch Geronimo in the great spaces of the American
Southwest. Instead, he turns to people who are more
experienced with Apaches - Lt. Charles Gatewood (Jason
Patric) and Indian hunter Al Sieber (Robert Duvall).
Together with young Lt. Britton Davis (Matt Damon) they
would begin mission aimed at capturing Geronimo.
GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND, like many movies made under
the shadow of Political Correctness, try to tell the tale
about oppressed minorities, but instead the real subject is
the bad conscience of the oppressors. So, the story about
Geronimo is told from the perspective of his enemies. Almost
all of them happen to be his greatest admirers and use every
opportunity to express how sorry they feel for having to
fight him and his people. Although such elements of John
Millius' screenplay do indeed have some basis in history,
they harm the story of Geronimo. To be honest, Walter Hill
does try to make Geronimo the real hero of the film, but the
movie segments that deal with the plight of Apaches and the
uprising are given too little time. Instead, they turn out
to be nothing more than the back story for rather
uninteresting adventure story of Gatewood and his band. To
make even worse, Hill has some real problems with pacing and
style, and in the end we have impression that we are
watching two films badly edited into one - story about
Geronimo and story about his pursuers. The movie should have
been better if it turned to Geronimo's life before and after
his last uprising, in many ways more interesting than the
story about Gatewood.
The difference between those segments could be observed
through the different quality of acting. Wes Studi, Cherokee
actor who was so impressive as Magua in THE LAST OF THE
MOHICANS, was perfect choice for Geronimo, not only because
he resembles Geronimo, but because he induces a lot of
passion in his role. Contrary to him, we have disinterested
actors who sleepwalk through the roles of his white enemies.
While this could be expected from someone like Jason Patric,
it is shame when we have veterans like Gene Hackman or
Robert Duvall. Even Hill's directing is bellow expectations
- battle scenes are too short and, like in many of his late
films, force viewers to ask what had happened to the great
action director of 1970s. Even his old associate, music
composer Ry Cooder, disappoints, with the score that shifts
between Indian motives and classic. On the other hand,
photography by Lloyd Ahern II, with the use of red lenses,
gives somewhat dreamy atmosphere, ideal for this movie that
was supposed to be melancholic epic. All in all, compared
with some of the Hollywood's examples of Political
Correctness, this film isn't so bad, but we are left with
the unpleasant impression that it could have been better.

Title
Review for Hair (1979)
Few days ago I was watching Brannagh's version of LOVE
LABOUR'S LOST and was again reminded of the lack of musicals
in contemporary Hollywood. Musicals have been almost
vanished from American cinema for nearly two decades, but
the dying years of that genre were glorious. At least we
might come to this conclusion judging by the quality of
HAIR, 1979 musical by Milos Forman. This film also happens
to have rather great sentimental value to the author of this
review; long time ago I received the movie soundtrack as
birthday present and it is one of the most treasured vinyl
records in my collection.
Plot of this film, based on the cult 1960s musical by Gerome
Ragni, James Rado and Galt McDermott, begins during the
Vietnam War when young and nave Oklahoma farm boy Claude
Hooper Bukowsky (played by John Savage) receives draft
notice. In order to see some world before going to Army he
makes a trip to New York City and spends some time wondering
around Central Park. There he meets group of hippies led by
unorthodox Berger (played by Treat Williams) and immediately
strikes friendship with them, despite having ambivalent
attitude towards their irresponsible lifestyle dominated by
drugs and free love. His idea is to have some good time
before he goes to recruitment centre, while Berger hopes
that Claude would reconsider his plans and join their merry
band for good, especially after falling in love with
beautiful Manhattan debutante Sheila (played by Beverly
d'Angelo). Claude's brief romance with Sheila, however,
isn't reason enough for him to change his mind and he joins
Army. After few months Sheila receives letter from Claude
and again gets in touch with Berger and his friends. Berger
decides to travel all the way to Nevada in order to visit
Claude before he is shipped to Vietnam. That trip would in
the end result with tragedy.
Czech immigrant Milos Forman perhaps didn't look like the
best choice for the director of the movie version of popular
Broadway musical, bit his Hollywood record before and after
this film justified producers' decision. Forman showed great
fascination with the popular culture of his adopted country
yet his perspective of the outsider often allowed him to
approach American themes and characters from unusual angles.
That often resulted with original and powerful works, and
HAIR is one of them. Originally considered to be unfilmable,
especially a decade after the time when its messages about
free love, anti-establishment rebellion and opposition to
Vietnam War became outdated, this material actually
benefited from Forman's outsider perspective. He approached
Swinging Sixties and hippie movement with critical and often
ironical distance - people like Berger are shown to be nice,
but generally irresponsible people who, despite all their
anti-establishment philosophy, still had to rely on more
down-to-earth types like Claude or their parents. Forman's
ironical approach also manifested by casting - veteran
director Nicholas Ray, man with a reputation of Hollywood
rebel, is given the role of General that represents war and
establishment - everything hippies rebelled against. But the
most visible element of Forman's irony is in the finale -
black humour in those scenes doesn't hamper its strong
emotional impact.
Musical aspect of HAIR is superb. The performers are up to
the task, including John Savage, and the musical numbers in
most cases seem natural. Forman usually doesn't allow them
to get in the way of the plot and when he does, he makes
some interesting editing experiments. One of them is "Black
Boys"/"White Boys" being used for scenes in recruiting
centre with humorous results, and another comes in the form
of equally hilarious acid trip sequence during "Electric
Blues"/"Old Fashioned Melody". Acting is also very good -
usually underrated Treat Williams gives one of his best
performances and John Savage is also very good, especially
when we compare his character to the somewhat similar role
in THE DEER HUNTER. Annie Golden as Jeannie is charming
while Beverly d'Angelo is somewhat inept and not too
attractive Sheila.
HAIR, although very likeable film, has some flaws.
Choreography by Twyla Tharp is fun to watch, but at some
times it gets too distracting. Some songs are included for
the sake of following Broadway original and the even last
scene in powerful "Let the Sunshine In" has some problems.
Basically, the last shot in Arlington is followed by the
scenes of thousands of anti-war protestors in front of the
White House. This last scene, which suggest that the Love
Generation stopped the war leaves the bitter taste in mouths
of those who know what happened to those young, idealistic
people in Reagan years and how their opinion on war changed
when they stopped worrying about getting drafted themselves.
But our cynical 1990s perspective shouldn't prevent us to
enjoy this extraordinary piece of cinema.
Review written on September 25th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Great Flamarion, The (1945)
Erich von Stroheim, Austrian-born actor, writer and director
is one of the most recognisable Hollywood icons. His image
is usually associated with silent era spectacles or his own
directorial megalomania and clashes with producers, which
made him one of the most tragic personalities of Old
Hollywood. At the end of his career, von Stroheim employed
his instantly recognisable image in various character roles.
But few of us would dare to turn von Stroheim into film
noire protagonist. In 1945, Anthony Mann did just that in
THE GREAT FLAMARION.
The plot of this film is relatively simple. Flamarion
(played by Von Stroheim) is expert marksman, who lives
ascetic life and works as performer in variety shows. His
latest act features him as an jealous husband, with two of
his assistants - beautiful Connie Wallace (played by Mary
Beth Hughes) and Al (played by Dan Duryea) playing
adulterous lovers. In real life Connie and Al are unhappy
couple; Connie can't stand living with alcoholic, abusive
and not very bright Al, but she can't divorce him either
because he knows some sinister secrets of her past. So,
Connie decides to get rid of the husband by seducing
Flamarion. Since his tragic experience with opposite sex
twenty years ago, Flamarion is resisting Connie's seduction,
but not enough. Soon he would fall in love with her and take
part in her scheme to get rid of the husband by arranging
Al's "accidental" death on the stage.
THE GREAT FLAMARION in 78 minutes of its length shows us
craftsmanship of Old Hollywood, but nothing more. All
familiar elements of film noire are here - crimes of
passion, fatal brunette, comeuppance and explanatory
flashbacks. Idea to make contrast between stage and real
life relationship between the characters seems interesting.
Actors are OK - Duryea gives very convincing and almost
sympathetic alcoholic, and Mary Beth Hughes is more than
believable as femme fatale. Unfortunately, von Stroheim
seems somewhat unconvincing in his role - his character
transforms too quickly and his character isn't explored
properly. All in all, THE GREAT FLAMARION is good film that
could be recommended for the lovers of classic cinema, but
those who want to truly appreciate von Stroheim and Mann
should try to watch other films.

Title
Review for Visions of Murder (1993) (TV)
When someone makes a trailer for a movie, and when the
product looks less attractive than its advertisement, people
usually feel cheated. But the author of this review didn't
feel that angry after having similar experience with VISIONS
OF MURDER, 1993 television thriller by Michael Ray Rhodes.
The national video distributor in my country was extremely
creative in editing various clips from the film and using
appropriate music, thus making VISIONS OF MURDER look like
an exciting blend of supernatural horror and psychological
thriller. Of course, in reality, VISIONS OF MURDER was
nothing more than conventional product of American TV
industry.
The heroine of the film is Jesse Newman (played by Barbara
Eden), ambitious psychologist that takes a new patient,
Gloria Hager (played by Anita Finlay). The young woman tells
about spousal abuse and leaves the office. Soon after that,
the therapist begins having visions and hallucinations that
involve Gloria. Those visions culminate with the vision of
Gloria's body being dumped into the sea by her husband.
Jesse Newman reports it to the police, but soon she becomes
the prime suspect in the murder investigation.
Of course, the standards of American TV movies are lower
than the standards of Hollywood feature films. But that
shouldn't be the excuse for poor quality, especially in
psychological thrillers that, like this one, don't require
big budgets to be attractive. What makes those film good are
the script, the direction and actors. VISIONS OF MURDERS
fails in all of that. The plot is turning into sentimental
overkill at the end. The direction is wooden. The characters
are uninteresting and are played by disinterested actors.
Barbara Eden practically destroys her character, but the
worst disappointment is in the form of Terry O'Quinn, who
sleepwalks through the role very similar to the one he had
brilliantly played in THE STEPFATHER. This film is
interesting only as an example how bad movies could be sold
to unsuspecting audience.
Review written on September 11th 1999

Title
Review for Shichinin no samurai (1954)
Work of art can have its quality measured by other works of
art it inspired through time. The world of seventh art has
plenty of such examples, and the best known are those which
had inspired numerous remakes through decades. Among those
remade movies the best are those that contain images,
stories and characters deeply ingrained in the collective
unconsciousness of their viewers, regardless of their
cultural background. Probably the best known of such films
is SEVEN SAMURAI, 1954 film by famous Japanese director
Akira Kurosawa. This is equally famous for being the best
example of "jidai-geki" (samurai picture) genre - Japanese
equivalent of western - and for being inspiration for
numerous other authors which had used its basic concept for
movies set in different time periods, different locations
and belonging to different genres.
The plot of this movie, loosely based on ancient Japanese
legend, is set in late 16th Century Japan. The country is in
the middle of civil war, the government authority has
collapsed and the countryside is left the roaming hordes of
bandits. One of such gangs made a habit out of plundering a
mountain village after each harvest and leaving barely
enough food for peasants to survive. This time the village
had been hit by especially hard times, and after one of the
peasants accidentally overhears bandits discussing plans for
their next visit, village council is ready to listen to
young Rikichi (played by Yoshio Tsuchiya) who wants to fight
bandits. But the villagers also know that they lack combat
skills necessary to match dozens of well- armed thugs.
Village elder Gisaku (played by Kokoden Kodo) advises them
to go to town and hire services of ronins, masterless
samurais, whose martial expertise would defend the village.
When the group of peasants come to town, they see plenty of
ronins, many of them penniless, but almost none would
humiliate himself by offering his services to common
peasants for three meals of rice per day. Their search is
fruitless until they meet Kambei Shimada (played by Takashi
Shimura), old, experienced but kind-hearted samurai who
agrees to help them. He and his apprentice/disciple
Katsushiro (played by Isao Kimura) gather four other ronins
and six of them head for the mountains, followed by vagabond
and samurai wannabe Kikujiro (played by Toshiro Mifune). The
small army arrives in the village, greeted by scepticism,
fear and distrust from the peasants, but they nevertheless
begin preparations for defence.
When Kurosawa died, many obituaries called him the God of
Cinema, and it was hardly an exaggeration. Anyone who
watches THE SEVEN SAMURAI would understand why. Fans of
Peckinpah, Lucas, Spielberg, Millius, Cameron and almost any
respected modern-day action director would see many familiar
scenes and motives in this film, made almost a half century
ago. The influence Kurosawa had on future filmmakers is
immeasurable, yet his films still look fresh, original and
very modern. THE SEVEN SAMURAI, despite its black-and-white
photography and despite its huge length (203 minutes in
original cut), can be put in the same category with action
classics like DIE HARD and ALIENS. This also explains why
Kurosawa's work sticks out as the only B&W classic among
entries in many personal Top 10 or Top 100 movie lists.
This movie is so successful because of its flawless
direction and very balanced combination of powerful human
drama and exciting action. Unlike most of the action
directors today, Kurosawa knew that the audience wouldn't be
satisfied just with the elaborate action scenes; audience
needs characters to identify with it. Script by Kurosawa,
Shinobu Hashimoto and Hideo Oguni is based on the very
simple plot, but this plot is used as base for the whole
series of interesting subplots and character studies. Never
allowing the film to become stale and boring, Kurosawa
slowly but methodically unfolds the plot and develops his
characters, less through dialogue and more through the
simple but revealing gestures. For that Kurosawa had to rely
on very talented actors and he was very lucky to have more
than adequate crew for the job. The top of the list is
Takashi Shimura, descendant of real life samurai, who gives
quiet yet powerful performance as the leader of small army;
every community in the world would probably appreciate
having someone like him in times of need. Seiji Myaguchi is
also remarkable in the role of ascetic yet deadly samurai
Kyuzo, same as Isao Kimura as young Katsushiro, forced to
learn some ugly lessons in life. Yoshio Tsuchiya is great as
Rikichi, hotheaded peasant who is deeply traumatised by
personal tragedy. The best known of them all is, of course,
Toshiro Mifune, Kurosawa's favourite actor, who gives more
than memorable portrayal of Kikujiro, lowlife who begins the
film as comic relief and gradually evolves into real hero.
Kurosawa, having such great characters and such great actors
on his disposal, established rather interesting
interactions, but that didn't interest him only on
individual level. Like very few action movies before and
after, THE SEVEN SAMURAI actually deals with broader social
issues. In the context of 16th Century Japan this issue was
class conflict between peasants and feudal class, embodied
in samurai. Kurosawa always keeps viewers aware of such
conflict - peasants and samurai can live and work together,
but this relationship is temporary and based only on short-
term interest. Both classes are inimical towards each other
- samurai look on the peasants like inferior beings, while
peasants mistrust samurai. Character of Kikujiro explicitly
explains this class conflict through memorable and powerful
monologue. This social dimension of THE SEVEN SAMURAI,
although it could be replanted from feudal Japan through
different times and places, wasn't very convincingly used in
this film's remakes (which is especially the case with
American 1960 version).
Despite having a story with universal appeal, Kurosawa has
put a lot of effort for historical accuracy in THE SEVEN
SAMURAI. Clothes, houses and folklore of 16th Century rural
Japan are painstakingly recreated, as well as the weapons
and armour of the samurai. But the best thing about this
historical reconstruction is Kurosawa's great care about
combat scene. Fighting in THE SEVEN SAMURAI doesn't just
look exciting, it is very realistic and, unlike most of the
war and action movies, it actually makes sense. Individuals
play very limited role, just like in any other war; unlike
Rambo movies with superhuman heroes that eliminate hundreds
of well-armed opponents, superior numbers, tactics, training
and firepower does matter. Samurai might be superior in
one-on-hand and hand-to-hand combat (such fights are very
short and decided in matter of seconds), but even they are
powerless against bandits' firearms. Victory comes out of
collective action, with few making painful sacrifices for
the benefits of the many. Same as in any military textbook
from Sun Zi to this day, good planning in THE SEVEN SAMURAI
plays more important role in acquiring victory than actual
fighting itself. It is marvel to watch scenes in which
Kambei, like any other good general, surveys and sketches
the future battlefield and makes mental notes about best
ways to defeat the enemy. This dimension of THE SEVEN
SAMURAI is also missed from all latter remakes.
Kurosawa was very pedantic about scenes depicting the war,
but THE SEVEN SAMURAI could hardly be seen as militaristic
propaganda. Realism in battle scenes also means that the
death in war happens without any rules; characters often die
in agony or covered with mud or similar prosaic
circumstances. War equally brings out the best and worst
from people, the latter being symbolised in brutal acts of
violence and succumbing to animalistic desires, even among
the most innocent and idealistic characters like Katsushiro.
Wars, even when they are justified and when they end with
victory, are hardly something that should be celebrated.
Kurosawa underlines this message with bittersweet finale
scene.
With the sole exception Fumio Hayasaka's musical score that
sounds a little bit old- fashioned for today's standards,
THE SEVEN SAMURAI withstood the test of time. But this is
just one of many reasons why this film earned its rightful
place as the timeless gem of world cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Vidimo se (1995) (TV)
Sorrow, disdain and repulsion are the emotions that critics 
usually felt after watching almost any Croatian film made in 
1990s. Unlike Serbia, where war, economic ruin and 
authoritarian regime didn't seem to affect filmmakers' 
creativity, Croatian filmmakers constantly failed to rise 
above those limitations. Reason for that can be found in the 
state being the only source of finances for dying film 
industry, which resulted in contents of those films being 
more or less synchronised with the rigid nationalist 
ideology of President Tudjman and his ruling party. This was 
especially evident in films that dealt with 1991-95 war in 
Croatia and almost always offered one-sided, simplistic view 
of that conflict and often degenerated into cheap propaganda 
that turned Goebbels into master of subtlety. However, 
mostly thanks to Ivo Stivicic, one of the more liberal 
managers of Croatian state television, there were some 
titles that managed to bend those rules and offer somewhat 
grittier and more realistic view of the war that would later 
haunt Croatia to this day. Among them the most celebrated 
was VIDIMO SE, 1995 television drama written and directed by 
Ivan Salaj. 
The plot revolves about five young men who used to be best 
childhood friends. In summer of 1981 they spend idyllic time 
in the woods and make a solemn promise to bury each other in 
their favourite spot. Ten years later newly independent 
Croatia is fighting desperate war against Serb rebels backed 
by Serb-dominated military of former Yugoslavia. It is 
Autumn, city of Vukovar has fallen, Croatian morale is at 
all-time low and another conflict - between 
government-controlled National Guard and extreme right- wing 
militia HOS - threatens to increase the bloodshed. Five 
friends meet again- first one is studying in Germany in 
order to avoid draft, second is guilt-stricken for not 
volunteering to fight, third is an heroin addict and fourth 
Maks (played by Goran Visnjic), member of HOS, obviously 
unable to accommodate himself to civilian life. The fifth 
member of the group was recently killed in action, and his 
funeral is the reason for their reunion. After re-evaluating 
their own lives and thinking about idyllic past and 
uncertain future, four friends decide to honour their 
childhood pledge. 
Ivan Salaj spent some time on the front with a camera, and 
the result of his efforts, HOTEL SUNJA, is one of the best 
documentaries that dealt with the wars of former Yugoslavia. 
Because of seeing the war and its destructive effects first 
hand, Salaj knew what this film was all about and, 
therefore, refused to follow the rules of Croatian 1990s war 
films. In Salaj's film, the war of 1991-95 is presented less 
a heroic struggle between good and evil and more as a sum of 
individual tragedies, the worst of them all being the loss 
of innocence. In this film the picture of Croatia is 
extremely bleak - entire generation is doomed; uncertain 
future awaits those who won't be killed in war or fall prey 
to drugs, alcohol or PTSP and they are going to forever be 
haunted by seeing their childhood dreams shattered in most 
brutal way imaginable. The only way for protagonists of this 
film to justify their existence is through rebellion that 
manifests itself in action against spiritual (cursing God) 
or mundane authority (embodied in police). 
Sincerity of its author, as well as an excellent way in he 
reconstructed the bleak atmosphere with meagre financial 
resources at his disposal - all that makes VIDIMO SE into 
one of the best films produced in 1990s Croatia. Because of 
that, even some major flaws can be forgiven. One of those 
flaws - bad direction of few action scenes - can be 
explained with the low budget. The other - terrible acting - 
is something that is common to almost any 1990s Croatian 
film. The only exception comes in the form of Goran Visnjic 
(of later ER fame) who simply radiates charisma as socially 
challenged black-clad stormtrooper. Although there were 
better films made in 1990s Croatia, VIDIMO SE is 
nevertheless one of the most important. Whenever someone 
asks what was Croatia 1991 really like, this film is going 
to provide part of the answer. Unfortunately, judging by the 
way the recent events are unfolding, millions of people in 
the rest of the world might very easily find to have a lot 
in common with the characters of VIDIMO SE. 
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax 
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Dogs of War, The (1980)
While it was part of former Yugoslavia, my country, Croatia,
used to be almost completely ignored by Western films in
general. Words "Croatia" and "Croatians" were unheard, even
in movies whose plots actually took place on Croatian
locations. The rare exception was THE DOGS OF WAR, 1980
adaptation of Frederick Forsyth's bestselling novel, yet
that rare occasion only added insult to the injury, by
mentioning Croatians in most unflattering context. In a
single line they are referred as a bunch of mean people,
probably terrorists, who happen to remove parts of arm
dealers' stomachs when they are unsatisfied with the quality
of merchandise.
Same line also illustrates the milieu where the movie takes
place - dark and violent world of shady international deals
with the blurred boundaries between business, politics and
crime. The movie protagonist, Shannon (Christopher Walken)
is a mercenary who spent the best years of his life fighting
numerous little wars all over the globe. His latest job is a
intelligence mission for powerful mining corporation that
demands information about political climate in West African
nation of Zangaro. Shannon arrives in that country only to
find oppressive regime of President Kimba, bloodthirsty
madman whose brutality crushed any opposition and scared
almost any Westerners away. After being arrested and
tortured by Kimba's secret police, Shannon leaves country
with a help of British journalist North (Colin Blakely).
Upon return, he is approached by mining company again, but
this time they want him to plan and execute the coup d'etat
against Kimba. Shannon reluctantly agrees and assembles
small group of his surviving mercenary friends who begin
meticulous preparation for another small war.
Thing that separates THE DOGS OF WAR from conventional
action movies, especially those made in 1980s, is its
authenticity, almost close to documentary. It shouldn't
surprise anyone, because the author of the novel, Frederick
Forsyth, made reputation by blending fiction with real life,
thus creating interesting, exciting yet very believable
plots for his books. Those plots were also responsible for
few very successful 1970s thrillers, and one of them,
Zinnemman's THE DAY OF THE JACKAL, is now considered a
classic in that genre. This one deals with soldiers of
fortune, ancient tradition that was resurrected in great
turmoil of 1960s and 1970s and filled the void left by
vanishing colonial empires. Unlike WILD GEESE, that used it
as a pretext for conventional action adventure, script by
George Malko and Gary De Vore (author whose death last year
became real life mystery) is serious, and instead of action
puts emphasis on characters and prosaic details of their
work. The movie doesn't try to romanticise the mercenary
profession nor glorify mercenaries as some kind of
superheroes; they are simply shown as deadly yet expendable
tool of powerful forces with questionable agenda.
Christopher Walken played in many movies, yet very rarely we
can see him in a leading role. His performance in this film
perhaps isn't breathtaking, yet adequate. His notoriously
expressionless face is perfect illustration of the
disillusioned, world- weary man whose alienation from the
"normal" way of life becomes complete and only remaining
ideal is loyalty to the shrinking circle of friends.
Although the movie doesn't lack capable actors, their roles
are miniature compared with Walken's, and only Colin Blakely
as cynical reporter has opportunity to portray his
character. However, those who look familiar faces would find
them plenty in THE DOGS OF WAR - Tom Berenger, Paul Freeman,
Jo Beth Williams, Victoria Tennant (in brief cameo), and
biggest surprise is Ed O'Neill (of MARRIED WITH CHILDREN
fame) as Shannon's reluctant colleague.
This was the first major production for John Irvin, and it
shows why he earned the reputation of capable, yet second
class director. With the good script he can make very good
movie, with the bad script he can make real mess. Luckily,
THE DOGS OF WAR had a good script. Irvin's direction was
very ascetic and it gave the movie almost documentary feel.
The only distraction is dramatic music of Geoffrey Burgon,
used on the wrong places. In the final battle scene, where
we can see mercenaries at work, Irvin shows us that modern
warfare means superior firepower and tactics, unlike 1980s
Ramboesque fantasies that rely on macho superheroes.
Unfortunately, by making battle realistic Irvin made it
somewhat less attractive and his sloppy editing also didn't
help. But, despite those shortcomings, this movie remains
interesting and rare combination of action thriller and
gritty, realistic political drama.

Title
Review for Congo (1995)
Best-selling author Michael Chricton, same as his colleague
Stephen King, hadn't got much luck in adaptations of his
books into movies. At least this was the case in 1990s when
all those efforts, with an exception of JURASSIC PARK,
produced disappointing results. The worst disappointment of
them all was probably CONGO, 1995 adventure thriller
directed by Frank Marshall.
The plot begins in the jungles of Central Africa, somewhere
on the border of Congo and its politically unstable states.
R.B. Travis (played by Jon Doe Baker), greedy CEO of
Houston-based corporation, has sent his own son Charles
(played by Bruce Campbell) into the area in order to search
for world's largest diamonds - necessary ingredient for the
lasers his corporation was about develop. When communication
between Houston and Charles' jungle camp gets lost, Travis
hires Charles' former fiancee and ex-CIA agent Dr. Karen
Ross (played by Laura Linney) in order to locate him. When
Dr. Ross arrives in Central Africa she is soon accompanied
by few characters who are going to join her expedition for
their own reasons -Dr. Peter Elliott (played by Dylan Walsh)
is a researcher who wants to bring his talking gorilla to a
natural habitat; Herkemer Homolka is "Romanian
philantropist" who dreams of finding a treasure within a
lost city somewhere in the jungle, while Monroe Kelly
(played by Ernie Hudson) happens to be U.S. mercenary with
his own agenda.
CONGO was supposed to be a combination of late 20th Century
techno-thriller and old-fashioned adventure film about lost
treasures in distant, exotic lands. Unfortunately, Patrick
Shanley's script failed to properly employ both components
and the movie fell flat, not even managing to become a
parody of those two genres. The result is an anachronistic
mess made of cliched characters and situations that looks
like a cheap copy of Indiana Jones films and ends with
unsatisfying deus ex machina finale. Director Frank Marshall
is definitely unable to compensate flaws of such script, and
some actors don't help either, including Tim Curry whose
over-the-top performance looks more irritating than funny.
His colleagues, on the other hand, look mostly
disinterested, probably knowing that even with their best
efforts CONGO won't be a film to be particularly proud of.
Review written on September 19th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Breakaway (1996)
Salaries of Hollywood top actors are getting obscenely large
these days and many find this to be the main reason for
skyrocketing movie budgets. Actors who demand such salaries
might be greedy, but in some instances they are quite
justified, because many films would never be watched or even
made without their participation. Proof for that can be
found even in the realm of low-budget movies, and one fine
example is BREAKAWAY, 1995 thriller directed by Sean Dash
and starring (in)famous figure skater Tonya Harding.
Face of Tonya Harding is most prominently featured on
movie's poster, but the main star of the film is Terri
Thompson who plays Myra, attractive woman who works as a
courier for gangster. One day she decides to retire, but her
employers are anything but enthusiastic about that.
Realising that her life suddenly became worthless, Myra
starts running for her life, followed by professional
assassins.
Terri Thompson being the actual star of the film instead of
Tonya Harding becomes quite understandable after the scenes
that feature former figure skater. Although Tonya Harding
displays convincing martial arts abilities, her acting
leaves much to be desired. On the other hand, her
disappointing efforts are hardly out of place in the film
that lacks originality, believable characters and situations
and actually represents anything that gave B-films a bad
name. Martin Sheen's brother Joe Estevez, whose character
looks like he had entered from another movies' set, is the
only bright spot of BREAKAWAY. Unfortunately, he appears in
this film too little too late to prevent viewers from
realising why Tonya Harding's silver screen debut proved to
be her last film.
Review written on September 22nd 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Net, The (1995)
In the beginning of 1996 users of Croatian bulletin boards
services participated in the poll designed to establish
popularity of Hollywood starlets. The winner of this
popularity contest was Sandra Bullock, young actress who had
just became a star by appearing in SPEED. However, Croatian
modem geeks probably chose Bullock because of the interview
in which she had mentioned her own Internet surfing habits.
For the geeks, whole idea of Bullock being "one of us"
nicely corresponded with her down-to-earth "girl next door"
image, most responsible for her popularity. Whether
intentional or not, the aforementioned statement was
supposed to help the ticket sales for THE NET, 1995
cyber-thriller directed by Irwin Winkler.
In this film Sandra Bullock plays Angela Bennett, computer
expert who became so addicted to on-line communication that
she barely leaves her house. One day Dale Hessman (played by
Dan MacKinnon), an on-line friend and fellow computer
expert, sends her a program that seems to allow access to
most secret government and business databases. After
MacKinnon dies in mysterious airplane crash, Angela goes to
vacation in Mexico where she meets suave Jack Devlin (played
by Jeremy Northam), who later turns out to be assassin hired
to kill her. She manages to run back to States only to find
her entire existence literally erased - somebody has
tampered with her files within various government
institutions and replaced them with files belonging to the
convicted felon. Now she is forced to run for her life and
evade both the assassins and police. It becomes clear that
the disk is the key of mystery.
As one of the first Hollywood films to actually tackle new
phenomenon of Internet, THE NET can be forgiven for not
being too successful in this endeavour. Unfortunately,
scriptwriters John D. Brancato and Michael Ferris can't be
forgiven for using the emerging world of on-line
communication as nothing more than an excuse for weak plot,
full of situations and characters that became cliches in
Hitchcock's time. Hollywood's technophobia and exploitations
of popular sentiments against Bill Gates (who is thinly
disguised in the form of movie's chief villain) are only a
backdrop in rather predictable story of a single protagonist
on the run from seemingly omnipotent Bad Guys. There are
plenty of scenes that are completely unneccessary (like
Angela's visit to her Alzheimer- stricken mother), full of
plot holes or simply don't work. Jeremy Northam is terribly
miscast as one of the film's villain. Although her character
looks too good for someone who is supposed to spend days
sitting in front of monitor, Sandra Bullock, on the other
hand, uses all of her charms and talents to make her
character believable and her efforts are at least partially
successful. Her role alone is the only reason why this film
should receive a passing grade, but this is not enough for
recommending this film to anyone except Bullock's fans and
those interested to see how Hollywood treated Internet in
mid 1990s.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Where Eagles Dare (1969)
Action movies, like any other genre, tend to change through
time. Today it is impossible to imagine action spectacle
being scripted by renowned novelist and having a theatre
legend in the leading role. But thirty years ago this was
quite normal for Hollywood, and one of the better examples
for this practice can be found in WHERE EAGLES DARE, 1969
World War Two action spectacle directed by Brian G. Hutton.
The screenplay was written by Alistair MacLean, prolific
author of popular action-packed novels (many of them later
into popular films, including GUNS OF NAVARONE), while the
lead was played by Richard Burton, actor who was until this
time associated only with serious dramatic roles.
The plot begins in early months of 1944, when two leaders of
British intelligence - Vice Admiral Rolland (played by
Michael Hordern) and Colonel Turner (played by Patrick
Wymarck) - summon top Allied covert operatives for important
mission deep in the heart of Nazi-controlled Europe. Few
days ago Allied plane was shot down over Southern Bavaria,
and team of commandos under British Major Smith (played by
Richard Burton) must liberate captured U.S. general before
he reveals important information about upcoming D-Day
invasion to German intelligence. Smith's team, wearing
German uniforms, is parachuted into Southern Bavaria, near
the "Castle of the Eagles", mountain fortress where the
General is being held. Actually getting to the fortress is
difficult, because it is accessible only by helicopter and
cable car. But this is the least of Smith's problems,
because some members of his team start getting killed in
suspicious circumstances and Germans seems to be aware of
their presence. Lt. Schaeffer (played by Clint Eastwood),
only American in the team, is also baffled by these events
but he also starts doubting the true purpose of the mission.
WHERE EAGLES DARE is bound to be always compared to GUNS OF
NAVARONE, its better-known predecessor, also based on
MacLean's text. Both films (and novels, since MacLean later
turned his script into novel) feature small band of Allied
commandos deep behind Nazi lines in a covert yet spectacular
mission against all odds - formula which was used in many
popular WW2 films in 1960s. Pure action is combined with
complex plot twists and uncertain allegiances of main
characters. Unlike GUNS OF NAVARONE, viewers actually have
to wait whole hour before the first action scene (and this
is the reason why the viewers accustomed to
Bruckheimmer/Silver type of action movie might find it
overlong and boring), but when the action actually starts,
it never stops until the end and features endless shootouts,
explosions, car chases, general mayhem and bodycounts that
could put even Hong Kong directors to shame. Those viewers
who are patient enough to sit through the first hour are
going to be awarded with very good stuntwork, excellent
pyrotechnics and special effects that look convincing even
after three decades. And even the scenes that aren't that
spectacular - like the fight on the cable car roof - are so
well done that they would be remembered long after the rest
of the film is forgotten.
Unfortunately, WHERE EAGLES DARE, like many other action
films, loses a lot of its value whenever someone takes it
seriously. There should be more suspension of disbelief than
usual to accept easiness in which our protagonists enter and
leave heavily defended Nazi fortresses and airports, dodge
thousands of bullets and, despite overwhelming numerical
inferiority, manage to cause more casualties to Wehrmacht
than those suffered in the course of certain major WW2
campaigns. In the end viewers might even start to feel sorry
for all those multitudes of Germans who constantly get
stabbed, strangled, shot, torched and blown without any
chance to fight back. Obvious invulnerability of
protagonists comes with the complete lack of complex
characterisation - they are presented as stone-cold and
emotionless killing machines we couldn't care less about.
Even the actors show no desire to breathe some air into
their cardboard character, and this is especially evident in
the obligatory romantic coupling of Richard Burton's and
Mary Ure's character. The supporting players, as usual, are
those who steal the show - Patrick Wymarck as half- mad
Colonel Turner and Darren Nesbitt as frustrated Gestapo
officer. However, excellent Alpine locations and equally
impressive musical score by Ron Goodwin are more than enough
to turn these two and half hours of non-stop action into
pleasant viewing experience.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Wyatt Earp (1994)
In the early 1990s western fans saw one of the many revivals
of their favourite genre. However, this time it happened
during the zenith of "political correctness" in Hollywood,
so the entire idea of "western renaissance" was associated
with the need to paint Old West in colours more suitable for
modern political sensibilities. Former heroes who had
brought the civilisation and American of life to the
Frontier were suddenly transformed into wife beaters,
homicidal psychopaths and fascist thugs responsible for the
genocide of Native Americans and the rape of virgin natural
environment. In the climate when the old myths got replaced
with new ones, even the real life legends of the Old West
had to go through revisionist makeover. That included Wyatt
Earp, lawman whose life had inspired numerous Hollywood
films through the decades, mostly centred on his role in the
gunfight at O.K. Corral. In 1993/1994 Hollywood brought two
new versions of that story. While the first, George P.
Cosmatos' TOMBSTONE, remained loyal to the past conventions
of the genre, WYATT EARP, written and directed by Lawrence
Kasdan, was more ambitious effort.
In this film Kasdan tries to fill the blank left by almost
every other filmmaker who had dealt with Earp - his life
prior to the fateful events in Tombstone. So, in this film
we follow how Wyatt Earp (played by Kevin Costner) grew up
to become the law enforcement legend of the Old West. In the
first scenes we are introduced to his family, led by
patriarchal figure of Nicholas Earp (played by Gene
Hackman), lawyer who wants Wyatt to follow his footsteps and
make career as respected citizen. At first, Wyatt follows
his footsteps, but the tragic death of first wife Urilla
(played by Anabeth Gish) would lead him to alcoholism,
gambling, and other form of anti-social behaviour. After he
barely avoided hanging for the horse theft in Arkansas Wyatt
decides to sober up and seeks new life in the West. There he
would switch many careers until his efficiency of the law
enforcer in the rowdy Middle West cattle towns earns him
reputation of the legend. That reputation would become very
useful when he retires and goes to Tombstone, Arizona in
order to seek fortune together with their brothers. In the
ensuing conflict with rival clans of Clantons his friendship
with terminally ill gambler and gunslinger Doc Holliday
(played by Dennis Quaid) would be equally useful.
Kasdan probably thought that the epic scope is the way to
make his treatment of Wyatt Earp different from other films.
He provides that epic scope by widespread use of James
Newton Howard's music and panoramic shots, but the most
"epic" thing about WYATT EARP is its three-hour length. In
other circumstances, those 189 minutes would bring texture
to the story and character, but this time the long run only
reveals the weakness in the script. Kasdan, one of
Hollywood's most talented screenwriters, seems overwhelmed
with the ambitious task to give more modern, historically
accurate and less flattering picture of Wyatt Earp while
remaining loyal to the myth in the same time. So, in the
first hour or so, the film meanders into banal and not very
significant episodes concerning Wyatt Earp's early life -
relations with his family and opposite sex or early career
choices, When we get to the point that should be the most
interesting- gunfight at the O.K. Corral - Kasdan rushes the
pace of the film to the predictable conclusion, without
bothering to explain the background of the said event and
thus leaving audience unsatisfied.
The length of the film could be explained by the influence
of Kevin Costner, Kasdan's long time associate. Costner, who
became star by playing another American law enforcement
legend in THE UNTOUCHABLES, probably tried to stay on the
screen as long as possible, so perhaps this is the reason
why WYATT EARP has many scenes that should have been cut.
Costner, however, delivers the goods and his portrayal of
Earp is commendable, but unfortunately, it can't compensate
contradictions in the story and characterisation.
Furthermore, although WYATT EARP has the truly stellar cast,
none of Costner's colleagues, with the possible exception of
Hackman in rather routine role of his father, has room for
more than couple of lines. The most tragic thing happened
with Dennis Quaid, who allowed himself to lose 20 kilograms
of his weight only to accurately portray terminally ill Doc
Holliday. That should have been truly marvellous role, but
Kasdan didn't use its potential, so Quaid's performance
looks inferior to Kilmer's portrayal of the same character
in TOMBSTONE. Actually, any kind of comparison between two
films is very unflattering to Kasdan's effort - while
TOMBSTONE looks like standard Hollywood entertainment that
delivers the goods, WYATT EARP is pseudo-"artsy" epic that
sinks under the weight of its authors' ambitions.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Quiz Show (1994)
These days game shows are viewed as symbol of everything
which is false and artificial on television. But few decades
ago, in the pioneering days of the new media, perception of
game shows was completely different. In 1950s America quiz
shows were not just the most popular form of television -
they were viewed as the living embodiment of American Dream.
They gave Average Joes their chance for instant fame and
fortune. They also awarded good old traditional values like
hard work and education over physical looks, strengths and
luck - those qualities beyond the reach of mere mortals. But
in 1958 that belief was forever shattered with a scandal
that would gradually turn American Dream into nightmare...
At least this is what screenwriter Paul Attanasio and
director Robert Redford are trying to convince us in their
1994 drama QUIZ SHOW.
The plot of the film is based on the true story that began
in 1958. In that time the most popular television show is
NBC's "Twenty One". For several weeks one of its
contestants, Herbert Stempel (played by John Turturro) is on
the winning streak, earning huge amounts of money in the
process. Producers, on the other hand, don't share his
enthusiasm because New York Jew with the bad teeth can't
make sponsors happy. So, they pressure Stempel to take a
dive and find new, more suitable contestant in the form of
Charles Van Doren (played by Ralph Fiennes), good-looking
WASP college professor belonging to American intellectual
aristocracy. After few months, disgruntled Stempel
unsuccessfully tries to alert public about the rigging but
his efforts are fruitless until he meets with ambitious
congressional investigator Richard Goodwin (played by Rob
Morrow).
Redford again showed his good directorial skills and the
recreation of late 1950s is almost flawless. The acting is
great - Ralph Fiennes is good choice for charismatic
intellectual unable to cope with difficult moral choices;
Turturro makes great contrast as victim nobody feels sorry
for and Morrow is great as relentless, idealist public
crusader. QUIZ SHOW is, therefore, film that shouldn't
disappoint the audience. But the same audience probably has
few reasons to be very enthusiastic about this piece of
cinema. Reason for that lies in antiquated subject matter.
Rigging of game shows perhaps represented something quite
shocking for 1950s public, but for newer generations, those
raised on Watergate, Iran-Contra and Clinton presidency and
those who now take media manipulation for granted, this
"scandal" looks terribly insignificant. Those viewers could
hardly accept Redford's view of these events as something
that represented "the loss of American innocence". At least
not without some sort of irony, but the irony is something
this film terribly lacks. Redford takes everything in this
film too seriously, and, in the end, this film looks
outdated and quixotic, resembling one of its characters in
his last futile crusade against emerging power of
television. However, this cinematic effort, although failed
and, ironically, better suited for television as a medium,
still represents one of more interesting (and rare) examples
of socially conscious 1990s Hollywood films.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Holy Matrimony (1994)
The easiest part of every criminal career is committing
crimes; getting away is what differentiates successful from
unsuccessful criminals. Same goes for the female protagonist
of HOLY MATRIMONY, 1994 comedy by Leonard Nimoy. Havana
(played by Patricia Arquette) and her boyfriend Peter
(played by Tate Donovan) rob state fair and cross the border
into Canada, where Peter, prodigal son of Hutterite family,
would seek shelter among his folks, with Havana posing as
his future bride. The idea is to hide money, get married and
live as good Hutterites until police abandon the search.
Unfortunately, Peter dies in car crash without telling
Havana where he had stashed the money. Havana, who took
great pains to adapt her worldly ways to simple Hutterite
lifestyle, is desperate. However, the obscure biblical
custom would rescue her plans - according to Hutterite
tradition, widow must be proposed by the deceased's younger
brother. Community elders see this as formality but Havana,
at the surprise of everyone, accepts to marry Peter's
12-year old brother Zeke (played by Joseph Gordon-Levitate).
Zeke actually can't stand Havana and correctly assumes that
Havana had some unsavoury motives.
David Weisberg's script for HOLY MATRIMONY probably looked
great on paper. This interesting mix of GETTING EVEN WITH
DAD and WITNESS had more in it than simple "high concept" -
story and characters offered numerous opportunities for
humour based on cultural, generational and gender gaps, all
wrapped in neat feelgood package of family entertainment.
Leonard Nimoy, who already had experience with this sort of
films while doing U.S. version of THREE MEN AND THE BABY,
seemed like a good choice for director. Unfortunately, while
Nimoy wisely decided not to take sides in Hutterite vs.
outside world conflict (even when their strict obedience of
biblical laws led to unpleasant results like institutional
paedophilia), he nevertheless missed opportunity to give
more insight into Hutterite world, their lifestyles and
worldviews. The film also suffered from bad pacing,
unnecessary subplot involving maniacal FBI agent and weak
and not very believable happy ending. Acting was good -
Patricia Arquette didn't seem tired from another role of
fugitive (she had played similar characters in TROUBLEBOUND
and TRUE ROMANCE in previous years) while young
Gordon-Levitt showed that even the children who lack
Culkin's cuteness might carry the film. In the end, HOLY
MATRIMONY, while amusing in some part, nevertheless gives
impression of a film with too many missed opportunities.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Scarlet Street (1945)
In few last decades Hollywood producers were very often
using critically and commercially successful film from
France for their own remakes. For many critics, such
practice was the sign that American cinema, at least the
segment associated with big studios, begins to lack the last
sparks of originality. However, remaking French films isn't
such new phenomenon in Hollywood. It happened even half a
century ago, but the results were usually much better than
today. That was the case with LA CHIENNE, 1931 classic by
Rene Clair. In 1945 it was remade as SCARLET STREET, classic
film noire by Fritz Lang.
Plot of the film is set in New York City. Christopher Cross
(played by Edward G. Robinson) is cashier who has nothing in
life except his job, gold watch and shrewish wife Adele
(played by Rosalind Ivan). One night he accidentally
stumbles in dark alley and rescues beautiful Kitty March
(played by Joann Bennett) from a street thug. Almost
immediately he falls in love with her, never knowing that
Kitty actually works on the streets for living and that the
thug happened to be her abusive boyfriend Johnny (played by
Dan Dureya). Of course, Christopher, blinded by the feeling
of love he hadn't felt for decades, lies too. Since his
hobby is amateur painting, he presents himself as successful
and wealthy artist. Kitty sees that as an opportunity to get
a lot of money, and these misunderstanding are just the
first in the spiral of events that would lead to ironic and
tragic finale.
Although SCARLET STREET belongs to the realm of film noirs,
viewers accustomed to more conventional examples of that
genre would have some difficulties cataloguing it as such.
Reason is in the script by Dudley Nichols, which brings
refreshing mix of drama, tragedy and devastatingly black
humour, that would seem somewhat out of place in standard
film noirs. People are not supposed to laugh at the
characters and situations in film noirs, but this is the
case here. To make this achievement even more unusual, the
characters are played by small army of very capable actors.
Edward G. Robinson as Chris Cross gives probably one of his
best performances; his character is flawed, artistic soul,
intelligent enough to deceive people but blinded by feelings
and unable to detect deception himself. Since we could meet
such small, inconspicuous people every day at street, his
tragedy gets very close to viewers. Joann Bennett is also
very good as not so bright femme fatale, but Dan Duryea
steals the show. His character is painted in most
unflattering light, he even doesn't look like someone who
could steal women's hearts, but Duryea plays him as someone
who could invoke audience's sympathy in the end. Fritz Lang
as director brought some of the European feeling into this
film. First of all, his New York doesn't look like American
metropolis. Instead, it looks like any big European town,
with slang phrases spoken by Bennett and Duryea as the only
clear national identification. But the biggest original
contribution by Lang is his ironic portrayal of New York art
world - critics, dealers and artist wannabes (with
always-reliable Vladimir Sokoloff in one of such supporting
roles). It is a real shame that the movie was made in black
and white; paintings that play important role in the plot
should have been displayed in their full glory. However,
this isn't the only problem SCARLET STREET had. Tragicomical
irony of the film and unexpected finale is compromised with
too dark overtones in the epilogue. Those last scenes,
although powerful in its own way, seem somewhat out of place
and nothing more than Lang's concession to censors, unable
to digest unconventional finale. On the other hand, despite
those flaws, this film is real gem of the Old Hollywood, the
one that justifies the existence of remakes.

Title
Review for Crimson Tide (1995)
In the week following WTC bombing, many commentators
couldn't fail to notice that America, same as many other
countries in history, had its military prepared to fight the
past rather than the future war. Same thing can be said for
Hollywood, since in many 1990s films Russians continued to
be convenient villains and the source of greatest danger for
Western world, all that despite the collapse of Soviet
Empire and its would-be successors being pathethic losers
unable to restore the Evil Empire even in their back yard.
One of such examples can be found in the plot of CRIMSON
TIDE, 1995 submarine thriller directed by Tony Scott. The
story begins with civil war erupting in Russia and
anti-Western rebels seizing nuclear base in Vladivostok.
American nuclear submarine "USS Alabama", commanded by old
and experienced Captain Frank Ramsey (played by Gene
Hackman), is sent to Pacific in order to watch over the base
and retaliate in case of rebels launching nuclear strike on
America. In the last minute his XO is replaced by Lieutenant
Ron Hunter (played by Denzel Washington), intellectual whose
humanist ideas of waging war create discomfort in
no-nonsense Captain. Two of them are going to settle their
differences, at least temporarily, as their vessel
approcahes hostile waters and gets engaged in conflict with
Russian renegade submarine. As a result, the communication
equipment is damaged, but not after receiving the order to
launch nuclear strike. This order was, however, followed
with another one, which is interrupted and can't be
deciphred. While Captain Ramsey wants to follow the order
and launch the strike, his XO is convinced that the next
message represents the cancellation of the original order.
Not wanting to risk start of nuclear exchange over
communication failure, Hunter starts a mutiny aboard the
submarine.
CRIMSON TIDE is not the film that should enter Top 100
lists, but it nevertheless represents one of the brighter
spots in the career of Jerry Bruckheimer and Don Simpson.
The reason for that can be found in the script by Michael
Schiffer that manages to rise above the cliches and
predictability of action film formula, and this
accomplishment is even more impressive when we consider that
CRIMSON TIDE in its original form became the object of
script-doctoring by numerous writers like Robert Towne,
Steven Zaillian and Quentin Tarantino. Usually the
screenwriting by committee produces disastrous results, but
not this time. The suspense and the action in this film is
clearly constrained within the framework of the plot and
terrible dilemma facing the main characters - whether to act
and risk starting nuclear holocaust or show restraint and
allow mother country to be anihillated. Even more
interesting thing about CRIMSON TIDE is that this film
doesn't take sides in this debate - both viewpoints are
shown to be valid and justifiable under the circumstances.
Good direction by Tony Scott and strong acting performances
by Hackman, Washington and numerous character actors (among
which Viggo Mortensen and George Dzundza are the most
impressive) guarantee that this film is going to be as
entertaining as it was thought-provoking. Even the usual
Hollywood cop out ending and sometimes too boring musical
score by Hans Zimmer aren't enough to diminish generally
positive impression given by this film, one of the rare
1990s action films that is going to be as engaging now as it
was half a decade ago.
Review written on September 19th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for New Eden (1994) (TV)
Fans of BLAKE'S SEVEN would probably think of the opening
episode of their favourite TV show being inspiration for the
opening shots of NEW EDEN, 1994 science fiction film
directed by Alan Metzger. The film begins with huge
spaceship that carries prisoners to distant planet that
serves as a prison colony. Upon arrival on the desert planet
called Earth 21-523, the prisoners are unceremoniously
dumped and left to fend for themselves. Most fall prey to
the bandits or try to join their ranks, but young idealistic
engineer Adams (played by Stephen Baldwin) chooses another
path and tries to improve life of small nomadic tribe by
showing them benefits of irrigation. Such efforts would,
however, lead to the conflict with some of his former
friends.
NEW EDEN is made with small budget, but it starts looking
really cheap only when we realise that the distant alien
planet is desert-like not only to due to the lacking budget,
but also due to the lacking creativity of their makers.
After a brief intro, NEW EDEN starts resembling multitudes
of cheap post-apocalyptic action films made in 1980s after
success of MAD MAX. The impression is even worse when we
take into account ESCAPE OF ABSALOM, similar futuristic
prison movie that had the decency of employing somewhat
different setting. However, Dan Gordon's script manages to
overcome at least some post-apocalyptic cliches - the
protagonist is idealistic intellectual instead of Rambo-like
killing machine, and Stephen Baldwin seems more suitable for
playing the former type of characters. Another bright spot
in this film is Tobin Bell in rather interesting role, so
different from many psychopaths and villains he had to play
during his career. But his efforts would won't improve the
general impression of this film. Although not among the
worst example, NEW EDEN is one of those cheap science
fiction films that often give bad name to the entire genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Bridge on the River Kwai, The (1957)
Once upon a time, there were movies called "larger than
life". They appeared in 1950s, in order to help Hollywood
survive the challenge issued by the new medium of
television. Such films featured stuff small screen could
not: cinemascope, bright colours, exotic locations, truly
epic stories and spectacles with thousands of extras. Some
of those films slid into obscurity, others got their Academy
Awards and became the most precious part of cinema legacy,
often causing filmophiles to lament good old times.
Undisputed master of that genre was David Lean, one of the
greatest British directors who ever lived. In the latter
part of his career he made five such great films, and two of
them are regarded as masterpieces. The first one was THE
BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI, 1957 war spectacle than won seven
Academy awards and later became praised as one of the best
anti-war films ever made.
The plot of this film is based on the novel by French author
Pierre Boulle (whose work would later inspire another great
film, PLANET OF THE APES). However, the novel, as well and
the film, found its basis in one often forgotten but ghastly
episode of World War Two. In 1942, following Pearl Harbor,
Japanese forces overcame weak British defences and conquered
Malaya and Burma. However, the Jewel of the Crown - India -
remained out of their reach, not because of weakened British
defences, but because of their own logistical problems. For
the supply of their troops on Burmese front, Japanese
couldn't rely on their navy, already over-stretched with
surprisingly successful Pacific conquests. So, the land
supply route had to be made, and Japanese began to build the
railway that would connect Japanese-controlled Burma with
the supply bases in Thailand. Such task was hard, because
the railroad had to be built through the hundred kilometres
of thick, wild jungle. The least of all problems was the
workforce - Japanese used tens of thousands of captured
Allied soldiers and hundreds of thousands of natives as
slave labour. After sixteen months of hard labour the
railroad was finished, but the death toll among the
captives, exhausted by heat, disease and Japanese
mistreatment was horrible, and the railroad deserved its
nickname Railway of Death.
The film begins in February 1943, in the Prison Camp No. 16,
commanded by Colonel Saito (played by Sessue Hayakawa), who
is faced with a problem. He is ordered to finish the bridge
over the river Kwai before May 12th, but the task is almost
impossible, since the almost all camp prisoners succumbed to
the harsh conditions of prison life. Their replacement comes
in the form of battalion of British prisoners, commanded by
Colonel Nicholson (played by Alec Guiness). Nicholson is
obsessed with order and military discipline and wants to
maintain it, even as prisoner; so he refuses Saito's orders
to take part in manual labour, which is, according to Geneva
Convention, forbidden for officers. Of course, that leads to
dramatic confrontation and Saito wants to make Nicholson
change his mind through torture. While those two Colonels
are obsessed with desire to save face, US Navy Commander
Shears (played by William Holden) is more concerned with his
own survival; knowing that his chances in the jungle are
better than in the camp, he escapes. Few weeks later, Saito,
pressed with mounting deadline and frustrated with the lack
of progress, concedes defeat and allows Nicholson and other
officers to be spared from manual labour. Instead of
gloating, Nicholson decides to actually co-operate with
Saito and help him build the bridge; in his mind, this
successful completion of such task would regain dignity,
moral and discipline of his men. In the meantime, Shears has
miraculously survived the jungle and reached the safety of
British- controlled Ceylon. There he is shown to be
impostor, enlisted man who had took the false identity of an
officer in order to get privileges. In order to evade court
martial, he accepts the deal that brings him back to the
last place he would want to go - to the bridge on the river
Kwai, this time as a member of commando team, led by Major
Warden (played by Jack Hawkins), determined to blow up still
unfinished bridge.
Usually, when we are talking about anti-war films, wars
depicted in them are those that have gained reputation of
senseless slaughter, like WW1 and Vietnam. WW2, as much
clearer example of Good vs. Evil, seemed like unsuitable
example for anti-war message. But not for David Lean,
dedicated pacifist, who probably had rough time reconciling
his own beliefs with ugly reality of Britain being
threatened by Hitler. That author was probably the most
suitable for this film that very explicitly equals war with
madness. Lean wasn't the only one who had troubles because
of his beliefs - screenwriters Carl Foreman and Michael
Wilson were branded as alleged Communists and blacklisted by
Hollywood studios, which erased their names from movie
credits (restored many years later, together with "Oscars",
originally given only to non-English-speaking novel author
Boulle).
War as madness in this film is shown through four memorable
characters, each of them displaying different levels of
sanity, as well as different ways such madness manifests
itself. The main and most complex and tragic character is,
of course, Colonel Nicholson. This role by Alec Guiness, who
would get "Oscar" for it, is one of the best in the history
of cinema and much better than Guiness' latter and better
known incarnation as Obi Wan Kenoby in STAR WARS. Here he
portrays heroic, but deeply flawed individual, obsessed with
the idea to maintain order and civilisation even in the
situations when such things clearly don't exist anymore. One
illusion follows another and he slowly and gradually slides
into madness, often deceiving the audience. In the
beginning, his stubborn refusal to bend to his captor could
be viewed as an act of heroic defiance; but, later,
following the same logic, he becomes a traitor instead of a
hero.
His prime antagonist is portrayed by excellent and often
neglected Asian actor Sessue Hayakawa. Colonel Saito is on
the surface looks like nothing more than generic sadistic
villain, but later he is revealed to be as psychologically
troubled as his prisoners are troubled physically. His
previous failure as artist, and failure as engineer could
only lead to his ultimate failure as soldier, already hinted
with the post of prison camp commander - most humiliating
task for the military built on ancient tradition of no
surrender. Desperate desire to save face makes him as
stubborn and mad as Nicholson, and that madness would
express itself with suicidal intentions that are unimpeded
even with the apparent success of his project.
Another military madman in this Siamese jungle comes in the
form of Major Warden, played by excellent Jack Hawkins.
While Saito and Nicholson became obsessed with duty and
order, Warden sees war as an adventure, opportunity to have
some fun by blowing up bridges and buildings. He couldn't
care less about discipline and formal rules of war, but,
unfortunately, he doesn't care about the fatal consequences
his adventurous approach to war could have on men under his
command.
Voices of reason seem few in this lunatic asylum. One of
them is Shears, character often cited by some critics as
unbelievable and unnecessary, written only to bring American
crowds to theatres. William Holden plays him as cynic,
flawed man, but someone most of us could relate to. His
course of actions might seem cowardly or unethical (enjoying
undeserved privileges of rank or frolicking with beautiful
nurses while his fellow men bleed on the battlegrounds), but
they are quite understandable in the context of his
experiences. The opposite thing - lack of experience - is
something that bothers Lieutenant Joyce, played by Geoffrey
Horne, who suffers from fatal inability to kill another
human being, even when such course of action is mandated by
circumstances. But only the character of Major Clipton
happens to be the true voice of reason and his final
comments at the end are the words that belong to the author
of this film.
Strong acting talent in this film was accompanied by superb
directing. David Lean spent a great deal of time making this
film and it shows on the screen. The shots are long, but
they allow the viewers to concentrate on the characters and
their subtle gestures, as well as many interesting details.
Photography by Jack Hildyard was superb, with the great use
of Sri Lankan jungle locations that provide claustrophobic
and depressive atmosphere for the film. Musical score by
Malcolm Arnold is also very suggestive, but only the
"Colonel Bogey March" remains in memory as one of the most
catching and popular tunes in the history of film music.
THE BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI is almost perfect film,
brilliantly written, acted and directed and one of the rare
examples of "Oscar" winners that actually passed the test of
time. Of course, there are some flaws, but they are minor.
Some may argue that the life of Allied soldiers in Japanese
POWs, although still very grim according to this film, was
actually much harder in real life. Conflict between Saito
and Nicholson was simply unimaginable under such brutal
conditions; this film was often criticised by surviving POWs
for portraying Japanese guards as kinder and gentler than
they actually were. Also, the final showdown, although
powerful, in the film seems a little bit melodramatic.
However, despite those flaws, THE BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI
still remains undisputed masterpiece, an excellent example
of one great film-making talent and thought-provoking
cinema. All those with intention to educate themselves about
war through movies must see this one.

Title
Review for Jian hua yan yu jiang nan (1977)
In the last years of former Yugoslavia, emerging video
market became the battleground in the war between video
pirates and legitimate video distributors. The latter, being
underdog from the start, tried to win the upper hand by
delivering less popular, but more exotic and better
catalogued merchandise, usually ignored by their pirate
competition and missed by those who wanted something else
than standard Hollywood material in their video stores. Such
policy pleased those who wanted to watch former Yugoslav,
European, Indian, Turkish, Russian films or those films
belonging to genres unpopular in early 1990s like spaghetti
westerns, Italian historical spectacles or kung fu movies
from Hong Kong. One of such video collections was made of
twelve titles, covering early career of Jackie Chan in
1970s, mostly belonging to the genre of kung fu. I watched
them all and, among them, THE KILL WITH INTRIGUE, 1976 kung
fu melodrama directed by Lo Wei, was one of the better.
Plot of the film begins when young master Cao Le (played by
Jackie Chan) chases away Chin Chien, his pregnant girlfriend
and one of palace maidens. Cao Le's cruel act is actually
motivated with the desire to save her life, since vicious
gang of "Killer Bee" bandits is about to attack Le's family
estate. They arrive, led by Chin Chang Yin, woman who had
her face scarred as a child by Le's father, and kill
everyone. Life of Cao Le is spared and he goes on the long
and perilous journey in order to re-unite with Chin Chien,
who had met his friend Chin Chun. While Cao Le tries to
reach both of them, he is constantly tormented by Chin Chang
Yin, which took unusual interest in his plight.
For some people, kung fu films are by definition formulaic,
with cardboard characters and plots being nothing more than
cheap excuse for totally unrealistic fight scenes. For me,
kung fu is a specifically national (Chinese) genre, and, as
such, it has specific genre rules that, nevertheless, allow
their makers precious creative freedom, the very same way
different authors make different westerns. TO KILL WITH
INTRIGUE, with simple yet complicated plot that deals with
romance, friendship, unrequited love, betrayal and revenge,
is one of such example. Completely devoid of humour, script
by Kung Lu, gives opportunity to Lo Wei to engage in
straightforward drama with believable characters. It is also
opportunity for us to see Jackie Chan, actor almost always
associated with comedy, in a serious dramatic roles.
Dramatic scenes in this film are powerful, compensating
sometimes overlong and unrealistic fight scenes, plagued
with bad editing and even worse special effects. Musical
score is sometimes corny, as well as some romantic scenes,
but as a whole, film works, giving those accustomed to kung
fu films, more than average quality entertainment. Greatest
disservice to this film is done by poor English dubbing and
even worse pan & scan editing.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Ruby Cairo (1993)
In the last decade quality of Hollywood films declined, and
that phenomenon didn't manifest itself solely in the realms
of the finished products. Even the promotional trailers were
getting worse with time, and movie advertising became as bad
as the movies themselves. One of the rare films that should
pride itself with exceptional state-of-the-art trailer is
RUBY CAIRO, 1993 adventure thriller directed by Graeme
Clifford.
The heroine of this film is Bessie Faro (played by Andie
MacDowell), mother of three children and wife of Johnny Faro
(played by Viggo Mortensen), owner of air cargo company.
Bessie's idyllic life starts to fall apart when she gets a
word about her husband dying in air crash and the company
going bankrupt. In Vera Cruz she finds that her husband
actually stashed large sums of money on various off-shore
accounts. Using her husband's baseball cards as the only
clue she starts travelling across the world trying to
retrieve those funds. However, in some cases someone is
always one step ahead, emptying those accounts. The trail
leads Bessie to Cairo, where she would receive assistance by
Fergus Larb (played by Liam Neeson), humanitarian pilot who
would lead her to the unexpected discovery.
The trailer for RUBY CAIRO is a masterpiece of movie
advertising because it suggests an exciting and interesting
thriller set in exotic locations. In reality, RUBY CAIRO is
mostly disorganised mess of a movie, with contrived and not
very believable plot and mostly disinterested cast members,
especially Liam Neeson in tragically undeveloped role. Among
many other things, the subplot involving baseball cards is
going to be incomprehensible for most of the audience that
lives outside USA. On the other hand, Graeme Clifford tries
to compensate inadequacies of the content with style. The
movie features truly impressive shots of exotic Egyptian
locations, and the musical score by John Barry would remind
viewers of Bond movies, especially THE SPY WHO LOVED ME.
However, apart from providing some interesting information
about multi-cultural nature of modern Egypt, RUBY CAIRO
mostly fails to arouse viewers' attention and it is quite
understandable why it sank to oblivion almost immediately
after its production.
Review written on September 20th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Slaughter of the Innocents (1994)
Scott Glen belongs to that broad category of great actors
whose reputation is sometimes marred simply by appearing in
unwatchable cinematic stinkers. In case of Scott Glen such
stinker was SLAUGHTER OF THE INNOCENTS, 1994 film by James
Glickenhaus, just one of the many thrillers that exploit the
public's obsession with the serial killers. In SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS, "Oscar"-awarded film that inspired the entire
trend, Scott Glen played FBI agent specialised for serial
killers. In this film Glen, in a way, repeats the role by
playing Agent Stephen Broderick, one of the Bureau's best
when it comes to dealing with homicidal monsters. However,
this time the maniac in question seems to be too much even
for Broderick. Luckily, his 15-year old son Jesse (played by
Jesse Cameron-Glickenhaus) is a wunderkind determined to
help his father, even if it means that he would have to run
away from house and chase the dangerous maniac by himself.
I must say that I was, in a way, both surprised and not so
surprised when I realised how despised SLAUGHTER OF THE
INNOCENTS is among net.critics. This movie was hardly
masterpiece, but it is still better than its reputation.
Glickenhaus' screenplay is a mess, the movie is sometimes
too preachy, unbelievable or boring (totally pointless scene
involving shootout between FBI and lone Neonazi), but Glen
and others at least play their parts professionally, and
Glickenhaus does provide some suspensful scenes, including
quite spectacular finale. Most probable reason why people
hate this film is the fact that Jesse Cameron-Glickenhaus,
rather talented brat (who also wrote some of the songs in
the film) happens to be director's son and that his
character actually steals the film from Scott Glen. Although
some of the viewers might feel cheated, and although some
may have problems swalloving the concept of underage boy
battling serial killers, the movie is rather watchable, but
hardly anything above it.

Title
Review for Immortal Beloved (1994)
Ludwig van Beethoven (1770-1827) is one of the greatest
composers who ever lived, and his work is able to inspire
people centuries after his death. At two fine examples of
this could be found in the world of cinema - A CLOCKWORK
ORANGE and DIE HARD are impossible to imagine without
Beethoven's music. The private life of the great composer
was perhaps less impressive than his work, but Beethoven's
biography was interesting enough to become subject of many
films. The latest of those films is IMMORTAL BELOVED, 1994
biopic written and directed by British filmmaker Bernard
Rose.
The film begins with Beethoven (played by Gary Oldman) dying
in 1827. His young secretary and friend Anton Schindler
(played by Jeroen Krabbe) digs through his papers and finds
the will in which he leaves everything to the mysterious
woman refered only as "Immortal Beloved". Schindler is
determined to establish the identity of said woman so he
starts travelling all across Europe in search of people who
might be the key to this mystery. Among them are Beethoven's
past lovers -Giulietta Guicciardi (played by Valeria Golino)
and Anna Marie Erdody (played by Isabella Rossellini) - and
through their stories Schindler starts to make a picture of
a great artist, haunted by childhood traumas, deafness and
long-time feuds with his own family, including sister-in-law
Johanna Reiss (played by Johanna ter Steege) with whom
Beethoven fought for the custody of her young son Karl
(played by Marco Hofschneider).
Rose decided to depict Beethoven's life using the story
device similar to Welles' CITIZEN KANE - present the
character through bits and pieces of other peoples' memory.
Unfortunately, the jigsaw puzzle was simply not worthy of
the effort - according to Rose, the most important thing
about great composer's life was not his music but his love
life. Because of that, IMMORTAL BELOVED looks less an
ambitious biopic and more like a cheap melodrama. To make
things even worse, Rose took too many liberties not only
with Beethoven's life, but also with the broader historical
events, including Beethoven's infatuation with Napoleon and
French invasion of Austria - the events that were as
thraumatic to 19th Century Viennese as WTC bombing was to
early 21st Century New Yorkers. Because of that, the ending
is completely non-cathartic and the whole story is rather
unengaging. What saves this film from complete failure are
two things. One is the scene that tries to show where and
how Beethoven found inspiration for his 9th Symphony. The
other is excellent performance by Gary Oldman, who again
utilises his raw energy to play a madman, although this time
madness manifests itself in art rather than homicidal acts.
Unfortunately, Oldman's performance is not matched by his
colleagues, and he can't save IMMORTAL BELOVED from ending
like a big disappointment.
Review written on September 18th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Body Heat (1981)
Hollywood movies are full of different stereotypes, but one
of the most noticeable regards the lawyers. Such stereotypes
are probably the result of deep-rooted view of the legal
profession among ordinary people in USA. Lawyers are always
portrayed as slimy, rich bastards that not only make a
living by twisting justice and common sense, but become
rich, powerful and dark invincible pillar of American
society. The only exception lies in movies that take quite
an opposite view by portraying lawyers as noble individuals
ready to fight the system for the sake of common, and often
completely helpless man. Very few movies actually try to
portray lawyers as ordinary human beings, with all the
normal strengths and weaknesses (with the exception of
television, that usually takes real life more seriously than
Hollywood). BODY HEAT, 1981 directorial debut by famed
screenwriter Lawrence Kasdan, is one of them.
The plot of the movie is loosely based on DOUBLE INDEMNITY,
1944 film noire by Billy Wilder and one of the most
celebrated movies of the classical era. Kasdan, who also
wrote the screenplay, sets it in Southern Florida and turns
its protagonist into lawyer, instead of insurance agent. Ned
Racine (William Hurt) is an attorney who works in small
town, and whose pool of client is very small due to his
notorious incompetence. Racine, on the other hand, hides his
bad luck by cocky demenour and mostly successful womanising.
The latest of his romantic conquest is Matty Walker
(Kathleen Turner), extremely attractive, emotionally cold,
but sexually insatiable woman. Before he knows it, Racine
falls in love with her, and the only obstacle to their
perpetual bliss is Matty's husband Edmund (Richard Crenna),
local businessman with shady connections. After accidentally
meeting the man and seeing him as the arrogant bastard,
Racine devises the plan to kill him. After the murder Matty
would collect the inheritance and later live with Racine
happily ever after. Both of the lovers agree on the plan and
kill Edmund. However, after the killing things don't go that
smoothly for Racine. Damaging evidence starts popping up in
the hands of the local law enforcement, and Matty doesn't
seem to be as forthcoming about her plans.
In the current debate between those who are for and against
the Hollywood practice of re-makes, the pro-remake side
would probably case by using BODY HEAT as its argument.
Lawrence Kasdan very cleverly used the old film noire
formula, yet he also set in an familiar environment and used
the new techniques and plot twists that would make this film
original not only by its look. First of all, he emphasised
the heat as a metaphor for the atmosphere of moral
corruption and decay that engulfs the movie protagonists and
their surroundings. Racine is portrayed as immoral
character, but he is hardly an aberration from the rest of
society; his only crime is his own stupidity, that allows
him to get caught. The heat in the movie is also an metaphor
for sexual lust, and Kasdan here uses almost all the
liberties of mainstream Hollywood in order to portray it as
depraved as possible (it is implied that Racine and Matty
did break anti-sodomy laws in their relationship); yet his
portrayal is very subtle compared with some "erotic" films
of the same nature, so BODY HEAT remains as a shining
example of the subtle use of erotica. The movie also can be
seen as a really ironic twist on popular American beliefs;
the lawyer, who usually screws over common men, is the one
who gets screwed over at the end.
The characters of the movie are extremely well-drawn.
William Hurt, who was considered to be one of the hottest
WASP-stars in the early 1980s, was perfect in his role of a
man who is on the outside epithome of virility, but utterly
weak and stupid on the inside. But the real show stealer is
Kathleen Turner in her debut role - her sexy look and
seductive deep voice, in contrast with her cold and
calculating personality, made her a most impressive femme
fatale for many years to come; Hollywood had to wait for
Sharon Stone in BASIC INSTINCT to enjoy the sinister
man-eater of similar calibre. The other actors are also more
than fine; Ted Danson as Racine's friend, equally but much
smarter colleague (although his tapping sequence seemed a
little bit redundant); J.A. Preston as a policeman whose
friendship towards Racine doesn't prevent him from doing the
right thing; Richard Crenna as incarnation of rich
businessman's arrogance. But the best side role is one made
by young Mickey Rourke as petty criminal who seems to have
more common sense than his supposedly smarter and more
educated lawyer.
The other artists contributed to the BODY HEAT too. John
Barry's melancholic and jazzy tunes were perfect for such
erotic film noire set in a hot locations of Southern
Florida. But the movie's photography by Richard H. Kline was
slightly uneven - in the night, red and orange colours were
dominant, but the daytime scenes look too bright, especially
those set in interiors. However, despite those small flaws,
BODY HEAT remains one of the best directorial debuts in
Hollywood history, and probably the best film noire ever
made in previous decade.

Title
Review for TekWar (1994) (TV)
Good literature, more often than not, tends to turn into bad
cinema. This sad state of affairs, however, has more
positive side - same creative processes can use bad
literature as inspiration for good cinema. One of such
example is TEKWAR series of science fiction novels, written
by famous Canadian actor William Shatner in 1980s. For many
of the critics, those novels were nothing more than the lame
excuse for the famous actor to satisfy his vanity or cash in
his STAR TREK charisma. Nevertheless, a decade later, those
movies inspired brief series of TV films, starting with
TEKWAR, directed by Shatner himself in 1994.
The plot takes place in 21st Century, in a world where
chemical drugs got replaced with electronic stimulation
devices called Tek. Protagonist of the film is Jake Cardigan
(played by Craig Evigan), ex-policeman who awakens after
four years of cryogenic sleep - punishment for the crime he
didn't commit. Cardigan wants to clear his name and bring
back the estranged family, so he joins his ex-partner Sid
Gomez (played by Eugene Clark) and two of them agree to work
for mysterious business tycoon Bascom (played by William
Shatner). Their first task is to locate missing scientist
whose research might have brought cure to Tek plague.
Cardigan would soon have to face powerful forces behind Tek
trade, as well as the world that changed beyond recognition.
Since Shatner not only wrote original novel, but also
directed this film, the expectations, based on his previous
directorial effort work in STAR TREK V, weren't great, to
say the least. However, Shatner did rather decent job this
time, giving arguments to those who put all the blame for
the failure of STAR TREK V on penny- pinching producers
instead of actor-director. With more creative control and
CGI technology at his disposal, Shatner created quite
believable high-tech world of the near future that looks
more "cyberpunk" than other better known examples of that
still-born movie genre. Shatner contributed this film as an
actor too, with his brief appearance as character whose
moral alignment remains the mystery until the very end. Fans
of the early 1980s pop music might also enjoy the cameo of
hardly recognisable Sheena Easton. All in all, TEKWAR looks
like rather good TV pilot, which can arouse interests for
future sequels, even among those who don't particularly like
Shatner, science fiction or cyberpunk.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Species (1995)
By mid 1990s the author of this review has learned not to 
expect much from Hollywood blockbusters. However, despite 
those bitter experiences, disappointments still happen, 
because, sometimes, you simply want certain film to be good. 
Seeing complete lack of truly memorable science fiction 
films in this particular period, I was hoping that SPECIES, 
directed by Roger Donaldson in 1995, might be it. 
The plot begins rather promising - sometimes between early 
1970s and early 1990s an alien civilisation has caught 
signals from Earth. As a result, SETI radio telescopes 
receive transmission with details of alien DNA and 
instructions to splice it with its human counterpart. 
Government scientist follow the instructions, but the 
resulting hybrid, girl named "Sil" grows too rapidly and the 
project leader Xavier Fitch (played by Ben Kingsley) decides 
to pull the plug. Little girl, however, doesn't like idea of 
being gassed to death so she uses her superhuman abilities 
to escape from the secret laboratory. In order to catch her, 
Fitch gathers a small team of two scientists, an empath and 
professional assassin. In the meantime, little "Sil" 
transforms into adult and gorgeous looking woman (played by 
Natasha Henstridge) and slowly discovers her genetically 
programmed mission is to procreate and settle this planet 
with as much of alien hybrids as possible. She comes to Los 
Angeles where her looks could serve her well in her mission, 
while the scientific team races with time in order to find 
her. 
The premise of SPECIES looked like a really promising 
combination of Ridley Scott's ALIEN and Paul Schrader's CAT 
PEOPLE. Even more promising was really interesting cast of 
gifted actors led by "Oscar"-winning Ben Kingsley, as well 
as Swiss conceptual artist H.R. Giger (of ALIEN fame) as the 
designer of "Sil's" alien shape. Unfortunately, the script 
by Dennis Feldman quickly abandoned all interesting 
opportunities contained in its premise (including the human 
civilisation being seen through alien eyes). Instead, 
SPECIES quickly disintegrates into the series of plot holes 
and cliches (including the obligatory and not so plausible 
romance between the members of retrieving team) that 
culminate with the cheap ending more suitable for B-horrors 
than an ambitious science fiction film. Although director 
Roger Donaldson tries his best to fill inadequacies of 
script by nice visuals, his efforts are in vain, partly due 
to rather disinterested cast that fail to create any sort of 
interest for their cardboard characters. The only exception 
and probably the only potentially redeeming thing in this 
film is 20-year old Canadian supermodel Natasha Henstridge 
in her first major film role. She tries her best to give 
some sort of character to the shape-shifting alien monster, 
but the audience, especially male, would probably remember 
only those scenes in which she appears without clothes. 
Unfortunately, those scenes are only a tiny portion of 
SPECIES and not the reason enough to waste almost two hours 
of precious time watching this Hollywood garbage. 
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax 
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Young Americans, The (1993)
Globalisation, like any other phenomenon, has its own dark
side. It may manifest itself in the spreading of certain
forms of social pathology that were supposed to be alien and
unimaginable for certain parts of the world. For the makers
of 1993 British crime drama THE YOUNG AMERICANS the thing in
question is American-style form of gangland violence, which
was alien to the more peaceful and enlightened Britain.
The plot begins with a series of brutal hits of gangland
bosses that rocked the London underworld. The police,
accustomed to the old and less bloody ways of settling
gangland scores, is helpless and it needs outside help. That
help arrives in the form of Joe Harris (played by Harvey
Keitel), DEA agent who is about to use its long experience
in fighting drug lords and advice Scotland Yard how to react
to the new threat. He soon realises that the mastermind
behind the killings is Frazer (played by Viggo Mortensen),
American drug baron who came to London and found a simple
and ingenious way to take over the city's drug trade by
recruiting naive youngsters from city slums and turning them
into cheap and expendable assassins. One of the potential
recruits is Chris (played by Craig Kelly) whose late father
had chosen the path of crime. Nevertheless it is Chris who
is going to help Harris in bringing Frazer down by agreeing
to infiltrate drug lord's organisation.
Danny Cannon was praised as one of the most promising
British filmmakers in the early 1990s and this film shows
why low budget THE YOUNG AMERICANS has plenty of impressive
sights and sounds, and the atmosphere of the film is
overwhelming. The photography of Vernon Leyton nicely
captures images of London's mean streets, while the musical
score by David Arnold (including Bjork's song "Play Dead")
is the feast for people's ears. The acting is also very
good, with reliable American character actors like Keitel
and Mortensen working hand-in-hand with group of relatively
unknown yet very talented young British actors (of which
only Thandie Newton reached some sort of global fame
afterwards). Unfortunately, the script and, to a lesser
degree, direction were somewhat lacking. Danny Cannon
overused slow motion and thus made this film longer than it
should be. The script by David Hilton and Danny Cannon,
apart from creating few impressive characters, also lacked
substances and instead of plot we have Hollywood formulas
and cliches. The most notable of them all is romantic and
near-apologist view of the local hoods as the last bastion
of national pride, not very different from the way some
black filmmakers in America used to glorify gangstas from
U.S. inner city ghettos. Danny Cannon nevertheless had
talent and THE YOUNG AMERICANS is the reason why we should
view his departure to Hollywood as a loss to British cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Mad Max (1979)
Most people would agree with Wes Craven's saying that
"sequels suck", yet there are some notable exceptions to the
rule. One of such exception is MAD MAX 2 a.k.a. THE ROAD
WARRIOR, one of the most successful and influential movies
of the last decade. So, the logical question arises: if the
sequel is so revered, is the original also good or even
better? Answer to that question lies in MAD MAX, Australian
1979 action movie that launched the careers of director
George Miller and today's Hollywood megastar Mel Gibson, as
well as a commercial boom of Australian cinema in 1980s.
Although the opening title puts the plot of this movie in
the near future, on the surface the world looks pretty same
as today's. The only difference is in decline of the public
services, including law enforcement, that opened way to
psychopathic biker gangs to make the roads and countryside
their undisputed realm. The small, yet dedicated police
force is using their powerful, and in the same time
obsolete, machines in a losing battle to prevent the law and
civilisation from becoming distant memory. The best among
them is Max Rokatansky (Mel Gibson), supreme killing machine
on the road, whose skills are again proven in a deadly
confrontation that leaves escaped cop-killing biker
Nightrider (Vince Gill) dead. However, Max is in a same time
dedicated family man, and after seeing too many of his
colleagues hurt or killed in a futile struggle, he
contemplates quitting and takes his wife and son to the
vacation. Unfortunately, the bikers led by Toecutter (Hugh
Keays-Byrne) had already marked Max as a target because of
Nightrider's death and they kill his family in the process.
Having nothing else to live for, Max returns to the road,
but this time not as policeman, but avenging maniac, using
all of his abilities to track and kill bikers, even in the
vast areas abandoned by legal authority.
In many ways, plot of MAD MAX looks like a combination of
vigilante cop thriller and B-western. Many also argued that
mild futuristic motives serve only as an excuse for hour and
half of brutal non-stop violence. On the other hand, even
those critics that question movie's originality praise
Miller for the talent he showed in his great cinematic
debut.  MAD MAX was made on a ridiculously small budget
(being edited by Miller himself, in his own bedroom), yet it
didn't look cheap. On the contrary, some of the stunts and
action scenes are spectacular and breathtaking. Small budget
also worked into the movie's advantage; being forced to use
second-hand equipment as props, Miller painted the picture
of industrial decay in order to illustrate the declining
state of future civilisation.
Miller's visions of near future, that would be even more
developed in next two MAD MAX visions, have been actually
inspired by current events. The great fuel crisis of 1973
suddenly showed great, and until than unthinkable,
vulnerability of Western civilisation. The loss of faith in
progress and technology coincided with the great moral void,
left by the breakdown of traditional social values in the
1960s. Miller, and many like him, feared that the fall of
industrial institutions would lead to anarchy and new
barbarism, because society wouldn't be able to protect
individual, now forced to live without any moral compass.
Such ideas were already explored in JEREMIAH, cult comic
book by French artist Hermann, whose influence, together
with MAD MAX movies, would later incite whole sub-genre of
post-apocalyptic movies. Anyway, original MAD MAX fell in
line with a whole series of dark, dystopian science fiction
movies that were very popular in late 1970s and early 1980s.
Apart from dark tone that corresponded with pessimistic feel
of the time, MAD MAX succeeded also because it was good
movie. Mel Gibson was well-cast in the role of at least
nominally civilised policeman that later turns into
homicidal maniac, not very different than those he tried to
stop. Gibson very effectively portrays his gradual slide
into madness, and such experience would later serve him very
well in his later role as Martin Riggs in LETHAL WEAPON.
Other actors were also good and gave a lot to well-drawn and
strong characters, like psychotic Nightrider, evil
Toecutter, cool yet dealy Bubba Zanetti (Geoff Parry) or
stoned Johnny the Boy (Tim Burns) that would stick long in
our memory, despite their relatively short appearance in
this relatively short film. Sadly, among them, only Steve
Bisley, who plays Max's larger-than-life friend and
colleague Jim Goose, got some name recognition in later
years. Character of Jesse, Max's wife, was somwhat
undeveloped and the family scenes seemed a little bit
stereotyped, with the cheerfulness and sentimentalism that
is unnecessary contrast towards the dark and pessimistic
tone of the whole picture. Brian May's score, on the other
hand, was good, yet not as powerful as some other science
fiction soundtrack of that era. But, on the whole, MAD MAX,
despite being slightly inferior to its more influential
sequel, is still very effective piece of cinema, that can
entertain us despite forcing us to think about some
unpleasant topics.

Title
Review for Fort Apache (1948)
People who like to classify movies according to their
quality are often reminded of a phenomenon called "guilty
pleasures" - films that are bad, but still liked, even by
those filmophiles who should know better. On the other hand,
we might encounter quite the opposite phenomenon - films
that should be viewed as masterpieces, but are actually not
very liked. The author of this review encountered such
phenomenon very often in the case of John Ford. The reason
for that probably lies in first impressions which weren't
very favourable towards John Ford's work. In my early years
I used to like westerns very much, but westerns by John
Ford, who had been often referred as the best and most
important director of the genre, looked somewhat "too
artistic" or not attractive enough to be actually liked.
Those impressions stuck with me in latter years, even after
my taste in films became evolved. Such was the case with
FORT APACHE, 1948 western by John Ford, first in his US
Cavalry trilogy.
The script of the film, written by Frank S. Nugent is based
on the story called MASSACRE by James Warner Bellah. Fort
Apache is small, desolate garrison of US Cavalry, populated
by rag-tag bunch of Civil War veterans, many of them former
officers and now reduced in rank and pay. The garrison gets
the new commander - Lieutenant Colonel Owen Thursday (played
by Henry Fonda), accompanied by his lovely daughter
Philadelphia (played by Shirley Temple). Thursday sees his
new post as humiliation and desperately seeks ways to
reclaim his honour and prove himself as capable military
leader. His arrogance would cause conflict with his
subordinates, and his class snobbery would make a rift
between him and Philadelphia, when she falls in love with
young Lt. Michael O'Rourke (played by John Agar), son of
Sergeant O'Rourke (played by Ward Bond). The biggest
conflict arises when Thursday, against the advice of his
much and experienced subordinate, Captain York (played by
John Wayne) decides to betray Cochise, legendary Apache
chief, in order to start war that would bring him
long-desired fame. At the end, Thursday would reach his
goal, but not in a way he had anticipated.
Since the plot of this film bears more than small
resemblance to the legend of Custer's Last Stand, John Ford
uses this opportunity to explore the reality of Old West,
and it the same time keep the mythical distance towards this
popular subject. This film indeed deals with the darker
pages of Old West history - the ways in which US government
dealt with the Indians and its own war veterans, and the
rigid class system that existed in US Army at the time.
Those motives are used in variety of vignettes that deal
with the everyday lives of Fort Apache cavalrymen. Although
many of those vignettes slow down the pace of the movie,
making it two hours long, some of them are very amusing, and
sometimes even touching; John Ford obviously liked his
characters and thanks to the actors of his legendary "Stock
Company" they appear as the most memorable element of this
film. This is not the case with the romantic subplot
involving Philadelphia and young O'Rourke - it seems
forcefully introduced into to the movie only to satisfy
Hollywood formula.
The acting in the film is, on the other hand, very good.
Henry Fonda, who plays arrogant and self-obsessed
militaristic maniac, never slips into over- acting and paves
a way for the role of the true villain role in ONCE UPPON A
TIME IN WEST twenty years later. John Wayne, who is
overshadowed by his performance, has a rather thankless role
of a second fiddle. That role is even more compromised by
the sudden and rather unexplained change of heart in Wayne's
character - Captain York, who was portrayed as a man of
integrity is following the party line at the end. Wayne was
probably less responsible for that than Ford himself, who
had rather ambiguous feelings about military while making
this film. On one hand, he clearly deplores militaristic
folly, while, on the other hand, sees the military as one
big family. That ambiguity is probably the biggest weakness
of this film, with the rather forgettable musical score by
Richard Hageman being the close second. So, this film isn't
among the best westerns ever made, not even among the best
films by John Ford. Despite all of its imperfections and
despite the fact that it isn't the must-see or cult classic
material, FORT APACHE is still a very good piece of cinema,
essential for those who want to see expressions of American
myths in Hollywood movies.

Title
Review for Philadelphia (1993)
There are many movies that are remembered for the wrong
reasons, and PHILADELPHIA, 1993 courtroom drama directed by
Jonathan Demme, is one of them. Instead being remembered by
its own merit, it is only a footnote in a tale about moving
1994 Oscar acceptance speech by Tom Hanks - occasion that
inspired a movie by itself (IN & OUT by Frank Oz). And it is
really sad, since PHILADELPHIA happened to be the very first
big budget Hollywood movie dealing with the AIDS phenomenon.
It was also an opportunity for Demme to defend himself from
homophobia charges, inspired by the fact that some gay
groups didn't like the sexual orientation of the villain in
his Oscar-winning masterpiece SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.
This courtroom drama has a plot which is based on the real
life event (the fact which the filmmakers at first denied,
which, ironically, caused a lawsuit later on). Andrew
Beckett (played by Tom Hanks) is a young and brilliant
attorney who had just received a promotion in a prestigious
Philadelphia law firm, led by his bigoted mentor Charles
Wheeler (played by Jason Robards). In the same day, Beckett,
who was hiding his homosexuality from co-workers and
supervisors, finds out that he had contracted AIDS. Soon,
important legal brief vanishes from his possession and he is
fired from the law firm because of alleged incompetence.
Beckett knows that the real reason is homophobia, so he is
ready to start discrimination lawsuit. Unfortunately, few
lawyers are ready to take his case. The only exception is
Joe Miller (played by Denzel Washington), black ambulance
chaser who must overcome his own homophobic prejudices
before he begins long legal battle.
Made during the zenith of Political Correctness, in the
first year of Clinton presidency, PHILADELPHIA, like many
similar "socially conscious" movies, walks on the very fine
line between art and propaganda. The screenplay by Ron
Nyswaner almost pushes movie across that line, with
sometimes annoyingly clear contrast between Good Guys
(young, beautiful, talented and heroic gay character plus
his slowly evolving attorney) and Bad Guys (old, ugly and
bigoted establishment). The attempts to paint some shades of
gray (like the scene with the young black gay man and
Miller) look somewhat artificial and sometimes it provide
unnecessary plot holes. However, this movie is saved by
great directorial skill by Demme and great acting
performances. Demme, with his superb techniques, small
gestures and great use of close-ups allows us to see the
plot and characters through banal but all-revealing scenes,
like the accidental encounter between Beckett and Miller in
the library. The actors, on the other hand, are stealing the
show - Tom Hanks won his first "Oscar", and his portrayal of
AIDS-stricken man with the passion for life and justice is
touching and magnificent in the same time (although some
would see his opera singing scene as an emotional overkill).
Hanks should also be praised for the great physical effort,
because he went on a diet and lost 12 kilograms in order to
physically resemble terminally ill AIDS patient as much as
possible. His partner Denzel Washington is great too,
although his role didn't require such demanding physical
requirements. Instead, his character transformation from the
bigot into the compassionate human being is portrayed with
subtle but very effective actions (like, for example,
different levels of physical distance between Beckett and
Miller). Other actors are, on the other hand, underused -
Jason Robards' character is caricature, Mary Steenburgen as
his attorney is capable, and Antonio Banderas is totally
wasted as Beckett's lover.
Although Demme's good intentions and his talent should be
praised, they aren't enough to make PHILADELPHIA truly
exceptional piece of cinema. For the movie that was supposed
to be the groundbreaking Hollywood project about AIDS,
bigotry and alternative lifestyles, this film is too
mainstream and constrained by the content regulations - both
the old (which bar kissing between males in mainstream
films) and new (which prohibits portrayal of gay characters
as nothing less of saintly). Being exposed to the multitude
of independent, cable or even TV-movies that, one way or the
other, broke such rules, we must conclude that PHILADELPHIA
didn't pass the test of time, necessary to achieve the true
greatness. But, although overrated, PHILADELPHIA is still a
good film.

Title
Review for Serpico (1973)
In one of my previous reviews I mentioned SERPICO as one of
the most important films of the 1970s. Perhaps it was an
overstatement, because that film means very little to people
who didn't actually live or were too young to remember that
particular time period. But in its time anything involving
the real life story of New York police detective Frank
Serpico was a big news. In 1972 that story first became a
best-seller book by Peter Maas and, one year later, found its
way to the silver screen under the direction of respected
film- maker Sidney Lumet. The success of the movie was such
that the producer, Dino de Laurentiis, even created
short-lived television series starring David Birney few
years later. Of course, the main reason why people still
remember Serpico after more than a quarter of a century is
Sidney Lumet's film.
The plot begins with the shooting of Frank Serpico (played
by Al Pacino), New York undercover policeman. Serpico, while
being treated in hospital, starts remembering his police
career. He started as young, idealistic policeman whose
nonconformist views often clashed with conservative views of
his colleagues and superiors. In the turbulent decade of
1960s, his reputation of black sheep is enhanced with his
image, totally different from the regular cops - he grows
long hair and beard, wears hip clothes and takes interest in
exotic arts and philosophies. To his conservative superiors
he claims that this is the best way to work undercover in
rapidly changing society. But the outside appearance isn't
the only thing that bugs his colleagues. Serpico is man of
principles and he not only refuses to take bribe, like
almost any other plain clothes policemen do, but he also
wants to put the end to such widespread corruption. Mostly
ignored by the top police brass, he does things that are
strictly forbidden by unwritten laws of New York police - he
blows whistle to outside agencies and media and later
testifies against his colleagues. The word gets out and
Serpico becomes marked man among all New York policemen, who
are all more than willing to set him up during his life
threatening undercover assignments.
Sidney Lumet made a lot of different films in his long
career, but they often share a common themes or settings.
Lumet seems to have certain fondness for New York and its
burning social problems, as well as rampant moral ambiguity,
most often associated with police and political corruption.
SERPICO is one of such films, and it was made in a
especially favourable time. Early 1970s were the era of
Pentagon Papers and Watergate, when America as a society
stopped taking the established perceptions of itself for
granted. In such times, when everything was questioned,
there was a hunger for people ready to expose the darker
side of American dream. Frank Serpico was one of such
perfect heroes - he didn't just expose police and
establishment corruption, he as a personality with his hip
image was antithesis of everything associated with
conformist, pre-1960s America. And Serpico's life story -
his quixotic struggle against establishment, personal
courage and martyrdom, made him not just a perfect hero of
the public, but also a perfect protagonist for socially
important movie like those Lumet used to make in 1970s.
The name most often associated with SERPICO, of course,
isn't his director Lumet. The icon of this film is Serpico's
alter ego in the form of Al Pacino, young Italian American
actor who was just beginning his rise towards Hollywood
acting pantheon after his brilliant debut in GODFATHER.
Pacino here worked very hard in order to make a role very
different from the one he had in Coppola's masterpiece. And
he succeeded, at least in making the screen personality of
Serpico authentic, if we are to believe real Frank Serpico,
who was very pleased with the portrayal of his character.
Pacino plays Serpico as an idealistic, low-key but stubborn
character, who is hero, but never superman - he has his
doubts, he gets angry and depressed, and often drowns
himself in self-pity, making the life very miserable for
everyone around him. Pacino's performance was so strong,
that he had managed to overshadow almost every actor around
him; on the other hand, it wasn't that hard, since the
script by Oswald Salto and Norman Wexler left place for only
minor roles, often filled by good, but this time hardly
noticeable character actors.
Direction by Lumet is superb, with the splendid use gray and
dark scenery of New York locations; they serve as perfect
illustration for this serious and often depressing story.
Sadness is also underlined with the touching musical score
by Mikis Theodorakis, with the Mediterranean motives that
illustrate Serpico's humanity and noble ideals. The script
by Oswald Salto and Norman Wexler, on the other hand, is the
weakest part of the film. Serpico's background is mentioned
in the beginning, than mostly ignored through the film. Time
given to the depiction of Serpico's private life is too long
and it often gets in the way of his real story (especially
when he has to deal with many, often hardly recognisable or
established characters).
However, despite all that, SERPICO is one very brave,
socially critical film that asks important questions.
Unfortunately, time that had allowed such films is behind
us. These days, Hollywood wouldn't touch such depressing and
non-commercial subjects with ten-foot-pole and Serpicos of
our time could see their screen incarnations only in
television and cable movies. Which is sad, but, in the same
time guarantees good reputation of SERPICO for future
generations of film-lovers.
Review written on September 26th 1999

Title
Review for A.P.E.X. (1994)
More experienced fans of science fiction cinema tend to
watch out for three things in any upcoming title of that
particular genre - low budget, time travel as major plot
point and homicidal robots as chief villains. When all three
of those elements are brought together in the same film, the
results are rarely above abysmal. THE TERMINATOR, one of the
best time travel films of all times, had all those three
ingredients, but it is usually considered to be an exception
to the rule. At first glance, A.P.E.X., 1994 science-fiction
film directed by Phillip J. Roth, might look like nothing
more than cheap copy of THE TERMINATOR, but it is actually
one of those very rare instances when low budget, time
travel and homicidal robots don't produce a bad piece of
cinema.
Plot begins in Los Angeles 2073 AD where the group of
scientists led by Doctor Nicholas Sinclair (played by
Richard Keats) conduct a time travel research. One of their
experiments goes terribly wrong and for a brief period of
time Sinclair is transported back to 1973 AD. Upon his
return to 2073 AD Sinclair sees that the world has changed
beyond recognition - Los Angeles has turned into
plague-stricken wasteland where few survivors, including his
wife Natasha (played by Lisa Ann Russell), fight desperate
war against A.P.E.X. killer robots. Those robots had been
made by Sinclair's laboratory and designed to kill any
witness and erase every trace of time travel and thus
prevent the time paradox. Sinclair knows that the only way
to stop the robots is to erase the time paradox, so he must
start looking for a workable time machine in ruins of Los
Angeles in order to correct the fatal mistake during the
initial experiment.
Thorough nit-picking of Roth's and Ronald Schmidt's script
would probably find a lot of logical flaws and
implausibilities, but A.P.E.X. looks a masterpiece compared
with similar films. This is mostly due to rather cerebral
approach to the problem of time travel and its consequences,
including the time paradox, which is usually, absent in most
other examples of this popular sub- genre. In A.P.E.X. the
time paradox not only exists but it is the cause of all
trouble and it must be dealt with. The more intellectual
approach can be also seen in movie's protagonist who happens
to be scientist instead of action hero. His character, as
well as many others, are fleshed out nicely and played by
relatively unknown but truly competent actors. Like in all
classic films by James Cameron, action scenes are
intertwined with character exposure and as a result, the
viewers tend to care what happens to the protagonists.
A.P.E.X. is surprisingly good even in technical side. The
lack of budget is compensated with good use of locations and
CGI. Unfortunately, the shootout scenes are done rather
poorly and rely too much on sometimes tiring pyrotechnics.
But the end result is still the intelligent, entertaining
piece that gives a good name to low budget science fiction
films.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Stakeout (1987)
Movie-loving people who used to live in former Yugoslavia
probably had the best times of their lives in a short, but
blissful period between mid 1980s and early 1990s. That
Golden Age happened thanks to the mass advent of VCRs -
something that took domineering socialist economy by
surprise. Legislation of the dying Communist regime wasn't
prepared any better, so the legal limbo was (mis)used by the
cunning entrepreneurs of the private sector, ready to flood
the hungry market with bootleg tapes of the latest Hollywood
blockbusters. Average video-consumer of those times had an
excellent opportunity to enjoy latest Hollywood products
sometimes only few weeks after U.S. premiere, which was
great improvement over pre-video era, when the average wait
used to be 3-4 years. Of course, there were drawbacks - the
picture quality was abysmal, and the translation on
subtitles was sometimes even more imaginative than the movie
itself. In a few rare occasion that benefited slumping
theatre industry, because people were inclined to go see
movies on the big screen, simply to find out what really
went on at the movie. But sometimes, on even rarer
occasions, people who had previously seen movie on video,
went to the theatre to re- watch it, simply because they
liked it on a small screen. The first movie that did that
for the author of this review was STAKEOUT, 1987 action
comedy by John Badham.
The movie plot begins when Richard "Stick" Montgomery (Aidan
Quinn), sociopathic cop killer, escapes from the maximum
security prison with the help of his cousin Caylor Reese
(Ian Tracey). FBI organises the nation-wide manhunt, and one
of the possible leads could be Montgomery's ex-girlfriend
who lives in Seattle. Two Seattle police detectives - Chris
Lecce (Richard Dreyfuss) and Bill Reimers (Emilio Estevez)
are assigned for the stakeout. At the beginning, two men
hate the boring job, but everything changes when they
finally see the object of their surveillance - beautiful
Maria McGuirre (Madeleine Stowe). That is especially true
for Chris, who, after a while can't stop bumping into the
woman, against Bill's better judgement. After a few
accidental encounters, it turns out that the feeling is
mutual and one thing leads to another.  However, the romance
seems ill-fated from the start, due to some practical
problems. Chris must hide his true identity from the woman
he loves, and at the same time he must find the way to hide
his unprofessional behaviour from the colleagues and
superiors.
Some of today's viewers might be tempted to consider this
movie as nothing more than just another in a series of "high
concept" cop movies. That trend indeed produced mostly
disappointments, including some really unwatchable garbage,
but sometimes we could enjoy some real pearls including this
one. Screenplay was written by Jim Kouf, writer whose work
before and after was of a mixed quality (most notable is his
underrated SF thriller HIDDEN, made in 1986).  He decided to
avoid the usual formula of such movies (main attraction -
e.g. pairing of black woman detective with epileptic partner
-  plus series of clichs and conventional storyline
automatically patched together) and really worked to make
the plot as realistic as possible. His characters are also
real human beings, and the best example could be Chris and
Bill, two policemen who, unlike their cardboard or
superhuman colleagues in other movies, really talk and act
like someone we could envision as real-life cops. The life
of policeman, as portrayed in STAKEOUT, isn't fascinating
nor exciting at all - most of the time is spent on routine
and mostly boring assignments. Even the high- tech
surveillance, something that used to be portrayed as
frightening future in previous movies by John Badham (BLUE
THUNDER) here becomes boring part of everyday life, and even
the vouyeristic benefits soon lose their appeal. Instead of
becoming obsessed with the object of their surveillance, our
heroes are more concerned with ways to fight boredom; one of
them, that provides charmingly realistic comic relief, is
practical joke war with another surveillance shift. The
general realistic tone of the movie is good ground for the
successful blend of standard cop action and comedy.
Sadly, this combination of action and comedy was the last
big movie of John Badham, whose career later sunk into
mediocrity (including the disappointingly bad sequel ANOTHER
STAKEOUT). However, in this movie Badham has a nice
opportunity to combine his skills of action-oriented
director with comedy. STAKEOUT might be almost two hours
long, but Badham knows how to wrap a lot of attractive
material in that package. One of those materials is a
photography by John Seale that provides a nice contrast
between grey Vancouver exteriors (x-philes would recognise
not only the locations of their favourite series, but also a
some notable members of supporting cast) and warm interiors
- contrast that illustrates the warmth in the hearts of our
heroes. The soundtrack of Arthur B. Rubinstein isn't too
inspired (some elements of BLUE THUNDER musical score  might
be recognised) and more often than not Badham uses songs in
the background to advance the plot. Perhaps the only major
flaw would be Badham's acceptance of Hollywood's formulaic
big showdown in the finale - but even the standard showdown
in an empty warehouses provided some room for minor twists
and some humour.
However, the biggest attraction of the movie are the actors,
or, to be more specific, one single actor. Richard Dreyfuss
had proved his comedic potential long time ago, but here he
shows that he can do the same thing as Eddie Murphy - carry
out entire movie almost single-handedly due to his talent.
His portrayal of Chris is wonderful - grey-haired,
experienced policeman whose mature exterior seems to be in
great contrast with his comic personality and flaws that
seem to impair his efficiency as policeman. Another amusing
contrast is provided by his partner, played by Emilio
Estevez (who had to grow moustache to look older in his
first adult role), who happens to look more mature than his
twice older partner. Chris' immaturity and irrational
acting, however, is quite justifiable since the object of
his attention is played by Madeleine Stowe, one of the most
beautiful actresses in Hollywood. Stowe, who would repeat
femme fatale routine in many other movies, here shows a
great comic talent and her interaction with Dreyfuss is
delightful. All the other supporting actors are good, even
Aidan Quinn in the role of psychopatic boyfriend, who had
enough space to make his token bad guy multi-dimensional.
All in all, STAKEOUT is full of contrasts - it is realistic,
yet entertaining movie; serious and funny in the same time.
But, more than anything, it is that kind of movie that would
make people enjoy it without feeling guilty.

Title
Review for Untamed Heart (1993)
Hollywood filmmakers in 1990s missed plenty of opportunities
for truly great films when they decided to stick to the
formula and simplify plots and characters as much as
possible. However, there are some occasions when simplicity
can be a virtue, and when attempts to spice up films for the
sake of originality can be counterproductive. One of
examples of simplicity that works could be found in UNTAMED
HEART, 1993 melodrama directed by Tony Bill.
The protagonist of the film is Caroline (played by Marisa
Tomei), waitress in Minneapolis diner. She is beautiful
young woman, but her search for "Mr. Right" is fruitless -
each of her romantic relationships ends with disappointment.
One night, on her way home, she gets attacked by rapists,
but Adam (played by Christian Slater), her introverted
colleague, comes to the rescue. This incident marks the
beginning of the romantic liaison between Caroline and her
rescuer. Two of them are very happy, but one thing casts a
shadow on their bliss - Adam was born with a heart disease
and his condition can be fatal unless he gets another heart.
Adam nevertheless refuses to go to surgery, convinced that
his heart is part of his identity.
At first glance, Tom Sierchio's melodramatic script looks
terribly old-fashioned and almost ridiculous in its attempts
to manipulate viewers' feelings. However, two things rescue
UNTAMED HEART from turning into disaster. One of them is
blue collar setting of Minneapolis - it represents something
of a refreshment compared to the majority of similar films
that usually take place in New York or Los Angeles; and it
also brings realism necessary for us to forget that we are
being manipulated. The other great asset of this film is in
the cast. Marisa Tomei excels in the role so different from
the one that brought her "Oscar" in MY COUSIN VINNY, while
Christian Slater obviously works very hard in order to show
people that he can play shy, introvert and almost retarded
people - so different from the characters that brought him
fame. Because of that and Tony Bill's professional
direction, UNTAMED HEART is a nice example of Hollywood
craftsmanship that could be recommended to audience hungry
for good old tearjerkers in these cynical times.
Review written on September 29th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for I Love Trouble (1994)
Every now and then, reviewers are faced with the films that
are hard to be properly reviewed. Most of the time it
happens with films that leave so overwhelming impact, either
good or bad, that in the end reviewers must work hard to
express his thoughts or feelings. But, sometimes it can
happen for rather trivial reasons. I LOVE TROUBLE happened
to be one of such occasions for the author of this review.
The impression left by the film wasn't overwhelming - on the
contrary, there were hardly any impression at all, since I
had real trouble keeping myself awake while watching it.
Which surprise me to this day, because the movie theatre was
full, I was close to sound speakers, the show wasn't late
and I didn't lack sleep before the show. Such things happen
very rarely to me, and, after many years, the closest thing
to solution to this mystery is probably the quality of the
film itself.
The plot revolves around two rival Chicago reporters - old
Peter Brackett (Nick Nolte) and young, aspiring Sabrina
Peterson (Julia Roberts). Two of them are assigned to cover
the train collision. As soon as they meet, they start
scooping each other, but during the process they both
discover sinister plot involving cancerogenic milk, and also
the romantic feelings they have for each other. The plot in
this film is rather secondary to its real raison d'ętre -
romantic pairing reminiscent of classical screwball comedies
starring Spencer Tracy and Katharine Hepburn. Movie author,
director and screenwriter Charles Shyer, who had some
experiences with turning the screwball spirit into modern
setting with FATHER OF THE BRIDE, tries again, this time
pairing old Nick Nolte with young Julia Roberts. However,
although there is some chemistry between the two, soon it
stops to arouse any interest. It probably happens due to
poorly executed genre mix, that collides light-hearted
romantic comedy with rather uninteresting plot suitable to
pure action thrillers. Shyer as director fails to make the
proper transition between the two, and fails in both areas,
making the story cliched and predictable. The end result is
rather forgettable effort, which convinced me not to watch
movie again. I'll give it the benefit of the doubt, though.

Title
Review for Getting Even with Dad (1994)
For many critics Macaulay Culkin symbolised everything that
was bad about early 1990s Hollywood. Following the smashing
success of HOME ALONE, Culkin became the most bankable child
star of those times with most of his later films repeating
the same formula over and over again. Since those usually
films relied on Culkin's pretty face and annoying brat
routine at the expense of everything else, young actor was
not particularly popular among critics, at least those
unwilling to bow to the standards of the lowest common
denominator or accept misanthropic comedies as family
entertainment. They probably greeted Culkin's puberty with a
sigh of relief - with his voice mutating, Culkin simply
couldn't deliver the goods anymore and his movie star career
came to a halt. GETTING EVEN WITH DAD, 1994 comedy by Howard
Deutsch, is one of his last films.
In this film Culkin plays Timmy Gleason, young boy whose
mother has passed away while father Ray (played by Ted
Danson), professional thief, spent most of the time in
prison. Ray is now out of prison and together with his two
accomplices - Bobby (played by Saul Rubinek) and Carl
(played by Gailard Sartain) - prepares great coin heist.
Timmy, however, shows up in the middle of planning and since
he is bright kid, he doesn't need much time to figure out
why Ray ignores his presence. So, in order to finally
attract father's attention, Timmy hides the stolen coins and
demands that Ray spend some time with him before turning
them over. When father and son finally get together, they
are followed by Ray's partners and police.
The script by Jim Jennewein and Tom S. Parker, based on
already bizarre premise, is overcrowded with sentimental
cliches (delinquent man sees the errors of his ways after
being paired with infant against his will) and some
obligatory but nevertheless implausible subplots (romantic
liaison between ex con and female detective, played by
Glenne Headley). This script provides few humorous scenes,
and character actors are doing fine work, whether they have
more complex job like Ted Danson, or play caricatures like
Rubinek and Sartain. However, good production values and
acting talent alone can't save GETTING EVEN WITH DAD to from
sliding in the oblivion reserved for Hollywood mediocrity.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Spellbound (1945)
As I had said in one of my previous reviews, from time to
time I'm faced with interesting movie watching phenomenon,
quite opposite from "guilty pleasures". There are film
authors who are great and who are supposed to be worshipped,
but sometimes I just can't help it - I don't like their work
and later I feel guilty about it. The movies are technically
all right, they have all the necessary ingredients, but they
simply don't look the way a true masterpiece should. I often
encounter such phenomenon when I watch films by John Ford,
but there are other cases. Among those cases are also
classic thrillers by Alfred Hitchcock, the great master of
suspense. More often than not, those alleged masterpieces
failed to meet expectations created by the established
critics and film scholars. Of course, that doesn't mean that
they are bad or substandard; actually, many of them are very
good, but their flaws are often overlooked, mostly out of
irrational respect towards great Hitchcock. One of the
illustrations of such phenomenon is SPELLBOUND, his 1945
thriller, often hailed as the first major Hollywood film to
deal with psychoanalysis.
The plot of the film begins in Green Manors, psychiatric
institution dedicated to the treatment of mental disorders
via psychoanalysis. Among the staff is Dr. Constance
Petersen (played by Ingrid Bergman), beautiful but emotional
cold psychiatrist. Her barren love life is going to improve
thanks to Dr. Edwards (played by Gregory Peck), young
psychiatrist who is going to become new head of the
institution. Two of them fall madly in love with each other,
but Constance and her colleagues soon discover some oddities
in Dr. Edwards' behaviour. Constance confronts him and
discovers that her lover is actually impostor, mentally
disturbed amnesiac who used to be Dr. Edwards' patient and
later took his identity after being involved in some
mysterious and traumatic incident which, presumably, left
real Dr. Edwards dead. Against her better and professional
judgement, guided only by the feelings towards stranger who
has initials "J.B." as the only trace of identity, Constance
decides not to report him to police. Instead, she tries to
treat his condition by helping him to remember his true
identity and what really happened.
Hitchcock, sometimes accused of creating films solely around
single scene, had a very good script here, written by Ben
Hecht and based on the novel by Francis Beeding. The plot of
SPELLBOUND revolved about genuine and very intriguing crime
mystery, and its originality was due to the use of someone's
mental condition as the main element of the plot. Hitchcock
also used that mental condition in order to create some
really effective and suspenseful scenes. On the other hand,
scenes that were most remembered from this movie - dream
sequence by Salvador Dali and the showdown at the end - had
nothing to do with such mental condition. The bravery with
which Hitchcock had used psychoanalysis for the first time
in Hollywood was compromised with rather simplistic approach
towards such subject. According to Hitchcock, psychological
problems that require professional help could be cured
simply if person acknowledges their existence. Of course, we
know that this is not the case, and even Hitchcock in his
later films used much more complex approach when he dealt
with psychoanalysis.
The acting in this film is good. Ingrid Bergman is very
believable, both as emotionally detached professional and as
woman blinded by love. Unfortunately, her character is done
great disservice with the script that failed to properly
explain her transformation from former into latter;
Hitchcock as director didn't help either, since he didn't
make that change gradual. Also, many feminists would
probably be up in arms because this film implicitly treats
professional women as inherently unstable and therefore
inferior to their male colleagues. Gregory Peck as her
partner has somewhat better role that inspired many similar
characters in psychological thrillers - good looking guys
who hide sinister secrets behind their attractive surface.
But, those who played supporting roles did the most
impressive acting job in SPELLBOUND. Michael Checkov was
excellent as Dr. Brulov, old mentor and friend of Constance.
Leo G. Carroll was also very good as Dr. Murchison, and Bill
Goodwin had a brief but very good appearance as sympathetic
house detective.
All in all, SPELLBOUND is more than solid, although still
overrated psychological thriller. Its true importance lies
not in its quality, but in the roads Hitchcock paved for
future filmmakers in it.

Title
Review for North by Northwest (1959)
Rating Hitchcock's film can be rather difficult task,
especially since British director made plenty of truly
exceptional films during his golden period from 1950s to
early 1960s. Many of those films are very distinctive from
each other, but the difference in quality is microscopic.
So, the scholars and critics must apply different sets of
criteria when they rate Hitchcock's films. The author of
this review is therefore unable to name Hitchcock's film
that is, in his view, the best. But, on the other hand, I
can name Hitchcock's film that provides the best viewing
experience. That film is NORTH BY NORTHWEST, 1959 comedic
thriller that is often mentioned as the cornerstone of that
particular genre.
The plot, based on the original script by Ernest Lehman,
begins in New York, where Roger O. Thornhill (played by Cary
Grant) successful middle-aged advertising executive,
prepares for business lunch in Plaza hotel. There he is
mistaken for "Roger Chaplain" and immediately kidnapped by
two sinister-looking men who take him to country house in
Long Island. There he is confronted by their leader (played
by James Mason), who doesn't believe Thornhill's claims of
mistaken identity and decides to kill Thornhill by getting
him drunk and arranging the traffic accident. Thornhill,
while drunk, manages to escape his captors but he is soon
arrested and charged for driving under influence.
Authorities view his abduction story as alcoholic fantasy,
especially since they find no evidence of foul play in the
house allegedly used by captors. Thornhill, on the other
hand, decided to settle this matter so he goes to UN
building where he is supposed to meet the owner of the
house, UN diplomat Lester Townsend (played by Philip Ober).
The meeting ends with disaster for Thornhill - assassins not
only kill the diplomat, but Thornhill himself is seen as the
perpetrator in front of dozens of witnesses. Thornhill is
now forced to flee both from assassins and police, and the
only way for him to clear his name is to find the real Roger
Caplan. The trail leads him to Chicago so he boards the
train where he would receive assistance from Eve Kendall
(played by Eva Marie Saint), attractive industrial designer
who seems to fall for handsome fugitive and whose presence
on the train might not be accidental.
Versatility as one of the ingredients for cinema genius
could be clearly observed during Hitchcock's golden phase.
NORTH BY NORTHWEST represents another brilliant example of
such versatility, especially when we compare this film to
Hitchcock's previous masterpiece. NORTH BY NORTHWEST in many
ways provides sharp contrast to VERTIGO made one year
earlier. Instead of extremely dark and unrelentingly
depressive psychological drama we are now presented with
light- hearted, almost farcical comedy of errors. Instead of
the film that sacrifices tempo and action for the sake of
establishing deep characters, we are here introduced to
rollercoaster plot full of breath-taking scenes. Instead of
dysfunctional characters on the verge of psychosis NORTH BY
NORTHWEST gives us one of the clearest examples of
Hitchcockian "ordinary man in extraordinary situation"
formula.
On this particular occasion, "ordinary man" is played by
Cary Grant, extraordinary actor who had great previous
experience with Hitchcock, usually playing suave characters.
This time character of Roger O. Thornhill represented quite
a challenge, because protagonist of this film was supposed
to be "normal", ordinary person. Unable to brush off his
already iconic looks and mannerism, Grant had to rely on
some interesting character quirks that would make this
character closer to the perception of Joe Average. So, his
character of Thornhill is given some rather unflattering
baggage - two failed marriages, boozing and lying habits
plus and image of mamma's boy that doesn't quite corresponds
with his greying hair. Ironic dimension of the last element
was recognised by Hitchcock and he accordingly gave the role
of Thornhill's mother to Jessie Royce Landis, actress
younger than Grant. Many critics often like to see Thornhill
in NORTH BY NORTHWEST as the precursor to the movie
character of James Bond, but they usually ignore the fact
that suaveness is the only thing Thornhill and Bond have in
common. Actually, Thornhill is anything but ordinary hero -
in the beginning of the film he is only passive participant
in the plot beyond his comprehension. While Bond has some
abilities and training to deal with extraordinary
situations, Thornhill must more than often rely on luck or
other people to get him out of trouble. In many instances
those people are women, and in one occasion it results with
rather humiliating experiences when Thornhill leaves the
elevator being ridiculed as "mamma's boy". Thornhill also in
many occasions makes mistakes, some of them bordering on
common stupidity, and only through the rather far-fetched
set of circumstances fulfils the role of the hero, still
suffering setback until the very end of film.
Icy blonde - another important element of Hitchcock's
formula - is this time played by Eva Marie Saint, actress
who is relatively unknown compared to other Hitchcock's
blondes. This is partly because reputation of Eva Marie
Saint has rather tough competition in the forms of Grace
Kelly, Kim Novice, Janet Leigh and Tippi Hedren, but the
real reason is the fact that character of Eve Kendall
doesn't exactly fit Hitchcock's stereotypes. This character
is more complex and multilayered, but Saint, despite looking
supernaturally glamorous in her role of femme fatale still
retains some down-to-earth qualities of girl-next-door,
making her character even more charming. Because of that,
Saint's performance in this film is one of the most
convincing female role in Hitchcock's opus and definitely
the most underrated of them all.
Hitchcock in NORTH BY NORTHWEST keeps heroes and heroines
within the boundaries of his formulas, but strays away from
his principles when it comes to the depiction of villains.
In this case, they are less interesting than protagonists.
James Mason as the chief villain is suave but menacing, yet
somehow his manners are too mechanical. Young Martin Landau
as his creepy, but intelligent sidekick Leonard, is more
impressive. Some villainous traits are even reserved for the
characters usually associated with the forces of good, and
Leo G. Carroll, long-time associate of Hitchcock, provides
impressive performance as chillingly cynical Professor.
Hitchcock's trademarks are not only visible in the realm of
characterisation, but also in the way he constructed the
film. His method of building the movie on the single yet
effective scene is here enriched with the excellent script
that provided not one great scene but many. And all those
scenes make perfect sense by gradually changing the
environment and general atmosphere of the film, starting
with the noisy, overpopulated streets of New York and ending
in a empty, natural state of Mount Rushmore (and culminating
in almost too obvious Freudian comment in the very last shot
of the film). In order to achieve that effect, Hitchcock
heavily relied on photography by Robert Burke and music by
always reliable Bernard Herrmann. The choice of the latter
is superb, especially in the scenes where Hitchcock
deliberately decides not to have music in the soundtrack and
thus allow that atmosphere develops through much more
effective silence. Choice of locations - New York, UN
Building, Mount Rushmore - is also very good, same as rather
impressive architecture and interior design of Vandamm's
house.
NORTH BY NORTHWEST, although probably the most beloved of
all Hitchcock's films, had its share of critics, always
ready to rip it to shreds by nit-picks. There are some
elements in this film that might be seen as flaws, namely
when it comes to the plausibility of certain scenes. For
example, in the scene that takes place in UN building,
Thornhill acts like no sane man would act in similar
circumstances. The finale is marred by somewhat too
convenient dues ex machine. And, finally, even the most
cherished of all Hitchcockian moments - crop-dusting scene -
might be perfect from the technical point of view, but it
nevertheless features the most idiotic method of
assassination in the cinema history. However, by the time
this happens, the audience was already exposed to the
farcical nature of this film in which nothing on screen can
be taken too seriously. Viewers who bother with such details
make the same mistake as those who are ready to ponder long
about the true nature of "MacGuffin" in NORTH BY NORTHWEST.
They should simply sit, relax and enjoy watching this as the
one of the best films ever made.
Review written on September 25th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Absolution (1981)
Richard Burton is a great actor who had misfortune of being
associated with well-known films that didn't turned out to
be worthy of his talent. Those who want to see Burton at his
best should look among the lesser-known films he made in his
native Britain in the last stages of his career. ABSOLUTION,
1978 thriller directed by Anthony Page, is one of such
examples.
The plot takes place in English boarding school that is
being run by Catholic priest. One of them is Father Goddard
(played by Richard Burton), teacher who insist on the
strictest forms of discipline and can't stand any trace of
independent thought. Because of that he is despised by the
most of the pupils, and that even includes his favourite
student Stansfield (played by Dominic Guard). When
free-thinking hippie vagrant Blakey (played by Billy
Connolly) arrives near the school in search of work, he is
soon befriended by Stansfiled who sees a new and better role
model in him. After a while, Blakey and Stansfield decide to
pull a practical joke on Father Goddard by staging a fake
murder. Stansfiled tells about the murder in confession,
knowing that Father Goddard won't be able to do anything
about it. However, what began as a prank would soon turn
into real nightmare.
Anthony Shaffer's script is based on stage play, but this is
more of an asset than liability for this particular
thriller. Unlike modern-day thrillers that usually rely on
exotic set-ups, ABSOLUTION takes place in isolated yet
realistic setting, and the real source of tension is within
the characters. Shaffer never takes sides and until the very
end audience is left to sympathise with different
characters, never quite certain who among them is a good or
bad. Because of that constant uncertainty, the atmosphere of
the film is very dark and unusually bitter ending comes as
something quite natural. The ending of ABSOLUTION also
represents something which is quite rare in modern Hollywood
thrillers - it is both unexpected, yet very believable and
fits within the context of the story. The acting in this
film is superb, with Richard Burton allowing audience both
to despise and sympathise with his rigid character. Billy
Conolly is also very impressive as his carefree and often
larger- than-life opposite. Their younger colleagues Dominic
Guard and David Bradley are also very good in their roles.
Unfortunately, Anthony Page's direction is best-suited for
this film, because he employs shock tactics in the film that
would have benefited more from more subtle approach. Musical
score by Stanley Myers (of DEER HUNTER fame) is also rather
unimpressive. However, despite these flaws and despite the
fact that it might prove too disturbing for some of the more
sensitive viewers, ABSOLUTION is nevertheless powerful and
thought-provoking film that would leave long lasting
impression on those who see it.
Review written on September 30th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Threesome (1994)
Tastes and morals may change, but one thing remains the same
throughout history - among all works of art the most
controversial ones are those that explore how far a human
being can go before he/she reaches happiness. Since that
happiness often corresponds with active love life,
controversy often comes from the depiction of sexuality -
either unconventional display of sexuality or display of
unconventional forms of sexuality. Interestingly enough,
THREESOME, 1994 romantic drama by Andrew Fleming, hardly
caused any controversy despite satisfying both of
aforementioned criteria.
The plot takes place on unnamed American college where shy,
bookwormish student Eddy (played by Josh Charles) shares two
thirds of dormitory suite with Stuart (played by Stephen
Baldwin), typical jock. Two of them, despite differences in
character and views on world, become best friend, but their
relationship becomes complicated when, due to bureacratic
mistake, remaining third of their suite gets occupied by a
female student, Alex (played by Lara Flynn Boyle). Soon it
becomes apparent that Alex rejects all Stuart's advances in
favour of Eddy, who, to his utmost horror, starts realising
that he is being attracted to Stuart. However, despite
triple case of unrequited love, all three become great
friends and enjoy time with each other. But the unresolved
sexual tension is still present and threatens their unusual
relationship.
THREESOME didn't cause much of a controversy because it was
made during the zenith of "political correctness" when
homosexual desires as integral part of love triangle didn't
look as shocking as in previous eras. Furthermore, this film
at first glance didn't look very different from the standard
romantic comedies from Hollywood and for many the unusual
love triangle was nothing more than "high concept" for
formulaic and predictable Hollywood product. However,
writer-director Fleming approached this farcical situation
with a great deal of seriousness. There are some truly funny
moments in this film, but THREESOME is melodrama in its
nature, obviously inspired by Truffaut's classic JULES ET
JIM (which is explicitly referenced in this film), and
Fleming is not afraid to counter mostly benign humour with
some darker overtones in the plot. The actors who appeared
in this film seemed perfect for the part - Josh Charles is
very good in his role, while Stephen Baldwin plays very
convincing jock. Lara Flynn Boyle is also very good as the
only female in this triangle and plays her role with a lot
of natural ease, which wasn't such easy thing do considering
that she had to appear not only naked in front of camera,
but also to play love scene that features certain sexual
activity that used to belong only in the domain of X-rated
movies. The ending of this film, however, seems somewhat
forced and diminshes generally good impression of this film.
However, even when the novelty of its basic premise wears
off, THREESOME is still going to be interesting and
entertaining movie experience.
Review written on September 30th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for American Graffiti (1973)
Last few years it became very fashionable to portray 1970s
as the Golden Age. People that actually had to live in that
particular period had somewhat different perspective. In the
Gloomy Decade lamentation over kinder and gentler past was
quite fashionable. In 1973 George Lucas, young and unknown
film director at the time, was one of the first to profit on
such feeling of nostalgia. His semi-autobiographical drama
AMERICAN GRAFFITI, shot in four weeks with small budget,
turned out to be one of the most popular, and therefore,
most profitable films of the year. Financial success,
critical praise and "Oscar" nominations later allowed Lucas
to engage in the next and even more successful project -
STAR WARS.
The plot takes place in Modesto, small town in Northern
California during one night in summer of 1962. Curt
Henderson (played by Richard Dreyfuss) and Steve Bolander
(played by Ron Howard) are two high school graduates who are
about to travel back East next morning in order to enrol in
college. Two of them have different views on their immediate
future - Curt has some second thoughts about leaving
friends, familiar settings and carefree teenager lifestyle;
Steve is, on the other hand, quite adamant about going to
college, even if it jeopardises relationship with his long
time girlfriend and Steve's sister Laurie (played by Cindy
Williams). Steve, while trying to settle things with Laurie,
borrows his expensive car to Terry "The Toad" Fields (played
by Charles Martin Smith), nerdy friend who would use that
machine to cruise the town's strip and pick beautiful blonde
Debbie Dunham (played by Candy Clark). John Milner (played
by Paul Le Mat), the oldest of the bunch, has quite another
problem - during the course of his nightly cruise, he was
tricked into babysitting obnoxious 13-year old brat Carol
(played by Mackenzie Phillips), and while he tries to dump
her, new hotrod driver Bob Falfa (played by Harrison Ford)
challenges Milner's title of local drag race king.
AMERICAN GRAFFITI is often cited not only as one of the best
1970s, but also one of the best American films of this
century. On the other hand, its current popularity was
perpetuated, at least partially, by the later success of
STAR WARS and instant name recognition of its creator.
Overrated or not, AMERICAN GRAFFITI is a fine piece of
filmmaking. It has anything a good period film should have
-costumes, hairstyles, cars and other details characteristic
for the early 1960s, all shot by a good photography by Harry
Wexler (although some scenes look too dark at times). The
period atmosphere is also brought by almost semi-documentary
style in which Lucas shows us fast food restaurants, drive
ins, high school dances, night cruising, drag races and
other social customs of that era. The characters are well
written and played by a great ensemble cast of young and
unknown actors who would later (at least in most of the
cases) enjoy respectable careers, including Harrison Ford in
a small but very uncharacteristic role of villain. The music
is not original, but great nevertheless, with an excellent
collection of late 1950s and early 1960s songs that play
almost non-stop, followed by the voice of Wolfman Jack,
legendary DJ of the period who appears in a small but
memorable cameo role in the film.
However, this film, despite being very good, lost part of
its initial appeal through the passage of time. Some of the
flaws in the script by George Lucas and Gloria Katz are
becoming more transparent - like the lack of coherent plot
and adequate closure. Many situations and character types
became overused in multitude in later films that covered the
same period, turning AMERICAN GRAFFITI in large collection
of cliches and stereotypes. And even its message of growing
up and facing the world seems less universal than Lucas
wants to admit. Those who would understand this film the
most are still those who used to grow up in nearly fairytale
world of post-WW2 American prosperity and whose illusions
got shattered by Kennedy assassination, Vietnam and great
social turmoil that followed those traumatic events. The
others would probably have different perspective on this
film, but AMERICAN GRAFFITI still bears the mark of a superb
filmmaking talent.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Boy and His Dog, A (1975)
When people hear the phrase "post-apocalyptic" films, they
usually think about extremely violent low budget action
films, set in deserts that are supposed to represent the
modern civilisation turned into wasteland. Most of these
films were made in late 1970s and early 1980s, inspired by
the success of George Miller's MAD MAX 2 and new-born fears
of nuclear annihilation in Reagan's year. However, post-
apocalyptic films were made before late 1970s and they
didn't always belong to the area of action genre. One of
such examples is A BOY AND HIS DOG, 1975 black comedy
directed by L.Q. Jones and based on the award-winning
novella by well- known science fiction author Harlan
Ellison.
The plot of this film is set in Arizona in the year 2024
A.D. The world had been devastated by nuclear war seventeen
years ago, and the surface of the Earth is turned into
desert, roamed by various drifters in search of food, drink
and shelter. One of them is Vic (played by Don Johnson),
eighteen-year-old boy whose only companion is Blood (voice
by Tim McIntire), dog with whom he has telepathic
connection. Blood's instincts, wisdom, knowledge experience
help Vic in his everyday search for food, but so far Vic
can't find the only thing on his mind - a girl. Finally, two
of them stumble on a girl in the form of young Quilla June
Holmes (played by Susan Benton) and rescue her from
homicidal rapists and mutants. After a night of passionate
love Quilla disappears and Vic, against Blood's better
judgement, goes looking for her in the underground, where
some remnants of civilisation survived and turned into
grotesque version of ultraconservative America. The
underground men are sterile and Vic finds out that he had
been lured down in order to impregnate underground women,
but this task turns out to be anything but pleasant.
After the opening scenes of A BOY AND HIS DOG, when scenes
of nuclear explosions serve as backdrop for authors'
commentary on contemporary world, viewers instantly know
that he is going to watch black comedy, but hardly anything
can prepare them for the surprise and macabre twist at the
end - probably one of the best finales in the history of
cult movies. Between those two points we have an opportunity
to watch Don Johnson of MIAMI VICE fame in his early days,
when he very believably plays young, horny teenager.
However, the best thing about whole film is his interaction
with dog and Tim McIntire whose voice always spews critical
and right-on- target comments on boy's mundane and
irresponsible behaviour. The dialogue is extremely funny and
very entertaining, and Susan Benton also adds them
additional dimension when she enters the picture.
Unfortunately, in the segments that deal with underground
society, writer and director L.Q. Jones goes overboard with
his grotesque attempt of satire on conformist and
semi-totalitarian tendencies of small- town America. Those
segments provide opportunity for great Jason Robards Jr. to
give quite effective portrayal of soulless bureaucrat, but
that performance doesn't improve general impression. Another
problem with this film is obvious lack of budget that forced
filmmakers to shoot many scenes underground or at night;
inadequate lighting make many happenings on the screen
incomprehensible to the viewer. Those who are patient and
forgiving enough are going to be awarded with good acting,
sharp dialogue and effective black humour, so the cult
reputation of A BOY AND HIS DOG is well deserved.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Drop Zone (1994)
John Badham was never considered to be among the best
American film directors, but his work in 1990s represents
huge disappointment to those who are familiar with his
achievements in previous decades. One of the reasons for the
decline in his career is the lack of inspiration. On too
many occasions Badham tried to find that inspiration from
the past triumphs, whether other people's (like in his 1992
American remake of Besson's NIKITA) or his own (like in his
sequel to STAKEOUT one year later). In 1994 he probably
remembered his past success with BLUE THUNDER, one of the
best action films of 1980s, and thought that the success had
something to do with spectacular helicopter stunts. The
result was DROP ZONE, action film that dealt with another
kind of flying objects.
The protagonist of this film is U.S. Marshall Pete Nessip
(played by Wesley Snipes). Federal prisoner and former
computer wizard Earl Leedy (played by Kevin Jeter) is to be
transferred by commercial flight, and Nessip and his brother
and partner Terry (played by Malcolm Jamal-Warner) escort
him. Routine task gets turns into nightmare when the plane
gets taken by the group of hijackers, led by Ty Moncrief
(played by Gary Busey). They snatch Leedy from Nessip's
hand, blow a hole in plane and jump out with parachutes
leaving Nessip's brother dead. Nessip is blamed for the
disaster, disgraced and suspended, but he decides to pursue
his own private investigation, although everyone tells him
that nobody could survive skydiving from such altitude and
with such speed. The trail leads him to Florida skydiving
circles, so he enrols in skydiving school led by tough
instructor Jessie Crossman (played by Yancy Butler). In the
meantime, Ty Moncrief plans to parachute himself and his
gang on the top of DEA headquarters, use Leedy's hacking
abilities to penetrate computer databases, gather top secret
data about informants and undercover agents and sell them to
top drug dealers afterwards. The raid is about to take place
on July 4th, where the airspace over Washington D.C. is open
for the annual skydiving event, which is going to be
attended by Crossman and Nessip.
Badham still knows how to shoot action films, judging by the
series of spectacular scenes in this film, as well as the
way he handles skydiving stunts. Some of those stunts with a
passage of time get somewhat monotonous (at least for those
who aren't enthusiastic about extreme sports), but the pace
of the film is rapid. Unfortunately, even with plenty of
"cool" scenes and fast tempo, audience still has time to
notice gaping plot holes, preposterous premise and series of
implausabilities in the screenplay by John Bishop and Peter
Barscochini. Many of them (two brothers working as partners
in federal agency, parachute landings in the middle of town
being mistaken for covert action etc.) seem to insult
viewer's intelligence. The actors also seem discouraged by
the lack of plot or credible characters, so their
performance is either bellow expectations (Wesley Snipes in
many instances hyperventilates), uninspired (like in the
case of Yancy Butler) or routine (Gary Busey again playing
his trademark blonde psychopath). Although some elements of
the film make it barely watchable, DROP ZONE in many ways is
quite suitable title for the movie that deserved to bomb.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
The year that is about to pass was supposed to be the year
of GODZILLA. However, that unfortunate film by Devlin and
Emmerich would be remembered less by its own quality than by
the unprecedented marketing campaign and its main slogan
"Size does matter". Intended to symbolise the supremacy of
quantity over quality in contemporary Hollywood, that slogan
was also a direct challenge to Star Wars fans with its
mockery of immortal words of Yoda in THE EMPIRE STRIKES
BACK. Star Wars fans were enraged, and Lucasfilm briefly
cashed on the sentiment with its own marketing campaign for
STAR WARS: EPISODE ONE with the words "Plot does matter" as
its rebuttal of Devlin-Emmerich claims. Some Star Wars fans
welcomed that move, while the others were more cynical.
"Plot does matter? Really? To the same people who gave us
RETURN OF THE JEDI?" Those were the words of my friend who
is also an avid Star Wars fan and who simply can't forgive
Lucas for the disappointment he had experienced with the
third film of the original Star Wars saga.
Perhaps it would be too harsh to put Devlin-Emmerich's
GODZILLA and RETURN OF THE JEDI in the same basket. Those
two movies are undoubtedly light years away in their
quality. In the case of the latter, bad reputation was
deserved mostly because it failed to reach the extremely
high standards of cinematic and artistic perfection, set by
its two great predecessors - STAR WARS and THE EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK. I noticed this things even when I had seen the
film for the first time, almost a decade and half ago. For
me it was a bitter-sweet occasion - the last film of the
great saga that had used to capture my imagination. But I
was disappointed; partly because I grew up and my movie
going preferences matured; partly because I knew what was
going to happen in the final part of the trilogy; and partly
because the RETURN OF THE JEDI was really bad in comparison
with the previous two films. To this day, I watch RETURN OF
THE JEDI, but only as the last film of the trilogy; never as
original and captivating works of art like previous two
films. Without them, RETURN OF THE JEDI is a mildly
entertaining second-rate science fiction spectacle, not very
different from an average infantile blockbusters that almost
ruined the genre in the mid 1980s.
Problems of the RETURN OF THE JEDI begin with the plot which
had to solve the cliffhanger from the previous film and also
to finish the trilogy. The story begins with the attempts of
the small band of Rebels, led by Jedi knight Luke Skywalker
(Mark Hamill), to free their comrade Han Solo (Harrison
Ford) from the clutches of evil galactic crime lord Jabba
the Hut. Despite being imprisoned by Jabba themselves, our
heroes succeed in freeing Solo, but now they are faced with
a greater and more important challenge. Evil Galactic Empire
is building the new version of Death Star, battle station
able to destroy entire planets. The construction site is in
a orbit of a forrest moon of Endor, so Rebels carry out the
commando raid on a power generator on the moon's surface,
which would make station vulnerable to the attack of the
entire Rebel fleet. Rebels don't know that the evil lord
Darth Vader (David Prowse, voice by James Earl Jones, face
by Sebastian Shaw) and Emperor himself (Ian McDiarmid) are
on the station and that they have some sinister plans of
their own. The raid on the surface doesn't go well, until
the Rebels find help in the form of Ewoks, primitive but
brave natives that look like teddy bears. In the meantime,
Luke feels that he must finally confront his oldest nemesis
and father, lord Vader, and try to snatch him away from the
dark side of the Force.
The need to wrap up the story forced the screenwriters -
Lawrence Kasdan and George Lucas - to cut corners, but in
the process they sacrificed plausibility and in some
instances even contradicted themselves (like in case of
Vader's true loyalty to the Emperor). Some bad guys are
conveniently present in the movie only to receive their
comeuppance (Boba Fett), some nine hundred years old people
decide to die just in the course of the film, only to
provide some cheap melodrama (Yoda), and some of the new
additions to the story are almost on the level of daytime
soap operas (Leia Organa as Luke's long lost sister). Such
decisions are responsible for RETURN OF THE JEDI having the
weakest script in the trilogy. In previous two films we saw
what could happen to our heroes and we learned to care for
them; here we don't have to. In the beginning, almost all of
them are in the hands of the evil Jabba, but we simply know
that they would get away without the scratch. Even their
lines aren't as powerful as they were in previous two films.
Leia, who used to be feminist icon in the first movie, is
now reduced to object of Jabba's infantile lust in the first
part of JEDI. Original characters - Jabba and the Emperor -
are intended to be cannon fodder, so they weren't very
developed. Jabba is nothing more than grotesque, and Emperor
looks like a caricature of Death in Bergman's SEVENTH SEAL.
His sadistic evilness is deprived of any seductive quality,
and without it he is reduced into less complex and
second-rate villain. Forced again to play stereotypes,
actors didn't have much opportunity to excel. Hamill is
here, unlike previous two films, better than Ford, who
unsuccesfully tries to turn romance with Carrie Fisher's
Leia back into unresolved sexual tension.
The look of the film is good, though. Six years have passed
since the first film, so the special effects technology has
improved. Sadly, in some instances, those effects look
cheaper. The worst example is the beginning in the Jabba's
palace - pandemonium of different and bizarre aliens looks
too much like a bad episode of Muppet Show, and the obvious
blue screen of the Luke's fight with Rancor monster haven't
been improved even in the Special Edition. On the other
hand, space battle in the end, with literally hundreds of
different spaceships fighting each other, looks really
stunning. Same is with the forest battle between Ewoks and
Imperial stormtroopers. Scenery of the desert planet
Tatooine, forest moon Endor and ominous empty halls of Death
Star is really grand and impressive. Musical score by John
Williams is good, although it doesn't offer anything new or
especially memorable, with the exception of the final duel
between Luke and Vader.
However, the biggest addition to the visual identity of the
JEDI is also the most notorious one - Ewoks. Perhaps it was
really nice idea to introduce the primitive race able to
cope with technologically superior enemy (Lucas in
interviews said that he was partly inspired by the U.S.
experience in Vietnam, although Ursulla K. Le Guin's novel A
WORD FOR WORLD IS FORREST could also be seen as a source of
inspiration), but it was compromised in the moment when
Ewoks became teddy bears, obviously intended to provide huge
profits as toys. For many hard core science fiction fans,
including the fans of the trilogy, Ewoks are the symbol of
infantilism that reigned supreme in Hollywood in 1980s.
Movies like JEDI were the reason why people stopped
considering SF to be genre for adults, and thus the Ewoks
became the object of intense hatred among hard core SF
people. One of the most bizarre expressions of that feeling
is the Endor Holocaust theory, that can be found on some
Star Wars sites, and that gives entirely different spin on
the final moments of the film. Perhaps the only redeeming
quality of the Ewoks is their innocence towards the world of
the Star Wars - the scene when C3PO tells them the epic saga
is probably the most moving and, in the same time, most
charming moment of the entire film.
Despite the Ewoks, and despite the alarmingly low quality of
screenplay, RETURN OF THE JEDI remains a good piece of
cinema. It is far from perfection, and far from the heights
reached by its two predecessors, but it still can entertain
the audience - not just the children who would enjoy Ewoks,
not the usual family crowd but even the ordinary space opera
aficionados, even those who fell in love with Star Wars
saga. As a film per se, RETURN OF THE JEDI is a very good
entertainment; but as a part of a saga, it works beautifully
despite all of its flaws. The end sequence - in its original
form and in the "improved" version of the Special Edition
(the author of this review prefers the former) - is the
reason enough to watch this film.

Title
Review for Dune (1984)
When Frank Herbert's DUNE becomes a topic, the author of
this review tends to get a little bit sentimental. There are
two reasons for that. First, the Frank Herbert's
masterpiece, although not the first science fiction novel I
have read in my life, happened to be the first one which
blew me away. And, second, the movie based on a novel
happened to be the subject of the very first article I wrote
for a local fanzine. When I decided to write the review of
the film, I was contemplating a simple adaptation of the
original fanzine article. However, the reason prevailed over
sentimentality and I decided to write completely new piece.
As I said before, Frank Herbert's DUNE was the first piece
of science fiction that blew me away. But even then, when I
was engrossed in a beautiful, mystical and fantastic world
of planet Arrakis, I was imagining how would all those pages
translate into major motion picture. I didn't have as much
insight into film-making business as I have today, yet I saw
two great problems. The first one was the fact that the
detailed yet very alien Herbert's vision of distant futures
and worlds beyond our imagination required a huge, perhaps
even unthinkably high budget for film-makers. And, even if
some brave producer and director would somehow acquire such
great sums of money, they would be faced with another
problem. The hundreds and hundreds of pages of text, full of
detailed and elaborated scenes, numerous sub-plots and
interesting characters were, to say the least, very unlikely
to be squeezed into the regular feature film format.
When I began thinking about it, little did I know that
someone in the world was really faced with such problems.
That person was Dino de Laurentiis, respected Italian
producer who had a relatively good record with
science-fiction and fantasy genre, thanks to his previous
commercial and critical successes like FLASH GORDON and
CONAN THE BARBARIAN. For almost two decades, many people
were contemplating the cinematic adaptation of DUNE, yet de
Laurentiis was the first with the will and resources for
such endeavour. His choice for a director was, though,
somewhat risky; David Lynch was director who brought
attention with unusual visual styles and strictly personal
tendencies towards bizarre in THE ELEPHANT MAN, his first
mainstream picture, as well as with his experimental movie
debut and future cult classic, ERASERHEAD. Choice of Lynch
was a mix blessing for de Laurentiis; on the other hand,
Lynch would deliver science fiction spectacle very different
than usual genre products of those times, like STAR WARS or
BATTLESTAR GALACTICA; on the other hand, his unconventional
cinematic style was liability in terms of box-office
success.
Unlike many other adaptations of popular fiction, and
despite the fact that the Herbert himself had his own script
version rejected, the movie plot was unusually faithful to
the novel. It was set in a very distant future, some 25,000
years from now, when the humanity managed to conquer vast
distances between the stars and settle on numerous worlds.
The entire known universe is ruled by Padisha Emperor Shadam
IV (Jose Ferrer) whose Empire contains areas controlled by
different, and often feuding noble Houses. One of them is
House of Atreides, led by Duke Leto (Juergen Pruchnow),
whose charisma and popularity could be threat to the
Emperor's supremacy. So the Emperor plots a complicated
scheme, using the mortal feud between the Duke and rival
House of Harkonnen, led by evil and sadistic Baron Vladimir
(Kenneth MacMillan). He orders the Duke to occupy Arrakis,
desolate and desert planet also known as Dune, previously
controlled by Harkonnens. The planet is also rich with spice
melange, substance essential for the interstellar travel,
and of extreme importance for the powerful Guild of Space
Navigators. Soon after the arrival, Duke's 15-year old son
Paul (Kyle MacLachlan) begins discovering the planet's
mysteries. One of them is an existence of Fremen, local
people whose legends and prophesies speak of the Messiah
that would lead them to freedom.
Both those who like and who don't like the movie can agree
that David Lynch's DUNE stands out as a very original piece
of science fiction cinema. Lynch, together with the cast and
crew, took a lot of effort in order to make this movie as
different from other science fiction spectacles as possible.
First there was a production design by Terry Masters and
costumes by Bob Ringwood that gave the movie certain
pseudohistorical,  yet very recognisable atmosphere. Than
there was music by pop group Toto, whose ambientalist sound,
together with new age theme by Brian Eno, made the
soundtrack very different from conventional themes by John
Williams or Jerry Goldsmith. And, finally, Lynch himself was
less interested in making spectacular scenes or special
effects attractions than to use Herbert's script for his own
visual obsessions. So, the scenes of space travel or
prophetic visions are more surreal than spectacular; the
characters, especially the bad guys like Harkonnens, are
repulsive, both by their image and by their actions. Nice
example is character of Baron Vladimir Harkonnen; he is
hideously fat man with gruesome swellings on his face, and
the senseless and brutal violence is the only thing that
could provide him orgasmic pleasure. The character of Baron,
brilliantly played by late veteran actor Kenneth MacMillan,
is one of trademarks of the entire picture.
Under the shadow of MacMillan is a small army of other, very
respected and capable actors. Main lead, Kyle MacLachlan,
was a great fan of the novel, and the role of Paul Atreides,
his great movie debut, was a task he had hoped and prepared
for throughout his entire adult life. Lynch's choice in
casting was perfect, and both artists would later continue
their co-operation in other, somewhat more successful
projects. Francesca Annis also left strong impact as Paul's
mother Jessica, with her stunning combination of mature
sexuality and commanding presence. Sadly, almost nobody else
had a real opportunity to shine, because their characters
were underdeveloped or underused.
The reason for that lies in the problem I noted above.
Originally, Lynch envisioned DUNE as four hours long epic
and tried very hard to follow novel, using only minor
changes to the story or characters. Unfortunately, the
producers were too afraid to follow suit, considering any
movie over two hours long unprofitable at the box office.
Results is a movie sliced into two distinctive halfs. First
half is very good because the plot is followed very
meticulously, with very few omissions from the original
material. Lynch worked very hard to stay loyal to the novel;
even the inner thoughts of the characters, one of the
novel's most valuable elements, are delivered to the viewer
through  voice-over, although some of them happen to be
slightly annoying as the time passes by. However, that
annoyance is nothing compared to the second half of DUNE,
when the plot gets sacrificed for the sake of smaller
length. Many events from the novel, some of them very
important, are omitted, and the rest is simply narrated
instead of being portrayed according to novel. Character of
Chani and Fremen in general don't get the attention they
deserved. The rhythm of events finally slows down at the
end, but the timing is again wrong; the ending doesn't
follow the novel, and the anti-climactic duel between Paul
and Feyd-Rauta is there only to please Sting fans, who were
expecting some more screen time for the character played by
their idol.
Such flaws became evident at the movie's initial release,
when it flopped at the box-office. Reasons were simple: the
audience, who had expected conventional science-fiction
entertainment, was confused both by complicated plot and
Lynch's original style. Despite that, David Lynch's DUNE
managed to developed its own cult following, mostly thanks
to Frank Herbert fans, hungry to see their favourite novel
on the screen, even in such less than perfect condition. The
movie became almost obligatory for all those who enjoyed
Herbert's fiction; and such audience was the only one able
to understand the picture. The cult continued to grow, later
inspired entire new sub-genre of computer games (real time
strategies), and to this very day DUNE remains a strong
impulse for many people to start reading Herbert's books.

Title
Review for Striking Distance (1993)
Those people who didn't like Hitchcock used to say that he
made entire movies around single, most effective scene. In
case of STRIKING DISTANCE, 1993 thriller directed by Rowdy
Harrington, the most original and effective scene is
actually wasted in the beginning. What follows is rather
formulaic plot about Tom Hardy (played by Bruce Willis),
Pittsburgh homicide detective and one of the many members of
his family who chose police profession. Loyalty towards his
colleagues and kinsmen is seriously challenged when he
starts investigating the case of a serial killer and finds
out that the perpetrator might be policeman. But this is not
the end of his problems - first, his own father (John
Mahoney) becomes one of the killer's victims, and later on,
his coleague and cousin Jimmy (Robert Pastorelli) commits
suicide after being accused for brutality because of Hardy's
testimony. The ratting on colleague is unforgivable crime
and Hardy is transferred to the River Rescue service. Two
years later, he is embittered alcoholic, but the new wave of
killings would make him re-start investigation, this time
with the help of partner Jo Christman (Sarah Jessica
Parker).
STRIKING DISTANCE is rather forgettable film, which
shouldn't surprise anyone, because the script, written by
Rowdy Harrington and Martin Kaplan, is so full of cliches
and predictable plot twists, that the film itself is hardly
distinguishable from hundreds of similar products produced
by Hollywood in that era. The only difference, perhaps is
the setting - city of Pittsburgh is something like a
refreshment for all those viewers who are tired of seeing
all crime thrillers set in Los Angeles, New York or, in case
they got lucky, New Orleans or Chicago. However, city in
question was probably chosen because of being situated on
three rivers, which allowed Herrington to direct many and
endless chases including speedboats. Some of those action
scenes work, and some don't - in any case, they hardly
justify a whole bunch of formulaic subplots and wooden
characters. The acting is mostly fine - whole bunch of
capable character actors like John Mahoney, Dennis Farina,
Andre Braugher or Brion James do their best to rise above
mediocre script. The lead actor, Bruce Willis, was probably
in one of the worst periods of his career - post-HUDSON HAWK
and before PULP FICTION - so his character, although still
being wise-cracking self, is hardly memorable. Another
disservice to him is done with pairing his character to the
token female in the form of Sarah Jessica Parker, good actor
totally unsuitable for the role and romantic pairing with
zero chemistry. All in all, STRIKING DISTANCE is movie
unworthy of attention, made watchable only by rather sad
collection of great acting talents who had deserved much
better film.

Title
Review for Man Without a Face, The (1993)
One of the riskiest and hardest moves in any actor's career
is transition from the image of popular entertainer to the
image of true artist. Mel Gibson saw that in early 1990s,
when he tried to reach beyond his status of action
superstar, shown in MAD MAX and LETHAL WEAPON movies. His
first attempt, role in Zeffirelli's HAMLET, ended
disastrously. Luckily, there was a second chance for him,
and in 1993 he took that chance with THE MAN WITHOUT A FACE,
coming-of-age drama based on the novel by Isabelle Holland.
That film was also his directorial debut that laid the path
that would lead to his BRAVEHEART triumph two years later.
Like his colleague Jodie Foster in LITTLE MAN TATE, Gibson
decided to direct a movie with a young boy as protagonist.
The plot takes place in small town in Maine 1968. Chuck
Norstadt (played by Nick Stahl) is a 12-year old boy who
lives together with his mother (played by Margaret Whitton)
and two half-sisters. Being misunderstood and ignored by his
family, he seeks rebellion in the idolatry of his late
father, military pilot. His great ambition in life is to go
to the military boarding school. That move, at the peak of
anti-war movement, isn't just unpopular - it is very
unlikely, because Chuck needs tutoring. Help comes in a form
of Justin McLeod (played by Mel Gibson), former teacher with
a terribly scarred face, who lives a hermit. McLeod begins
teaching Norstadt and two of them become friends.
Unfortunately, that only enflames the hostility of the town,
and vicious rumours about teacher's dark past emerge,
threatening the relationship between Chuck and McLeod.
At first glance, THE MAN WITHOUT A FACE looks surprisingly
good for someone's directorial debut. But, those who are
likely to nitpick Gibson's work would find that the
directing seems somewhat too baroque for a simple drama that
would be most suitable for TV films. The most attractive
element in this film is acting. Gibson plays very good and
thankful role of a misanthropic hermit who gradually regains
love for humanity. That role was very carefully played, in
order not to overshadow anyone else, including Nick Stahl,
who was good in his part. The result is a well-acted,
competently directed coming-of-age drama that doesn't drowns
itself in cliches and cheap sentimentality.
Unfortunately, the screenplay by Malcolm McRury had touched
the issues of homosexuality and paedophilia, and that was
enough for this film to be criticised not for its own flaws,
but for the shortcomings of its director. Before making this
film, Gibson was branded as homophobic, because of an
interview he had given. In the peak of Political
Correctness, it was simply inconceivable arrogance for a
notorious homophobe to direct a movie dealing with such
issues. But the real reason why some left-leaning critics
attacked the film wasn't in Gibson's treatment of
homosexuality (which wasn't mentioned or implied on until
the very last scenes in the film). It was the fact that
Gibson gave a story about anti-establishment rebellion from
a rather conservative point of view. The film is set in
1968, but the thing that bothers Chuck is not the old
establishment; Chuck is disgusted with the new social
freedoms that are enjoyed at the expense of newer
generations (with Chuck's own family being the victim of
endless divorces), and the character of Carl (played by
Richard Masur), Chuck's potential stepfather, could be seen
as the caricature of Baby Boomers and all their ideals. The
subtlety with which the conservative ideas were introduced
in this Hollywood film didn't hurt the film, but the very
fact such ideas found their place on screen in that
ultra-liberal era was enough to make this film better than
its reputation.
Review written on September 15th 1999

Title
Review for Henry V (1989)
Screen adaptations of William Shakespeare's plays used to be
made since the moment of Lumiere brothers' invention, but
many might get an impression that the number of such films
reached its peak in 1990s, and that the trend continues to
this day. Every now and then we hear about another of
Shakespeare's plays being turned into prestigious Hollywood
production. In many of such cases producers try to overcome
the gap between Bard's 16th Century worldview and modern-day
audience by using the new settings (ranging from 1880s Italy
to 1930s fascist Britain in alternative historical timeline)
or adding new content (gunfights and musical numbers).
Kenneth Branagh, British actor and director who is the best
known Shakespearean filmmaker of today, has also
experimented with new techniques, but his first major
Shakespearean adaptation, 1989 version of HENRY V, is one of
the most faithful and conventional adaptations in the
history of film. Interestingly enough, it was also one of
the best Shakespeare adaptations, at least judging by the
critics who heralded 28-year Branagh as "new Laurence
Olivier" and instantly called his work as "the masterpiece
of British cinema".
The plot is based on the historical play Shakespeare had
written in the earlier phase of his career and begins in
1415, during the lulls in Hundred Years War between England
and France. Young Henry (played by Kenneth Branagh) has
recently ascended English throne and many consider him
inexperienced and still unfit to be the king, mostly due to
his youthful rowdiness and friendship with notorious John
Falstaff (played by Robbie Coltrane). Henry needs to
establish his authority and the best way to do it is
military campaign against France whose weak King (played by
Paul Scofield) wants to deny him the right to succeed him at
the French throne. When jingoistic French Dauphin (played by
Michael Maloney) sends him tennis balls instead mandatory
tribute, Henry would use this diplomatic insult as a pretext
for war and rallying his nation. His army lands in France
and takes the strategic port of Harfleur after prolonged and
bloody siege; this victory is short-lived because Henry's
army, exhausted by diseases, casualties and short on
supplies must retreat towards their stronghold at Calais.
When his route to safety gets blocked by huge French army
Henry refuses French offer to surrender and instead prepares
for the battle. The next day - October 25th 1415 - would
enter military history as well as the name "Agincourt".
HENRY V is probably the most popular of all Shakespeare's
historical plays, and this might be explained with its tone
being somewhat different from the rest of Shakespeare's work
in that period. Instead of complicated and often depressive
tales of endless feudal backstabbing, Shakespeare provided
us with story that provides clear definition between Good
(English) and Bad Guys (French) as well the inspirational
and uplifting story about triumph of human spirit against
overwhelming odds. Strong patriotic and jingoistic overtones
of that play explain why Laurence Olivier used it in order
to make his 1944 film version while Britain was involved in
war against Nazis. Almost half a century later, Kenneth
Branagh didn't feel the need to incite patriotism in his
fellow British, but jingoism of the play nevertheless had
something to do with his choice of the project, although on
more personal level. Branagh probably found many things in
common between himself - young actor directing first major
film - and Henry - young monarch being put to the first
serious test of his reign. So, in many ways, this film has
very personal dimension for its maker, which is usually one
of the elements of true masterpiece.
Aware of the unavoidable comparisons between his and
Olivier's version, Branagh was determined to be as different
as possible. First of all, his version is more faithful to
Shakespeare's text and it is more realistic. Despite the
budget that seems ridiculously small compared with Hollywood
standards, he decided not to turn HENRY V into stage play on
film (like Olivier did in his version). Instead, HENRY V
looks like full-blooded historical spectacle. Branagh also
keeps some elements of Shakespeare's text that Olivier had
felt uncomfortable with in 1944 war-torn Britain - like
episode with English nobles betraying their king, English
soldiers being hanged for stealing from church, and,
finally, Henry himself capturing French town by publicly
making threats that would look gross even to Rwandan war
criminals. Furthermore, the lack of budget actually works to
the film advantage - unburdened with the need to impress the
audience with lavish costumes, thousands of extras or
magnificent vistas, Branagh tries to suspend viewer's
disbelief with naturalism which comes in many forms. For
example, although Shakespeare's poetic language might sound
artificial and out of place when it comes from the mouths of
career soldiers and petty criminals, Branagh's adaptation,
as well as very convincing acting performances, make those
lines quite natural and believable in the context. Branagh,
who lacked budget for extras or technology for CGI, had to
forget about truly spectacular depictions of Agincourt, but
his version compensates the lack of spectacle with intensity
of action. Although their numbers could have hardly filled
the ranks of two soccer teams, players and extras (Branagh
had to use services of his composer Patrick Doyle) manage to
create illusion of terrible slaughter that featured
thousands of men by sheer intensity of bloodlust. Branagh
uses slow- motion in almost the same manor Peckinpah did and
the fighting scenes are very violent despite not being
excessively gory. And after the battle, when victorious
English begin to march out from the battlefield followed by
Patrick Doyle's triumphant soundtrack, their blood-stained
faces and muddy clothes speak volumes about the scope of the
battle - more than thousands of extras would do.
However, the real strength of HENRY V lies in truly superb
acting. Branagh was lucky to assemble great cast, the cr確e
de la cr確e of the British actors, and, yet those giants,
unlike in similar productions, work together in magnificent
harmony. We have the opportunity to see great variety among
them, sometimes in rather unusual roles, like Dame Judi
Dench who had made a career with roles of tough and powerful
women; here she plays rather common wife of mercenary
soldier. Branagh's regular Michael Maloney gives another
powerful performance as neurotic French Dauphin, while we
also have the opportunity to see young Christian Bale as
Falstaff's Boy. Branagh, being an actor himself, understood
his colleagues very well and almost anyone made great
performance. That includes Emma Thompson who was Branagh's
wife at the time and with whom Branagh shares charming,
although not very necessary seduction scene at the end of
the film. Another Branagh regular, Derek Jacobi plays Chorus
who is there not only to serve as an excuse for low
production values (like in Olivier's version) but also to
put events of the play into historical context.
Great acting, great respect for the source material, great
experience and great talent - these are all ingredients that
made Branagh's HENRY V into one of the best film adaptations
of Shakespeare. Even those who aren't enthusiastic about the
Bard or those who don't like historical dramas would
probably enjoy this superb piece of filmmaking.
(Historical note: While most of period epics tend to
sacrifice authenticity for the sake of drama and spectacle,
HENRY V takes the different route. Battle of Agincourt is
depicted in the way it probably happened, although Branagh
decided to follow Shakespeare rather than historical record
in some details. For example, unlike the film, English army
had more men than French. However, Henry's army was
exhausted by long marches and dysentery, and French had more
of armoured knights in their ranks. Same as in the film, the
battlefield was muddy and that prevented French from using
the numerical advantage of their armoured cavalry; their
knights were forced to fight on foot, making them an easy
target for the favourite English weapon - Welsh longbows
that decimated their ranks. Although a great English
victory, Battle of Agincourt produced more English and less
French casualties than in the figures presented by the film
and Shakespeare's play.)
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov

Title
Review for Wolf (1994)
The author of this review is supposed to worship, or at
least respect Mike Nichols as one of the great American
filmmakers, but he can't. Although I never saw anything
particularly wrong in Mike Nichols' films - they all had
interesting stories, good cast etc. - I still have
impression of watching them being equal to the watching
paint dry. So, when even when he tried to make something
different with WOLF, his 1994 horror film, I greeted that
effort without any sort of enthusiasm.
The protagonist of this film is Will Randall (played by Jack
Nicholson), publishing executive from New York who is
currently experiencing plenty of disappointments in his
life. His firm is taken over by business tycoon Raymond
Alden (played by Christopher Plummer) who degrades Randall
and brings Stewart Swinton (played by James Spader),
treacherous yuppie and Randall's former friend to his old
position. To make things even worse, Randall's wife
Charlotte (played by Kate Nelligan) is having an affair.
However, few days before this all happened, Randall was
bitten by a wolf on the isolated country road. Since that
event he notices changes in his metabolism and life patterns
- he sleeps all day and is awake all night, his senses are
better, but the most significant change is willingness to
stand up against his enemies. He becomes even more aware of
this change when he meets Alden's daughter Laura (played by
Michelle Pfeiffer) and begins an affair with her.
Some of the best roles in Jack Nicholson's career were those
of men whose willingness to break the rules or succumb to
irrational urges made them look satanic compared to "normal"
people. So, the role of book editor who is slowly turning
into werewolf was perfect for Nicholson and he plays it with
gusto. Michelle Pfeiffer as his partner is also great and
visually more appealing than in many other movies. The cast
in this film is truly up to task, and Indian actor Om Puri
makes quite an impression in the small episodic role of
lycantropy expert. Nichols puts a lot of effort into
production design and other details, trying to make the
story about lycathropy in New York publishing circles as
realistic as possible, using the classic horror scenario as
the basis for interesting, thought-provoking drama about
inter-office politics, midlife crisis and eternal struggle
between civilisation and irrational urges in individual
humans.
Unfortunately, all those elements go down the drain when
Nichols decides to wrap the story up with cheap horror
cliches and even cheaper murder subplots. The ending is not
the only problem of the film; Nichols, as usual, has
problems with proper pace of the film. Slow-motion shots of
Nicholson as werewolf are overlong, and Ennio Morricone's
score is again quite irritating. So, like in many similar
cases, my skepticism about Mike Nichols' film was justified.
WOLF could be recommended only to those who truly enjoy
Nicholson's acting, even when the rest of the film isn't
quite worthy of his talent.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Little Shop of Horrors, The (1960)
The magic world of cult cinema is a place full of surprises
for those film-loving souls brave enough to wander through
it, guided by nothing but the hearsay. Sometimes, cult
movies lauded as masterpieces turn out to be incredible
disappointments, eroded by time and surpassed by the more
recent authors who had used it as an inspiration for much
better material. That was often the case with Roger Corman,
writer, producer, director and one of the legends of
American movie legends. Most often referenced as prolific
producers of B-movies, whose company encouraged young
talents and future directorial stars like Coppola or Demme,
Corman was also lauded as director himself. His films, in
most cases, didn't stand the test of time very well, and the
author of this review often wandered what was so special
about Corman. But not any more since he saw some of his true
gems of late 1950s and early 1960s. Among them the best
known film is LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS, 1960 dark comedy with
the cult following that spawned Broadway musical and, later,
movie version of its own by Frank Oz in 1986.
The plot of the film is set in Skid Row, the bad
neighbourhood of Los Angeles where Mr. Mushnik (played by
Mel Welles) owns a not so profitable flower shop. His
financial frustrations are accompanied with the obvious
incompetence of his clumsy clerk Seymour Klerboined (played
by Jonathan Haze). The only thing that could save Seymour's
job is a strange plant he had grown and named after his
beautiful colleague Audrey Fulquard (played by Jackie
Joseph). The plant begins attracting customers and Mushnik
changes his mind about firing Seymour, at least as long as
he can take care of it. It looks like almost impossible task
until Seymour discovers that the plant feeds on human blood.
At first, Seymour sheds his own blood to keep his treasure
alive, but the plant is growing and its demands are
impossible to meet. Soon, Seymour must choose whether to let
the plant die or start killing people.
LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS became the legend not on its own
merit as a film, but because of the apocryphal stories about
its creation. Corman shot entire film in less than two days,
with a minimal budget, cheap and soon-to-be-torn-down
production sets and bunch of street bums as extras. It is
very visible on the finished product - film looks very
cheap, unpolished and sometimes even pathetic, at least
compared with the lavish production values of its 1986
remake. But the insufficiencies of the production were more
than compensated with the extremely funny script by Charles
B. Griffith (who appears in the cameo role of burglar). The
humour of the film is very dark and trashy, although rather
tame for today's Tarantinoesque standards, and the viewers
are quickly drawn into the story and its weird characters.
And this film features whole bunch of them, all played by
relatively unknown, but in this case, perfectly cast actors.
Jonathan Haze is excellent as Seymour, Mel Welles is perfect
as his neurotic boss and Wally Campo and Jack Warford give
perfect spoof of Dragnet-like cops. Jackie Joseph, on the
other hand, is rather inferior to Ellen Greene playing the
same role in 1986 version. There are plenty of great actors
in small roles here, but the best known of them all is young
Jack Nicholson as masochistic dental patient, one of the
first in long series of twisted characters that would later
make him famous. All in all, LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS is a
film that is hardly a masterpiece, but it is entertaining
enough to deserve all the love felt by generations of cult
classic aficionados.

Title
Review for French Lieutenant's Woman, The (1981)
One of the hardest tasks for any filmmaker is a successful
adaptation of a literary classic. There were very few of
them who actually succeeded in that, and rarely do we see
great novels being transformed into great films. The reason
is quite obvious - the medium of movie is quite different
from the film, and thousands of pages of text could hardly
be transformed into two hours or 90 minutes of films. So,
film adaptations could hardly be faithful to the original
novels and fans of such novels are almost always
disappointed. On the other hand, in such cases ignorance
could be bliss. By not reading the original novel in
advance, viewers are spared from such disappointments and
they can judge movie based on its own merit. For the author
of this review, such was the case with John Fowles' novel
THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN and its 1981 film adaptation
by Karel Reisz.
The plot begins when Victorian gentleman and amateur
scientist Charles Smithson (played by Jeremy Irons) comes
from London to coastal town of Lyme in order to study
fossils. During his stay, he is engaged to Ernestina Freeman
(played by Lynsey Baxter), daughter of wealthy local
industrialist. Before two of them get married, Charles meets
Sarah Woodruff (played by Meryl Streep), ex-governess who
became scorned by the local community after the torrid
affair with French seaman. Some call her "whore", some pity
her, and some, like local physician Doctor Grogan (played by
Leo McKern) doubt her sanity, since she spends every free
moment looking at the sea. Charles is intrigued by her story
and wants to help her, but in the process he falls in love
and endangers his own engagement and future with Ernestina.
Sarah also seems to fall in love with Charles, but some of
her actions indicate clever manipulation. In the same time,
Mike and Anna, modern day actors who play characters of
Charles and Sarah in the movie based on the novel, have
their own torrid love affair at the set.
Faithful adaptation of THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN,
according to those who had read the novel, was impossible,
so the authors of this movie had to be creative. Director
Karel Reisz was lucky to have script written by famous
British playwright Harold Pinter. Instead of standard plot,
we have two parallel stories - regular and "movie within
movie". The latter is given more time, but the lack of usual
suspension of disbelief (since we know from the start that
we are watching the film, and not the actual story or
characters) doesn't hurt the film. Instead, those two
parallel plots help us to truly appreciate the film and
directorial mastery of Karel Reisz. The editing, very
important in this kind of film, is well done. Although the
modern segment is given less time than Victorian "movie
within movie", Reisz uses small bits and pieces to paint
complex and intriguing picture. Two love stories are very
different and very similar in both times; characters are
complex, and their motivations unclear, and the outcomes for
protagonists are different. Reisz and Pinter also use
parallel stories to comment on differences between modern
and Victorian times in the way society treated women,
marriage, sexual morality and mental illness. And even
"movie within movie" has few well-done ingredients to the
story - character of Charles' young servant Sam (played by
Hilton McRae) and his romance with local girl is good
opportunity to portray class division in Victorian society.
Such complex story and dual characters required first class
actors in major roles. Jeremy Irons in his first major role
fulfilled that requirement, but his portrayal of nice,
mild-mannered Victorian gentleman who gets in trouble
because he can't control his romantic desires doesn't look
impressive. But it didn't happen because Irons was bad in
his role; on the contrary, he is as good as ever, but in the
view of the similar roles he played in many recent movies,
his Charles/Mike doesn't look original. Unlike somewhat
typecast Irons, his more versatile partner Meryl Streep is
truly great, although her Sarah seems much more interesting
character than Anna. The other actors are also great,
especially Leo McKern in memorable episode of local
physician who takes interest in uncharted areas of
psychiatry. Reisz also took great efforts to reconstruct
period details, and always reliable composer Carl Davis
creates melancholic atmosphere with his musical score,
dominated by string instruments. The ending of the film is
somewhat overlong and confusing, though. But that wouldn't
general impression about THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN as
surprisingly successful combination of standard melodrama
and unconventional filmmaking.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Sands of Iwo Jima (1949)
Many years ago I used to watch television show hosted by
Irish comedian Dave Allen. One of the gags in that shows
parodied American WW2 movies, featuring tough sergeant,
determined to mold bunch of his soldiers into single combat
organism. The scene had been funny in its own sense, but
only after many years I managed to find the source of the
inspiration. If parody could be viewed as an ultimate form
of flattery, Allen must have liked SANDS OF IWO JIMA, 1949
war film directed by Allan Dwan and one of the best known
examples of that particular genre.
The movie plot deals with the platoon of US marines in the
Pacific Theatre of WW2. The year is 1943, and Sergeant John
N. Stryker (played by John Wayne), platoon leader and
battle-hardened veteran of Gualdacanal Campaign, receives
new group of fresh, inexperienced marines. He begins
training them for the upcoming battles in the island-hopping
campaign and he trains them very hard, bullying them at
every opportunity. Since Stryker happens to be embittered
man after his family leaving him, many question his real
motives. But Stryker's hard lessons become very valuable for
the men when they experience their own baptism of fire
during the landing on Tarawa Island.
This film is often referenced as an example of militaristic
propaganda in Hollywood. On the surface, it really looks
like the canticle for American military and the
scriptwriters Harry Brown and James Edward Grant spare no
effort to teach the viewers about patriotism, self-sacrifice
and other virtues that embody US Marine Corps. On the other
hand, they were subtle enough to allow characters to be more
than one-dimensional. John Wayne, who was often seen as
embodiment of American gung-ho militarism, gave rather
realistic performance here; his Sergeant Stryker is tough,
capable and very valuable to men in combat, but he is hardly
a superman nor a perfect human being. His "Oscar" nomination
for this role was well- deserved, although some scenes
contained unnecessary sappiness. The other actors are
shadowed by him, especially those playing stereotypical
ethnic characters that were obligatory ingredient to this
type of film. The real value of this film is not in the
acting, though. Director Allan Dwan did a really impressive
job in editing documentary war footage into the film, and
the black-and-white photography works splendidly, making
SANDS OF IWO JIMA one of the most realistic and exciting war
films of that era. On the other hand, Dwan's zeal towards
authenticity has hurt the film - some of the real life
Marines and heroes of Iwo Jima appear in cameo roles playing
themselves and their wooden, uninspired performances shatter
the illusion. Which is real shame, because this celluloid
monument to US Marines could have been as impressive work of
as the one made of bronze.

Title
Review for Charade (1963)
Those people who are familiar with old movies often complain
about the present-day state of cinema, especially Hollywood,
which looks much worse than in Good Old Days. Nostalgia and
natural tendency among humans to view past days and years
through rose- coloured glasses often lead them to conclude
that the quality of films in general used to be much better
than it is today. So, in that way, old decades look like
Golden Age when characters, stars and movies used to be
Larger Than Life, and their success owed more to the virtues
like charm, talent and hard work instead of publicity
campaigns. This is especially so when the old movie
connoisseurs compare certain average examples of certain
genres with their classic counterparts. The difference in
quality becomes especially striking in the case of
light-hearted comedies with a romantic flavour. One of such
classic examples, although not romantic comedy in strict
sense, is CHARADE, 1963 film by Stanley Donen, extremely
entertaining piece of cinema which is often referenced as
the "Best Hitchcock film Hitchock never made".
Heroine of this film is Regina "Reggie" Lampert (played by
Audrey Hepburn), UNESCO translator who goes through some
rather rough period in her life. While on vacation in Megeve
she had decided to divorce her husband Charles, feeling
estranged after years of unsuccessful attempts to find
anything about his background or source of his fortune. When
she returns to Paris, her home is emptied of all possessions
and Charles has disappeared. Police inspector Granpierre
(played by Jacques Marin) brings another bad news - Charles
has converted all his (and Regina's) belongings to cash and
tried to leave the country, only to be killed on the train.
The money is gone, presumably taken by the killer, but that
doesn't concern three menacing characters - Tex Panthollow
(played by James Coburn), Herman Scobie (played by George
Kennedy) and Leopold Gideon (played by Ned Glass) - who
visit Regina and demand 250,000 US$, apparently owed to them
by her late husband. Regina would like to pay them, but she
doesn't have a clue where the money should be. On the other
hand, CIA agent Hamilton Barthollomew (played by Walter
Matthau) is also interested in the money, because it used to
belong to US government until it was stolen by Charles and
his comrades during the covert operation behind enemy lines
in WW2. Three men who harass Regina were apparently Charles'
partners in the scheme, who got themselves swindled by their
comrade. But this revelation is hardly comforting to Regina,
who remains fearful for her life. Thankfully, charming and
suave businessman Peter Joshua (played by Cary Grant) is
always there to save her from unpleasant situations and
offer assistance, but Regina gradually begins suspecting his
true motives.
In this day and age, any plot containing cynical widow,
large stash of stolen money and multitude of menacing or
double-crossing characters determined to get their hands on
it, would probably be most suitable for low budget
Tarantinoesque farce with tons of black humour, graphic
violence and thousands shouted obscenities. However, Peter
Stone wrote his script in a more enlightened, kinder and
gentler era of moviemaking. Humour in CHARADE might look
macabre at times, but in general the film is very light, at
least for today's standards. Characters are simple but
effective, with actors - especially supporting cast led by
Coburn and Kennedy - making them colourful without heavy-
handed attempts to make them cool. But the greatest
contribution to the lightheartedness of CHARADE was probably
given by director Stanley Donen. Filmmaker who had made his
reputation by filming classic musicals in 1950s like SINGIN'
IN THE RAIN and SEVEN BRIDES FOR SEVEN BROTHERS,
successfully adapted his directing skills to the new genre,
and also added his own tendency to make the material as
light- hearted as possible. Donen, on the other hand, also
learned a thing or two from the masters of the genre. Major
element of the plot - ordinary person in extraordinary
situation - looks very Hitchcockian, as well as the fight
scene on the Parisian rooftop, probably intended as humorous
homage to the similar scene in NORTH BY NORTHWEST. Some
critics also found many links between CHARADE and early Bond
films, including effective teaser scene, little flavour of
international intrigue and exotic Parisian setting.
But the most memorable element of CHARADE is not the plot or
elaborate scenes. This film owes its reputation to its
leading stars, acting legends that look like deities and
represent movie equivalent of the age when giant walked the
earth. On one hand we have Audrey Hepburn, embodiment of
Class among Hollywood female stars. Her slender, almost
anorexic figure, combined with girlish looks and manners of
aristocratic adult, allows her to turn Reggie Lampert as one
of the most memorable characters in the history of romantic
comedy. Her "damsel in distress" routine is nicely
illustrated with few deliberate scenes of overacting,
intended to keep the lightheartedness of the movie in few
dark and macabre scenes. (One of the elements of Reggie's
character - career in UNESCO - gives a prophetic dimension
to this film, considering Hepburn's real life work for UN in
late years). opposite is Cary Grant, another Hollywood
legend who also built reputation by playing charming and
suave characters in romantic comedies. In this film he uses
script opportunity to play not one, but many variations of
the same character, additionally entertaining the viewers by
making them guess his true alignment (and that game
continues until the very last shot of the film). But the
true strength of Hepburn's and Grant's performances is in
their interaction - all murder, mayhem and international
intrigue that goes around their characters represents
nothing more than one giant Macguffin-like obstacle in their
romantic path. On the other hand, their exchanges, although
always amusing, at times seem a little bit distracting and
unnecessarily lengthen the film. Few screen couples had so
much chemistry between them and CHARADE is therefore one of
the most effective and entertaining romantic comedies.
Finally, another memorable element of this film is musical
theme by Henry Mancini, the author who would later become
legend by producing music for Blake Edwards films.
All in all, CHARADE is an excellent piece of classic
Hollywood entertainment, somewhat overlooked by present day
audience, but nevertheless a splendid product of bygone era
of filmmaking.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Beverly Hills Cop III (1994)
These days the lack of originality in Hollywood reflects
itself in the deluge of remakes. But, only a few years ago,
before Wes Craven publicly made fun of the practice, sequels
had been more popular among Hollywood producers. Sequels
also used to be popular among directors and movie stars
whose careers went south. The way to regain popularity and
prestige, they thought, was the use the same formulas,
characters and story lines that brought them success in the
first place. One of such celebrity was Eddie Murphy, black
comedian of 1980s whose career was in big decline during the
first part of this decade. In order to return to the
spotlight, he chose to resurrect the franchise created by
his most popular film, BEVERLY HILLS COP, 1984 action comedy
that had already spawned the sequel in 1987. Seven years
later, for the third instalment, he used the directorial
service of John Landis, another fading star, with whom he
successfully collaborated twice - in TRADING PLACES and
COMING TO AMERICA. This time, however, third time wasn't the
charm and BEVERLY HILLS III was failure. Eddie Murphy had to
wait few more years for real comeback.
Eddie Murphy here plays Axel Foley, fast-talking streetwise
Detroit policeman, who raids illegal chop shop. The routine
police action ends in tragedy, when the criminals kill
Foley's boss. Determined to bring the killers to justice,
Foley realises that their leader is Ellis De Wald (Timothy
Carhart). When it turns out that De Wald happens to be
security chief for Wonderland theme park in Los Angeles,
Foley goes back to Los Angeles. There, with the help of his
old friend, local policeman Rosewood (Judge Rheinhold),
Foley would clash with money counterfeit ring.
Ten years has passed since the original and times are
definitely different. In this decade, the contrast between
blue collar Detroit and yuppie Beverly Hills, which provided
a lot of gags in 1984 film, simply doesn't work.
Screenwriter Steven E. de Souza provides another conflict,
this time between the childish sillyness of the Good Guys
and business-like professionalism of the Bad Guys. Since
Foley belongs to the former, his character had to watch his
language, and the tone of the film in general is more
infantile. Unfortunately, this film still belongs to action
movie genre, and there is too much violence for little
children. Nice example is the humorous scene in the
beginning, which turns into standard Ramboesque bloodbath.
Unlike Donner with the LETHAL WEAPON series, Landis simply
can't balance the comedy with "regular" action, and the
result is a film that fails in both aspects. Action scenes
are sometimes interesting, but not too spectacular (at the
end, scenery of Wonderland is more fascinating than the
action itself); humour, on the other hand, falls flat. To
make even worse, some minor characters from 1984 film gets
unnecessary and sometimes irritating overexposure
(especially art expert turned into arms dealer, played by
Bronson Pinchot). In the end, although the film provided
some entertainment, viewers, at least critical ones, would
probably be happy to know that there aren't any plans for
BEVERLY HILLS IV.

Title
Review for Wrong Man, The (1993) (TV)
Judging by the majority of Hollywood films, criminals on the
run and other less fortunate Americans envision Mexico as
the country of milk and honey, where all their problems
would become thing of the past. Protagonist of THE WRONG
MAN, 1993 drama directed by Jim McBride, is going to
experience rude awakening from such pipe dreams. Alex Walker
(played by Kevin Anderson) is US merchant sailor left
stranded and penniless in Mexico. To make things even worse,
he comes at the wrong place in the wrong time and thus
becomes suspect in the murder case. In order to evade the
authorities he meets unusual couple - aged con man Mills
(played by John Lithgow) and his young, sexy wife Missy
(played by Rosanna Arquette). He befriends them hoping that
the three of them might leave the country. But as police,
led by Captain Diaz (played by Jorge Cervera Jr.) and
Detective Ortega (played by Ernesto Laguardia) is closing
in, so is Alex torn between the friendship towards Mills and
obvious lust he feels towards Missy.
Director Jim McBride, whose previous career includes
interesting U.S. remake of Goddard's BREATHLESS, could have
turned Michael Thoma's script into thriller or comedy.
Instead he decided to film THE WRONG MAN as drama,
concentrating at the characters at the expense of plot and
film's pace. The temptation was great, since John Lithgow
didn't fail to deliver great performance in his role of
Mills. Kevin Anderson, on the other hand, was rather
uninspiring while Rosanna Arquette, although giving a fine
acting job, catches our eye more because of scenes featuring
her bare breasts. Interesting opportunity to use Mexican
detectives as comic relief or some kind of Greek chorus was
also wasted. When this overlong film ends, the viewers would
be disappointed, less because of the film's bad quality, and
more because of many missed opportunities.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Disappearance of Nora, The (1993) (TV)
Identity crisis has a complete new meaning for the heroine
of THE DISAPPEARANCE OF NORA. In the beginning she (played
by Veronica Hamel) wakes up in the desert, beat up and with
nothing but a red dress. She doesn't remember anything - not
her name nor how she ended there. The instinct tells her to
go to Reno where she meets Denton (played by Dennis Farina),
head of security in on of the casinos. He decides to help
her and employs his detective skills in order to identify
her and thus bring her back to her family. But even when she
is finally given her proper identity, the incident that
caused her amnesia remains the mystery and source of new
frustrations, doubts and fears.
The opening scenes of this 1993 TV movie are in many ways
similar to the opening scenes of SIESTA, 1987 thriller by
Mary Lambert, which also featured amnesiac woman trying to
find her identity. However, the similarities between the two
films end in the beginning - while SIESTA turns out to be
nothing more than over-pretentious drama, THE DISAPPEARANCE
OF NORA remains mystery thriller from the beginning to the
end. Makers of this film, which is basically a routine
television production, perhaps lack artistic ambitions but
they compensate it with experience and craftsmanship. While
the script by Alan Ormsby and Tom Cole has its share of
cliches, and the plot twist at the end is not so
unpredictable, experienced director Joyce Chopra knows how
to compensate those flaws with good atmosphere and superb
cast. Veronica Hamel brings a lot of vulnerability to her
character, Dennis Farina is great as kind-hearted tough guy
and Stephen Collins also makes a good job out of rather
thankless role. Mostly due to their efforts, THE
DISAPPEARANCE OF NORA captivates the viewer's attention and
ends up like a nice little television thriller which should
deserve recommendation or two.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for "Nico (marca registrada)" (1998)
When first Steven Seagal movies appeared in former
Yugoslavia, local video distributors didn't look very
inventive in marketing them. HARD TO KILL, MARKED FOR DEATH
and OUT FOR JUSTICE were distributed as NICO 2, NICO 3 and
NICO 4 - presumably as sequels to the first Seagal movie,
NICO (ABOVE THE LAW). Fact that Seagal had played different
characters in each of the films, and that the plot and
characters actually hadn't had anything in common, didn't
seem to bother local (mostly pirate) distributors. For
die-hard Seagal anti-fans (and they seem to be more vocal
than Seagal fans) that could be the ultimate proof of
Seagal's limited acting skills and his inability to be
anything more than mediocre star of formulaic action films
indistinguishable from each other. On the other hand,
Seagal's fans might take this example as a proof that Seagal
in his debut as an actor and producer, directed in 1988 by
Andrew Davis, actually made very good and lasting
impression.
Protagonist of this film is Nico Toscani (played by Steven
Seagal), son of Sicilian immigrants who went to Japan to
study martial arts. His talents brought the attention of
CIA, which recruited him and sent him to take part in some
covert operations on Vietnamese-Cambodian border in 1973.
There he became disgusted with his superiors like Zagon
(played by Henry Silva), who used war as an opportunity to
engage into lucrative drug trade. Fifteen years after
leaving the Agency, Nico works as Chicago police detective
and one day finds out about major drug deal that involves
Salvadorian drug lord Salvano (played by Daniel Faraldo).
Nico and his partner, female detective Jax (played by Pam
Grier), manage to arrest Salvano, but the drug lord is
immediately released at the request of high Federal
officials. Not listening to the orders to back off, Nico
begins his own investigation that would link Salvano and his
old pals from CIA.
For many people, NICO is the best Seagal film. It might be
arguable whether it is the best Seagal film or not, but NICO
still has all important Seagal trademarks. Luckily, Seagal's
lack of skills in scriptwriting and acting is compensated.
We might disregard Seagal's wooden acting when in action
scenes that feature Seagal using his superb fighting skills
and doing most of his own stunts. Sometimes preposterous
elements of the plot (Nico just "bails out" after being
witness to the dirtiest possible CIA covert operation;
spectacular, but definitely unrealistic assassination
attempts etc.) are contrasted with the realistic atmosphere.
Chicago-born director and script co- writer Andrew Davis
uses his hometown locations and local acting talents with
great success. Some of the supporting actors are great, like
former blaxploitation star Pam Grier, while some, like
Sharon Stone in rather thankless role of Nico's wife, show
even less talent than Seagal himself. What distinguishes
this film from the multitude of formulaic 1980s action films
is the political message, more in line with the writings of
Noam Chomsky than with the speeches of Ronald Reagan. CIA
and, indirectly US government as a whole, is empowered with
huge powers, which, unchecked because of "national security"
considerations, might prove to be the ultimate threat to
American democracy and world peace, much greater than any
"evil empires" out there. This message is explicitly
delivered to the audience through Seagal's sermon, another
of his trademarks. This message might look somewhat dated
now, after the end of Cold War, when USA lost motivation to
be engaged into dirty little wars in Central America.
However, even those who don't care much about political
messages in the movies might really enjoy NICO as flawed,
yet still entertaining example of an action genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Big Easy, The (1987)
When he compared two of the best dramatists of his age,
Greek philosopher and scholar Aristhoteles said: "Sophocles
shows the people as they should be, and Euripides shows them
as they are." Two and half thousands years later, that
statements still rings true. Flaws of human nature provide
causes for conflict, and without conflicts there wouldn't be
any dramas. Without dramas, whole modern entertainment
industry, at least the one we know it, wouldn't exist. And,
besides, flawed characters are usually fun to watch, while
ideal aren't. That ancient wisdom could be witnessed in THE
BIG EASY, 1987 movie by Jim McBride, one of the more
entertaining examples of the police thriller genre.
The movie is set in New Orleans, colourful American
metropolis known for its exotic looks, mystique and
century-old traditions. One of such traditions seems to be
wide- spread corruption within New Orleans Police
Department. Lieutenant Remy McSwain (Dennis Quaid) doesn't
seem to see anything wrong with it; on the contrary, he is
on the take himself, but still considers himself a good cop.
However, his personal code of ethics is challenged, same as
the peaceful coexistence between police and organised crime.
Someone is killing major drug dealers and Mafia figures in
town, and such events, that could lead to gang war, are
bringing attention of Anne Osborne (Ellen Barkin), special
prosecutor in charge of police corruption. At first
intrigued by the fact that cop-busting attorney shows so
much interest in a simple feud between the bad guys, McSwain
decides to help her. But, as the investigation continues and
more bodies pile up in the streets, McSwain witnesses
growing attraction between the two.
THE BIG EASY presents a challenge to anyone who would like
to put movies into genre folders; it isn't thrilling enough
to be called "thriller", and it isn't funny to be called
"drama" and it isn't funny enough to be "comedy". Yet,
despite its own genre ambiguity, it is probably one of the
most charming films of the previous decade. Plot doesn't
matter in this film - Daniel Petrie Jr. didn't bother too
much with that element of his script; but the real treasure
of the movies are the characters. Remy McSwain is presented
as easy-going fellow, who cracks jokes in the presence of
dead bodies and whose unstoppable charm can wiggle him out
of any situations; Dennis Quaid is in his acting prime, and
the role of Remy is probably one of the best performances in
his career. His partner is equally seductive Ellen Barkin,
but she manages to hide her feminine charm  under the guise
of inquisitorial Dragon Lady that would make even like
Kenneth Starr tame in comparison. However, the real strength
of this movie lies in the combination of those two actors;
their sexual chemistry is unbelievable and as soon as they
meet, the viewer is only left to wonder when, and not if,
should two of them end in bed. When something like that
finally happen, director Jim McBride, who has some
experience with explicit erotica in the movies, shows their
encounter in most realistic, yet equally charming fashion.
Other characters also contribute a lot to the movie's
appeal, mostly by illustrating a colourful and easy-going
nature of New Orleans. The most notable is slimy but
cultivated lawyer Lamar Parmentel, played by stage actor
Charles Ludlam in the cinematic role of his life; Cajun
mystique is also presented by McSwain's tough and protective
mother, played by Grace Zabriskie, actress who usually takes
less appealing roles. Of course, minor roles are also
reserved for capable character and comic actors like Ned
Beatty, John Goodman and Lisa Jane Persky. Even one of the
local celebrities, Louisiana State judge Judge Jim Garrison
(immortalised as the hero of Oliver Stone's controversial
epic JFK), gets an opportunity to play himself in a cameo
role. Apart from characters, another things that could
please the viewers is a clever use of local zydeco music,
whose uplifting tunes make this film cheerful instead of
depressing.
Darker tones, however, do appear in THE BIG EASY, but too
late. The movie makers were simply forced to include the
obligatory elements of conventional thriller in the movie,
but they didn't do a good dramatic transition in that
direction. Our hero suddenly develops a crisis of
conscience, begins changing to moral and upstanding lawman
and finally, together with his new lover and crime-fighting
partner, takes care of the bad guys in a inevitable
showdown. The movie lacks real finale, and one, presented by
the movie, isn't cathartic enough to improve the final
impression. However, despite those shortcomings, THE BIG
EASY is great fun while it lasts.

Title
Review for Prophet of Evil: The Ervil LeBaron Story (1993) (TV)
In the late 1970s, small Mormon sect, led by charismatic but
scrupless Ervil Le Baron (played by Brian Dennehy), begins
the campaign with the intention of becoming the dominant
force in the Mormon community. In doing so, any means are
necessary, including violence and physical elimination of
rivals. The sect seems unstoppable, until the dedicated
district attorney Daniel "Dan" Fields (Willliam Devane)
begins investigation and personal crusade with the intention
to bring Le Baron and cronies to justice.
Based on true events, this film is just another example of
assembly line philosophy that characterises American
television approach to the stories inspired by real life.
The result of such philosophy is gazillion of docudramas,
movies whose only value is the fact that save time and
resources for those viewers hungry for true-life stories,
yet unable, or unwilling to spend their precious time and
resources for reading books or articles. However, even in
the world of docudrama there are different layers of
quality. Some movies can be enjoyed by their own merit, and
some can't be saved even by fascinating subject.
PROPHET OF EVIL falls within the second category. Directed
by Judson Taylor, director who made more than fifty
television movies in his career, it shows the lack of any
interest by filmmakers. The interesting and fascinating
subject of little known inter-sectarian violence in American
Southwest is mostly ignored (MESSENGER OF DEATH, 1988 film
with Charles Bronson, was much better in exploring such
themes). What we get is the lame, predictable and sometimes
downright boring story, with Brian Dennehy, usually very
capable actor, making his character a third-grade
caricature. Same is with William Devane, as his adversary,
with boring subplots that fail to make his character human.
All in all, PROPHET OF EVIL is a film unworthy of both the
story and viewer's attention.

Title
Review for Un flic (1971)
Among those who like to find the major influence on
Tarantino's work, John Woo and his ultra-stylish gangster
films from Hong Kong are the most obvious choice. However,
Woo himself was actually influenced by another film maker,
French director Jean-Pierre Melville, who used to create
cult following among some critics in 1960s and 1970s.
Melville, the biggest fan of American culture among
sometimes snobbish French filmmakers, built his reputation
by making ultra-stylish gangster movies about cops and
robbers as cold, detached professionals with highly personal
codes of ethics. Many of those films are considered to be
the classics. That includes UN FLIC, Melville's last film,
directed in 1971, two years before his death.
The movie's nominal protagonist is Edouard Coleman (played
by Alain Delon), police inspector whose character became
emotionally numb after witnessing too many deaths, tragedies
and human degradation in his everyday line of work. His
friend Simon (played by Richard Crenna) owns a small night
club in Paris, and the friendship is unchallenged even by
Coleman having affair with his wife Cathy (played by
Catherine Deneuve). Two of them, however, belong to the
opposite sides of the law, although Coleman doesn't know it
yet. Simon has led violent bank robbery in small coastal
town and the loot is going to finance another, even more
daring and ambitious stunt. In the meantime, Coleman gets
tipped off about huge shipment of drugs being smuggled on
the train.
In his last film, Melville showed his strength and some
weaknesses. The best thing about Melville is a sense of
style, mostly evident in the beginning scene - brilliantly
staged heist, with great atmosphere, pacing and superb
acting. Actually, this film could be viewed as pure style
accompanied with not so interesting content. Characters
aren't fleshed out enough, although they are played by
really superb actors. Alain Delon is excellent as extremely
cold, with almost pathological inability to show emotions.
On the other hand, Catherine Deneuve is used more like a
pretty face than real character. For Melville, casting was
opportunity to express his Americanophilia - Delon's
opposite is played by very good Richard Crenna, and Michael
Conrad (of later HILL STREET BLUES fame) is more than fine
as one of his crime partners. Melville was obviously more
interested into making elaborate and very effective heist
scenes, and they work splendidly (although the latter one,
including train, suffers from too obvious use of poor
special effects). Unfortunately, what connects those scenes
is not so interesting, and, even more important, not that
well-done. Script relies on too many coincidences, but it
also gives interesting insight into Melville's contrasting
view of those who break and enforce law. While gangsters in
this film conduct painstakingly planed heists that require a
lot of discipline and skill, policemen don't use much brain
- cases are solved through informants or simply by roughing
up suspects. On the other hand, flaws of the script and
characters are compensated with well-done atmosphere, thanks
to the grey overtones of Walter Wottiz's photography and
suggestive soundtrack by Michel Colombier. All in all, UN
FLIC, despite being imperfect and far away from cult
reputation of its creator, still represents very interesting
piece of genre cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Blink (1994)
According to the video distributor in my country, BLINK,
1994 movie by Michael Apted, was awarded as the best
thriller for that year. That wasn't enough for this film to
be picked from the multitude of different thrillers that
used to flood the video store shelves few years ago. But I
remembered Michael Apted as a director of very interesting,
although not too successful 1983 thriller GORKY PARK. I also
noticed Madeleine Stowe, an actress I like very much, in a
lead role. That was enough for me to pick this film and I
didn't regret it later.
Unlike many formulaic, by-the-numbers, thrillers, and
despite its "high concept" premise, BLINK, scripted by Dana
Stevens, has a rather complicated plot. Emma Brody (played
by Stowe) was blinded by her abusive mother in childhood.
Years have passed, and Emma, being adapted to darkness,
became a folk musician in Chicago. But the new improvements
in medical technology allowed her to see again through
donated eyes. Emma has some problems adapting to the new,
strange and now visible world, and additional problem comes
from a rare phenomena called "delayed vision" - her brain
tends to receive old visual signals from her eyes. That same
problem would get her in trouble when her next door
neighbour gets murdered and she begins thinking that she saw
the suspect. John Hallstrom (played by Aidan Quinn),
detective on the case, is, of course, sceptical towards her
claims, but, on the other hand, very attracted to her.
What differentiates this thriller from many others is the
fact that it isn't so clearly defined in the terms of genre.
BLINK mixes thriller with the elements of psychological
drama, love story and comedy. Those other genre elements,
although not so overwhelming, and together with urban
Chicago setting, bring a breath of every day life realism
into the story that would otherwise look like lifeless "high
concept" product. But BLINK still has thriller credentials,
and it is still a very suspenseful and exciting film. Most of
the suspense comes from the fact that in many scenes the
audience, same as movie's heroine, doesn't know whether to
believe or not to believe the sight. Also, the movie has
rather original villain with even more original agenda, and
the ending is somewhat unusual for this kind of film. What
makes this film ultimately work are the actors. Madeleine
Stowe, one of the most remarkable actresses in modern
Hollywood gave a very good performance in her role of a
blind woman frightened by the new and sudden perception of
world. Aidan Quinn, who used to work with Stowe in Badham's
STAKEOUT, has a really good chemistry with her, and his
performance of cynical yet dedicated policeman is fine too.
Music by the folk band "Drovers" delivers a soundtrack which
is refreshingly new for this kind of films. All in all, the
video distributors didn't lie - BLINK is a very good
thriller that deserves more than a glimpse from those who
want originality in that genre.
Review written on September 19th 1999

Title
Review for Fatherland (1994/I) (TV)
Almost half a century after World War Two, there are still
many voices, especially in some countries of Eastern Europe,
who lament the outcome of that global conflict. For them,
the wrong side has lost and the world would have been much
better place if it happened otherwise. For others, Hitler's
victory in WW2 is a matter of pure speculation, and Sci-Fi
novels from the alternative history sub-genre used that
concept very often (most notably in 1962 novel THE MAN IN
THE HIGH CASTLE by Philip K. Dick). However, first such
novel to reach the mainstream audience was Robert Harris'
FATHERLAND, bestseller who later served as basis for 1994
HBO movie, directed by Christopher Menaul.
The plot of this film is set in the alternative 1964, in a
world where Hitler managed to successfully finish conquest
of Europe, while USA was too busy making war with Japan. The
result is Germania, grand Nazi empire that controls the
entire Old Continent, with 75-year old Adolf Hitler still at
its helm. After the decades of cold war and still frustrated
with the inability to finish the bitter guerrilla war with
the remnants of Soviet Union, Hitler's regime wants to
improve relations with the other superpower, USA, led by
anti-Semitic and pro-German President Joseph Kennedy. The
summit in Berlin is set, and among many invited journalists
is Charlie Maguire (played by Miranda Richardson). She would
stumble on Xavier March (Rutger Hauer), SS officer who is
investigating the mysterious death of former Nazi official.
The murder is somewhat connected with the "Jewish question"
conference that took place during the war, and almost all
participants are dying. While trying to find the motive for
the killings, March and Maguire become targets of Gestapo.
The entire concept of alternative history is really
fascinating. On one hand, the created worlds are so
different from the world we live in, and on the other hand,
they are in the same time closer and more recognisable than
fantastic worlds of distant galaxies or distant futures. The
world of FATHERLAND, although some may question its
plausibility (most of the today's historians are almost
unanimous in their opinion that Hitler could never win WW2,
at least not in the way indicated in the film), is very
realistic one. The most intriguing idea is to show the most
evil and universally despised political system in the world
- German Nazism - slowly evolving into its "gentler and
kinder" form, in a manner very similar to the path Soviet
Union took from Stalin to Gorbachev era.
Unfortunately, like many good novels, FATHERLAND suffered a
terrible fate in its version as feature film. Instead of
putting an effort to show the fascinating and intriguing
details of Robert Harris' world, screenplay by Ron
Hutchinson and Stanley Weiser concentrated almost
exclusively on the lame, predictable and boring crime
investigation. Such subplots, as the example of much better
GORKY PARK shows us, simply don't work in totalitarian
settings, as long as the all-powerful government is one of
culprits. And with Nazi Germany, even in its "reformed"
version, that is definitely the case. Things are even made
worse with the poorly drawn characters, and actors who don't
put much effort in playing, which is especially the case
with Rutger Hauer. Terrible scripting culminates with hardly
believable, unoriginal finale and corny epilogue that would
have to establish the parallels between the fall of
alternative Nazism and our world's Communism.
It would be unfair to say that FATHERLAND doesn't have its
good sides. Director Menaul put some real effort in
portraying some interesting details while portraying Robert
Harris' world (like the posters of "Die Beatles" band). The
locations and some of the artifacts from Communist era
Czehoslovakia provided good hints how would latter dazy
Third Reich would look like. Unfortunately, all those
details are catching our attention only in the first part of
the film. The rest is one great disappointment - one of the
most tragic examples of great movies ideas being wasted in
mediocre screen effort.

Title
Review for Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981)
There are many reasons why people like certain movies, but
often those reasons are quite sentimental in their nature.
For example, author of this review likes RAIDERS OF THE LOST
ARK because this film - among other things, of course -
brings back nice memories. This film was also not only the
subject of my very first movie review, but also the reason
why I started reading movie reviews in newspapers and paying
attention what the critics actually think about movies.
Year 1981, when the movie was made, actually belongs to my
very personal Golden Age of movies. Majority of my favourite
films was made in late 1970s and early 1980s and they left
long lasting impact on my future viewing preferences.
RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, although not belonging to my
favourite genre of science fiction and being quite different
from mostly dark and thought-provoking visions of the
future, also became my favourite. Mastery of Steven
Spielberg, director who began his slow, but unstoppable
climb to the title of Hollywood king, enchanted me with his
magical vision of the past.
The plot begins in 1936. Indiana "Indy" Jones (played by
Harrison Ford) is shy and mild-mannered college professor of
archaeology, but when the college museum headed by Marcus
Brody (played by Denholm Elliott) needs new artefacts,
Indiana Jones is turned into experienced and fearless
explorer who would stop at nothing to make archaeological
finds even in the most dangerous places of the world. His
talents are being employed by U.S. Army Intelligence, since
Hitler recently became obsessed with the occult and sent
expedition in Egypt to recover the lost biblical artefact
known as the Ark of the Covenant. That mythical object
contains immense powers and army carrying it is believed to
be invincible. Indiana Jones doesn't believe in it, but he
would prefer to lay his hands on Ark before Hitler does. So,
he goes on the journey and the first stop is Nepal, where an
old colleague, Professor Ravenwood, should help him with an
ancient medallion showing the way to the Ark. Instead of
friend, he finds his daughter Marion (played by Karen
Allen), who still can't forgive Indiana for the heartbreak
caused ten years ago. Marion's dilemma about helping him
resolved after the visit by Nazi spies, led by sadistic Toht
(played by Ronald Lacey). Indy and Marion continue their
journey to Cairo, where Sallah (played by John Rhys-Davies),
top local digger and Indy's old friend, brings news about
German expedition making major excavation in the desert.
Their effort, that dug out ancient Egyptian city, is
intended towards the room with the Ark. "Indy" is going to
use medallion to find the Ark, and his quest is even more
motivated when he finds out that the Nazis are helped by
Rene Belloq (played by Paul Freeman), French archaeologist
and his arch-rival.
In the interviews that followed smashing success of STAR
WARS, George Lucas often named B-movies and cliff-hanger
serials of 1930s and 1940s as the major source of
inspiration. Four years later, it turned out that the same
material shaped the movie preferences of Spielberg, and
Lucas, together with Lawrence Kasdan, created movie
character that became embodiment of all heroes featured in
such films. For Spielberg RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK was
intended as nothing more than nostalgic trip to the past,
where such films spawned juvenile imagination with exotic
locations and breath-taking stunts. But his personal
nostalgia was quite in tune with the demand of audience -
those masses that got tired of dark, serious, cynical
protagonists of 1970s cinema and desired return of
old-fashioned heroes, ready to fight old-fashioned villains
and get old-fashioned girls in the end. This renaissance of
simplistic Good vs. Evil worldview, embodied in renaissance
of American self-confidence and national pride in Reagan's
years, was just one of the reasons why this film became one
of the first true summer blockbusters.
Another reason was the fact that Spielberg's artistic vision
proved to be perfect for such kind of films - pure and
ideologically unburdened juvenile adventures. Spielberg
excelled in all areas of filmmaking when he directed RAIDERS
OF THE LOST ARK. From brilliantly staged opening scene in
Peruvian jungle that remains memorable despite not being
particularly related to the rest of the film, until the
last, equally memorable scene, audience has opportunity to
enjoy Spielbergian magic at its best. Action scenes are
spectacular and exciting, but script by Lucas and Kasdan
allows enough room for character development yet never
hurting the perfect pacing of the film. There are many
scenes of violence and the amount of blood and gore might be
somewhat unsuitable for youngest audience; unfortunately,
Spielberg was somewhat more squeamish in scenes that could
be viewed as erotic. Dark and potentially disturbing
overtones of the film are compensated with humour and catchy
one-liners. General light-hearted tone of the film helps us
to suspend disbelief and digest certain anachronisms (1936
Germans armed with 1938 submachinguns) or implausibilites
(British allowing Nazis to deploy force equivalent to
Rommel's Afrikakorps outside Suez three years before the
war). Spielberg's long-time associate John Williams provided
RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK with one of his powerful musical
scores and one of the most recognisable title themes.
By playing lead character of Indiana Jones, Harrison Ford
finally became Hollywood star in true sense, silencing all
those who saw him as "one hit wonder" and predicted same
fate as other STAR WARS leads. Ford was talented enough to
utilise all potential of his, superficially cartoonish,
character and create hero who is both traditional and
complex - troubled with his own imperfections (snake phobia)
and self-doubts. Karen Allen as Marion was his ideal partner
- woman who is both strong, tough, intelligent yet feminine
and charming. Unfortunately, Karen Allen failed to use this
role as boost for her future career. British actor Paul
Freeman as Belloq gave anything but routine role of villain
with complex motivations. Other two memorable roles were
also played by reliable character actors from Britain - John
Rhys-Davies (of SLIDERS fame) is one of rare Muslim good
guys in modern Hollywood, and Ronald Lacey was impressive in
his Peter Lorre impersonation.
Cliff-hanger movie serials and B-movies from 1930 and 1940s,
of course, weren't the only source of inspiration for
Spielberg. Another thing that makes this film so valuable is
the fact that it could be seen as some kind of movie
encyclopaedia due to the numerous references to various
movies made in 20th Century. Filmophiles would probably
enjoy seeing nods given to movie classics like CASABLANCA,
or the famous scene that pays homage to Kurosawa, flying
date that gives homage to Kubrick's bone in 2001 and even
Spielberg's use of relatively obscure (for American
audience) Belmondo adventures directed by French filmmaker
Philip de Broca in early 1960s. Some of the referenced
movies are rather recent, and Spielberg makes very explicit
homage to his partner's STAR WARS. Ironically, Indiana Jones
later became not just a movie icon itself and object of
numerous references (and two inferior sequels plus
disappointing TV series), but also a recognisable cultural
icon (with "Hungry Like a Wolf" clip by Duran Duran being
one of the first examples).
RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK might be inferior to STAR WARS in
terms of cultural importance, but this film still deserves
to be praised as Hollywood masterpieces and loved even by
those viewers who aren't as sentimentally attached to it as
the author of this review.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Time Machine, The (1960)
One of the most popular subplots in the entire science
fiction genre is time travel. That concept, although many
purists doubt its scientific credentials, spawned many
interesting novels, comic books and films in the last
century. However, the big grand-daddy of time travels, H.G.
Wells' novel THE TIME MACHINE, wasn't written with the
intention to speculate about that concept or its
consequences. The author, H.G. Wells merely used it as a
convenient way to express his socialist views and condemn
the great social gap between the rich, idle capitalist class
and impoverished labour. Whatever intentions Wells had, the
future generations of readers were less impressed by his
political messages. Instead they were fascinated by the idea
that the strange new worlds could be explored without
traveling trough space. The novel became one of great
classics of science fiction genre and it natural for
filmmakers to use it as inspiration. First of them was
George Pal, who in 1960 directed film which would, through
the years, become genre classic of its own.
The plot revolves about George (Rod Taylor), Victorian
scientist who discovered the way to travel through the
fourth dimension - time. At the eve of the new 20th Century,
George gathers his friends in order to present them his
invention - machine that would enable him to travel through
time. They are skeptical, but that doesn't prevent George
from carrying out his plan and traveling into the future. At
first, he travels slowly, seeing London as it changes
through the years and three world wars. Finally, after
witnessing World War Three, he travels far into the future,
hoping that he would cease to witness wars and senseless
destructions. When he finally reaches year 802,701 AD, at
first glance, new world looks like utopia - humanity
consists of young, beautiful, but idle Eloi, people who are
fed, clothed and taken care of by unseen machines. But,
Weena (Yvette Mimieux), Eloi woman, tells George about
another side of the coin - in the night, her people is
preyed upon by Morlocs, humanoid creatures from the
underworld.
THE TIME MACHINE became the cinematic classic for the very
same reason the novel became the classic in science fiction
literature - the fantastic concept was a brilliant way for
the authors to talk about burning issues and fears of their
respective times. For H.G. Wells it was frightening threat
of class struggle; for George Pal and his screenwriter David
Duncan, who produced the film in the worst days of the Cold
War, it was the constant and more imminent threat of nuclear
holocaust, underlined with the negative references to war
throughout the movie. Even the modern audience, which would
be tempted to discard the film as old-fashioned, could find
some values in its universal messages, fit for each era.
Compared with the genre films of today, THE TIME MACHINE is
even better, and could serve as a good example how to make
intelligent, thought-provoking films.
Of course, since this is Hollywood product after all, THE
TIME MACHINE delivers such concepts in the form of classic
adventure, sometimes sacrificing plausibility for the sake
of attractiveness. For example, it is hard to imagine that
someone would be able to understand perfect English million
years in future; same is with Morlocs degenerating into
mutant monsters, while Eloi remain undistinguished from the
people of today. Some of the final scenes, that turn
Victorian scientist into an action superhero, are also
rather unconvincing. But, on the other hand, the film is
very well directed, cleverly paced and the special effects,
although definitely old-fashioned, are more than adequate
for this kind of picture. The acting is good, with Rod
Taylor in one of his most remembered roles, while in the
same time Alan Young brings rather memorable performance as
George's trusted friend Filby. Yvette Mimieux, who plays
Weena, on the other hand, would be remembered more by her
looks than by the complexity of her role. However, despite
all those flaws, THE TIME MACHINE is a very good piece of
cinema, something that connoisseurs of quality
science-fiction films sorely miss these days.

Title
Review for Et Dieu... créa la femme (1956)
When French film director Roger Vadim died last month, most
of the obituaries dealt less with his work and more with the
fact that he had been married or had romantic relationship
with some of the most beautiful film actresses of his time.
Vadim's romantic relationships were intertwined with his
professional life, though, and many of those actresses had
their careers launched or boosted by appearing in his
movies. The best known example is Brigitte Bardot, probably
the most famous French movie icon of this century, married
for Vadim in the early 1950s. She reached world-wide fame by
starring in her husband's 1956 melodrama ...AND GOD CREATED
WOMAN, film that pushed the limits of screen erotica in its
time.
Brigitte Bardot plays the heroine of the film, Juliette,
18-year old orphan who lives with her foster parents in
small French Riviera town of St. Tropez. Juliette is
sexually attractive woman, object of desire among entire
male population of the town, and being quite aware of it,
she takes the kick out of teasing men by dressing and acting
provocatively. Nobody is immune to her charms, including
wealthy businessman Carradine (played by Curd Juergens), but
Juliette is going out with Antoine Tardieu (played by
Christian Marquand), eldest son in the family of
impoverished local shipbuilders. Antoine and everyone else
is going to lose her, though, because her foster parents had
enough of scandals and want to send her back to orphanage.
When Carradine suggests that she could be saved from such
fate by marrying one of the local boys, Antoine's shy
younger brother Michel (played by Jean-Louis Trintignant)
suddenly volunteers for the job. Because of the bride's slut
reputation, everyone in town is ridiculing the marriage, but
newlyweds suddenly realise that they love each other. Their
idyll ends when Antoine gets back in the town, since
Juliette can't resist opportunity to cheat on her husband.
The script by Vadim and Roger Levy is simple, hardly
original and more in the class of television soap operas
than great cinema classics. Observation of social
relationships in small town (the way that people's action
are led more by their wallets than by their feelings) are
only hinted and not explored enough. Characters are hardly
memorable, although they are played by more than capable
actors (especially in the case of Curd Juergens and young
Jean-Louis Trintignant). Vadim is, however, never impressed
with the lack of content in his picture, and he compensates
it with packing into visually attractive film. Colours are
bright, locations quite charming and the new Cinemascope
technique used with great skill. But the biggest attraction
of the film is, of course, Brigitte Bardot. She not just
looks stunnigly beautiful, she uses all her acting talent to
simply ooze raw sexuality from the screen, creating
character that seems to be the living embodiment of male
sexist ideals - woman who is virgin and slut in the same
time. Vadim enhances his wife's seductive abilities by using
Cinemascope to show her body in a ways it was never shown in
mainstream cinema before. Her first appearance in the film -
when she sunbathes in the nude - might seem quite tame,
almost kindergarten material for our standards, but it must
have been quite shocking for 1950s audience. However,
despite being almost half a century old, this cheap
melodrama still posseses certain charm that would endure
same as the legend of Bardot.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1993) (TV)
For some literary scholars, FRANKENSTEIN, 1818 novel by Mary
Shelley, happens to be the very first piece of fiction
within the realms of science fiction genre. However, most of
the movie adaptations of the novel are associated more with
the genre of horror, thanks to Ken Whale's 1931 version,
unsurpassed until this very day. The other adaptations,
although some of them good, paled in comparison. It wasn't
much different in 1990s, which was rather bad decade for
movies dealing with Frankenstein monster. After
disappointing FRANKENSTEIN UNBOUND in 1990, we got equally
disappointing Kenneth Branagh's version in 1994. In the wake
of latter, Turner Pictures tried to cash in on the
renaissance of classic horrors, inspired by Coppola's
version of DRACULA. Result is rather forgettable and equally
disappointing television production, despite being more
faithful to the novel than most of other versions.
Movie begins when Swiss medical scholar dr. Victor
Frankenstein (played by Patrick Bergin) develops a method to
artificially create human being out of dead matter. The
result of his experiment is a disfigured by physically
superior monster (Randy Quaid). Creature escapes to
countryside only to find that the humanity hates it. Angry
at his maker, the monster kills his bride Elisabeth. Dr.
Frankenstein is now determined to track down and kill
monster, but soon he realises that he had developed a
psychic link with it.
The screenplay by director David Wickes employs somewhat new
(or unused) elements of the plot - materialisation instead
of patching up body parts, psychic link. However, those
elements aren't enough to drive off unpleasant effect of
deja vu for many viewers. And Wickes' unispiring directing
doesn't help at all. Actors are also disinterested, and
Randy Quaid as monster is quite unconvincing. The result is
failed film that looks like a cheap exploitation of great
literary and movie classics.

Title
Review for Commando (1985)
One of the things that should make movie fans less nostalgic about 1980s
aren't "teenage slasher" horrors. The real killers among products of
movie industry in that decade were so-called "ramboids", movies inspired
by the meteoric success of Stallone's FIRST BLOOD PART 2. That story
about lone U.S. Special Forces man that manages to single-handedly
destroy entire Vietnamese army was the product of Reagan years and
actually served as a substitute for U.S. victory in Vietnam War.
However, Stallone's stunts in that film inspired hundreds of cheap
imitations - usually such cinematic abominations that would need
centuries before they get any chance of camp appeal. "Ramboids" weren't
just monstrosities in artistic sense - in case of former Yugoslavia they
actually proved the theory of movies as a bad influence on real life
people. After being exposed to hundreds of movies with heroes who, armed
with single machinegun or a rocket launcher, manage to wipe out entire
regiments of bad guys, many young people considered war to be fun and in
1991, when war erupted in Croatia, they actually volunteered go to the
battlefields in droves. For many rude awakening about world where
bullets don't miraculously miss good guys, where automatic weapons have
to be re-loaded and where superior firepower, training and numbers
actually do matter came too late. Thousands, perhaps even tens of
thousands of people in body bags or wheelchairs could be counted as a
indirect victims of movies inspired by RAMBO 2.
The only "ramboid" that I actually liked, and, I still like, causing
certain feeling of guilt about it, is COMMANDO by Mark L. Lester, one of
those rare big studio projects that jumped on RAMBO 2 bandwagon.
Actually, it proved to be quite succesful vehicle for rising star of
Arnold Schwarzenegger and one of the most popular action movies in that
decade (that would later bring such a masterpieces as PREDATOR and DIE
HARD).
The hero of the movie is Colonel John Matrix, veteran of a unnamed U.S.
Special Operations unit, who has retired and lives a happy and quiet
life as a logger together with his pre-teen daughter Jenny. The idyllic
life is interrupted by a bunch of thugs, including his former
psychopatic subordinate Bennet, who kidnap his daughter. The move was
orchestrated by Arius, exiled dictator of a remote Latin American
country who wants to return to power and Matrix must kill the sitting
president in a exchange for his daughter's life. However, knowing that
he deals with anything but an honest people he escapes from ascending
plane, knowing that he has only 11 hours before the plane lands and
Arius finds that he changed his mind. Matrix begins the race against the
time and tries to find the location of terrorist base, with the
attractive stewardess Cindy as his only help.
One of the reason why COMMANDO beats RAMBO 2 is in a approach. While
director Pal Cosmatos, writer James Cameron and Stallone used
impressive, but utterly unrealistic visual and other attractions of
"one- man-army" concept as a tool for certain political message,
Schwarzenegger, writer Steven E. De Souza (author of DIE HARD) and
director Mark L. Lester (whose work on COMMANDO is probably his best)
considered all that special forces mumbo-jumbo as an excuse for escapist
pulp fiction fun. Schwarzenegger, who had already created an image of
invincible hero/killing machine in CONAN THE BARBARIAN (1981) and THE
TERMINATOR (1984) actually tried to give some new elements to his own
character (East German background as an attempt to give plausible
explanation for his accent). But, he also finished the creation of his
on-screen Schwarzenegger personality, including his famous one-liners
and very specific, sometimes very cruel sense of humour. His lines,
usually given before the killing of the bad guys, are probably the best
remembered element of this movie.
Almost everything in this movie is deliberately over the top. That also
includes the small army of brilliant character actors in the roles of
Arius and his henchmen. Vernon Welles, who was, until that time best
known as Mad Max's nemesis in THE ROAD WARRIOR is, despite his huge
physical presence, overshadowed by Bill Duke and Dan Hedaya. But his
final showdown with Schwarzenegger is quite impressive, anyway. The good
guys are under-represented (small roles of Bill Paxton and Chelsea
Fields are almost un-noticeable), but Rae Dawn Chong as Cindy,
displaying entertaining combination of "damsel in distress" and tough
chick that gives this movie brilliant comic relief.
COMMANDO is hardly a masterpiece, suffering mostly from the uninspired
soundtrack by James Horner (mostly re-write of his work in 48 HRS) and
the song that beats Celine Dion's "My Heart Will Go On" in "the
cheasiest song of all times" category. Editing is sub-par in the final
showdown scenes, but only the most fanatical nitpickers would find such
fatal flaws. In its 90 minutes of non-stop action, COMMANDO manages to
achieve its goal - to entertain the audience. And, sometimes, that fact
is enough to consider the movie good.

Title
Review for Flat, De (1996)
In the last decade Hollywood, in desperate search for any
original idea, turned to Old Continent and many films
originally made in France, Denmark or Holland got their
American versions. However, this process never went in
single direction. Lack of stars, budget and other resources
didn't prevent European filmmakers from creating their own
versions of popular Hollywood films. HOUSE CALL, Dutch
thriller directed in 1995 by Ben Verbong, is one of such
examples.
Protagonist of this film is Roos Hartman (played by Renee
Soutendijk), single mother who just moved into the large
apartment complex near the sea in order to work as a
resident physician for other tenants. Soon she becomes a
witness to the gruesome murder of another tenant, but she is
unaware of killer's identity. While police suspects her
mysterious but good-looking neighbour Eric Coenen (played by
Victor L"w), Roos Hartman begins romantic relationship with
him. However, after a while some details emerge and Roos
begins wondering whether she made a right choice or not.
Even the least experienced viewers wouldn't fail to notice a
great deal of similarities between HOUSE CALL and SLIVER,
one of the most underrated erotic thrillers of early 1990s.
Director Verbong and writer Jean van der Velde almost
shamelessly copy situations, characters and even some
particular scenes from Noyce's 1993 film. Naturally, that
means that the entire plot development is, more or less,
quite predicatble. To make things even worse, Verbong is not
Noyce and Dutch actress Renee Soutendijk is not in the same
league as Sharon Stone, so the viewers would quickly lose
interest for this film. Because of that, HOUSE CALL looks
like a cheap and unsuccessful attempt of reaping the fruits
of someone else's labour.
Review written on September 22nd 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com -
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Jour de fęte (1948)
In the eyes of casual filmophiles, French cinema is
associated with artistic and usually dead serious films. But
one of their most important and celebrated filmmakers,
Jacques Tati, actually earned his reputation by making only
few films, all belonging to the genre of comedy. The first
among them was HOLIDAY, shot in 1948. This film was
important in the history of French cinema, since it happened
to be the first one shot in colour. Unfortunately, due to
some technical and financial difficulties, the colour print
was never developed and Tati had to use back-up footage,
shot in black and white. In later years, Tati colourised
some segments using pencils and even added some new footage,
but HOLIDAY in its full, colourised glory was released in
1995, thirteen years after director's death.
HOLIDAY shares the setting and protagonist with Tati's
previous film, 1947 short L'?COLE DES FACTEURS. Franois
(played by Tati) is a postman who works in small, sleepy
provincial town of Saint-Severe-sur-Indre. Once a year, on
holiday, the town is visited by fair. Among the things
featured on the fair is a cinema. Franois watches a short
documentary that praises the modern equipment, dedication
and speed of U.S. postal service. Since all townspeople
begin to mockingly compare Franois' slow ways with the
efficiency of his American colleagues, he decides to change
his technique. Next day he devises many ingenious ways to
deliver mail as quickly as possible, sometimes with funny
results and unexpected consequences.
For some of the contemporary audiences, HOLIDAY, at least in
its beginning, might seem a little bit dated and some of the
gags are funny, but hardly hilarious. But once the viewer
gets tuned in he begins to truly enjoy this film. In a
relatively short time we meet simple, yet nice people and we
begin to truly appreciate their idyllic way (the village
portrayed sheltered Tati when he had run from being drafted
for slave labour in Germany during WW2). With time, the gags
are getting funnier and funnier, and the very loose plot,
Tati's favourite theme - impact on rapidly developed modern
technology on human beings - is properly established. The
film also could be viewed as an interesting comment on late
1940s France, especially the ambivalent relationship towards
Americans. On one hand, they are heralded as liberators and
providers of much needed Marshall Plan aid; on the other
hand, French national pride rebels against American cultural
imperialism. The film is also spiced with subplot dealing
with carnival worker Roger (played by Guy Decomble) who
constantly flirts with local girl Jeanette (played by Maine
Valle), despite having his wife (played by Santa Relli) by
his side. Such arrogant naughtiness was unimaginable in
Hollywood films of the same era. The pleasant, but not
overbearing music by Jean Yatove also contributes a lot to
the idyllic atmosphere.
Despite being somewhat aged, HOLIDAY after more than half a
century still remains a pleasant viewing experience, a film
that should be recommended to anyone tired of darkness so
omnipresent in the cinemas of today.

Title
Review for There Was a Crooked Man... (1970)
Term "hidden gem" is usually reserved for films that were
unappreciated because they were unknown - small, low budget
films, made by filmmakers who never became popular or by
film industries that don't have reputation of winning
festival awards. However, one of the more blatant cases of
"hidden gem" is a film that doesn't meet all those criteria.
THERE WAS A CROOKED MAN... was 1970 big budget production by
respected Hollywood studio featuring big names and being
directed by respected director. More than quarter of century
later, this film is ignored and almost forgotten. I was very
surprised to see it, because THERE WAS A CROOKED MAN...
happened to be film that had left big impression on me when
I had seen it for the first time. I had to wait for almost a
decade to see this western comedy for the second time, but
the long wait really paid off. After that seeing, I began to
appreciate it even more and wonder why the other filmophiles
ignore it.
Protagonist of this film is Paris Pittman Jr. (played by
Kirk Douglas), bandit who is endowed with intelligence and
charm. However, those qualities can't save him from bad
luck; he is being caught and sentenced to ten years of
prison for the latest robbery. Conditions in the prison,
placed in the middle of desert, are hard, but Pittman could
endure those years simply by thinking about half a million
dollars of the loot that he had stashed outside. Pittman's
days in prison get even easier when the word about his
fortune spreads among the inmates and even some guards;
everybody starts doing him favours, expecting share of the
loot in exchange. That provides opportunities for the
jailbreak, in which Pittman could expect co- operation by
his picturesque cellmates. However, Pittman's plans would be
temporarily halted with the appearance of Woodward Lopeman
(played by Henry Fonda), new, idealistic and incorruptible
warden, more interested in improving prison conditions and
penal reform than Pittman's bribe.
Script for THERE WAS A CROOKED MAN..., written by Robert
Benton and David Newman, is a surprisingly good piece of
work. The plot is relatively simple, but it is laced with
interesting subplots and even more interesting supporting
characters. Each of those characters has an interesting
story, and those stories are often funny and very
entertaining. But the most important element of the film is
the acting talent, and this film had place for two giants.
Kirk Douglas and Henry Fonda have more than interesting
interaction as two completely opposite characters. Douglas
is splendid as totally immoral but intelligent and charming
villain. Fonda, on the other hand, uses minimalist approach
in more serious role of idealist Good Guy. However, that
seriousness and good old American values, in the context of
this film, provide comical effect. The dynamic duo of
Douglas and Fonda is accompanied with small army of
excellent character actors in equally impressive supporting
roles. Burgess Meredith is great as the oldest, most
experienced inmate, Warren Oates is good as strong but naive
bandit, but nothing can top the comic relief provided by
Hugh Cronyn and John Randolph as pair of two, old,
presumably gay, swindlers. Michael Blodgett is somewhat
shadowed by them in his role of young man sentenced to
death. The great script and many great actors provided good
material for Joseph L. Mankiewicz to make truly great film.
Mankiewicz did it for the most part; on the other hand, some
scenes are too repetitive or unnecessary, making this film
longer than it should have been.
The reason why this film failed to become instant classic
lies in the worldview it showed. That worldview uses
uncompromising and extremely cynical portrayal of Old West
in order to portray humans as greedy, lustful and entirely
amoral creatures, and all those who think that there are
some higher ideals in life, like Lopeman, are portrayed as
idiots. Critics at the time would probably appreciate a film
that was brave enough to show the film that undermines the
old American values by showing their dark side (the film
also shows racism towards blacks and Chinese in few scenes).
On the other hand, this film actually fails to bring any
alternative -THERE WAS A CROOKED MAN... lacks any positive
role models, and in their absence viewers are left with the
impression that the human beings are simply rotten and that
there is nothing that could be done about it. Such nihilism
was something that highly idealistic audience of late 1960s
couldn't swallow. Feminists would also be infuriated with
the way women are portrayed - as nothing more than whores
and amoral sex addicts, and even the implied gang rape is
seen as something quite funny. On the other hand, perhaps
the audience that had grown up on Tarantino would find way
to really appreciate this film.

Title
Review for Death Wish 3 (1985)
Fact that Charles Bronson represents one of the most
important movie icons of the 1980s represents one of the
biggest and almost tragic ironies of that decade. Tragedy
lies in the fact that the icon status was earned less by
quality of his work in movies, but the quantity. Most of
those movies were produced by Cannon Group, company led by
Israeli producers Menahem Golan and Yoram Globus. Those two
men probably thought that they could be the next Roger
Corman, B- movie mentors of future Hollywood legends.
Unfortunately, that didn't happened, and when Cannon finally
went bankrupt at the end of the decade, behind it stood the
huge pile of cinematic garbage, that would require at least
few centuries before it reaches the camp appeal. Sadly for
Bronson, that garbage also contained numerous movies in
which that capable character actor and action hero of the
1970s tried to raise their worth simply by being the main
lead, and lowering his own reputation in process. On the
other hand, Bronson could take comfort in a fact that those
movies were extremely popular, especially among the audience
3 or 4 times younger than Bronson himself.
One of such movies that seriously marred Bronson's
reputation is DEATH WISH 3, third sequel in the series which
began with DEATH WISH in 1974. In the original movie,
Bronson played Paul Kersey, mild-mannered New York architect
who turns into deadly street vigilante after his family fell
victim to urban violence. That movie was far from
masterpiece; yet, in it the director Michael Winner was
skillfully offering the cinematic remedy for very real
disease of growing crime rates of the time (on the same
lines like Siegel in DIRTY HARRY). Unfortunately, six years
later Cannon Group got rights to the character of Paul
Kersey and began destroying it by pumping out sequels; even
the presence of its original director didn't stop the rapid
decline of the quality. DEATH WISH 3 begins when Kersey
comes to visit an old friend, living in the urban wasteland
of East New York, populated by young criminals and people
too old or too poor to move out.  Before the reunion,
Kersey's friend falls victim to the street gang led by evil
Fraker (played by Gavan O'Herlihy, probably the only
noteworthy role in the film). Kersey decides to avenge his
death and slowly prepares for his crusade, while the police
inspector Shriker (Ed Lauter), ants to use him as a secret
weapon in his losing war against the urban crime.
Bronson, the main asset in this movie, plays the character
who is nothing more than an efficient killing machine.
Although Bronson's charisma does help in overcoming some
implausibilities (single man in his 60s and armed with a
single pistol manages to wipe out dozens of opponents with
superior firepower), the lack of emotions or Bronson's own
commitment could be seen in a very few lines spoken in a
film. The movie authors were somewhat aware of that
emotional shallowness, so they added romantic interest for
their hero - public defender played by Deborah Raffin and
conveniently terminated in order to give some more motives
for Kersey's crusade. On the other hand, emotions are much
better played by confronting law-abiding, yet ethnically
stereotyped citizens with their daily nemesis of street
punks - ruthless enough to exercise their reign of terror on
the entire city blocks, and stupid enough to be killed in
droves by Kersey. Unfortunately, Michael Winner doesn't know
how to work out the plot, and after torturing the viewers
with mostly uninteresting characters and cliched and
formulaic situations, ends this movie with a bang. The big
showdown at the end - that turns East New York into the
Sarajevo-like battle zone - is probably the worst part of
the movie, because of the poor editing and the cheap sets
and props that give away the low budget.
In short, this movie could be recommended only to the most
fanatical Charles Bronson fans or for the people who are
already desperate for 1980s nostalgia.
(Special note for trekkies: Marina Sirtis, the actress who
played Counsellor Deanna Troi in STAR TREK: THE NEXT
GENERATION could be spotted in a small role of Portorican
wife).

Title
Review for Sophie's Choice (1982)
Bitter experience often taught us that Hollywood stardom and
great acting doesn't have to go hand in hand. Bitter
experience also taught us that Academy Awards often end in
the wrong hands. However, one of the rare instances when
Hollywood star indeed was the great actor and when the
Academy Award was truly deserved happened in 1983. In that
year Meryl Streep received her "Oscar" for her heart-
wrenching role in SOPHIE'S CHOICE, 1982 drama directed by
Alan J. Pakula.
The plot of this film is based on the best-seller novel by
Joseph Styrone and begins in 1947 when young and aspiring
Southern writer nicknamed "Stingo" (played by Peter
MacNicol) comes to New York in order to begin his literary
career. He finds an apartment in Brooklyn where he meets
neighbours - a couple of two fascinating individuals in
romantic relationship. One is Nathan (played by Kevin
Kline), Jewish biologist prone to violent mood swings;
another is his girlfriend Sophie Zatkowska (played by Meryl
Streep), Polish immigrant and Auschwitz survivor. As he
befriends them and begins chronicling their stormy
relationship, Stingo becomes fascinated with Sophie's life
story and slowly begins unravelling well-hidden secrets
about her traumatic past, including terrible choice she had
to make. Stingo gradually starts falling in love with
Sophie, but the tragedies of the past will begin to reflect
in the tragedies of the present.
SOPHIE'S CHOICE is a film that gives a rather thankless
choice to any reviewer who tries to rate it. On one hand we
have a single performance which is as close to perfection as
any actor or actress had done in the history of the seventh
art. On the other hand, if we rate a film as a whole, we
might do injustice to the said performance. Simply, Meryl
Streep's role in this film is so overwhelming that she
outshines everything else and makes the whole film crumbling
under such weight. Based solely on Streep's role, SOPHIE'S
CHOICE is a masterpiece - rarely we have an opportunity to
watch an actress which is ready to employ every last bit of
her talent to give the detailed, total and moving portrayal
of multidimensional and complex character which we see in
different incarnations through different time periods.
Streep's efforts in this film can never be praised enough -
she doesn't just changes her physical appearances from young
Polish girl, pathetic concentration camp prisoner, mortally
ill immigrant or seemingly healthy and glamorous woman at
the end; she does everything in her power to make those
character transformations as accurate and believable as
possible. This is most notable in the way she excels in
skills beyond the grasp of most of her American colleagues.
While the average Hollywood actor or actress can't master
any accent other than Californian, Meryl Streep here cruises
through the segments that require her character to speak in
Polish, German and broken English. She masters those lines
and those languages flawlessly, never allowing us to imagine
that the actress hasn't grown up in Poland or Germany. After
this marvellous display of talent, it is quite
understandable why Meryl Streep earns "Oscar" nominations
almost every year.
First casualties of Meryl Streep's triumph were the roles of
her two partners. In some other circumstances, Kevin Kline's
film acting debut in the role of Nathan could have been seen
as a superb display of talent - especially the easiness in
which Kline manages to swing between various emotional
states. In the context of this film, this role looks over
the top, in the same way character of Nathan is less
interesting than character of Sophie. Kevin Kline's
performance would also seem less effective to those who had
encountered this actor in his latter, more comedic roles,
like A FISH CALLED WANDA. Meryl Streep does disservice to
Peter MacNicol too; this actor does a very fine job in
playing young and innocent intellectual, and uses a more
sublime technique to switch his character between
expressions of awe, lust, fear and confusion; yet his
character seems somewhat unworthy of the story that is most
effective as one-character study. His role also suffers from
director's decision to split his role between on-screen
character played by MacNicol, and narrator with the more
mature and suggestive voice of Josef Sommer.
Strength of Meryl Streep's performance creates another, more
serious problem for SOPHIE'S CHOICE. Nobody could accuse
Pakula of creating a bad film, since he covered all the
bases - plot develops nicely, multiple flashbacks explain a
lot about characters, and, finally, excellent photography by
Nestor Almendros uses two different sets of film in order to
guide viewers through different time periods. But whenever
SOPHIE'S CHOICE drifts away from Sophie and her story, it
becomes a less of masterpiece it was supposed to be and the
viewer begins to find its shortcomings. First of all, the
film is slightly overlong, with some episodes that serve no
purposes and that could have been left on the cutting room
floor (and that includes even the conversation between
Sophie and Hoess' daughter). Character of Nathan is, despite
Kline's good performance, underwritten and his big secret
gets revealed too late in the film; the authors did the bad
job when they tried to draw parallels between Sophie's and
Nathan's shortcomings.
However, SOPHIE'S CHOICE deserves to be recommended not
solely due to Meryl Streep's role. A great part of it deals
with World War Two and its most macabre yet most fascinating
element - Nazi death camps. Unlike many other Hollywood
films, SOPHIE'S CHOICE doesn't try to simplify this grim and
depressing subject and put it solely in the context of
relations between Germany and Jews. SOPHIE'S CHOICE shows
that the nations other than Germany had their own forms of
anti-Semitism with genocidal potential (which is later
hinted in Spielberg's SCHINDLER'S LIST). The movie also
shows that the people other than Jews also became victims of
Nazi genocidal policies. Therefore, even those who might not
get affected by the strength of Meryl Streep's performance
should watch this film, at least in order to grasp tragedy
that happened to Europe in the middle of 20th Century.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Romancing the Stone (1984)
Same as the westerns in early 1990s, adventure movies -
another classic genre forgotten in modern times - made short
Hollywood comeback ten years earlier. Series of high budget
adventure films made in early and mid 1980s were, however,
less inspired by nostalgic feelings of Hollywood executives
- the real impulse was given by the success of first two
films of Spielberg's Indiana Jones trilogy. Not
surprisingly, the efforts to mimic Spielberg and his formula
usually backfired. The only successful attempt was made by
Spielberg's disciple Robert Zemeckis in his 1984 adventure
comedy ROMANCING THE STONE - great commercial hit that
managed to spawn a sequel two years later.
The heroine of the film is Joan Wilder (played by Kathleen
Turner), writer of trashy romantic novels, whose
professional success makes great contrast to the utter lack
of romance in her private life. Everything changes when she
receives mysterious package from her sister Elaine (played
by Mary Ellen Trainor) who lives in Colombia. The package
includes the treasure map and this is reason why Elaine gets
kidnapped by American gangster Ira (played by Zack Norman).
Since the gangsters demand the map in exchange for Elaine's
freedom, Joan travels to Colombia where she gets greeted by
Zolo (played by Andreas Katsulas), nasty local character who
wants the map for himself. She intentionally misdirects Joan
to take the wrong bus and travel to jungle where he would
easily take the map out of hands of helpless American woman.
His plan is foiled by the arrival of Jack Colton (played by
Michael Douglas), American bird hunter who saves her from
Zolo and reluctantly agrees to escort her back to
civilisation. Soon it turns out that the unforgiving climate
and wild animals aren't the only obstacles on their way -
they are pursued by Ira's cousin Ralph (played by Danny de
Vito), and Zolo reveals himself as the deputy commander of
Colombian secret police. During the journey, Jack and Joan
decide to take the treasure for themselves, and Joan slowly
realises that Jack is the exactly the hero she was
describing in her books.
We might get impression that the time has done great
disservice to ROMANCING THE STONE. Decade and half after the
premiere, the film looks terribly dated, but the problem was
already there in 1984 - while Indiana Jones movies had
period settings and therefore kept their timeless quality to
this day, ROMANCING THE STONE somehow failed to bring the
spirit of classic adventure films like THE AFRICAN QUEEN to
1980s setting (partially due to Alan Silvestri's score that
sounds unmistakably 1980s and thus disrupts the illusion)
and, as a result, the film looked anachronistic from the
beginning. Thankfully, the scriptwriter Diane Thomas (who
tragically died a year after the production of the film) was
aware of concept's limitations and filled it with the right
combination of action, romance and comedy. Some characters
and situations are extremely funny or interesting, while
other look lame. For example, character played by Danny de
Vito, which is supposed to work as "comic relief" is
actually irritating for the most of time (Alfons Arau as
drug dealer and Holland Taylor as Joan's editor are more
effective in that area), and the film might work very well
without him. Same goes for Zack Norman as his partner, while
Andreas Katsulas manages to transcend one- dimensionality of
his villain character with enough dosage of creepyness.
However, the best assets of the film are the two main
actors. Kathleen Turner was incredible in this film - she is
equally believable in the role of mousy romance novelist as
she was in the role of manipulative seductress in BODY HEAT.
She also has a great chemistry with Michael Douglas, whose
role of classic adventure hero is so different from the
roles he had played in late 1980s and 1990s. Zemeckis'
direction is more than fine, although some scenes seem
heavily influenced by Spielberg, and the pace of the film is
satisfactory. The end result of his efforts is slightly
flawed and somewhat old-fashioned film that nevertheless
kept enough of its entertainment value to be recommended as
fine example of 1980s Hollywood's craftsmanship.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Boxing Helena (1993)
One of the indicator of badness in film is the hype being
remembered more than film itself. Such was the case with
BOXING HELENA, 1993 directorial debut of Jennifer Chambers
Lynch, daughter of the great David Lynch. Made in the dying
years of post-TWIN PEAKS Lynch craze among movie snobs, it
was hyped as another, "warped, twisted masterpiece" of Lynch
clan. Kim Basinger also provided extra publicity by quitting
the lead role and being sued for the breech of contract.
But, the result was extremely disappointing film, which
quickly sank into well-deserved oblivion.
The movie protagonist is Nick Cavanaugh (played by Julian
Sands), talented surgeon who is getting obsessed by Helena
(Sherilyn Fenn), beautiful woman who ditched him after brief
affair. Cavanaugh stalks her and uses every opportunity for
the pathetic attempts to re-establish the relationship.
During one of such occasions, Helena is hit by a car, and
Nick quickly takes the role of her personal physician in
order to have his way with her. After she wakes up, Helena
discovers not only that she is prisoner in Cavanaugh's
stylish residence, but also that Cavanaugh amputated her
legs in order to prevent her from escaping. She is still
trying to escape, so Cavanaugh takes off her arms.
Apart from casting Sherilyn Fenn (Audrey Horne in TWIN PEAKS
and small cameo in WILD AT HEART) and the use of twisted
characters and their perverse fantasies, this film by Ms.
Lynch hasn't got anything in common with the works of
director's more talented father. Despite rather bizarre
subject, the style of this film is conventional and setting
is light, characters are beautiful - but the result at the
end is quite sterile and the film in the end looks too
artificial for dark sexual fantasy it was supposed to
portray. Jennifer Lynch obviously lacks talents in directing
and it becomes painfully obvious in the scenes that are
supposed to erotic - its banal artificiality is even bellow
the standards of Playboy videos. The actors aren't good
either. Julian Sands is terribly miscast as emotionally
disturbed man - this actors is best either when he plays
charismatic protagonists or villains; being neurotic doesn't
suit him. Bill Paxton was better for this role, but his
presence was wasted in forgettable and unnecessary subplot
dealing with Helena's boyfriend. Sherilyn Fenn contributed
to this film mostly by her looks, but even the her greater
effort in acting couldn't help this film. The screenplay, on
the other hand, is awful, at least for someone who had made
best-seller with Laura Palmer's diary - the events in this
movie are implausible, characters come and go without
purpose and many unnecessary subplots only slow down the
film and add to the total confusion. One of those subplots
involves character of Cavanaugh's "regular" girlfriend,
played by Betsy Clarke. The twist at the end, although
unpredictable, is unbelievable and the viewers, who had the
stomach to endure entire film, would feel cheated. All in
all, BOXING HELENA is disorganised quasi-artistic mess of a
movie that should be remembered as nothing more than one of
the wiser decisions in Kim Basinger's career.

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Sometimes films can be like wine - getting better as they
age. Such examples are, however, very rare and author of
this review can name only few examples of films he
considered better with each subsequent viewing. One of such
films was VERTIGO, 1958 thriller, often mentioned as the
best among many films directed by great Alfred Hitchcock and
one of the greatest films ever made. When I saw this film
for the first time I was not that impressed. Actually, I was
quite disappointed - although VERTIGO looked like a truly
great film, something was missing and I began thinking about
it as one of those overhyped films which filmophiles are
supposed to worship even if they don't particularly like
them. On the second viewing, I began changing my mind about
VERTIGO after discovering some new elements in the films and
looking it from different perspective. My view on VERTIGO
improved and continued to improve after each viewing. Every
time I discovered something new and gradually became
convinced that VERTIGO meets all requirements for cinematic
masterpiece.
VERTIGO was made during the zenith of Hitchcock's career,
with his reputation of great filmmaker already established.
Two French authors, Pierre Boileau and Thomas Narcejac, have
written the novel D'ENTRE LES MORTS especially for
Hitchcock. Hitchcock used the plot of the novel after
adaptations by Samuel A. Taylor and Alec Coppel. Protagonist
of VERTIGO is John "Scottie" Ferguson (played by James
Stewart), San Francisco police detective who discovers that
he suffers from acrophobia while chasing the crime suspect
on rooftops. The chase would end with one of the uniformed
policemen dead and Scottie, traumatised for life, decides to
leave the force. Few months later, he is called by an old
college friend and shipping tycoon Gavin Elster (played by
Tom Helmore) who wants to hire him as a private detective.
Scottie's job is to look after Elster's wife Madeleine
(played by Kim Novak), who is acting strangely, struck with
unhealthy obsession with Carlotta Valdez, woman who took her
own life in San Francisco a century ago. Scottie begins
following Madeleine and gradually falls in love with her.
But his love is weaker than his acrophobia, and he can't
save Madeleine's life when she jumps from the high bell
tower. Stricken with grief, remorse and guilty conscience
Scottie wanders through streets of San Francisco until he
finds Judy Barton (again played by Kim Novak), ordinary girl
who is looking somewhat similar to Madeleine. His interest
in Judy is motivated only by memory of lost love, but young
girl has her own skeletons in the closet.
VERTIGO represents Hitchcock at his best - a great artist
who is willing to experiment while being faithful to his
trademark style in the same time. Result of his efforts is
the film with multiple layers that could satisfy both those
who worship Hitchcock as the king of suspense thrillers and
those who aren't particularly attracted to the genre. Again,
as in many films from this period of Hitchcock's career,
VERTIGO is suspense thriller on surface only. Hitchcock uses
thriller plot only as an opportunity to explore various
forms of human conditions, especially those, which are
considered bizarre, aberrant or downright perverse.
Therefore, VERTIGO should be viewed less as a thriller and
more like a combination of powerful love story and intense
psychological drama. Hitchcock's ability to put all those
contents within the framework of thriller is another reason
why VERTIGO happens to be one of the most celebrated (and
quoted) films in the history of cinema.
VERTIGO is film worshipped by critics and film scholars, but
I doubt that the general audience could share their
enthusiasm. This is probably due to the fact that VERTIGO
happens to be very dark, by many standards the darkest and
most depressing film Hitchcock has ever made. Sinister
dimension of the film could be already found in the
character of protagonist. For many people, James Stewart's
role in this film is one of the most successful
transformations of the actor's image - once good
all-American boy was already playing people with extremely
unpleasant character traits, but John "Scottie" Ferguson
represents the bottom of the barrel. In REAR WINDOW, another
Hitchcock's classic, Stewart played voyeuristic
photographer, but this aberration from societal norms was
something almost acceptable and within the framework of
Hitchcockian formula of "ordinary man in extraordinary
circumstances". But this time Stewart plays character that
is anything but ordinary - Scottie Ferguson is actually
textbook example of various psychopathological conditions.
Pathological fear of heights is the least of his problems,
as well as his inability to deal with women. As the plot
progresses, we see protagonist revealing his darker side.
First we are introduced to his maniacal obsession on the
verge of stalking. Than Hitchcock hints about necrophilia -
Ferguson is attracted to Madeleine less because of her
beauty and more because she is cold and distant, and in one
scene it is implied that he might have had his way with her
while she was unconscious. Finally, in the second part of
film, after being diagnosed as chronic depressive, he shows
his worst side as someone who wants total control over his
sex object. Stewart shows these character traits
uncompromisingly, but the audience is still having some
sympathy for Scottie - this is the reason why the role in
VERTIGO represents the greatest achievement in Stewart's
acting career. Ironically, this role was, according to many
film scholars, inspired by Hitchcock himself - Scottie's
makeover of Judy was in many ways similar to the ordeals
suffered by lead actresses during production of Hitchcock's
films.
The actress who was subjected to such makeover for the
purposes of this film was Kim Novak, one of numerous blonde
sex symbols of 1950s Hollywood whose reputation led many
critics to disregard her genuine acting talent and give all
credit for the success of her role to Hitchcock himself. Kim
Novak played the difficult dual role of Madeleine/Judy with
great success, and it is understandably the best acting
performance of her career, achievement that couldn't be
possible without some true talent. In most likelihood,
critics and film scholars were discouraged from praising her
achievement for the same reason why general audience
wouldn't like this film - her characters are equally dark
and dysfunctional as male protagonist. At first we are
introduced to the woman who is slowly but inevitably
succumbing to self- destructive madness only to see her
reincarnation in seemingly ordinary woman who repeats the
same process. But the most sinister revelation of her
character happens in the end of the film, when Judy not only
voluntarily puts herself through utmost humiliation of
abusive relationship, but also hints that she went through
this before. This depiction of female protagonist as passive
and powerless toy in the hands of morally or sexually
aberrant men is probably the reason why modern-day feminists
shouldn't be too enthusiastic about Novak or Hitchcock.
Some critics tend to claim that VERTIGO can't be masterpiece
because of various plot holes and implausibilties. Those
nit-picks, however, usually point to main characters doing
things or acting in a way normal and ordinary people would
not. But the main characters are already marked as
dysfunctional and nearly psychotic. Because of that they are
more interesting than the supporting, more "normal"
characters, and, consequently, supporting actors are
shadowed by great performances by Stewart and Novak. One of
the exceptions are Barbara Bell Geddes as Marjorie "Midge"
Wood, charming but nerdish friend and ex-fiance of Scottie,
who would provide the only traces of comic relief in this
grim tale. Another is Henry Jones as coroner whose harsh but
nevertheless correct depiction of Scottie's mental state
make him some kind of Greek chorus. While drafting a
villain, Hitchcock again threw away his formula about bad
guys being more interested than protagonists. Gavin Elster
might be manipulative and ruthless bastard, but his
psychology is too normal for Hitchcock; as a result, Tom
Helmore doesn't have to work hard playing him and,
furthermore, Hitchcock simply dumps that character half way
during the him and, in doing so, breaks Hollywood rules
about villains getting away with their crimes.
The acting alone, however, isn't the only reason why VERTIGO
should be considered a masterpiece. Again, like in many
other occasions, Hitchcock showed his great talent of superb
filmmaker, always ready to employ new filming techniques and
create memorable scenes and images. In case of VERTIGO
Hitchcock uses splendid photography by Robert Burke and the
camera rarely leaves the protagonist, which gives a plenty
opportunity for Hitchcock to employ various techniques with
lenses, different lighting (and even some animation during
dream sequences) in order to present the protagonist's
twisted state of mind. San Francisco locations and memorable
music by Bernard Herrmann creates specific, almost surreal
atmosphere of the film - another reason why VERTIGO is
considered one of the everlasting Hitchcockian masterpieces.
Review written on September 22nd 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Samouraď, Le (1967)
Recent flood of serial killer films from Hollywood might
tell otherwise, but the most fascinating category of movie
criminals is the professional assassins. This becomes
evident when the said assassins are the movie protagonists.
Filmmakers are often struggling to reconcile the morally
objectionable nature of the said profession - taking of
human lives in cold blood - and the almost mystical skills
that allow the assassins to remain professionals in the
first place. So, it's not very surprising that many films
end up mystifying and glamorising this immoral trade,
turning the hitmen as the incarnation of the "cool". For
some, 1980s Hong Kong action films started the trend, but
their inspiration came in the form of a film from another
time and another place - LE SAMOURAI, 1967 ultra-stylish
crime drama by great French director Jean-Pierre Melville.
The protagonist of the film is Jef Costello (played by Alain
Delon), hitman who is hired to kill Parisian nightclub
owner. Jef has never been caught, and this is due to his
methodical approach to the job - the contracts are always
arranged through intermediaries, the weapons and means of
transportation are always disposable, the hits are
well-planned while his girlfriend Jane Lagrange (played by
Nathalie Delon, Alain Delon's wife at the time) and couple
of underworld associates always provide nearly perfect
alibis. The plan unfolds almost flawlessly, except in the
moment when the lady pianist (played by Cathy Rosier)
happens to spot Jef immediately after the murder. Jef is
afterwards picked by the police among dozens of potential
suspects and quickly becomes the focus of attention of the
Police Superintendent (played by Franois Prier). The
pianist, however, for some strange reason fails to recognise
Jef and he gets released, only to become the target of the
assassination attempt himself. Jef, realising that the
people who ordered the hit are restless and want to silence
him, wants to find them and the pianist seem to be the key
to the mystery. In the meantime, he must evade police,
determined to find any excuse to put him back to jail.
At first glance, LE SAMOURAI looks like a film that in many
ways glamorises the profession of contract killer. Young and
charismatic Alain Delon with his fedora and overcoat looks a
predecessor of Chow Yun-Fat and other "cool" hitmen we have
seen in past few decades. But this impression is only
superficial. All those who allow themselves to be drawn in
the world of LE SAMOURAI would find that the film shows the
other side of the coin. The nature of the profession, with
the constant risk of capture by police or betrayal by
criminal associates, leads to distrust and constant
paranoia, and, in the end, the said individuals might look
glamorous, but inside they are lonely, emotionally crippled
and unhappy. All that can fill this emptiness is the job
itself, and the missing emotional links to other humans are
compensated with the perverted professional code, in some
way similar to Bushido (which Melville deliberately
misquotes in the opening scene of the film). This impression
could be read through the face of Alain Delon who never
smiles thought the whole course of the film, and whose stone
face hardly displays any emotion at all. The cold, grey
interior sets of his character's home, as well as rain and
cloudy sky over Paris creates the atmosphere that enhances
this effect.
Melville, stripped the story to the bone, in a same way he
did it with the title character. The other characters, even
those who are important to the story, are one-dimensional,
but this actually suits the purposes of this ascetic film.
There are few exceptions to this. One is the character of
Police Superintendent (superbly played by Franois Prier),
whose determination to bring Jef down leads him to
occasional emotional outbursts, as well as use of blackmail.
The other is character of Jane Lagrange, who allows herself
some genuine feelings for Jef and, consequently, protects
him against her better judgement. Although both of them
hardly display strong emotions under Melville's minimalist
style, those emotions are there, providing strong contrast
with Jef and his cold, sad existence.
The direction of the film, however, isn't as perfect as this
movie's almost legendary status would indicate. There are
some memorable scenes - the hit, police line-up, Jef's cat
and mouse game with police detectives in Parisian Metro, and
the great finale - but LE SAMOURAI, while being a truly
great film, is far from masterpiece. The main reason is in
the pace, which is at times unbearably slow, even for those
viewers accustomed to pre-MTV standards. There are some
scenes that seem overlong (especially the one featuring two
police detectives planting listening devices in Jef's
apartment), and because of them LE SAMOURAI sometimes looks
like a cure for insomnia. However, apart from those scenes,
LE SAMOURAI, with great acting, superb settings, simple and
effective story, remains one of the better examples of genre
cinema and it should be recommended even to viewers who
aren't interested in finding sources of John Woo's and
Quentin Tarantino's inspiration.

Title
Review for Groundhog Day (1993)
At first glance, GROUNDHOG DAY looks like a film that
epitomises the worst in today's Hollywood - the lack of
originality and total reliance on "high concept". The plot
is "borrowed" from a short SF story by Richard A. Lupoff,
then turned into TWILIGHT ZONE episodes, short film by
Jonathan Heap and, finally, passable but forgettable TV
thriller by Jack Sholder. But this 1993 comedy, directed by
 noted SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE comedian Harold Ramis is
actually something very rare in today's Hollywood - a film
that is in the same time very funny and very humane,
thought-provoking yet entertaining. Because of that the
authors of GROUNDHOG DAY should be forgiven for their use of
not so original idea.
The film begins in Pittsburgh television station, where
weatherman Phil Conners (played by Bill Murray) receives yet
another routine and boring assignment - he must go to small
town of Punxsutawney and cover Groundhog Day, the
traditional event where a local mascot, groundhog named
Phil, indicates the length of remaining winter day. Conners,
self- centred misanthropic, is so disgusted with the task
that he decides to make life miserable for his producer Rita
(played by Andie MacDowell) and cameraman Larry (Chris
Elliott). To make things even worse for him, the unexpected
blizzard grounds the crew in the small town. When he wakes
up the next day, he suddenly realises that the people are
saying the same lines, using the same gestures and that the
same events are happening all over again. He is stuck in the
time loop and he is forced to relive Groundhog Day again and
again for, its seems, all eternity. Stuck in something
resembling personal hell, Phil must find a way to adapt to
the new situation.
Supernatural comedy as a sub-genre more often than not
produced weak, mediocre and formulaic movies in modern
Hollywood. Humour in such comedies was lame, storylines
cliched and predictable, and it usually degenerated into
self-serving special effects bonanza. But, it wasn't the
case with the GROUNDHOG DAY, mostly because the movie had
employed the talents already experienced in such areas. The
director and co-screenwriter Harold Ramis had already proved
himself by writing a screenplay for GHOSTBUSTERS, a similar,
although more spectacular product of that genre. For this
film, he was joined by Danny Rubin and the result was very
intelligent and tight script. The best thing two of them did
was to get rid of any scientific, para-scientific or magical
explanations for the personal time warp - which would
probably look corny and unconvincing. Instead they
concentrated on the practical matters and explored the ways
an average man like Phil would cope with the situation. And
it was done superbly. Movie that covers the same situations
and dialogues over and over again was in great danger of
being repetitive. But the script prevented this - after
being introduced to the main storyline in first, "normal",
segment, we see how even the smallest of details could
branch a whole new and interesting chain of events.
What makes this film especially funny is the great talent of
Bill Murray, one of the best comedians in modern Hollywood.
The entire movie rested on his shoulders. While all other
actors had rather simple roles to repeat, his character was
the only one being the aware the utter repetitiveness of his
existence and thus the only one who was changing through the
entire movie. It was really fine to see the different ways
he reacted to the situation - anger, disbelief, despair and
final acceptance - all that through the subtle gestures or
one-liners. What makes his character even more humane and
likeable, despite his more than obvious flaws, is a fact
that the he is faced with perpetual dilemmas and that he
takes different courses of actions, many of them the same
ones some of us would take in his place. And, finally, we
see him change and change for the better, which, of course
would reward both him and the audience with a happy ending.
The other actors and their performances were, as someone
should expect, shadowed by Bill Murray's role and reduced to
bit parts. Andie MacDowell as his attractive producer Rita
was, of course, good in her role, but the chemistry between
Murray and her wasn't particularly engaging, making their
romantic subplot somewhat too formulaic. And the editing in
this very well directed film should have been better -
Phil's mood change from manic to suicidal seems a little bit
too sudden. But, despite those minor flaws, GROUNDHOG DAY
deserved its reputation of a surprisingly good film,
reputation that gives it a serious potential to be regarded
as 1990s classic by future filmophiles.
Review written on September 19th 1999

Title
Review for Short Cuts (1993)
In my country, TV shows dedicated to seventh art tend to be
named after great or popular films. Our national television
so far had two such shows - one named after A FISTFULL OF
DOLLARS and another named after VERTIGO. Local television in
my home town adopted the same practices - for the past five
or so years, the movie show is named after SHORT CUTS, 1993
drama by Robert Altman. That film perhaps owes such honour
mostly to its "cool" title, but it is nevertheless
considered to be the one of the most important and most
successful films of early 1990s.
The film is based on the short stories by late American
writer Raymond Carver. Script by Altman and Frank Barhydt
changed the scenery from Pacific Northwest and brought it to
Los Angeles where the plot takes place few days before the
earthquake. The film actually lacks the plot in the usual
sense of the word - instead there are nine vignettes in
which we are introduced to few dozen characters. All of
those characters are faced with variety of problems which
are difficult but mundane - couple must deal with a death of
a child, husband has difficulties accepting his wife as
phone sex operator, participants in the fishing expedition
must decide whether to spoil their fun by reporting dead
body to police etc. Those vignettes are connected through
characters from one briefly appearing in another and they
would all end with the earthquake at the end of the film.
One of the most popular descriptions of SHORT CUTS is "the
shortest 3-hour movie in history". This catchphrase, very
popular among 1990s critics, seemed impossible for many of
those who followed Altman's career a decade earlier. Once
one of the most celebrated directors, Altman was practically
exiled from Hollywood in the era of Lucas and Spielberg,
since everyone began thinking about his films as "too
artsy", "hermetic" and incomprehensible to the average
viewer. Altman made a comeback with a style in 1992 and got
even with Hollywood establishment by mercilessly satire in
PLAYER. One year later, Altman finally got his satisfaction
by having one of such "artsy" and "hermetic" films being
lauded as one of the most important American films in 1990s.
SHORT CUTS in many ways resembles NASHVILLE, another
Altman's film populated with myriad of characters and their
stories accidentally intertwined on the same place. However,
this time Altman doesn't want to use satire in order to
expose specific cultural phenomenon (he would do it one year
later in PRET-A-PORTER); his goals are more ambitious and he
wants to expose modern life in all of its horror. He uses
camera as god-like instrument that allows the audience to
have insight into the most private and intimate details of
protagonist's lives, while in the same time he allows
audience powerless to change horrific fates that await some
unfortunate individuals in the film. SHORT CUTS is powerful,
gripping film in which the black humour often intertwines
with tragedy - one of the example is the scene in which a
boy gets hit by a car only to refuse the offer of
guilt-stricken driver to be taken to hospital, justifying
his decision with the most sensible advice given by his
parents. Actually, all the misery in this film comes from
understandable, down-to-earth human frailties as well as
equally down-to- earth and understandable twists of fate.
However, although Altman's masterful hands manage to keep
our attention from the beginning till the end, SHORT CUTS
doesn't deserve all of the praise received by the critics.
Since the material is so diverse, it is natural to expect
that some characters and vignettes would work and some would
not. Among the latter is the love story between alcoholic
Earl (played by Tom Waits) and his long-suffering wife
Doreen (played by Lily Tomlin). Quality of acting also
varies from vignette to vignette and from character to
character. It is interesting to find that the most powerful
performances come from a relatively obscure actor like Lyle
Lovett, while more established actress like Julianne Moore
gets remembered mostly for her willingness to appear
partially nude in front of camera. Another distraction in
SHORT CUTS comes from rather irritating musical soundtrack
by Mark Isham and Gavin Friday, dominated by jazz tunes.
However, although SHORT CUTS had its formula later used by
other, perhaps even more successful and talented filmmakers,
it still provides an interesting viewing experience and
clear demonstration of the talent of a very important
American filmmaker.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for House in the Hills, A (1993)
Sometimes, although very rarely, movies can unintentionally
serve as some form of autobiography for actors. A HOUSE IN
THE HILLS, 1993 low-budget thriller by Ken Wiederhorn is one
of such examples. The protagonist is played by Helen Slater,
actress who used to enjoy some peak of her career in late
1980s and early 1990s, although she didn't get the roles she
had truly deserved. This film, unfortunately very obscure,
is one of those rare examples that truly illustrate her
talent, unused by Hollywood.
In the film, Helen Slater plays Alex Walker, struggling
Hollywood actress who wants to make her big break in the
soap operas. But, until that big break happens, she is
forced to take many job offers, including house sitting for
one of Los Angeles millionaires. In an empty house she gets
a wild idea to put her acting abilities to the test by
impersonating the millionaire's wife. However, that idea
turns out to be bad when the exterminator (Michael Madsen)
knocks at the door. After coning his way in, exterminator
takes Alex as hostage and reveals himself as an ex con. Alex
is suddenly found herself in dangerous situation, but
surprises continue to happen.
Screenplay by Miguel Tejada-Flores and Ken Wiederhorn is
hardly a masterpiece, but the sheer quantity of unusual, yet
believable plot twists is enough to keep audience at the
edge of a seat. The ending is also rather unconventional and
makes this film really refreshing in a multitude of more
formulaic low budget thrillers. Most notable assets in A
HOUSE IN THE HILLS are the actors. Helen Slater literally
carries this film on her shoulders, providing us with
charming yet believable character. And, of course, in one
scene she actually reveals the reasons of her not so
spectacular career advancement in Hollywood. Her partner
Michael Madsen is reliable in his role of quiet, and
charismatic thug with the heart of gold, and Slater and him
have a great chemistry together. On the other hand, some of
the minor characters aren't that effective (Jeffrey Tambore
overacts in his episode). But this is the hardly reason
enough for the audience to avoid this charming little, yet
unjustifiably forgotten B-grade gem.

Title
Review for Blue Thunder (1983)
Less than a week ago Pope visited my town, and such,
once-in-a-decade, event caused a lot of commotion among its
citizens. Traffic was stopped, all the city services were in
the state of emergency, and many aspects of everyday life
weren't there any more. But, those were just a annoyances
compared with the huge security operation that lasted weeks
and months before the event. Both regular and secret police
was conducting door-to-door searches of all the apartments
and houses on the Pope's route; those who hadn't been
visited by police had to endure endless sounds of
helicopters flying over their heads and peeping into their
homes in search of imaginary terrorists and assassins.
Probably the very same thing happened in Los Angeles in the
eve of 1984 Olympic Games. Fears of all-powerful and
all-controlling government corresponded with the Year of
Orwell, and movie producers in Los Angeles were affected by
it just like any other citizens. Their paranoia actually
inspired them to make a techno-thriller BLUE THUNDER, now
almost forgotten, but in its time regarded as one of the
best action movies of all times.
The movie's hero is Frank Murphy (Roy Scheider), helicopter
pilot in Los Angeles Police Department, who does his job of
flying policeman very well, despite the traumas he suffered
in Vietnam. After being united with rookie pilot Lymangood
(Daniel Stern), he must test the new prototype of next
generation police helicopter - Blue Thunder. The machine is
equipped with automatic cannons, armour, ultra- sensitive
microphones and cameras, and with its silent engines can
sneak into any part of the city almost unnoticed and wreak
havoc or spy the unsuspecting inhabitants. Such powerful
helicopter is to be used as part of security for the
Olympics, or so the Federal people, led by Colonel Cochrane
(Malcolm McDowell), his Vietnam nemesis, say to suspicious
Murphy. But after he finds evidence that connects urban
riots and the death of city official with the Blue Thunder
project, his life is in danger. In order to save himself and
warn the public, Murphy steals Blue Thunder and instantly
becomes the target of spectacular manhunt by police and
military.
One of the things that makes this movie so different from
other contemporary action hits is its leftist
anti-government agenda, which is in huge contrast with
neoconservative American jingoism, so strong in Hollywood
during the Reagan years. Instead of being the celebration of
new military and police technology, BLUE THUNDER clearly
warns the people of its possible abuses (even in the first
shot, when the caption says that the "technology depicted in
this film is real and in use in USA today"). Some of those
abuses might be quite harmless - like the crew of police
helicopters that peep into bedrooms of beautiful women, but
it also can become quite frightening, like a recorded case
of adultery. From those small abuses it takes the really
small step to the huge conspiracy that would bring mayhem to
unsuspecting public and throw them into the jaws of
omnipotent police state. Those who want to control the
masses from the air don't even need technological
superwonders like Blue Thunder; regular helicopters are
enough to make life miserable for any opposition in the
ground.
Unfortunately, very good screenplay by talented Dan O'Bannon
uses this dark overtones of 1970s political paranoia only in
the first half. The carefully paced development of the plot
serves only as an overture before the grand finale, when the
politically conscious writer gives reign to action-oriented
director. The ominous machine in the hands of the powerful
conspirators is introduced in a shot that presents it as a
threatening monster; however, when our protagonist gets a
hand to it, it becomes a weapon of a superhero. The director
John Badham, whose filmography shows that he can make
masterpieces when given a good script (unfortunately, that
didn't happen in more than a decade), is using the second
part to make one of the most effective and impressive action
scene in the last two decades of Hollywood movies. With the
elements of chase and dogfight, and very cleverly done
special effects (something very hard to imagine in today's
computer- generated era) he uses the superb editing of the
reactions bellow to give some pseudo-documentary feel to
this action fantasy. He is so effective in it, that the
viewer forgets to ask the simple questions, like "how can
thousands of explosive rounds and numerous missiles can be
fired in the middle of crowded city without single civilian
casualty". However, suspension of disbelief is somewhat
over- stretched in the last scene, when the highly
implausible final dogfight between Cochrane and Murphy
serves only to finish the story with the clich more
appropriate for Playstation action games than serious movie.
Despite the silliness at the end, BLUE THUNDER as a whole is
a exceptional piece of good Hollywood cinema. The actors are
superb - Roy Scheider is very believable as a reluctant hero
who works well despite the stress and war traumas. Daniel
Stern looks charming as a boyish sidekick, so different from
the psychos he played in the later parts of his career. Such
role is, on the other hand, somewhat overplayed by usually
creepy Malcolm McDowell, who didn't even bother to get rid
of the English accent (it was easier to write his English
background in the story than to hire a dialogue coach).
Other supporting actors are good, especially Warren Oates in
his last role as Scheider's sympathetic boss. The electronic
music of Arthur B. Rubinstein, with its enchanting yet
menacing theme, works very well in order to enhance the
movie's gloomy atmosphere. All in all, BLUE THUNDER is a
movie that should be both the real inspiration for the
makers of future action cinema and the warning to all those
who forget how helpless the individual can be against the
government.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
According to many critics and movie aficionados, Dean Devlin
and Roland Emmerich are the worst thing that happened to
science fiction cinema in 1990s. This widespread animosity
towards Devlin-Emmerich duo can be partially explained with
the quality of their work in the past decade. However, the
real reason for such animosity lies less in the quality of
their movies and more in the massive hype that preceded them
and ensured huge disappointments among their future
audience. Taken by their own merit and without hype, those
films can be seen not only as passable, but also sometimes a
very good entertainment. One of such examples is STARGATE,
1994 science fiction spectacle by Roland Emmerich, often
heralded "the best science fiction film since STAR WARS".
The plot of this film begins in Egypt 1928 when the group of
Norwegian archaeologists digs out huge stone artefact with
strange, indecipherable hieroglyphs. Many decades later, the
artefact is in possession of US Air Force. Dr. Daniel
Jackson (played by James Spader), young and unconventional
Egyptologist, is called to decipher those hieroglyphs. To
the utter surprise of everybody, he manages to decipher
those symbols and finds that the artefact represents
Stargate - trandimensional portal that leads to distant
planet millions of light years away. US Air Force quickly
assembles expedition led by Colonel Jonathan "Jack" O'Neill
(played by Kurt Russell). This expedition enters Stargate
and finds itself on the desert world, populated by primitive
people that resemble ancient Egyptians and are ruled by god-
likes aliens led by evil Ra (played by Jaye Davidson).
All those who succumbed to hype in 1994 and expected another
masterpiece like 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY have all the reasons
to feel disappointed. STARGATE could hardly be seen as an
example of creative geniuses at work. Director Emmerich and
Dean Devlin (who co-wrote the script) had wonderful idea, as
well as huge budget and numerous talents at their disposal.
Despite all of that the best they could do was space opera
filled with every possible cliche (including alien world
modelled on Earth's deserts, something which is more
expected in SF films with much lower budget) and numerous
plot holes. However, all those flaws can be forgiven for one
reason - unlike almost all the other SF films in 1990s,
STARGATE can induce the sense of wonder among the audience.
First part of the film manages to arouse viewers' curiosity
with the promises of strange new worlds on the Other Side.
Unlike most of the other science fiction films that use
genre only as an excuse to make standard horrors, dramas or
action films, STARGATE returns to the roots of science
fiction - pure adventure and tales of wondrous lost cities,
civilisations and continents. Resurrection of this more
innocent, almost infantile yet purer approach to the science
fiction is probably the most important legacy of STARGATE.
Lack of Devlin's and Emmerich's script-writing talents was
fortunately compensated with the talents among cast and
crew. James Spader is great as Lennon-like scientist, while
Russell makes represents great contrast to him as
no-nonsense military professional. Jaye Davidson, on the
other hand, wasn't very convincing as evil alien, although
he tried very hard to avoid typecasting after his memorable
CRYING GAME role. Production design, costumes and special
effects are superb and they all make the alien world very
convincing. Musical soundtrack by David Arnold is very good
and it features one of the rare 1990s film themes that
managed to stick in popular memory.
Finally, STARGATE had flaws yet it managed to overcome them
by being reincarnated in another medium. Being the basis for
awarded television series is just another reason why this
film shouldn't have the same reputation as its unjustifiably
criticised creators.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for On Deadly Ground (1994)
There are many mysteries in life. The author of this review
is constantly amazed with the fact that he actually likes
Steven Seagal and his films. It's not because Seagal shows
some great acting skills, nor the quality of those films in
general. Seagal in all of his roles simply radiates the aura
of the man who honestly believes in what he is doing. Such
conviction is the virtue I admire, so, more often than not,
I'm ready to be biased and give Seagal benefit of the doubt.
That happened even in the case of ON DEADLY GROUND, 1994
directorial debut of Seagal, film that was one of the most
despised motion pictures, not just among Steven Seagal's
works, but also in entire movie history.
Plot revolves around Forrest Taft (played by Seagal), expert
fireman who works for Aegis Oil Company, whose corrupt CEO
Jennings (Michael Caine) wants to put into operation oil rig
right in the middle of Inuit tribal land in Alaska. Taft's
friend Hugh Palmer (Richard Hamilton) discovers the evidence
that the oil rig would permanently damage Alaskan
environment, so Jennings orders his killing. Taft is to
suffer the same fate, but instead, he is rescued by Eskimo
woman named Masu (Joan Chen) who gives him shelter in her
father's village. After brief recovery, Taft returns to oil
rig in order to stop Jennings' plans.
Seagal can't act to save his life, but in the hands of even
less capable directors, his charisma and martial arts skills
are enough to overcome such obstacles. Unfortunately, with
Seagal as director there was nobody else to compensate his
obvious lack of talents. The story of ON DEADLY GROUND is
third-grade, in-your-face exercise of "political
correctness" risen to unbearable levels. Seagal's lack of
directorial skills only underlines weakness of the script
with one-dimensional characters and total lack of subtlety.
The lack of Seagal's talent is matched with the lack of
acting ability or inspiration by almost anybody else.
Michael Caine is almost laughable as vicious yet totally
un-charismatic villain, same as Joan Chen who sleepwalks
through her role. Action scenes are fine, but Seagal could
learn a couple things about editing. Of course, it would
unfair to say that film doesn't have few good sides. Alaskan
locations are good to see, Basil Poledouris made nice score,
and the bar brawl scene seems almost surrealistically
unusual. And in the end we have that (in)famous five minute
scene of Forrest Taft holding sermon about ecology,
environment, energy resources and corporate greed. Fact that
Seagal originally wanted the sermon to last fifteen minutes
shows that he still believed in what he was doing and that
he had good intention. But, the end result is still
unwatchable and we are at end only reminded of that old
saying about hell and good intentions.

Title
Review for Loaded Weapon 1 (1993)
These days, people have rather short attention span and
hardly anything can satisfy them for the long run. 1970s
nostalgia is already wearing off, and now, people are
becoming more and more interested in 1980s. Few years in the
future, early 1990s are going to be regarded as next Golden
Age of nostalgia. However, I doubt that people are going to
be very nostalgic about the Hollywood products of that
period. One of the reason would surely be films like
NATIONAL LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON 1, that, in many ways,
symbolise the biggest problem of contemporary American film
industry - lack of originality and ideas.
Being made as some kind of parody on LETHAL WEAPON series,
this film pairs two L.A. policemen - Jack Colt (Emilio
Estevez), burn-out alcoholic cop on the edge, and Wes Luger
(Samuel L. Jackson), by-the-book policeman, days away from
retirement. Two of them, following the murder of Luger's ex-
partner, must confront evil General Mortars (William
Shatner), crime lord who is going to flood the market with
cocaine stashed in Wilderness Girl cookies.
The authors of this films (whose director, Gene Quintano,
worked on such projects like third and fourth sequel of
POLICE ACADEMY) lacked any original idea before they
undertook the projects, and that reflects in the lack plot,
characters, and, even original lines. The plot, or what goes
for the plot in this movie, is nothing more than a series of
gags that make laugh of some popular films made in previous
few years (apart from LETHAL WEAPON series, this film
"borrows" its female lead from BASIC INSTINCT). The best
gags, are, same as with many other similar movies, shown in
the trailers. The rest simply doesn't work. Only those who
used to watch a lot of Hollywood products in that period
would laugh. Others would probably wince at the lameness of
humour. Some would be entertained by celebrity cameos that
pop up every once in a while. But, at the end, spending hour
and half in front of this disorganised mess of a movie is
simply not worth the effort.
The film was sometimes criticised for being the parody of a
series that already had strong comic overtones. The authors
of LETHAL WEAPON returned the favour by using the LOADED
WEAPON 1 joke in their fourth sequel.

Title
Review for Terminator, The (1984)
Science fiction fans are seldom satisfied with the way their
favourite genre is used in films, especially those produced
in Hollywood. More often than not filmmakers totally forget
the meaning of "science" in the term "science fiction", and
such films ignore basic scientific facts, as well as
elementary logic. This is especially the case with time
travel films. Screenwriters of such films are more than
eager to embrace the concept of time travel (which is rather
controversial in the realm of established science), but they
seldom pay attention to some mind-boggling issues associated
with it, like Grandfather Paradox. Fortunately, there are
few filmmakers ready to approach time travel with these
problems in mind. One of them was young Canadian director
James Cameron. In 1984 he co-wrote and directed THE
TEMINATOR, low-budget science fiction film that would launch
one of the most spectacular careers in modern Hollywood and
also become one of the most influential films of its time.
Script for THE TERMINATOR, written by Cameron and his
producer Gale Anne Hurd, was based on the original
screenplay by Harlan Ellison (fact established after serious
litigation). The plot begins in Los Angeles 2029 AD. The
world was ravaged by nuclear holocaust and the surviving
humans are fighting desperate war against sentient machines.
>From this world two time travellers arrive to Los Angeles in
1984. The first one is Terminator (played by Arnold
Schwarzenegger), human looking but deadly and seemingly
indestructible cyborg. His mission is to kill Sarah Connor
(played by Linda Hamilton), future mother of John Connor,
charismatic leader of human resistance. Another time
traveller is Kyle Reese (played by Michael Biehn), Connor's
soldier from the future, and his mission is to protect the
mother of his commander. When he finds Sarah Connor, she
doesn't believe his story, but all her suspicions are swept
away when the unstoppable, remorseless and invulnerable
killer starts chasing them across streets of Los Angeles.
Today most people think of James Cameron as Hollywood's
greatest and most successful megalomaniac whose trademark is
big budget of his movies. In 1984 the budget for his
groundbreaking film was quite low, even for the standards of
the time. However, even in such conditions, Cameron's talent
of superb filmmaker became more than evident. Few filmmakers
are able to achieve things Cameron had done with THE
TERMINATOR - to create successful combination of interesting
and thought-provoking science fiction, powerful human drama
and action-packed thrillride.
Unlike most of the other time travel movies, THE TERMINATOR
takes time travel quite seriously and the Grandfather
Paradox here builds the plot instead of destroying its
plausibility. In this film the future is set and the
characters are aware than that they can't escape it; instead
of trying to change their destiny, they fight to preserve
it, no matter how ugly and depressing it might be in the
end. The atmosphere of impending doom could be sensed
throughout the film. Cameron, obviously inspired by the
heightened Cold War tensions of Reagan years, and worried
about possibility of sophisticated and automated weapons
systems running out of control, uses these fears to build
the vision of future apocalypse, which is even more
frightening, because it shares many elements with the world
of 1984. Low budget, which forced Cameron to shoot this film
at night and in the back alleys of Los Angeles, actually
helps this film. In this dark, cold and unforgiving world of
1984 Los Angeles we could see glimpses of 2029 - bums in the
street, which are not very different from the surviving
post-holocaust humans, or robot factories that probably use
the same technology of future killing machines. This was
good opportunity for Cameron to establish his trademark -
ambivalent portrayal of technology. While he obviously
admires efficiency of machines and their obvious superiority
over frail humans, Cameron in this film also shows
frightening consequences of technology running amok and
turning their former human masters into slaves.
Thing that separates THE TERMINATOR from most of the other
science fiction films is not just technical superiority or
intelligent message. Cameron also brings very strong human
dimension to this film. Characters in this film aren't
cardboard or stereotypical - in relatively short amounts of
time, before the action sets in, we meet them as
three-dimensional, convincing human being and later we
sympathise with their plight. This is the technique that
would serve Cameron very well in his later films like ALIENS
or THE ABYSS. For that he had to rely on very good actors.
Although the first actor associated with this film happens
to be Arnold Schwarzenegger, his non-human character of
Terminator is convincing more because of his frightening
physical appearance. Schwarzenegger's one-liners (including
his trademark phrase "I'll be back"), spoken in robotic
monotone and with heavy Austrian accent, didn't require much
of the acting ability. On the other hand, such ability was
perfectly demonstrated by two other leads. Linda Hamilton
was excellent choice for the role of Sarah Connor; not very
attractive in a physical sense, she is quite convincing as
an average woman caught in nightmarish situation. Her slow
evolution from clueless and helpless damsel in distress to
tough feminist role model in wonderful to watch. Michael
Biehn, one of the most underused actors of modern Hollywood,
is also great as her heroic and vulnerable partner; the
audience can sense the pain and anguish on his troubled
face. Finally, Cameron relies on the services of very
capable character actors Lance Henriksen and Paul Winfield
as police detectives; their roles as voices of reason and
"normalcy" actually are the closest equivalent of comic
relief in this grim tale.
Engaging story, superb acting and moviemaking craftsmanship
- all that ensured that THE TERMINATOR remains as one of the
best films of 1980s. Unfortunately, the reputation of this
film was later influenced by its more expensive, more
spectacular, better-hyped but ultimately inferior 1991
sequel. Compared with it, THE TERMINATOR looks rather cheap,
at first glance almost indistinguishable from the hundreds
of its own C-grade rip-offs made in late 1980s. Person that
could be responsible for such impression is Brad Fiedel,
author of musical score, which is hardly impressive except
the main theme. This unimpressive musical score, however, is
hardly the reason to view THE TERMINATOR as less than
excellent piece of science fiction cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Entangled (1993)
In the series of the erotic thrillers that flooded the
videoshelves in the early 1990s came this French-Canadian
co-production by Max Fischer. The movie is set in Paris
where its hero, struggling American author David Mirkine
(Judd Nelson, at the time specialised in playing losers and
people at the edge of sanity) suffers a terrible writers
bloc. He manages to overcome crisis after beginning romantic
relationship with beautiful model Anabelle (Laurence
Treill). Unfortunately, she hangs out in jet set circles,
which gradually makes Mirkine pathologically jealous. Her
connection with powerful David Caravan (Pierce Brosnan)
would make Mirkine step the line between reason and sanity
and put in motion whole series of violent and tragic events.
Although few pseudoerotic scenes and some elements of the
plot do indeed make this film an erotic thriller, drama
would probably be more appropriate genre label. Pacing of
the film is simply too slow to thrill the viewers, and those
patient enough to sit through its entirety have to wait a
long time between any interesting or significant
developments. Low budget also becomes painfully visible, and
physical attributes of Laurence Treill are the only thing
worth watching in this film. Unfortunately, this film has
too little of those supposedly erotic scenes, so those who
wanted to watch erotic thriller have all the reasons to feel
disappointed. Instead, they would have to settle with
pointless, slow scenes involving Nelson, Brosnan and
Laurence Treill's attempts of serious acting. All of those
definitely not worth spending hour and half of someone's
precious time.

Title
Review for Per un pugno di dollari (1964)
Long time ago, I was in a used book store and stumbled upon
a scholarly book about westerns. The book covered all major
westerns up to 1975, but the chapter I had been interested
in was conspicuously short. The author gave only a lip
service to "spaghetti westerns", considering them to be
nothing more than the travesty of the genre. Validity of
such notion might be debatable, but not for the critics in
late 1960s and early 1970s, who had been seeing that genre
with the same snobbish disdain as blaxploitation or kung fu
movies. However, there was one director who had managed to
give "spaghetti westerns" good name. Sergio Leone is one of
the greatest and most influential Italian directors and his
films often considered to be masterpieces. That was
especially the case with three of his films known as Man
With No Name trilogy, which brought subgenre of "spaghetti
westerns" to the perfection. However, every beginning was
hard and FISTFUL OF DOLLARS, made in 1964, is a proof for
that.
Leone was often accused of not being too original in his
first major film. Plot of FISTFULL OF DOLLARS looks very
much like the one used in YOJIMBO, 1960 samurai classic by
Akira Kurosawa. However, even Kurosawa found his inspiration
elsewhere, and Dashiel Hammett's 1931 novel RED HARVEST is
often credited as the first one to use the same plot. Some
of the latter critics, on the other hand, claimed that Leone
found his inspiration in 18th century comic stage play by
Italian author Carlo Goldoni.
In any way, original or not, plot of this film begins when
Joe (played by Clint Eastwood), mysterious poncho-wearing
and mule-riding stranger, comes to San Miguel, small Mexican
town on US border. The town seems dead, and the reason for
that is soon revealed in the conversation with local
bartender (played by Joseph Egger). Town is ruled by two
gangs - Rojos brothers, liquor smugglers led by vicious
Ramon (played by Gian Maria Volonte) and Baxters, arms
smugglers nominally led by sheriff John Baxter (played by
Wolfgang Lukschy) and really by his wife Consuelo (played by
Margarita Lozano). Those two gangs are fighting for the
control, and the town is full of hired guns and killings
became part of every day life. Joe, being fast on the
trigger, sees that as an opportunity. He offers his
gunslinging services to both clans, switches sides and then
manipulates them into shootouts, earning lots of money in
the process.
FISTFUL OF DOLLARS, being the first Leone's spaghetti
western, is, naturally, inferior to his latter classical
works like THE GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY. The cheap budget
is much visible, script seems rather unpolished and full of
some interesting plot holes (town on Mexican side of the
border having the sheriff is one of them). The acting at
times, especially during the ultra-sentimentalist scenes in
Marisol subplot, is plain terrible. The ending is weak,
sacrificing believability for the sake of the neat little
happy end.
On the other hand, even at his worst, Leone shows his
immense talent. Pacing is brilliant, scenes excellently shot
and his trademark of extreme close-up used with great
success. Black humour is also present in this film. And, of
course, Leone used services of great Ennio Morricone, one of
the best and most prolific music composers in the history of
cinema. Leone has, as he would do in all of his latter
films, used Morricone's score as the basis for his scenes,
and not the other way around. Morricone (billed as Dan Savio
on the credits) was here in his prime, using some of the
motives that would be enhanced and even more effective in
FOR A FEW DOLLARS MORE and THE GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY.
Apart from Leone, this film was important for another great
talent. Clint Eastwood had already became famous in
TV-series RAWHIDE, but the role of The Man With No Name
(although actually named in this film) was the one that
launched him to orbit. Eastwood here plays one of the first
great antiheroes of cinema - tough, cynical and utterly
materialistic man who doesn't have any problems with money
through bloodshed. The audience roots for him not for the
sake of his moral superiority, but simply because he happens
to be much smarter and more successful than others. On the
other hand, Leone's script shows that under the mask of
cynicism lies kind human heart; Joe doesn't want to do the
right thing not because he is bad; he is pragmatic because
he knows better. And when actually does the right thing, he
suffers because of it.
Eastwood was the only major American actor in this film, but
that didn't prevent him for being partner with truly
talented actors. Gian Maria Volonte (billed as Johnny Wels)
is impressive as villain, and he would improve his villainy
in next Leone's film. This film also features whole bunch of
actors whose faces are more than familiar to the fans of
Leone's spaghetti westerns.
FISTFUL OF DOLLARS is definitely pale in comparison to other
films by Sergio Leone, but even such imperfect and inferior
example of that master's work should be recommended as very
entertaining film, even for those who are familiar with his
masterpieces.

Title
Review for Guns of Navarone, The (1961)
World War Two seems to be the only major world conflict
resembling an average Hollywood movie - dividing line
between Good Guys and Bad Guys is more or less, clearly
defined and final victory of the Good Guys provides happy
ending, at least for the majority of audience. So, it isn't
surprising that in the following decades WW2 became
inspiration for many action-oriented pieces of popular
culture - novels, comic books and movies. In the literary
domain Alistar MacLean contributed to the trend with the
series of novels about small bands of Allied agents or
commandos wreaking havoc behind enemy lines. Combination of
complicated plots and constant breath-taking action proved
to be quite attractive for movie producers, so in 1960s some
of those novels were adapted into spectacular and very
popular action films. The most popular and influential of
them all was THE GUNS OF NAVARONE, directed in 1961 by J.
Lee Thompson.
Plot of the film begins in Autumn 1943. Following the
capitulation of Italy and mass surrender of Italian
garrisons scattered all over occupied Balkans, British
forces seized the opportunity and rushed to seize many Greek
islands in Aegean Sea. This attempt to regain foothold on
Balkans was short-lived, because Germans reacted more
rapidly by sending even more forces in the area and bringing
small British garrisons into strategically untenable
situation. The situation is especially grim for 2,000 men at
island of Kheros, who can't be evacuated by sea because the
only escape route is controlled by two huge German naval
guns stationed on the nearby island of Navarone. Attempts to
silence the guns from the air failed, and less than a week
before final German assault, British command is left only
with one, desperate alternative. Small group of British and
Greek commandos, led by Major Franklin (played by Anthony
Quayle) is sent to land on the island, contact the local
partisans and, using their help, sabotage the guns before
the evacuation convoy gets near Kheros. When their mission
gets underway, commandos are faced with many unexpected
difficulties and Captain Mallory (played by Gregory Peck),
who had replaced injured Franklin, begins suspecting
possible traitor among his comrades.
The script for THE GUNS OF NAVARONE was written by Carl
Foreman, one of the most talented Hollywood screenwriters of
1950s, whose previous credits included HIGH NOON. He
remained uncredited for his last major film, WW2 drama THE
BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI, due to studio blacklisting and
alleged Communist beliefs. THE GUNS OF NAVARONE was
Foreman's first major project with his real name back on the
credits (and the way he saw his alleged fling with Communism
could be seen in character of C.P.O. Brown, disillusioned
veteran of Spanish Civil War, played by Stanley Baker).
Foreman adapted MacLean's novel, probably intrigued with
opportunity to explore the humanity in war - theme he had
used with so much success in KWAI.
Unfortunately, this time direction wasn't in the hands of
first class filmmaker like David Lean, but J. Lee Thompson,
director whose overall career was hardly stellar. Thompson
was less interested in serious subjects and character
exploration and instead paid attention only to numerous
action scenes. Those scenes are truly spectacular, using
both the Shepperton studios and exotic island locations of
Rhodes, as well as manpower and equipment of Greek and
British military. In some cases, special effects are
top-notch and can impress even after almost four decades
(like in the scene describing commando team landing on the
island). But, generally speaking, attraction of these scenes
lies in quantity, not quality - THE GUNS OF NAVARONE simply
features more explosions, more shootouts and bigger
bodycount than in any contemporary action movie. Characters
somehow got lost in all that mayhem and, despite being
played by excellent actors, they hardly stay in viewer's
memory, since their motivations and subplots mostly get only
hinted and never properly explored, despite film having more
than two and half hours of length. Anthony Quayle, whose
real life WW2 adventures actually resembled those of his
character, is the only exception as physically and
psychologically injured leader of the team.
THE GUNS OF NAVARONE, although inferior as serious WW2
drama, could still be enjoyed as entertaining, exciting
action film with appeal that didn't fade through time. Its
reputation, on the other hand, owes much more to the more
talented film makers who later used THE GUNS OF NAVARONE as
an inspiration for much better examples of the genre.
(Historical note: Islands of Kheros and Navarone are
fictious, as well as the events described in the movie. The
real events that inspired them, however, turned quite
differently for the British. In November 1943 British island
garrisons in Aegean Sea were overran in combined operation
by Wehrmacht, Kriegsmarine and Luftwaffe. British attempt to
evacuate their stranded forces turned into disaster -
British navy suffered huge losses and most of the men in the
garrisons surrendered to Germans.)
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom (1984)
Time can be very unkind to movies. In first few months and
years after the premiere, a movie might make record profits
at the box-office, earn multitudes of "Oscars" and generally
be regarded as one of the greatest contemporary films. But,
only after few years that same film gets utterly forgotten,
and future film scholars have a lot of trouble in explaining
its initial success. 1980s blockbusters seem to be very good
illustration of this phenomenon, and not even George Lucas
and Steven Spielberg, those two symbols of blockbuster
success, could save their films from such fate. INDIANA
JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM, their second instalment in
very popular adventure film trilogy, directed by Steven
Spielberg in 1984, is a good example - a very popular and
critically hailed film in its time, and now virtually
despised by contemporary critics, misunderstood by the
contemporary audience and practically disowned by their own
creators.
INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM is product of its era,
albeit somewhat unusual one. When screenwriter and producer
George Lucas begun working on the follow-up to his classic
adventure masterpiece RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, he decided to
make prequel instead of sequel and set the plot in Shanghai
1935, one year before the events of the first film.
Archaeology professor Indiana Jones (played by Harrison
Ford) has located the remains of the first Manchu emperor
and he comes to luxurious night-club to complete the deal
with local gang boss Lao Che (played by Roy Liao). He is to
receive precious diamond in the exchange for the artefact,
but the deal goes bad and in the ensuing chaos he would have
to settle with clueless bar singer Willie Scott (played by
Kate Capshaw). Pursued by Lao Che's gangsters, they get to
the taxi driven by 9-year old Short Round (played by
Jonathan Ke Quan) who takes them to airport where they all
three would board plane for India. The flight is not the end
of adventure - plane crashes in the Himalaya mountains and
trio, barely escaping death, has to travel to Delhi. On the
way they reach small impoverished Indian village and the
local shaman (played by D.R. Nanayakkara) tells them about
evil Thugee cult whose minions took away the sacred Shankara
stone and all the children. Jones agrees to help them and
the trail lead him to Pankot Palace, place which used to
shelter Thugess many centuries ago but now seems to be ruled
by benevolent child Maharaja (played by Raj Singh) and his
Oxford-educated prime minister Chattar Lal (played by Roshan
Seth). Jones is still suspicious and soon he finds secret
passages that lead to the cave which was recently turned
into temple of goddess Kali and where the evil chief priest
Mola Ram (played by Amrish Puri) wants to gather all the
Shankara stone and thus get the magical power that would
enable him to rule the world.
Like many sequels of its era, INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE
OF DOOM had misfortune of being compared with its
predecessor, and in most of such cases predecessors happened
to be much better. In the case of this film predecessor was
RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, not only the first instalment in
trilogy intended to repeat the success of STAR WARS, but
also an undisputed classic of adventure genre. Lucas and
Spielberg were aware of this and they tried very hard to
make second instalment of the series as different as
possible from the first. They succeeded in that but those
changes weren't necessarily for the better and INDIANA JONES
AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM is almost universally viewed as much
inferior to the first film of the trilogy.
The most palpable change is in the screenplay, this time
written by Wilard Huyk and Gloria Katz. While the first film
had very basic, but still coherent plot, the second one is
nothing more than the series of action sequences and gags
loosely sawn together. Characterisation is even worse,
except in the case of Indiana Jones. His character has been
clearly established in the first part and screenwriters
actually don't need to experiment, but short episode with
his turning to the Dark Side seems refreshing. Harrison Ford
plays him very well, being equally convincing in tuxedo and
his legendary adventurer's outfit. Unfortunately, this is
not the case with his partners. Character of weak, stupid
and utterly useless female partner Willie Scott represents
spectacular departure from the high standards set for
Indiana Jones' girl in the first film. Her constant
complaining, crying and screaming is funny at first but
later gets repetitive and irritating; Kate Capshaw might be
the best actress around but she can't remedy the limits of
her character, which seems insulting to the female gender in
general, despite being modelled as a parody of dumb blonde
and damsel in distress stereotypes in 1930s movies. Bond's
9-year old sidekick Short Round looks much better in
comparison, although his character has opportunities to be
equally irritating. He was probably introduced to the film
in order to make it more attractive to the younger audiences
- those who were basis of Spielberg's commercial success in
1980s.
Unfortunately, Spielberg, in his effort to make this film
appealing to adolescent and pre- adolescent crowds succumbs
to infantilism that plagued many 1980s films. So, one child
among protagonists is not enough and the film must have
villains that use thousands of children for the slave
labour, sacrificing plausibility in the process. Such
infantilism, that plagued many films made in the mid 1980s
(like MAD MAX BEYOND THE THUNDERDOME), is compromised with
the heavy use of realistic violence. If spiders, bugs,
snakes, skeletons and decomposing bodies don't scare the
children in the theatres, people being ripped to pieces and
burned alive, all with appropriate amounts of blood and
gore, definitely would. Even the 1980s MPAA censors were
aware of this, and Spielberg used all his clout to create
compromise PG-13 rating that managed to save at least part
of his core audience. Of course, MPAA censors were, as
usual, more squeamish about sex than violence, so Spielberg
reduced eroticism for couple of weak double entendres,
leaving critics to interpret the Freudian meaning of the
tunnels that play important part in the second part of the
film.
Screenplay was weaker than the previous film, but at least
Spielberg kept his directing skills. From the opening, that
pays homage to 1930s musicals, to the end, movie is series
of excellent scenes. The action is always exciting and
rhythm very fast, never allowing the film the slow down;
which is perhaps a good thing, because characterisation and
plot problems would otherwise become even more obvious.
Photography of Douglas Slocombe creates good atmosphere, and
the production design in Pinewood studios is superb, as well
as Sri Lanka locations (which some of us might recognise
from THE BRIDGE AT THE RIVER KWAI). Special effects are also
very good and still look convincing, despite being made with
pre-CGI technology. Music by John Williams is very good, and
although not being particularly memorable (except in the
ritual scene), serves as perfect illustration for the events
in film.
There is another reason why INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF
DOOM enjoys much worse reputation today than sixteen years
ago. All the villains in the film happen to be non-white,
and even in 1984 British satirical show SPITTING IMAGE
accused this film for racism in a parody gag called
XENOPHOBIA JONES. We could only imagine how would PC police
of contemporary Hollywood react to the similar script today.
Because of that, INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM seems
quite refreshing compared with contemporary action and
adventure films. Spielberg is also one of the rare Hollywood
filmmakers who defies stereotypical negative portrayal of
the British Empire in historical films. This film not only
features British colonial troops in the role reserved for US
Cavalry in early westerns, but also references certain good
things the Empire did for its subjects.
All in all, INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM is deeply
flawed film that didn't age quite well, but most of those
flaws are well hidden by Spielberg's mastery. From our
perspective it is still a very good piece of Hollywood
entertainment, much superior to the more recent examples of
same genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Fatale (1992)
In the early 1990s, following the surprise success of BASIC
INSTINCT, Hollywood launched whole series of films labelled
as "erotic thrillers". Usually, such films were
disappointments - unsatisfying both to the fans of
thrillers, and those who like to be engrossed in erotica.
However, they proved to be modest commercial success, mostly
due to the hype caused with rating controversy. One of the
films that was mistaken for such "erotic thriller" was
DAMAGE, British erotic drama, directed by veteran French
director Louis Malle. This film also had to fight with
American censors, but, when the film actually had hit the
markets, the viewers, expecting another interesting thriller
or fleshfest, turned out to be quite disappointed.
The movie was based on the dark, depressing novel by
Josephine Hart. Its protagonist is Dr. Stephen Fleming
(played by Jeremy Irons), member of the British Parliament
whose life on the surface seems flawless. His family life
looks ideal, his wife Ingrid (Miranda Richardson) loves him,
his two children are grown, and his rising political star
might bring him to the post of Prime Minister. However,
everything shatters when he meets Anna Barton (Juliette
Binoche), beautiful young woman who just happens to be the
girlfriend of his son Martyn (Rupert Graves). After a single
glance, two of them engage in wild, passionate but
clandestine affair. Stephen is aware of the risks, but he
can't control his desires. Same as Anna, despite being
emotionally scared in the tragedy from her past.
Louis Malle made reputation, among other things, by breaking
taboos and making films about forbidden expressions of human
sexuality - like incest or paedophilia. However, unlike some
authors, who went after cheap sensationalism and excuses to
present gratuitous sex or violence, Malle was just exploring
favourite subject of many "artistic" European filmmakers,
especially French ones -huge gap between the nominal
morality of European bourgeoisie and the actual depravity
that controls the life of many of its members. Being
provided with excellent characters, both by novelist and by
talented screenwriter David Hare, Malle could engage in his
favourite way of portrayal - clinical, cold dissection of
protagonist's life and his hypocrisy. Malle's style is cold
and clinical, and it shouldn't surprise anyone that the sex
scenes, although definitely explicit, aren't erotic at all.
Actually, hardly anything is appealing in this film that
takes place on the grey interiors and exteriors of London
and under the eternally cloudy sky.
One of the reasons why the film is rather unappealing is
miscasting. Jeremy Irons, although being one of the best
actors from British Isles, is good in his role, but he lacks
the charm, able to convince that he could bring the girl
half of his age to the bed with a single look. Also, even in
the worst moments for his character, Irons seems somewhat
too dignified and cold to really makes us empathise with
him. Same goes for Juliette Binoche, talented actress that,
although physically attractive, simply seems too plain to be
femme fatale. Other actors save the day - versatile and
always reliable Miranda Richardson as Stephen's wife and
veterans Ian Bannen and Leslie Caron in two minor, but very
effective roles. In the end, what we are left with is a
paradox - technically great, excellently paced film with
good scenario, that in the end leaves us indifferent to the
story and characters.

Title
Review for True Crime (1995)
Young American actress Alicia Silverstone might be
criticised for many things but not for the unwillingness to
diversify her roles and projects in which she is to be
involved. The proof for that might come in TRUE CRIME,
relatively obscure 1995 mystery thriller, made in time when
Silverstone used to be one of the hottest new things in
Hollywood.
The heroine of this film is Mary Giordano (played by Alicia
Silverstone), exemplary catholic high student with somewhat
unusual ambitions - she wants to follow dead father's
footsteps and become police detective. However, until she
becomes old enough to join police she has to satisfy her
desire by consuming true crime stories and books about
police procedure. When teenage girls in her small
Californian town start becoming a prey for vicious serial
killer, Mary decides to use her newly acquired knowledge to
start her own investigation, which frustrates her mentor and
late father's friend - Detective Jerry Guinn (played by Bill
Nunn). Mary soon finds out that she is not the only amateur
detective around - young police cadet Tony Campbell (played
by Kevin Dillon) also wants to find a killer. Two of them
team up and as their investigation starts to bring some
results, Mary becomes aware of feelings she has for young
police cadet.
This first (and last) film by screenwriter and director Pat
Verducci might look a strange genre combination of teen
romance and serial killer movie, but in reality it is
surprisingly dark and depressing drama that uses bizarre
story and characters as a metaphor for the loss of
innocence. Unlike almost any other Hollywood film that has
teenagers as amateur detectives (with an exception of
Lynch's BLUE VELVET), this film shows how young mind's
desire to satisfy natural curiosity might bring some rather
unpleasant consequences. Unusual tone of the film is matched
by the unusual choice of role for Alicia Silverstone. Her
character is nerdy and unglamorous, so far away from sexy
MTV images, and suspension is disbelief is complete -
despite the outrageousness of the story, viewers have an
impression that they watch real people and witness events
that actually might take place. Unfortunately, that
suspension of disbelief crumbles in the finale of the film,
burdened with predictability of Hollywood cliches and few
totally unnecessary and distracting scenes. This is a real
shame, because TRUE CRIME, although still more than
watchable film, had clear potential for being much more.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Some times in 1990 I stumbled on some Bosnian weekly
magazine which featured the article about the best and most
influential movies of 1980s. The article was based on the
Top 10 poll conducted among the young film critics of former
Yugoslavia. I was more than pleasantly surprised to see two
entries - movies that I happen to adore and consider very
special, unlike most of the audience, which forgot them, or
mainstream critics who rejected them because of the content
or some other petty controversies. One of those two
masterpieces was CONAN THE BARBARIAN, 1981 fantasy epic by
John Millius. The other one was BLUE VELVET, dark,
disturbing thriller made in 1986 by David Lynch.
At the time, Lynch was hardly known outside the critics'
circles, mostly because of his "artsy" reputation, brought
by ERASERHEAD, his extremely disturbing debut feature that
later developed a cult following among alternative cinema
aficionados. His reputation of director who likes disturbing
content and revolting images was strengthen by his first two
mainstream movies - THE ELEPHANT MAN and DUNE. The latter
one turned out to be commercial disaster, and the jury is
still out whether because of Lynch's unconventional style,
or meddling producers. One of those producers, de
Laurentiis, should be forgiven for that transgression,
because two years later he atoned to the movie lovers
community by giving Lynch another chance. It was more than
that - the chance was used by Lynch who made BLUE VELVET,
very personal film that proved not only the best in his opus
but also one of the best movies of the decade. BLUE VELVET,
unfortunately, didn't became popular by itself - Lynch had
to make his ground-breaking TV series TWIN PEAKS first; he
became a household name, attractive enough for general
audience, and thus brought attention on his earlier work.
It isn't surprising that those who had enjoyed TWIN PEAKS
have the same feelings about BLUE VELVET. The movie and the
TV series have a lot in common, but most noticeable of
common elements is a subject - small all-American town that
hides some sinister secrets. The plot of the movie begins in
Lumberton, small town inhabited almost exclusively by
middle-class people who live in suburban idyll. One of those
people is Mr. Beaumont (Jack Harvey) who suffers stroke, and
his young son Jeffrey (Kyle MacLachlan) must visit him in
hospital. While returning from one of such visits, he finds
a severed human ear in a field. He picks it up and brings it
to Detective Williams (George Dickerson), his close
neighbour. Detective is very grateful for that find, but,
being the by-the-book policeman, declines to satisfy
Jeffrey's growing curiosity by providing information about
investigation. Sandy (Laura Dern), Detective's young and
attractive daughter, seems to be more helpful by giving some
hints to Jeffrey. Those hints mostly concern Dorothy Vallens
(Isabella Rosselini), beautiful and mysterious bar singer
who lives on the wrong side of tracks. Armed with that
knowledge, Jeffrey decides to begin investigation of his own
and devises daring plan to sneak into singer's apartment and
observe. However, that plan misfires, because Dorothy
discovers Jeffrey hiding in her closet and takes him at
knife-point. Scared, embarrassed but also aroused, Jeffrey
is suddenly forced to hide again, because Dorothy gets
another visitor. That visitor is Frank Booth (Dennis
Hopper), sick, violent and extremely dangerous man who loves
sadistic sex and uses blackmail in order to make Dorothy
"doing things" for him. Despite the shock, and against
Sandy's better judgement, Jeffrey decides to investigate
further, bringing his own life and life of his dearest in
danger.
One of the reasons why BLUE VELVET seems to be so appealing
to so many people - at least those who are way behind their
teen years - is the fact that it takes some very universal
subject - loss of innocence. But such subject is here
explored in a very personal story, with a lot of
autobiographical elements. Even the title seems to be very
symbolic - borrowed from a song by Bobby Vinton, that used
to be huge hit in 1963. That very year symbolised the loss
of innocence for entire generation, especially Americans who
had to experience the trauma of JFK assassination. That
event and that year symbolised the fading away of the
idealised, idyllic America embodied in small towns and white
fences, that we see in beginning of the movie; it was
replaced by dark, violent world of depravity, confusion,
violence and corruption of Vietnam and Watergate. Lynch as
an artist probably didn't care much about trials and
tribulations of those times - but his personal confusion
and painful transition to maturity corresponded with
similar, although more collective experiences of other
people who used to live in those times. However, in order to
make movie as personal as possible, Lynch deliberately
decided to be ambiguous about time period. That was acquired
with a very detailed work of production designers Patricia
Norris and costume designer Gloria Laughride - apart from
hairstyles, this movie could have taken place in early 1960s
without anyone noticing it.
No matter how meticulous, the work on the production design
and costumes was second in importance to the work of
Frederick Elmes, photographer who had much more important
task - of expressing Lynch's own obsessions through the
precise use of lighting and colour. Most of the photography
was good, especially in the scenes that used to shock some
critics with its explicit and mercilessly precise depiction
of violence and utter depravity. World, or to be more
precise, underworld of BLUE VELVET is dark, sinister place,
but also a place where extremely bad and unpleasant things
(unlike in cheap horrors) do come to light. It is an also
world of sharp contrasts - between childlike innocence and
violent depravity; boringly law-abiding citizens and
interesting, but deadly villains; people who know the
difference between right and wrong and those who get
themselves lost; angels and demons; Madonnas and whores.
Despite those sharp contrasts, BLUE VELVET has characters
who defy single- dimensional moral alignment. Jeffrey
Beaumont, author's alter ego is played by Kyle MacLachlan,
actor who made his character some kind of a prequel to his
Agent Cooper personality in TWIN PEAKS. This young man wants
to do the right thing, but at the same time he is curious,
and that curiosity leads him not only to personal danger,
but to the danger of losing his own moral compass. His
motives might look noble from the outside, but from the
inside they aren't so certain - idea to "sneak, hide and
observe" could be explain by prosaic voyeurism (and Lynch
himself hinted that in one of his interviews), and later
with his obvious sexual attraction to Dorothy. Dorothy,
played by Isabella Rosselini in the best known role of her
entire acting career, is a woman whose character is
something more than a simple victim - she is violated in an
almost unimaginable way. That is symbolised in one of the
shots in the final part of movie, when her nude body, that
should have been attractive in any other context, actually
becomes unbearable to watch. (That very sequence later
enraged some critics who accused Lynch for downright sadism
towards her female lead). Her own actions and feelings
towards Jeffrey, that might look like a product of deranged
mind on the road of depravity, are actually desperate
attempt to find some sense, even in utter despair and evil.
Dorothy's opposite is Sandy, young, blond, clean
all-American girl, whose role in this movie is to be the
voice of reason and the only link to the "normal" world for
Jeffrey. But, her own motives are also unclear - she too
seem to be thrilled by their investigation, and Jeffrey
would never entered into adventure without her interference.
Laura Dern, who plays Sandy, is very good in one of her
first major roles. Her interaction with MacLachlan is simply
unbelievably realistic; since the first time two of them
meet, we are sure that they would end as couple.
Such great movie also requires a great villain. That role
was given to Dennis Hopper, veteran actor and director who
became his great renaissance as character actor in mid
1980s, mostly due films like BLUE VELVET. If there was an
example of role tailor- made for certain actor, Frank Booth
is one of them. Hopper played him with such intensity that
he managed to outshine almost anything in his career. From
the moment he enters picture, we are certain that he means
bad news - his menacing look, intensive use of vulgar
vocabulary and, finally, outbursts of irrational violence.
However, such evil attracts other evil - Frank has group of
trusted henchmen, played by Lynch's own trusted merry men -
actors like Brad Dourif and late Jack Nance. Role of Frank
was so associated with Hopper himself, that he tried to find
excuses for the character of Frank in some interviews,
citing his love for Dorothy as a cause for all twists in the
movie.
BLUE VELVET was a more than good or very good film, it was
an excellent film. Unfortunately, single element kept it
from the top and deprived it of the cinematic perfection.
That was the score of Angelo Badalamenti, Lynch's
semi-official composer. Although good per se, the
sentimental Badalamenti's themes were silenced by more
popular and catchy songs of Bobby Vinton and Roy Orbison.
But, despite that almost unnoticeable flaw, BLUE VELVET
still remains the movie that deserves to be adored and
re-watched, same as masterpieces that actually reached the
perfection.

Title
Review for Fahrenheit 451 (1966)
There are many people who buy tons of books and never bother
to actually read them. Sometimes it is done on purpose -
volumes of Dostoyevsky, Sartre or Proust on your bookshelves
can give you the image of an intellectual and thus enable
you to impress your houseguests. But, sometimes books get
bought and never read simply because you never get enough
time to read them. In the case of this author, the sadly and
unjustifiably neglected book was FAHRENHEIT 451, classic
science fiction novel by Ray Bradbury. I bought it almost a
decade ago but I never caught enough neither time nor
inspiration to read it. The 1966 movie, based on the novel
and directed by famous French director Franois Truffaut,
was another matter - I watched it few times, mostly on
television. However, when I decided to review the film, I
felt that it just wouldn't be right without reading the
novel first. Since the novel was some 160 pages long, I
spared few hours and finally relieved myself from this
situation, quite ironic in the context of the book. So, now
I have enough reason to claim that FAHRENHEIT 451 happens to
be one of those occasions when the films turned out to be
better than the original novel.
The plot of the film is set in future, in a society that
banned all the books as the source of disharmony. Instead of
putting down fires, firemen are entrusted with tracking,
confiscating and burning books. One of those firemen is
Montag (played by Oskar Werner), who is about to get
promoted after many years of excellent service. His
professional success, however, can't compensate the deep
feeling of discontent, caused by the widening emotional gap
between him and his dull wife Linda (played by Julie
Christie) who spends all her time watching interactive TV
soaps and swallowing tons of psychoactive pills. Montag
becomes even more aware of this after meeting with Clarisse
(again played by Julie Christie), young, free-spirited woman
who would inspire him to start questioning not only his life
but also well-established norms of society. After a while,
Montag starts doing something inconceivable for fireman -
instead of burning, he would start to read books.
On the surface, the plot of this film is hardly different
from hundreds of similar science fiction dystopias, and it
also follows the cliches of lone hero who rebels against
future totalitarian society. But this very unoriginal and
over-used theme was given to the filmmaker famous for the
originality and very personal touch used in all his work. In
mid 1960s Truffaut was one of the most respectable members
of French New Wave and one of the most vocal proponents of
so-called "auteur theory". Adaptation of Bradbury's novel
was an interesting experiment for Truffaut, being his only
venture into the realm of science fiction (not counting the
role in Spielberg's CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND few
years later). His approach towards the genre was quite
unique. Unlike most of the directors, who like to create
futuristic atmosphere by cool gadgets, costumes or props,
Truffaut decided to make the future world visually identical
to our own. So, people in FAHRENHEIT 451 wear 1960s clothes
and hairstyles, drive 1960s vehicles and live in houses that
look very much like 1960s suburbia. The real difference
between our present and Truffaut's vision of the future lies
in people. They are cold, distant, emotionally cripple and
psychologically impaired.
So, Truffaut relies less on special effects (except in one
fake and totally unnecessary scene near the end that almost
ruins the whole movie) and more on actors and the
atmosphere. He had diverse but very talented crew of actors.
Oskar Werner, Austrian actor who had worked with him in
JULES ET JIM, plays Montag who is very close to character in
the book. Werner's minimalist style of playing was perfect
for gradual transformation of lead character from
cold-blooded government official to rebel. This gradual
transformation is mirrored in two very opposite characters
played by talented British actress Julie Christie in one of
the best dual roles in history of cinema. Another great
talent comes in the form of Cyril Cusack who plays evil,
sadistic but also a very intelligent Captain. He is aided by
Anton Diffring (German character actor almost obliged to
play Nazis in dozens of 1960s and 1970s WW2 movies) in a
small but effective role of Montag's professional rival.
Acting talent is supported by Truffaut's almost flawless
direction that represents the good combination of the old
and new. On one hand, Truffaut uses this film to give
endless homages to his great role model Hitchcock,
especially in the scenes that create suspense. Another
homage to the Master of Suspense is the use of Bernard
Herrman as music composer. His score is perhaps less
powerful than in some of the greatest Hitchcok's films, yet
it is recognisable and quite effective in the context of
FAHRENHEIT 451. In this film, as in many other, Herrman
deserved his reputation of one of the best movie composers
of all times. On the other hand, Truffaut uses this film to
experiment. One of such experiments could be seen in the
beginning, when the movie credits are narrated instead of
being shown on the screen. Unlike most of the 1960s
experiments, this one is successful and adds the futuristic
atmosphere to otherwise contemporary setting. Truffaut also
uses opportunity to mix genres - FAHRENHEIT 451 is made of
scenes that are truly horrifying, some scenes that are
filled with black humour and some scenes that are both.
Futuristic setting doesn't discourages Truffaut to comment
on the 1960s world through small but amusing details. "Law
enforcement as fun" scene looks very much like the clip from
a documentary about generations' conflict of late 1960s,
while TV announcers delivering statistics about burned books
sound very much like Pentagon speakers during Vietnam War.
However, the quality of FAHRENHEIT 451 is not only timeless
but also disturbingly prophetic. Some dark elements of
Bradbury's and Truffaut's visions could be seen in today's
world. Books are disappearing while the masses are
manipulated through dumbed-down popular entertainment,
people spend all their lives in front of TV sets or have
their metabolisms dependable on various drugs. But the most
disturbing trend is globalisation that tends to cover the
entire world in uniformity, leaving no place to all those
who want to remain independent and individual. When the
characters in this film justify burning books they use the
same vocabulary and almost identical arguments like the
militant proponents of "political correctness"; use of
Hitler's "Mein Kampf" in one of those scenes is movie's
finest irony. However, even those who would recognise some
disturbing trends of today would like FAHRENHEIT 451 in the
end. After all the dreariness, melancholy and hopelessness,
Truffaut rewards the audience with optimistic, powerful
finale that reinstates our faith in humanity. Because of all
that, FAHRENHEIT 451 still remains one of the milestones in
the history of science fiction cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for From Russia with Love (1963)
In the last decade of its existence Soviet Union was
desperately trying to counter overwhelming Western efforts
on the propaganda front of Cold War. That effort, among
other things, consisted in the multitude of explicitly
anti-Soviet spy and action thrillers like RED DAWN or RAMBO
2, so Soviets had to produce novels, movies and television
shows that would give their side of the story. One of such
examples was 1984 mini-series TASS IS AUTHORISED TO
DECLARE..., aired on former Yugoslav television in mid
1980s. The series was boring as hell, but those viewers
patient enough to sit through it in its entirety were
rewarded with occasional hilarious moment or too. One of
them was the scene featuring KGB agent leisurely discussing
James Bond movies with his CIA counterpart and mentioning
FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE. The author of this review is unaware
whether Soviet citizens in 1984 were able to watch that
particular film, but the citizens of former Yugoslavia were
not. That 1963 Bond film, second in the row, was
unofficially banned by former Yugoslav authorities not
because of anti-Soviet content, but because the part of the
plot takes place in former Yugoslavia, and the original
novel by Ian Fleming had painted quite unflattering picture
of Zagreb, then one of major cities of former federation.
Ironically, it was video distributor from Zagreb that
introduced the film to the audience only few years later.
It's quite a shame, because for many critics view FROM
RUSSIA WITH LOVE as the best Bond film.
The plot of the film begins when the anonymous head of
SPECTRE organisation authorises very complex plan that would
utilise Cold War rivalry between Britain and USSR. At first,
British secret agent James Bond (played by Sean Connery) is
sent to Istanbul in order to meet Tatiana Romanova (played
by Daniela Bianchi), young and beautiful deciphering clerk
in Soviet Consulate. Romanova is offering her services in
obtaining precious decoding device Lektor from the Consulate
in exchange for meeting with handsome British agent she had
allegedly fallen in love by watching his photos in KGB
files. Bond suspects a trap, and he is right, since
Romanova's actions have been actually directed by KGB
spymaster Rosa Klebb (played by Lotte Lenya). But Romanova
is deceived too, since her boss has just defected to SPECTRE
and the ultimate goal of the operation is to bring Lektor to
SPECTRE and kill Bond in the process.
One of the reasons why FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE happens to be
one of the most popular Bond films is the fact that it
remains the closest to the original vision of the character
creator Ian Fleming (who also got cameo role in the film).
In this film Bond doesn't have to save the world from evil
megalomaniacs and their underground armies. The story
revolves around rather minor Cold War skirmish, hardly
relevant in the general scheme of things, an episode that
could be inspired by Ian Fleming's real life adventures
during his career in British intelligence. The lack of
spectacle usually associated with Bond films is compensated
with the complex and intriguing, yet understandable plot.
Although the intrigue involves double deception, the
scriptwriters Johanna Harwood and Richard Maibum didn't left
audience in the dark - from the opening scenes viewers are
told about all major details of the conspiracy. That
provides additional suspense, because audience knows that
Bond is about to face the danger. Even if we are aware of
the unwritten rules that mandate Bond winning at the end of
the day, the film still remains interesting. Realism of the
film is underlined with scriptwriters' efforts to provide
some continuity to the series (unlike the rest of Bond
movies that usually start from scratch). Events of the
previous movie (DR. NO) are referenced, and Sylvia (played
by Eunice Grayson) is the only Bond girl who was
romantically involved with Bond in two separate Bond films.
Despite the higher dosage of realism, FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE
still follows the escapist formula of Bond movies. Bond
still gets it on with beautiful women and locations of
Istanbul are quite exotic (although Wales locations are poor
substitute for the coast of Istria, and Venice scenes are
even poorer example of blue screen techniques) and Bond
still flirts with Moneypenny. The action is not that
spectacular, except in the last scenes of the film (where
Bond uses some rather crude tools to deal with villains,
instead of his favourite gadgets), but the fight scene in
train is one of the best in the history of Bond films.
Finally, legendary Bond gadgets are introduced, as well as
their inventor, Major Boothroyd a.k.a. Q (played by recently
deceased Desmond Llewelyn). Another Bond movie ingredient -
cool opening titles - seem somewhat inferior compared with
the similar scenes in latter Bond films.
The acting is superb, as usual. Connery again proves that he
was born to play James Bond and that nobody could do it any
better. He is especially good in this film, where the script
his usual cockiness confronts with the realities of world
where even the heroes might lose a fight or two and let the
villains, at least for a while, to have the upper hand.
Connery's role is very good, but his partners also did a
very good job. Pedro Armendariz as his Istanbul sidekick
Karim Bey is especially interesting to watch, since he plays
the character who actually shares Bond's hedonism - we might
see Karim Bey as some kind of local James Bond. That role is
even more powerful when we consider that Armendariz shot
this film while being terminally ill. Daniela Bianchi,
Italian model and Miss Universe 1960, does more than decent,
actually very good job as Bond girl, at least for someone
who got the role on the basis of a good look. Robert Shaw as
villain is also impressive - Bond films rarely featured
truly psychopathic, yet efficient and realistic baddies like
this one. Another impressive villain is Lotte Lenya as
Klebb; she even manages to bring some interesting subtexts
to her role - I wonder why the makers of CELLULOID CLOSET
missed the scenes that feature Klebb and Romanova together.
Of course, those who like to nit-pick would find some flaws.
My major complaint is somewhat too romantic and rather
unrealistic portrayal of Gypsies and terribly fake
"catfight" in Gypsy camp. But, generally speaking, FROM
RUSSIA WITH LOVE should be praised as rarely intelligent,
yet still entertaining Bond film, one of the shiniest
examples of Bonds from golden Connery era. All those who
like to truly appreciate Bond phenomenon should watch it.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Psy (1992)
Until recently, police films were supposed to be in the
exclusive domain of cinematographies belonging to so-called
First World. Ethical dilemmas that make the backbone of
police films work only in environments that are supposed to
have at least basic framework of democracy, rule of law and
human rights. Naturally, East European countries during the
Cold War didn't exactly fit such criteria and in their movie
policemen in such films appeared only as protagonists in
standard crime mysteries. So, we actually had to wait for
the Communism to collapse to see East European films to deal
with the problems that haunt their law enforcement
personnel. One of such films is Polish drama PSY, directed
in 1992 by Wladyslaw Pasikowski. The film was one of the
most popular films in post-Communist Poland, spawning the
sequel made two years later.
PSY is rather unusual police drama because the policemen are
anything by ordinary. The protagonist is Franz Mauer (played
by Boguslaw Linda), former veteran of Communist Secret
Police. In the good old days he and his colleagues used to
live like kings - the regime provided them with numerous
privileges in exchange for their services. But times have
changed and the regime is now made out of people who used to
be Mauer's "clients". As a result, former secret police is
now downsized and filled with people more suitable for new
political masters - Maurer's best friend Olo (played by
Marek Kondrat) is thrown out of the force, while Maurer
himself is demoted to the regular police. Inability of the
old secret policemen to handle new circumstances is revealed
when routine car theft bust turns into bloody shootout in
which most of Maurer's crew die. Maurer decides to find the
responsible and takes help of young and idealistic rookie
Nowy (played by Cezary Paura). The investigation leads to
the well-organised ring of amphetamine smugglers, led by
former secret policeman Gross (played by Janusz Gajdos).
Maurer, being back-pedalled by his inimical and corrupt
superiors, must not only fight this ring alone, but one of
Gross' new recruits is his old friend Olo.
If PSY should be described with one word, that word is
"brutal". That brutality is, of course, most visible in the
large number of extremely violent scenes and naturalistic
quality of said violence which would probably turn off some
more sensitive segments of the audience. But the brutality
doesn't stop at that level - in the eyes of screenwriter and
director Pasikowski, naturalistic violence is just an
expression of equally brutal everyday reality of
post-Communist Poland. Pasikowski made this film three years
after the collapse of Communism, and in that time the newly
democratic country looked far away from reaching economic
and political standards of Western Europe. The end of
socialist economy brought unimaginable poverty to the
people, and many were forced to turn to crime in order to
survive; that later led to collapse of each and every
ethical norm and many Poles were guided in their life by
their most primordial and savage instincts. PSY is brutal
even to the protagonist, who is presented as corrupt,
primitive, violent and scruples individual who usually
treats their fellow men like garbage. PSY is actually film
without any positive character in usual Hollywood sense and
this represents something like a problem for Pasikowski;
since Maurer is not very different from the people he must
fight, he must be given the girlfriend in order to show his
kinder and gentler side. The subplot involving juvenile
delinquent Angela (played by Agnieska Jaskolka) is rather
routine and therefore needless; Linda and Jaskolka lack
chemistry and during the scenes when they are together we
can hardly wait for the film to start dealing with the real
subject. In the end, the whole idea of making Maurer more
humane is compromised in the brief scene that shows his
enemy, Gross, as kind and warm family man.
Today, when Poland more or less managed to overcome most of
the usual post- Communist difficulties, PSY is not as
effective as it was eight years ago. Pasikowski's picture of
Poland was simply too grim, and his speculations on near
future were not proven to be correct. According to the
experiences in most of post-Communist countries, former
secret policemen, instead of organising their own
all-powerful narco- Mafia, simply changed their masters and
former members of Nomenklatura found much easier and less
risky way for getting rich during the privatisation of
former state-owned companies. Pasikowski was perhaps trying
to hint some of those developments in the film, but PSY is
simply too short for that. Another problem for this film is
in references to the event in Polish Communist past, which
are hardly understandable for anyone outside Poland (except
perhaps viewers in other post-Communist countries, who can
probably recognise similar characters and situations).
Because of its brutality and rawness, PSY looks somewhat
unrefined, but such flaws are overcome with superb acting
and few scenes of black humour (especially visible in the
otherwise extremely naturalistic police shootout scene).
However, despite being far from perfect, PSY is memorable
viewing experience for anyone who can handle it, and
therefore it should be recommended for those who like to see
how East European filmmakers react to their post-Communist
reality.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Third Man, The (1949)
New "Oscars" were handed over two nights ago. The reaction
that is almost certain is the multitude of furious rants by
film lovers who can't forgive the Academy for favouring
SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE, "crowd-pleasing" romantic comedy over
"true art" in Spielberg's WWII epic SAVING PRIVATE RYAN. Of
course, this is nothing new and the debate between those who
judge films solely as "art" and those who judge them as
"popular entertainment" has been waged for decades. This
distinction could also be seen in a different perspectives
of film critics and average audience when they judge films
made in certain time periods. Nice example is the question
"What is the best film made in 1940s?" Average movie goer
would quickly answer with a single word: CASABLANCA. Average
critic would offer at least two other titles. One of them is
THE THIRD MAN, 1949 thriller by British director Carol Reed
- film that could be perfect companion piece to CASABLANCA.
Same as Michael Curtiz's celebrated melodrama, THE THIRD MAN
cleverly uses relatively obscure and now almost forgotten
details of that time period in Europe. The setting is
post-WW2 Vienna, picturesque capital of ancient and mighty
Austrian Empire. The empire is long gone, and Austria
reduced to small country, carved up into occupation zones by
victorious Allies. The population of the bombed out capital
is enduring unimaginable economic hardships and many of once
proud citizens are forced to earn for a living through the
thriving black market. To this city comes Holly Martins
(played by Joseph Cotton), American writer of cheap pulp
westerns, who has been invited to the city by his old
college friend Harry Lime. Martins is alcoholic and broke,
and writing about Lime's medical charity operation could
help him to start his career all over again. However, soon
upon the arrival, he is greeted with the shocking news of
Lime's death in automobile accident. To make things even
more puzzling, Major Calloway (played by Trevor Howard)
tells him that Harry Lime happened to be one of the worst
black market racketeers in town. Disbelieving and against
Calloway's wishes, Holly decides to stay in Vienna and try
to clear his friend's name. In the process he meets Anna
Schmidt (played by Allida Valli), actress and Harry's
mistress. Soon, details about Harry's illegal activities
with fake penicillin emerge, as well as contradictory
details about his death. Martins becomes convinced that his
friend was murdered, but the real truth is even more
shocking.
Comparisons between CASABLANCA and THE THIRD MAN are simply
unavoidable. They both have World War 2 in the background,
complex characters with various motivations and not so clear
moral allignment. They both have protagonist who is torn
between conflicting loyalties, self-interest and desire to
do the right thing. However, under that superficial
similarity lies clear distinction and the very reason why
the public prefers the former, and the critics the latter.
CASABLANCA, despite being excellent film, is nothing more
than a piece of WW2 propaganda wrapped into crowd-pleasing
melodrama. THE THIRD MAN, on the other hand, is made four
years after the war ended. Its author, Carol Reed, spent the
war covering it as documentary film-maker in British
military, and seen enough things to know that the world
can't be divided into two worlds of Black and White. The
characters in his film, thanks to screenwriter Graham
Greene, are set in the different shades of Gray. The film
reveals the real results of the noble and epic struggle
heroes of CASABLANCA engaged in. Europe, instead of enjoying
freedom and democracy, is impoverished, demolished, occupied
and humiliated. War time alliances are breaking apart in the
eve of Cold War and noble ideals are replaced with pragmatic
policies.
In such gloomy and nihilistic world, there aren't any place
for old-fashioned heroes. Holly Martins is the last of them,
still believing in things like friendship and doing the
right thing. Unfortunately, this simplistic division of
people into good guys and bad guys, that came straight out
of his pulp westerns, would bring him nothing but misery.
Joseph Cotton was excellent in this role. Another character
that still clings to something like moral code is Anna
Schmidt (played by Italian actress Allida Valli, great diva
of 1940s), but her character is already damaged with the
unimaginable horrors and moral disasters she had endured
through the war years. Her devotion to the deceased lover,
involved in outrageous racket with faulty medicine, is the
attempt to hang onto something solid in the world with the
lost foundations. Even the representatives of law and order,
who are supposed to be the good guys, are people without
scruples. Calloway shows no signs of sympathy towards
Martins or Anna - for him they are simply means to the end.
It was an excellent idea to have Bernard Lee (later best
known as M in the James Bond series) cast as his trusted
sergeant and some kind of comic relief.
However, the pearl that shines most brightely among the
actors in this film is Orson Welles. He plays the worst
villain of them all, yet the viewer, same as poor Anna,
can't escape his captivating evil charisma. Welles'
appearances in film are relatively brief, but they are the
most memorable - whether it is his effective entrance in the
last third of the movie, the final confrontation in Vienna
sewers or the great dialogue at the Ferris Wheel. The latter
scene is most remembered by Welles' immortal words about
Switzerland and Renaissance Italy. Welles simply chewes the
screen and it shouldn't surprise anyone, since he actually
wrote all his lines and practically directed those scenes.
Among other things that distinguishes this film from the
others is the atmosphere. Carol Reed employed all his talent
to picture despair, cynicism and nihilism through visual
means. Many scenes are filmed from unusual angles, which is
metaphor for the twisted moral perspectives of the movie
protagonists. The locations of post-war Vienna were also
perfect -they possess strong contrast between glorious past,
represented in old imperial architecture, and gloomy
present, represented through bombed out ruins. This contrast
serves as metaphor for distinction between nice faade and
ugly reality (another good example is the scene where
gangster Popescu makes threat to Martins in the form of
literary criticism). The streets of Vienna, especially in
the night, seems like a scenery more appropriate for horror
than for thriller, but Reed amends that by employing zither
music by Anton Karas. The lighthearted music (especially the
title theme that later became unofficial Viennese anthem) is
in another deep contrast with anything but cheerful events
of the film, and it also serve as ironic commentary.
Finally, Reed ends film with the one of the longest but most
powerful shots in the history of cinema.
THE THIRD MAN was the film in many ways before its time. The
quantity of cynicism, misanthropy and nihilism seemed more
suitable for some future time periods, including our own.
Luckily, we haven't been exposed to the remake yet (if we
don't count dreadful 1997 Croatian version called TRECA
ZENA). Until that happens we can enjoy THE THIRD MAN as
true, unhindered masterpiece and the ultimate film noire of
all times.

Title
Review for Videodrome (1983)
Almost twenty years ago I read the review of David
Cronenberg's SCANNERS and the author explicitly described
that film as "the work of a sick man". Such harsh words
shouldn't surprise anyone familiar with the films that
Canadian director used to make in 1970s and early 1980s -
science fiction films based on some disturbing ideas of
dehumanisation in modern society. Even more disturbing thing
for the contemporary audience was the graphic depiction of
such dehumanisation in the form of explicit violence and
realistic gore. One of such films is VIDEODROME, written and
directed by Cronenberg in 1983, science fiction thriller
which dealt with the effects of television on human
perception of reality.
The protagonist of this film is Max Renn (played by James
Woods), producer of the small TV station in Toronto. In
order to fight more powerful competition, he based his
program almost entirely on the broadcasts that feature
realistic violence and soft-core pornography. Recently, a
mysterious satellite program called "Videodrome",
unscrambled by his trusted technowizzard Harlan (played by
Peter Dvorsky) has caught his attention. It consists of
nothing more than scenes of torture and Max, although warned
that "Videodrome" might actually be snuff film, begins
searching for their producers. This happens after his
girlfriend Nicki Brand (played by Debbie Harry) got aroused
by the programme and expressed desire to star in the
program. After some time, Max is convinced that the author
of "Videodrome" is Brian O'Blivion (played by Jack Greley),
eccentric TV theorist who communicates with the rest of the
world via recorded tapes. In the meantime, Max begins
suffering from bizzare hallucinations involving his
television set. Explanation for such phenomenon is given by
O'Blivion's daughter Bianca (played by Sonja Smits) -
"Videodrome" is actually a signal which is able to cause
brain damage to the viewers and permanently alter their
perception of reality.
VIDEODROME is often referenced as one of the Cronenberg's
most ambitious works. Dehumanisation as the consequence of
technological progress - Cronenberg's favourite subject -
here takes shape in the form of media manipulation and
technology able to totally blur lines between real world and
artificial realities. Cronenberg, whose Max Renn might be
seen as some sort of alter ego, however absolves technology
from its share of responsibility for media-induced
alienation. In the endless debate about the role of media in
the rise of modern-day violence and other forms of human
depravity, Cronenberg puts some of the blame on primordial
instincts of human subconscius, with media being solely the
catalysts for subsequent destructive behaviour. Because of
that VIDEODROME is considered prophetic film by many.
However, those fine ideas have great difficulties in
reaching audience. In the beginning plot and characters work
quite nicely, but gradually film begins to deteriorate as
quickly as the mental state of its protagonist, and
practically nothing on screen makes sense, except Rick
Baker's make-up talents, responsible for some effective but
often revolting effects (like protagonist's stomach turning
into vagina- like VCR) and numerous scenes of gratuitous
violence. These scenes of carnage are here probably to
compensate lack of Cronenberg's ideas, manifested in his
ability to find adequate or comprehensible ending. To make
things worse, some of the quasi- ideological technobabble
and television idolatry now looks terribly outdated in the
age of Internet and virtual reality. On the other hand, some
of the images in the film are quite impressive - especially
Jack Greley as television guru (probably inspired by real
life Canadian TV theorist Marshall MacLuhan) and American
rock-singer Debbie Harry playing some really sick puppy.
However, those scenes can't save VIDEODROME from being seen
as a movie that failed to fulfil its potentials.
Review written on September 25th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Bitter Moon (1992)
In 1992 French writer Pascal Bruckner visited Croatia in
order to promote his novel LUNES DE FIEL. The government
media gave a massive hype to this event, although it had
less to do with Bruckner's work as a writer and more to do
with his vocal advocacy for the cause of Croatian
independence among the ranks of French and European
intelligentsia. Some Croatian critics nevertheless tried to
justify the hype by praising the novel as a perfect example
of new "post-ideological" literature, which should deal less
with fashionable leftist subjects and more with "simple love
stories". The author of this review admits that he haven't
read the novel but the idea of BITTER MOON being a "simple
love story" looks totally alien to him, at least if the 1992
screen version, directed by Roman Polanski, was faithful
adaptation of the novel.
The plot of this film is set on a cruise ship in
Mediterranean. British couple Fiona (played by Kristin
Scott-Thomas) and Nigel Dobson (played by Hugh Grant) are
travelling to India via Istanbul in hope that the exotic
destination would revamp their stiff and boring
relationship. There they meet another couple that seem to
have another set of problems - wheelchair-bound American
writer Oscar (played by Peter Coyote) and his beautiful
French wife Mimi (played by Emanuelle Seigner). Nigel's
natural curiosity about this couple is more than satisfied
when Oscar starts telling him the story of his long and
bizarre relationship with Mimi, not leaving even the most
intimate and embarrassing details. Nigel is shocked by this
series of discoveries and starts to wonder what kind of
perverse game Oscar plays with him, but in the same time he
can't get enough of it, partially because he is getting more
and more attracted to Mimi.
BITTER MOON is anything but "simple" love story, but it is a
nevertheless a love story, and it proves that love stories
can be effective even if the protagonists are dislikeable,
and the events on the screen mostly revolting or depressing.
Credit for this should be given to Bruckner, but also to
director Roman Polanski, director who is able to turn even
the most unpleasant content into something watchable.
Polanski's misanthropy and black humour were perfect for the
story that chronicles the evolution of man-woman
relationship from pure love to pure hatred and takes almost
pornographic approach to the extremes in which participants
of such relationships can show cruelty towards each other.
Such approach required a lot of effort from the actors, and
Polanski was lucky to have a good cast by his side. The best
acting jobe is done by Peter Coyote, American character
actor who rarely had an opportunity to play romantic leads,
mostly due to his rather unglamourous looks. His partner and
Polanski's wife Emanuelle Seigner employs much of her
sexappeal and dancing ability, thus creating few pleasant
moments in this generally depressing film. Grant and
Scott-Thomas are reliable in their roles of stiff-upper-lip
Britons, and their act, so overused in romantic comedies,
seems refreshing in the film of completely different nature.
Unfortunately, BITTER MOON has its share of problems. For
example, the most interesting scenes are those in flashback
(and one of them might interest historians of on-line
communications since it features French Minitel system),
while those on cruise ship are dull, slow and sometimes
completely unnecessary. Uninspiring musical score by
Vangelis also makes a rather disappointing impression. The
finale of the film is non-cathartic and not exactly
convincing. However, despite that, whether you like or
whether you loathe what you have seen in BITTER MOON, this
film will probably leave lasting impression.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Relentless 3 (1993)
Coinciding with the emerging popularity of movies that deal
with anything related to serial killers, RELENTLESS, 1989
low budget thriller about LAPD detective Sam Dietz, played
by character actor Leo Rossi, spawned three more sequels.
RELENTLESS 3, third in the row, features Sam Dietz again,
but this time detective, who had to catch vicious serial
killer in his very first case, doesn't want to deal with
similar line of work. Divorced, demoralised and transferred,
he reluctantly returns to his old post when Los Angeles
becomes a hunting ground for another serial killer, and
evidence indicate connection with one of Dietz's old cases.
To make things even more interesting, it seems that the
killer deliberately stages murders in order to bring Dietz
to the investigation.
Fans of the British TV films and mini-series like PRIME
SUSPECT or CRACKER would probably see a lot of similarities
RELENTLESS series of movies. They both feature vicious
psychopathic killers, yet also give a lot of, usually
depressive, details about chief investigator's private
lives. This one isn't an exception, but similarities with
British television are only in content. The execution and
style is different, which makes this film mediocre piece of
entertainment at best. Useless, gratuitous erotica also
doesn't help either, obviously making this film longer than
it should be. The actors are good, though - Leo Rossi is
fine as usual, and William Forsythe plays one of more
compelling villains in his career. Signy Coleman as Dietz's
love interest, is, on the other hand, quite miscast. But she
won't have to worry about it in the future career, since
RELENTLESS 3 wasn't supposed to be anybody's finest moment
anyway.

Title
Review for Stavisky... (1974)
Some scholars view history as perpetual but pre-determined
process, guided by easily predictable and irresistible
forces, either natural or social. Others see history as
nothing more than the series of chaotic, unpredictable
event. Somewhere in the middle between those two extremes
exist individuals, who either have or have not decisive role
in shaping world history. Those who believe that individuals
can make a difference believe in Great Man Theory, often
using examples of historical personalities that changed the
destiny of nations because of their unusual political or
military talents. However, individuals can play important
roles not only trough their great achievements, but also
because they just happen to be on the wrong place and in the
wrong time. French director Alain Resnais was used one of
such historical personalities for STAVISKY..., his 1974
drama.
The plot of the film begins in 1933, when French government
reluctantly gives political asylum to former Bolshevik
leader Leon Trotsky, exiled from USSR after his conflict
with Stalin. In the same time, another Russian Jew receives
much more favourable treatment by the same institution. He
is Serge Alexandre Stavisky (played by Jean-Paul Belmondo),
market speculator whose irresistible charm and audacity
enchanted and fascinated almost any part of French
establishment - industrialists, aristocrats, politicians,
bureaucrats and members of cultural elite. Stavisky used his
powerful friends to turn himself into financial tycoon and
start building business empire, enjoying life of luxury in
the process. There are some people immune to Stavisky's
charm, like policemen familiar with his previous career of
petty con man, as well as with the evidence that could put
him in jail. Stavisky is, however, shielded from prosecution
and convinced that he has government in his pocket. But when
his latest scheme collapses, so does his business empire and
the powerful friends not only abandon him, but instead try
to make him a convenient scapegoat for one of the greatest
scandals in French history.
History doesn't lack colourful personalities able to cheat
their way into impenetrable corridors of power and
establishment, but few of them left such impact like
Stavisky. After the scandal France barely avoided civil war,
only to be left with weakened finances, loss of faith in
democratic institutions and population deeply divided on
ideological lines - and, above all, tragically unable to
halt rise of Fascism in Europe which made WW2 inevitable. It
is understandable why this case intrigued Jorge Semprun,
screenwriter who had built his reputation on exciting
political films based on true stories. Relatively simple
story of Stavisky was used for much broader picture - few
films like this one capture the atmosphere of Europe in the
early 1930s, when the names like Hitler, Stalin or Mussolini
were actually viewed as excellent alternative to ailing,
corrupt and incompetent democratic governments.
Unfortunately, director Alain Resnais seems totally
disinterested in politics and concentrates solely on the
individual destiny of Stavisky at the expense of general
picture. What began as an interesting history lesson turns
into personal drama about over-ambitious man who pays
ultimate price for challenging the establishment. Such
stories were seen thousand times before in much better and
compelling films, and Resnais makes things even worse by bad
editing in the end, when scenes set in the past, present and
future mix without any particular sense. All those who want
to learn something about Stavisky through this film are
going to be disappointed, and only those viewers who are
more familiar with French politics in early 1930s would not
have problems in understanding the plot. What actually saves
this film is superb visual style and great work on props and
costumes, that give this film strong and convincing period
feel, especially the haunting musical score by Stephen
Sondheim. Acting is top-notch - Jean-Paul Belmondo was
perfect for the leading role, using his charisma of charming
rascal of his earlier films to become quite convincing con
man. Period feel is strengthened with the appearance of old
but still effective Charles Boyer who plays Stavisky's old
aristocratic friend; the link between new and old
generations in French acting is established with small role
played by young Gerard Depardieux. STAVISKY... is a
definitely a failed film, but attractive and interesting
enough to earn attention of all lovers of non-conventional
cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Soylent Green (1973)
Science fiction as a genre was often belittled as "escapist"
by cultural establishment. However, judging by the way
science fiction appeared in late 1960s and early 1970s, that
genre was anything but escapist. Instead of allowing viewers
to indulge themselves in optimistic visions of another
worlds and thus forget depressing reality, Hollywood science
fiction films of pre-Lucas era often did quite the opposite
- visions of the future were such that the turbulent and
often bleak 1970s reality looked good in comparison.
Interestingly enough, many of such films not only withstood
the test time but also became indisputable classics of the
genre. One of such films is SOYLENT GREEN, directed in 1973
by Richard Fleischer.
The plot of the film is based on the novel MAKE ROOM! MAKE
ROOM! by Harry Harrison and set in New York in the year 2022
AD As a result of decades of industrial pollution,
greenhouse effect caused constant heatwave and mass
extinction of plants and animals. Humans, on the other hand,
continue to grow in numbers and New York has population of
40 million - mostly utterly impoverished people forced to
sleep in crammed stairways and dependant on synthetic food
called "Soylent". Tiny minority of rich and powerful people,
on the other hand, can afford such luxuries as running
water, strawberries and "furniture" in the form of sex
slaves that come with such luxurious apartments. William R.
Simonson (played by Joseph Cotton), one of directors of
Soylent Corporation, belongs to such privileged group until
he is killed in his apartment, presumably by a burglar.
Murder investigation is conducted by Thorn (played by
Charlton Heston), police detective who lives in a tiny
apartment with his research assistant a.k.a. "Book" Sol Roth
(played by Edward G. Robinson), an old man who entertains
him with the stories about the time when the Earth used to
be green. Unlike his superiors who want to wrap up the case
quickly, Thorn decides to investigate further, convinced
that Simonson was the target of well-planned assassination.
His decision is partially motivated by the desire to indulge
himself, at least temporarily, in the privileged lifestyle
and also because he is attracted to Shirl (played by Leigh
Taylor-Young), Simonson's "furniture". When Thorn's
investigation begins to bring results and draws him closer
to the reason behind Simonson's murder, policeman himself
becomes the target of assassins.
Today, in a world of CGI and rapidly changing technology, we
are quite accustomed to the fact that science fiction films
might start looking dated only a year or two after the
initial release. SOYLENT GREEN was made almost three decades
ago, yet it seems like a movie that could be made today. The
only reason to treat SOYLENT GREEN as "dated" is in the fact
that the bleak future depicted in it becomes less certain
with each passing year. By the year 2022 Earth and its
population might indeed be in worse shape than they were in
1973, yet the pollution, global warming, overpopulation and
other apocalyptic trends didn't materialise in dimensions
sufficient to justify bleak visions of the film. So, Harry
Harrison (who wasn't exactly happy with the film),
screenwriter Stanley R. Greenberg and director Fleischer got
it wrong. But that doesn't mean that they failed to create
convincing and powerful vision of the future that even might
become reality at some date later than indicated in the
film.
Like many other dystopic science fiction films of 1970s and
early 1980s, SOYLENT GREEN doesn't create futuristic
atmosphere by presenting technology that doesn't exist in
present, but relies instead on the lack of present-day
technology that should indicate lower standards of living
and decay of civilisation. In SOYLENT GREEN industrial,
technological and cultural decay is presented in convincing
fashion, through the details of people's every day life.
Increased heat and humidity in the air through simple but
effective camera techniques in outdoors scenes. Lack of
trees means that there are no new books, and energy shortage
mandates that only trucks can be used for transport instead
of private-owned cars. Lack of living space means the lack
of privacy and the lack of respect for individuals - when
they die, they are disposed of instead of being buried, and
all their belongings, concubines included, are about to be
plundered without any question asked. In overpopulated
society human life is cheap, and gun battles on overcrowded
streets are bound to result with innocent people being
killed by stray bullets. Those who can't deal with pressures
of everyday life are publicly encouraged to end it through
euthanasia. All this is presented without any semblance of
moralistic outrage, and some viewers can come to the
conclusion that moralistic relativism is the only way a
society can function under those conditions.
Because of this, otherwise great script loses much of its
intended impact in the end. When the great secret is
revealed at the end, protagonist's last words (the most
quoted element of the film) are not directed to the people
of 2022, but to the audience of 1973. His warning, however,
is going to miss the mark in the context of his film. The
outrage he is hoping to create simply won't happen in the
impoverished world of 2022, which has lowered its moral
standards to almost sub-human levels. Yet, the film makes a
nice contrast between savage amorality of the world and
humanism of the protagonist, indicated in memorable scenes
of interaction with people he loves - his "book" and his new
girlfriend.
Protagonist was played by Charlton Heston, one of greatest
actors of American cinema. Same as in PLANET OF THE APES and
OMEGA MAN - two other science fiction classics of the period
- Heston brings humane dimension to the otherwise alien or
reprehensible world through the character of tragic hero.
His performance was, however, overshadowed by another acting
giant - Edward G. Robinson. His character, which had to put
the dark future world in the context of our present day,
gave extra humanism to the film through the strength of
Robinson's performance. Said performance, and especially the
final scene, becomes even more powerful when we know that
the role of Sol was Robinson's final appearance on the film.
Other actors did solid job - Chuck Connors was good as
villain, and Leigh Taylor-Young was more than pretty face.
Fleischer directed this film with great skill, showing his
abilities both in dramatic and action scenes. Unfortunately,
original musical score by Fred Myrow is not as good as this
film should deserve, but this is compensated with the good
use of Grieg, Tchaikovsky and Beethoven in some very
powerful scenes.
All in all, SOYLENT GREEN truly deserved its reputation of
science fiction classic. As a science fiction film that
relies more on viewers' intelligence than special effects,
it represents something that is sorely missed in today's
Hollywood. And we should only hope that its reputation
wouldn't be diminished with uninspired remake like it had
happened with many other great movies from that era.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Léon (1994)
Few examples seem as appropriate for the phrase "style over
substance" as the career of French filmmaker Luc Besson. His
films earned great deal of popularity simply by looking
"cool" and flooding the audience with impressive sounds and
images, while seriously lacking coherent plot and character
development in the same time. Besson managed to solve at
least some of those problems in his 1990 film LE FEMME
NIKITA. However, it seems that Besson thought that at least
some characters of that film weren't sufficiently explored,
namely The Cleaner, played by Jean Reno. Four years later,
the variation of that character became the protagonist of
THE PROFESSIONAL, action film that is now mostly associated
with the career of Natalie Portman.
In this film Jean Reno plays Lon, man whose job description
might very well be summed up in the phrase "cleaner". He is
one of the deadliest hitmen in New York underworld, able to
complete even the most complicated and difficult tasks with
incredible efficiency and all that without trace. Lon's
professional success is in sharp contrast with the quiet and
utterly ascetic private life he mostly spends in his small
apartment. His 12-year old neighbour Mathilda (played by
Natalie Portman), on the other hand, has a lot of problems
with drug-dealing father (played by Michael Badaluco) and
the rest of her dysfunctional family. Things get even worse
when the family gets a visit from the group of corrupt DEA
agents, led by psychopathic Norman Stansfield (played by
Gary Oldman). Mathilda is the only survivor of the massacre
and she seeks the refuge behind her neighbour's door. Lon
takes her in and reluctantly agrees to shelter her until
things cool down. Mathilda is, on the other hand, quite
impressed when she finds about her protector's true
profession so she wants to use his talents in order to
avenge the death of her 4-year old brother. First she wants
to hire him, then she wants him to teach her skills of
"cleaner", while Lon, utterly inexperienced in personal
relationships, unsuccessfully tries to keep both of them
from trouble. However, presence of the girl begins to affect
Lon and he becomes to sees the previous emptiness of his
life. Stansfield in the meantime becomes aware that he left
the eyewitness during the massacre so the extremely violent
conflict between him and Lon becomes inevitable.
Besson again remains faithful to his reputation by filling
THE PROFESSIONAL with many visually impressive scenes and
very atmospheric and memorable music by his long-time
collaborator Eric Serra. Besson's talent is most visible in
action scenes, especially the final showdown, which is
probably one of the best-choreographed gun battles in the
past decade. However, old-fashioned phrase "style over
substance" still hurts this film and whenever Besson decides
to pay much attention to the plot and character development,
the lack of those particular talents becomes quite apparent.
Large amount of implausabilties in the Besson's screenplay
(it is really hard to imagine ultra-efficient yet illiterate
hitman in modern-day New York or said low- profile hitman
choosing to live next door to drug dealers) is the only part
of the problem. Greatest flaw of this film is Besson's
inability to decide how to handle the relationship between
12-year old girl and the hitman three times her age. Various
avenues - ordinary friendship, substitute parenting and even
Lolita-like relationship - are hinted, but never
sufficiently explored, so after the few scenes in the
beginning film meanders until violent finale brings some
sort of conclusion. However, the acting in this film superb,
especially in the case of Reno who seems as the perfect
choice for this role. Although young Natalie Portman shows a
lot of talent in her first feature film role, sometimes that
performance slips into overacting. Gary Oldman, on the other
hand, does his trademark psycho routine very well, while
Danny Aiello provides good contrast with his minimalist
approach to the role of Lon's mob contact Tony. Taking
everything into consideration, THE PROFESSIONAL seems to be
one of the most overrated films of the past decade, but
Besson's skills of action director are enough to guarantee
entertainment to those who like "artsy" approach to that
particular genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Mad Max 2: The Road Warrior (1981)
The author of this review considers late 1970s and early
1980s to be the Golden Age of Science Fiction cinema. In
that relatively short period we were introduced not only to
the best science fiction films in the history of the genre;
we were also witnessed somewhat rare phenomenon of sequels
being superior to the original movies. Of course, film
aficionados often ignore this phenomenon because the
original movies were classics as well. Best known example is
THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, 1980 sequel to original STAR WARS.
However, a year later the audience was introduced to the
sequel to MAD MAX, surprisingly successful action film from
Australia. MAD MAX 2, also known as THE ROAD WARRIOR, was
not just the superior to its original; it was also
remembered as one of the most influential films of its time.
Its great commercial success spawned the entirely genre of
post-apocalyptic action films that would, decades later,
lead to WATERWORLD and POSTMAN. It was also the film that
finally launched successful careers of its lead actor Mel
Gibson and director George Miller. THE ROAD WARRIOR was also
the film that finally showed that Australian filmmakers
could compete with Hollywood, which allowed Australians to
pride themselves with one of the most vital film industries
in the world.
Plot of this movie takes place few years after the events in
MAD MAX. Sorry state of the civilisation, only hinted in the
original, deteriorated into total collapse, following the
World War 3 that had deprived the world industries of
necessary fuel. All mechanism of the societal order had
crumbled and in the ensuing anarchy the roads became the
domain of gangs ready to wage wars over a single drop of
fuel. Max Roxatansky (played by Mel Gibson) is former
policeman who is roaming the wastelands of Australia with
his V8 Interceptor, living on canned dog food and often
having to fight just to live another day. Along the way he
meets a bizarre character Gyro Captain (played by Bruce
Spence) who informs him about the chance to get huge
quantity of fuel. Somewhere in the desert there is a still
operating oil refinery, run by Papagallo (played by Michael
Preston) and his followers. However, this group can't have
much use of their precious fuel because their compound is
being besieged by the gang led by evil Lord Houmungus
(played by Kjell Nilsson) and his psychotic lieutenant Wez
(played by Vernon Welles). Max decides to get part of that
fuel in exchange for helping Papagallo's people reaching
safety.
Few films could be cited as the better example of ingenious
and effective filmmaking than THE ROAD WARRIOR was. When
George Miller shot this film, the budget looked huge
compared with the original, yet it was shoestring with
similar Hollywood projects. However, same as in the case of
MAD MAX (with second-hand cars as good illustration of
industrial decay), lack of finances turned into advantage
for Miller. Locations of New South Wales, with unforgiving,
harsh nature and road as the single and almost unnoticeable
trace of civilisation, provided the perfect setting for this
tale of post-apocalyptic world (and provided a cliche later
overused by Miller's less inspired imitators). By creating
this world, inspired by Herrman's cult comic book JEREMIAH,
Miller didn't have to spend a lot of money - the
"futuristic" clothes, vehicles and buildings aren't
futuristic at all, since they have been simply scavenged
from the remains of the civilisation. However, what Miller
did with such details made all the difference. Most obvious
example is use of fashion for the purpose of
characterisation. Good guys wear white robes (except Max),
while Bad Guys have strange combination of punk rock
hairstyles and black leather clothes more appropriate for
the protagonists of BDSM videos (that would also later be
used as post- apocalyptic cliche).
Another thing that turns THE ROAD WARRIOR into the triumph
of creative filmmaking are the action scenes. The
post-apocalyptic world is rather unspectacular by itself;
but the brutal realities of such world - prospect of murder,
rape, pillage, all presented in very naturalistic and often
gory fashion - face the protagonists with the need to act
fast in order to survive. So, the film is full of superbly
edited, ingenious and suspenseful action scenes. One of the
excellent examples is the final battle, breathtaking yet
able to provide us with unexpected twists, black humour and
even the scene that could match Hitchcock's PSYCHO with the
shock value. And all that was done with small budget,
without computer graphics with small, but dedicated and
talented band of stuntmen doing most of the work. Those
scenes are extremely violent, but all that violence does
make sense in the context of the story.
Of course, that doesn't mean that this film lacks good
characters and plot. Some of the critics were put down by
the lack of dialogue and often considered this film as
nothing more than the cheap excuse for 90 minutes of
violence. It may look that way on the surface, but this film
has more depth that any other action film. First of all,
bleak future presented in this world didn't look that
fantastic for the audiences of the early 1980s; the new oil
crisis and resurrection of Cold War after the decade of
detante created rather pessimistic worldview in which the
collapse of civilisation really looked close. Same as CONAN
THE BARBARIAN, another forgotten and ignored masterpiece of
1981, THE ROAD WARRIOR dealt with society deprived of
civilisation. That was the perfect setting for Miller to
portray the eternal conflict between Men As They Should Be
and Men As They Are. The simple plot, borrowed from classic
westerns, provided an interesting and thought-provoking
contrast between two groups. On one hand we have Good Guys -
idealists who work very hard to keep the values of old
world, even when such values, like democracy, happen to be
rather impractical in the new circumstances. And while they
argue about their course of action, Bad Guys don't have any
dilemmas - those who don't have scruples and who use brute
power are those who are adapted for this world. Although the
viewers sympathise with the former, they know that the
latter would win.
Into this conflict comes the mysterious, lone figure in the
form of Mel Gibson. His character doesn't talk much, but his
actions are short, decisive and quite obvious, as well as
his motivation. But in the course of this film Max slowly
transforms into the real hero, the same one which inhabits
collective unconsciousness of every culture on this planet -
lone person that would make the difference and save people
from grave danger. His mythical figure is accompanied with
the whole bunch of interesting and memorable characters that
paint broad pictures with small gestures and details. We
have obligatory comic sidekick in the form of Bruce Spence
as Gyro Captain, who is less troubled with the collapse of
civilisation than with his personal sexual frustration. The
other characters are also fleshed-out (for example, child
actor Emil Ginty as Feral Kid and Virginia Hey foreshadowing
feminist role models of the 90ies as Warrior Woman) and it
is real shame that most of the actors playing them didn't
enhance their careers afterwards. The sole exception is
Vernon Welles, whose homosexual villain (rather rare thing
in cinema, especially these days) later brought him numerous
roles of heavies in 1980s.
THE ROAD WARRIOR, unfortunately, shared another thing with
CONAN THE BARBARIAN - infantilised and uninspired sequel in
mid- 1980s. However, those who really appreciate good,
thought provoking yet entertaining films would never fail to
see THE ROAD WARRIOR as true masterpiece.

Title
Review for Gandhi (1982)
Some films are remembered for the wrong reason. Case in
question is GANDHI, 1982 epic by Richard Attenborrough, a
movie which slipped from everyone's memory, except for the
rabid Spielberg fans, who never forgave Academy's snubbing of
E.T. The author of this review, on the other hand,
encountered another GANDHI-related outrage. But this time,
the man outraged was the old critic who lives in my home
town and who was deeply disturbed and saddened by an article
written by one of his young hot shot colleagues. According
to the article, GANDHI shouldn't have won the Oscars, but,
instead of praising E.T. like almost anybody else, the young
critic said that CONAN THE BARBARIAN, violent fantasy epic
by John Millius deserved "Oscars" more than GANDHI. The old
critic was shocked to see someone preferring film that
praises questionable Nietzschean values instead of epic with
the positive message of non-violence and religious
tolerance. The author of this review agrees with the young
critic; Millius in fact did make better film than
Attenborrough. On the other hand, I can sympathise with the
old critic, especially after some most unpleasant historical
experiences that enforced the need for more Gandhis in this
world. This little anecdote illustrates one of the biggest
problems that any critic can find with GANDHI - whether to
appraise the movie strictly by artistic standards, or by the
messages that it may carry to the audience.
The movie deals with biography of Mohandas Karamchand
Gandhi, one of the greatest and most influential men of the
20th Century. Film follows the most important parts of his
biography, beginning with Gandhi as Hindu lawyer in South
Africa. After experiencing racism towards Indian immigrants,
Gandhi assembles his countrymen and begins fight for equal
rights, making that the first non-violent campaign of
passive resistance. After his first political victory,
Gandhi returns to India where he would lead the peaceful
movement to liberate that country from centuries of British
rule. Under his leadership, the Indian independence movement
would adopt the strategy of non-violence that would later
prove to be the unsolvable problem to the British. During
the course of years, there would be bloodshed and setbacks,
but at the end India would acquire the independence.
Unfortunately, Gandhi's charisma wasn't strong enough to
bridge the widening gaps between India's two main religious
communities - majority Hindus and minority Muslims. Gandhi
was forced to witness his country partitioning into India
and Pakistan, and the indescribable violence that followed.
Desperately trying to stop the slaughter, Gandhi fell from
the hands of a Hindu fanatic.
Richard Attenborrough, British actor and director
specialised for biographies of great historical figures or
movies about important historical events, prepared more than
a two decades for this film. The film is dedicated to the
two great historical figures that didn't live to see
fulfilment of that dream - Gandhi's  comrade and future
Indian statesman Jawaharlal Nehru and last British viceroy
of India Lord Mountbatten (both of those characters appear
in the film). The sheer amount of time and energy invested
in this film was enough to brand it "larger than life".
These days, that phrase is reserved for the movies that
contain big pyrotechnics, special effects and hardly
anything else. In good old days, that GANDHI helps to
recreate, movie "larger than life" meant the movie that
possessed an inner greatness and that engaged viewers'
emotions in order to make them sit through the three hour
experience. Despite Attenborrough clearly not being able to
cover Gandhi's life and personality in its entirety (the
fact that the author admitted in the credits), this film
achieves that. Through those three hours we are indeed
engrossed with the events and feel the strength of Gandhi's
character and his ideals.
One of the reasons for that is the main lead. Hardly any
actor in the history of the movies managed to achieve such
identification with the character, as Ben Kingsley did with
Gandhi. That identification was so strong that even the
Indian extras during the shooting used to fall on their
knees like they were dealing with the real Gandhi instead of
the actor. Kingsley was good in that role - he made us feel
his triumphs, his doubts and finally his personal tragedy in
the end of the film. All other actors were shadowed by him -
giants like Trevor Howard or John Gielgud are reduced to wax
cameos. On the other hand, some Indian actors had
opportunity to excel, because their characters were more
developed - Rohini Hattagandy is good as Gandhi's wife
Kasturba, Roshan Seth is very believable Nehru, while Saeed
Jaffrey even brings some comic relief as Gandhi's comrade
Sardar Patel. Unfortunately, Attenborrough was forced to
ignore some of the Indian characters in favour of Western
ones, mostly in order to bring the character of Gandhi
closer to the Western audience. So, some of the very
important episodes of the film are seen through the eyes of
American reporters - played by Martin Sheen and Candice
Bergen.
The other major flaw of this film lies in the fact that the
biography of one man, no matter how important and grand,
can't substitute the history of a nation. The screenwriter
John Briley chose to concentrate on Gandhi solely, so in
many instances the complex history of India under British
rule was simplified or ignored. Such problems become
especially visible in the second part of the film, where the
independence struggle suddenly turns into senseless
religious slaughter. The film also lacks the proper
antagonist, necessary for any drama. British are presented
as series of clueless and incompetent bureaucrats; the only
exception is Ali Jinnah, Muslim politician who would become
the first leader of Pakistan (played by Alyque Padamsee).
The film authors implicitly blame him for the partition, and
such impression is given by confronting his manners of upper
class politician with the simple virtues of Gandhi.
Screenplay also failed to address the differences Gandhi and
Nehru had in their visions of India's future - the film
authors take Gandhi's views about Indian rural utopia for
granted. On the other hand, such omissions can be justified;
the film is powerful anyway, and making Gandhi's story more
complex would just alienate the viewers. And the world,
which would mark half a century without Gandhi in couple of
weeks, really needs this film.

Title
Review for War of the Worlds, The (1953)
Whenever a superior civilisation, state or life form
encounter its inferior counterpart, the latter is almost
always subdued or eradicated by brutal force. At least, that
was the case with the state of international politics in
late 19th Century when H.G. Wells tried to speculate about
such practices on inter-planetary level. The result was THE
WAR OF THE WORLDS, one of the first classical sci-fi novels
that, like THE TIME MACHINE by the same authors, established
the sub-genre of First Contact stories. Images created by
that novel later proved almost prophetic, in the
unimaginable and utter destruction of two world wars. The
technology of the destruction was man- made, but for the
victims, faced with certain destruction by unstoppable and
technically superior machines, it didn't make any
difference. The proof for that came in the form of famous
radio-adaptation by Orson Welles, when the ensuing panic
pre-ceded later horrors of London Blitz, Dresden and
Hiroshima. The same feeling of fear and helplessness in
front of the superior technology also resonated well with
the anxieties of people in the atomic era, who used to live
in the shadow of Cold War. Such atmosphere brought third
incarnation of THE WAR OF THE WORLDS, this time in the form
of a 1953 science fiction movie, directed by Byron Haskin
and produced by George Pal, one of the legends of that
particular genre.
The film begins with the narration by Cedric Hardwicke that
describes Mars as the planet of superior, yet dying
civilisation, desperate for rich resources of Earth.
Martians are studying Earth and preparing for the invasion.
First Martian probe lands in small Californian town of Linda
Rosa. Group of scientists from a nearby observatory, led by
Clayton Forrester (played by Gene Barry), comes to
investigate, but the object is too hot and, before it cools
off, Forrester takes much more interest in Sylvia Van Buren
(played by Ann Robinson), daughter of the local priest. In
the mean time, the crew of Martian probe awakens and the
three local policemen guarding the site are the first to be
pulverised with deadly Martian beams. Seeing Martians as
hostile, authorities bring the military, but the best
equipment of this world is powerless against the invaders
from another world. Soon, the world is full of similar
Martian crafts that start their unstoppable reign of
destruction. While the governments of the world are working
desperately to stop the invasion and apparent annihilation
of the humanity, Forrester and Sylvia are trying to escape
Martians that are now roaming the ground, outside their
vessels. After they reach relative safety of Los Angeles,
Forrester and his colleagues are trying to devise a weapon
that would prove to be effective against Martians. But when
even the atom bomb proves useless against Martians, all hope
seems to be gone.
THE WAR OF THE WORLDS was one of the most successful science
fiction films of its time. Its popularity came partly
because the script seemed very much in line with the anxiety
of the times, as well as with the traumatic memories of WW2.
But the main reason was probably in the special effects,
that were state-of-the-art for its times, and that could
even be impressive today. The popularity of this film later
transformed into cult status among the genre aficionados,
and many successful and important science fiction films of
the later age were heavily influenced with it. The example
most often referenced is Spielberg's CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE
THIRD KIND, although mostly in a visual sense, because those
two films are extremely different in their depictions of
First Contact and human reaction to the unknown.
When THE WAR OF THE WORLDS gets compared with another film
that was heavily influenced by it, Devlin and Emmerich's
INDEPENDENCE DAY, it becomes clearly obvious why the former
is regarded as important classic and latter as nothing more
than forgettable "thrillride of the summer". Its director
Haskin was hardly a top Hollywood director, but the group of
talented artists provided a whole series of memorable,
spectacular and even today very effective scenes, especially
those involving destruction of the cities and panic in the
streets. The script itself, written by Barre Lyndon, wasn't
so successful. Many times story meanders along unecessary
subplots, especially those involving obligatory romance
between the macho scientist and damsel in distress. The
ending, although based on the original novel, seems somewhat
too melodramatic and deus ex machina. And I don't think that
H.G. Wells, known for his atheistic beliefs, would be too
enthusiastic about its heavy religious overtones. But,
despite those flaws, and despite the fact that it was firmly
in the B movies category, THE WAR OF THE WORLDS is a classic
that should be seen by anyone who really likes genre of
science fiction in the cinema.
Review written on September 27th 1999

Title
Review for TekWar: TekLords (1994) (TV)
Rapid progress of information technology in last few
decades, like any other phenomenon, had its negative side
effects. One of the most obvious among them is creation and
spreading of computer viruses. Their destructive potential
has increased as rapidly as our global society became
dependant on said information technology and many believe
that viruses are going to be cause of major disasters in the
decades to come. However, few of those viruses are going to
be as mean and destructive as the one unleashed in the
opening scenes of TEKWAR: TEKLORDS, 1994 TV movie, second in
the series based on the TEKWAR science fiction novels by
William Shatner. Their protagonist, former policeman Jake
Cardigan (played by Greg Evigan), had fought dealers of Tek
- electronic substitute for old chemical narcotics. Now he
is faced with another menace - intelligent virus which
doesn't affect only software but also human beings who have
misfortune to get in touch with it. As the virus begins to
work its way through global computer networks, Cardigan must
also deal with some more personal issues concerning his son
and former wife, as well as with former Tek lord Sonny
Hokori (played by Van Flores) who might have something to do
with the new phenomena.
TEKWAR: TEKLORDS represents huge disappointment for every
viewer who had expected the same quality as its predecessor
TEKWAR, rather decent little TV movie directed by Shatner
himself. The second film was directed by seasoned Canadian
TV director George Bloomfield who managed to keep most of
TEKWAR's cyberpunk atmosphere thanks to CGI effects yet
failed to remedy huge defficiencies of Morgan Grendel's
script. Story of TEKWAR: TEKLORDS is burdened with
predictable situations, cheap melodrama and especially
disappointing deus ex machina ending. Even the acting is bad
compared with the first film, and TEKWAR: TEKLORDS might
give arguments to all those who had dismissed the whole
series based on the already unenviable reputation of
Shatner's books.

Title
Review for Fearless (1993)
One of the things that make psychology so fascinating is the
fact that the same events create different reactions to
different people. This is case even with the worst possible
traumas, when the most experienced psychologists have
difficulties dealing with psychological aftermath. FEARLESS,
1993 drama directed by Peter Weir, represents the study of
one of such characters permanently altered with such
experience.
The movie is based on the novel by Rafael Yglesias, who
wrote the script. Max Klein (played by Jeff Bridges) has
just survived the terrible plane crash, which left many of
his co-passengers dead. Klein helps other survivors to leave
the burning plane and afterwards simply wonders off, not
even bothering to tell his wife Laura (played by Isabella
Rosselini) that he is alive. Afterwards he is found, brought
back to his family, but his wife can't fail to notice that
her husband is a totally changed man. Max escaped certain
death and now he thinks of himself as invulnerable and
godlike. Airline-appointed psychologist Bill Perlman (played
by John Turturro) can't reach him, but Klein, who became
totally alienated from his family, finds spiritual
connection with Carla Rodrigo (played by Rosie Perez),
grief-stricken mother whose child died in the same plane
crash.
FEARLESS, same as many other movies by Peter Weir, is hardly
experience which could leave viewers with smiles on their
faces. It is grim, uncompromising drama that deals with
death and makes the audience think about arbitrary nature of
that unavoidable fact of life. This is achieved through the
sharp contrast between two characters who are differently
affected with the same event, both in their soul and in the
ways they communicate with outside world. Max, who is
excellently played by Jeff Bridges, might see himself as a
person who cheated death, but since he can't connect with
the outside world anymore, his freedom is only superficial -
for all the loved ones he might be dead, nothing more than a
stranger dwelling in his body. Rosie Perez is also very good
as survivor whose guilt and grief make her not only very
alive, but the only person able to bring back emotionally
dead Max to the world of living. Unfortunately, Weir has
some problems in pacing of the film, and the large segments
on the film being wasted on unnecessary subplots or
characters, like John Turturro's therapist or money-grabbing
attorney played by Tom Hulce. The hallucinatory ending
doesn't answer questions about the nature of Max's
experience, and although some films might benefit from
leaving some questions opened, FEARLESS is not one of them.
But it could still be recommended as one of those rare
Hollywood examples of thought-provoking cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Magnificent Seven, The (1960)
In former Yugoslavia, generally speaking, the best or the
most popular television shows were produced by Serbian state
television. However, there were shows produced by other
republics' studios that successfully competed with Belgrade
television. SMOGOVCI, children's show about Zagreb family,
produced by Croatian television, was one of such examples,
which turned into the most popular and longest running
television series in these areas. Secret of its success,
together with good script and acting, was clever use of pop
culture references. Among them, the most obvious one was
musical theme used in the show's opening credits -
"borrowed" by Elmer Bernstein. The theme, which is now
always associated with the genre of western thanks to
Marlborough commercials, was written for THE MAGNIFICENT
SEVEN, 1960 film by John Sturges and one of the most popular
westerns of all time.
The plot of the film isn't original, since THE MAGNIFICENT
SEVEN happens to be the remake of SEVEN SAMURAI, 1954
classic by great Japanese director Akira Kurosawa. The
characters and situations are mostly the same, but the
setting is different. First we are introduced to a Mexican
village, populated by simple but hard-working farmers.
Fruits of their labour are, however, always being taken away
by the large group of bandits led by Calvera (played by Eli
Wallach) which comes every year. After the latest visit, the
villagers had enough and desperately want to get rid of such
menace. But, since they lack weapons and skills to resist
the bandits, village leaders ask the Old Man (played by
Vladimir Sokoloff) for an advice. He tells them to gather
the every coin and other precious belongings they still have
in the village and head across US border in order to hire
gunslingers. They follow his advice and stumble upon a man
who fits their criteria - Chris Adams (played by Yul
Brynner), efficient gunslinger who is noble enough to accept
their job offer. He quickly begins assembling his team,
whose members agree to follow him for reasons different than
money, since the pay is low. Chico (played by Horst
Buchholz), the youngest of them, is not gunfighter at all,
and wants to follow the group only to learn their deadly
trade. The group - now numbering seven - arrives in the
village and starts preparing for the inevitable showdown.
Remaking the indisputable classics like SEVEN SAMURAI is
always rather thankless job for the filmmakers. However,
four decades ago Hollywood was still able to produce at
least decent remakes. In this case, John Sturges, very
experienced director of classic westerns, didn't bother to
add anything significantly new to Kurosawa's plot and the
script by William Roberts and William Bernstein is very
faithful to original when it comes to characters and
situations. Those who had watched Kurosawa's version would
experience a lot of deja vus when they watch THE MAGNIFICENT
SEVEN, but Sturges found a way to compensate the lack of
originality by using resources Kurosawa had not. First of
all, Sturges is using colour photography, as well as exotic
Mexican locations with impressive scenery and local
folklore. Then, there is aforementioned music by Elmer
Bernstein. Finally, length of the film is drastically
trimmed (two hours compared to 200 minutes in Kurosawa's
original cut) and the cast is more acceptable to the average
Western audience.
The ensemble cast of THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN didn't look very
stellar in its time, but the actors who played the seven
gunmen later became legends, mostly thanks to the big break
in this film. Yul Brynner, the nominal lead, was perfect for
the role of Chris Adams with his commanding presence, and
the black clothes (including the hat) he wore in this film
would later became one of his iconic trademarks - ironically
used by the same actor in 1973 sci-fi thriller WESTWORLD.
The other six members of his crew were young unknowns at the
time, but each of them was memorable; the characters they
played were unique, either because different motives or
different character traits. Some of those actors became
action legends, like Steve McQueen and Charles Bronson. Some
never became top stars but instead earned reputation of
respected character actors, like James Coburn and Robert
Vaughn (the latter one actually reprised his role in BATTLE
BEYOND THE STARS, 1980 science fiction remake). Some never
used this big break, like Brad Dexter who would later sink
into obscurity. Buchholz, who had the hardest job by playing
role already immortalised by Toshiro Mifune, actually did
his part well, and although he didn't become big Hollywood
star, this moment in his career foreshadowed his future
successes in Europe. Eli Wallach as Mexican bandit did his
part also well, but his character wasn't fleshed out enough
in the script; on the other hand, his performance
foreshadows the immortal role of Tuco in Leone's THE GOOD,
THE BAD AND THE UGLY.
The performances in this film are very good, and shootouts
and action scenes were also exciting and well directed. But,
on the other hand, film still lacks texture and at times
seems too preachy compared with Kurosawa's original. Some of
the situations are even melodramatic and somewhat
predictable. Sturges did his job very well, but he still
couldn't escape the shadow of Kurosawa. But, on the other
hand, remaking SEVEN SAMURAI was justified, and three more
versions, as well as popular TV show, are the proof this
plot's universality. And, despite the flaws, THE MAGNIFICENT
SEVEN earned its reputation of the essential western
classic.

Title
Review for Equinox (1992)
Stories about identical twins separated at birth provide
excellent comedy material for millennia. However, when it
comes to drama or similar material of serious nature,
results are usually much worse. One of such examples is
EQUINOX, 1992 drama directed by Alan Rudolph.
Two twins (played by Matthew Modine in dual role) are Freddy
Ace, hit man and enforcer working for the mob boss Mr. Paris
(played by Fred Ward), and Tony Petosa, humble car mechanic
who works in the garage by his adopted father Pete (played
by M. Emmet Walsh). Two twins don't know about each other
and live completely different lives - Freddy is arrogant
gangster with rich apartment and trophy wife Sharon (played
by Lori Singer) who dreams about becoming boss, while shy
Tony has problems in the relationship with his girlfriend
Beverly Frank (played by Lara Flynn Boyle). Connection
between the two is discovered by morgue attendant and
wannabe writer Sonya Kirk (played by Tyra Farrell) who is
convinced that the twins are actually illegitimate children
of European aristocrat and set to inherit great fortune.
While majority of the filmmakers tends to treat audience
like idiots, Alan Rudolph goes to the other extreme. At
least this is the case in this film with plot and characters
understandable only to people with superhuman intelligence
or those ready to spend entire lifetime trying to decipher
its meaning. EQUINOX features plenty of bizarre characters,
some interesting scenes and situations, but only few of them
are actually connected to each other or make any sense. This
problem is alleviated by bad acting, especially by Matthew
Modine whose uninspired performance creates a lot of
confusion in the beginning, since the audience isn't aware
that he actually plays two different characters. Other
characters are either not necessary or not fleshed out, and
because of that EQUINOX is hardly anything else than
overpretentious "artsy" failure of movie.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for East of Eden (1955)
In 20th Century one of the easiest ways for people to become
immortal came in the form of early, premature death. At
least, that was the case with celebrities, which became
legends sometimes simply by dying before showing all their
potentials. One of the best known examples is, of course,
James Dean. He died at the age of 24 and had only three
major roles, but those three roles were enough for him to
become one of the most recognisable Hollywood icons. Perhaps
his cult status came from the simple fact that his image of
rebel youth remained untarnished by all age, and universally
appealing for all future generations. That may be true, but
also few people should forget that Dean was one of the
greatest actors of its time, if not one of the greatest
actors who ever worked in Hollywood. His talent is displayed
in his first major film, EAST OF EDEN, 1954 drama directed
by Elia Kazan.
Plot of this film, based on the novel by John Steinbeck, is
set in California during World War One. Adam Trask (played
by Raymond Massey) is a ranch owner in Salinas Valley,
righteous and noble man whose respect in the community is
undiminished even after disastrous business venture.
Everyone around Adam seems to be happy except his son Cal
(played by James Dean), troubled young man who was always
jealous of the love and attention his brother Aron (played
by Richard Davalos) receives from his father. His jealousy
was recently inflamed with his feelings towards Aron's
girlfriend Abra (played by Julie Harris), as well as with
frustrating discovery of estranged mother Kathie (played by
Jo Van Fleet), owner of the brothel in nearby town. In Cal's
mind, the only way to earn love and respect of his father
lies in a business venture that would compensate father's
recent losses. His scheme, that includes borrowing money
from mother and investing in beans, business made lucrative
by war, is successful but it actually causes a chain of
events with tragic consequences.
I never read Steinbeck's novel, but long time ago I've been
watching 1981 four-hour mini-series based on it. That
series, naturally, covered much larger territory than
Kazan's cinema version, and, consequently, all who watch the
latter one can't help noticing lack of many interesting
subplots, situations and characters. Compared with
television version, 1954 script by Paul Osborn looks barren
and simplistic, and the story sometimes have biblical
elements that are too obvious. On the other hand, despite
that, EAST OF EDEN still has strong dramatic potentials, and
director Kazan uses that by assembling terrific cast which
gave memorable performances.
The only one awarded by "Oscar" for this film was Raymond
Massey as virtuous Adam, and his role is really engaging,
since it requires whole set of different emotional states -
from patriarchal stoicism, across despair towards final and
inner serenity. But, the real star of this film is,
naturally, James Dean. He was simply perfect to play this
part, because troubled, neurotic Cal in many ways resembles
misfit, rebellious 1950s youth in America - generation whose
icon Dean later became. Dean used method acting to the full
extent (with Kazan making deliberately him drunk during the
shooting of one scene), and although, especially in the
beginning, his mannerism could slide into overacting, in the
end it rewards our patience with strong emotional impact. Jo
Van Fleet, who played his mother, received a "Oscar"
nomination, but her performance, although good, didn't
deserve it, at least not compared with underrated role by
Julie Harris. Harris, who would later be remembered most by
her role in 1963 version of HAUNTING, was perfect for the
role of Abra; she portrays her as plain looking yet
attractive all-American girl, the only person that can find
understanding for troubled Cal, since deep under her
righteous surface she shares his frustrations.
Since he had such a good cast, Kazan probably thought that
he shouldn't much bother with the visual details. EAST OF
EDEN looks plain in all scenes that don't feature actors,
and even some that do aren't best directed. Idea to
symbolise conflict and the twisted states of mind through
unusual camera angles was already used by other directors
and here it gives impression of artificiality that was quite
unnecessary for this film. On the other hand, Kazan in this
film used opportunity to comment on some darker sides of
American society. EAST OF EDEN is one of the rare films that
deal with anti-German chauvinist hysteria that erupted in
USA immediately after American entry into WW1. Although
apocryphal in the context of this film, this subplot would
be quite interesting for some who are still troubled with
the way USA treated its Japanese citizens in the next world
war, as well for those who are still undecided about Kazan's
own role during McCarthy hearings.
But, I doubt that many would watch EAST OF EDEN with such
heavy thoughts on their mind. James Dean is still the main
reason why should we enjoy this very good example of 1950s
cinema.

Title
Review for Romper Stomper (1992)
In today's world, where movies are entertainment before
anything else, there are fewer and fewer directors who dare
to tackle unpleasant subjects. However, the real test of
filmmaker's courage comes when unpleasant issues are
approached from even less pleasant perspectives. Such
efforts, especially in the climate of "political
correctness", can often create public misunderstanding and
controversies. One of such examples is ROMPER STOMPER,
Australian drama directed by Geoffrey Wright in 1992. Simply
because it dealt certain form of social pathology from
rather unconventional angle, this film was accused of being
too sympathetic towards it and it took festival awards to
silence the critics. These days the film is less known for
its controversies and more because of its principal actor,
Russell Crowe, whose role in it was probably the most
impressive before his future Hollywood triumphs in L.A.
CONFIDENTIAL and GLADIATOR.
The plot begins in Melbourne, town towards which flow the
endless river of Asian, mostly Vietnamese, immigrants who
gradually take over entire neighbourhoods. For many
impoverished and unemployed white youths Asians are
convenient explanation for their own misery, so some
accepted the most extreme form of xenophobic racism and
became skinheads. The small group led by charismatic Hando
(played by Russell Crowe) is just one of many that fight a
war for racial purity by mercilessly beating any Asian
unfortunate to be in their proximity. After a while,
Vietnamese decide that they had enough so they organise and
start fighting back. Hando's group is suddenly faced with
superior numbers and starts to fall apart. Hando and his
lieutenant Davey (played by John Pollock) are forced to run
from Melbourne in order to save their lives. The only
assistance comes in the form of Gabe (played by Jacqueline
Mackenzie), epileptic young woman from well-to-do family,
but her presence would turn out to be the reason of Hando's
final downfall.
While people usually associate skinheads with Germany, the
phenomenon is more widespread. Even Serbia, the country that
tends to boast with its anti-Nazi past, has witnessed
emergence of local skinheads and Great Britain, another
country that was often cited as example of racial harmony,
has recently seen explosion of racial violence and increased
popularity of far right political options. This obviously
global phenomenon receives somewhat unusual and rather risky
treatment in ROMPER STOMPER - instead of taking the easy
route and showing skinheads as brainless and worthless
losers who embraced racism as a way to give some kind of
importance to their sorry existence, Wright takes the hard
route and shows skinheads through their own eyes. In the
process the viewer is not only in position to be acquainted
with very authentic-looking subculture of skinheads and
their way of life (that may be quite seductive for
unemployed and impoverished urban youths), but also with the
whole philosophy preached by Hando and their ilk. While
doing this, Wright nevertheless manages not to romanticise
skinheads - the violence in film is extremely graphic and in
the end skinheads are presented as nothing more than thugs
while powerful yet ironic finale might be viewed as their
final condemnation.
ROMPER STOMPER is at times very powerful and
thought-provoking film, but this impression might be diluted
with some of less fortunate creative decisions. Whole
character of Gabe and the subplot involving her father looks
like an unnecessary diversion from the main story.
Furthermore, otherwise impressive musical score by John
Clifford White doesn't fit well with punk songs that often
play at the wrong scenes. However, Wright was fortunate
enough to have extremely good cast led by Russell Crowe who
is brilliant in playing the character who is charismatic
leader and violent simpleton in the same time. However,
Crowe's performance is outshined by Jacqueline Mackenzie,
one of the most talented Australian actresses, here playing
the complex role of the character that is sexually
attractive and emotionally repulsive in the same time. Her
partner Daniel Pollock (who committed suicide before the
release of the film) is also very impressive in the role of
Hando's lieutenant Davey. All in all, ROMPER STOMPER,
through its naturalistic and unrelenting portrayal of modern
society's darker side, represents one of the most
interesting and most impressive films made in previous
decade.
Review written on September 22nd 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Specialist, The (1994)
Phrase "high concept" are profanity in the vocabulary of
many of today's film critics. But even such, most despised
category of Hollywood bad movies has certain layers of
sub-categories. There are "high concept" movies based on a
single idea, or single storyline or plot. In case of THE
SPECIALIST, 1994 action thriller directed by Luis Llosa
there wasn't even such original idea. High concept was
simply in pairing two popular actors of the time - action
superstar Sylvester Stallone and blonde bombshell Sharon
Stone. Result was, of course, predictable, but hardly anyone
expected the critics to massacre film with such ferocity.
Stallone here plays Ray Quick, CIA bomb expert who retired
after accidentally killing innocent people and now lives in
Miami with his cat. Sharon Stone plays May Munro, beautiful
woman determined to avenge the deaths of her parents, killed
by Miami crime lord Tomas Leon (played by Eric Roberts). Two
of them never meet, but they exchange messages through BBS.
Ray agrees to use his talents in order to help her get her
revenge and begins the bombing campaign against the bad
guys. That bombing campaign would bring the attention of
Ray's old and corrupt colleague Ned Trent (James Woods), who
is ready to mobilise entire Miami police force to get him.
Later, it would turn out that May's motives aren't so clear.
Based on the novel by John Shirley, the screenplay by
Alexandra Seros offers standard, formulaic plot with
cardboard characters and couple or predictable plot twists.
The actors aren't very interested in their roles - Stallone
is wooden, and Sharon Stone (unlike in her future roles)
offers nothing more than her good looks. Speaking about
later, film also features steamy sex scene between two
protagonists, the element almost obligatory in any major
production Ms. Stone had during the particular period of her
career. The scene was well-done, but bellow the standards
set by Verhoeven in BASIC INSTINCT. Other actors are also
rather unispired, to say the least - Roberts plays standard
cardboard villain, and veteran Rod Steiger is laughable as
Latino godfather. The show is stolen by James Woods whose
overacting scenes actually brings some life into this dull
and predictable motion picture. The explosions are, however,
well-done, although some of the special effects seem corny.
Not interested in plot and characters, director Llosa, who
used to do much better work in SNIPER, tries to make
impression by providing noirish atmosphere of Miami. That
effort partially fails, and the musical score by John Barry,
which is good as always, only reminds the audience that
there were much better films out there. There are, of
course, much worse films out there, and this film perhaps
didn't deserve its horrible reputation, but very few people
should have to endure watching THE SPECIALIST just in order
to come to such conclusion.

Title
Review for Artists and Models (1955)
Most recent revelations about Columbine High School
shootings would probably give new fuel to the endless debate
about the role of popular media in the increase of youth
violence in USA. This debate, however, isn't anything new.
Four decades ago eminent psychologists, religious leaders
and politicians were fighting another, yet very similar,
crusade against violence in popular entertainment. Their
objects were comic books, targeted as the prime cause of
rising level of violence and pathological behaviour among
American youths. Contemporary Hollywood mostly ignored such
debate, which would later establish new standards of
self-censorship in American comic book industry. The only
exception was ARTISTS AND MODELS, 1955 film by Frank
Tashlin, which actually used it as a backdrop for one of the
silliest and funniest comedies of its time.
The plot deals with two struggling Greenwich Village artists
and best childhood friends. Rick Todd (played by Dean
Martin) wants to become a famous painter, and Eugene
Fullstack (played by Jerry Lewis) wants to publish his
children's books. Unfortunately, somewhere along the way,
Eugene became obsessed with Bat Lady comic books - he spends
all his time reading them and, as a result, he can't keep
jobs. Which is even worse for Todd, who shares apartment
with him, violent content of these comic books caused Eugene
to have very graphic nightmares every night. His dreams, on
the other hand, come closer to reality, because Abigail
Parker (played by Dorothy Malone), the author of the Bat
Lady comic books, lives in the same building, together with
Bessie Sparrowbrush (played by Shirley MacLaine), girl who
works as a model for Bat Lady. While Eugene must distinguish
his fantasies from reality, Rick is more down-to-earth -he
finds that Eugene's nightmares could serve as an excellent
basis for his own violent comic books. Such comic books
become instant success, but the secret formula mentioned in
them brings attention of FBI and foreign spies.
At first glance, ARTIST AND MODELS looks like a disorganised
mess of a movie - plot is weak, almost non-existent, and
serves only as an excuse for the series of gags and musical
numbers. Characterisation is also weak - we are to believe
that Eugene is sensitive enough to write nothing other than
children's books, yet in the same time he is obsessed with
more violent Bat Lady comic books. Romantic pairings between
characters are also predictable. Feminists would probably
frown upon Amy, strong professional woman, being portrayed
as artist to Rick, as well as totally defenceless towards
his manly charm. Their anger, on the other hand, would be
compensated with Eugene being the passive side in the
relationship with Bessie. At the end, Cold War subplot
involving Space Race and espionage makes the film longer
than it should be. But, all those flaws are compensated
thanks to the excellent team consisted of three very
different talents. Jerry Lewis and his clownish image,
suitable for visual humour is nicely contrasted with his
more earthly partner Dean Martin and his verbal cynicism.
Their different but symbiotic personalities are used by
Frank Tashlin staged elaborate and very funny gags thanks to
his own experiences of cartoonist. All that provide a lot of
laughs, with humour still working despite being somewhat
tame by today's standards. And even the song numbers work,
thanks to Dean Martin's singing talent.
Additional laughs in this film come when we take into
account future events. Brief REAR WINDOW reference
foreshadows Tarantinoesque homages of 1990s. Space Race
subplot with American generals boasting about their country
being the first one to send man-made object into the
universe was probably not that entertaining after Sputnik
hysteria two years later. And Shirley MacLaine here plays
character obsessed with astrology, numerology and other
parascientific disciplines, not very different from the
actress herself two or three decades later. All in all,
ARTISTS AND MODELS is one of those brilliant examples of Old
Hollywood craftsmanship - film that aged like wine, still
being able to entertain the audience after almost half a
century.

Title
Review for Sirens (1994)
The author of this review, same as any other heterosexual
male, doesn't mind seeing beautiful women in the state of
partial of complete undress. However, when such sights are
appearing in the movies, enjoyment of these particular
scenes is sometimes spoiled when it becomes obvious that
they don't make any sense apart from pleasing male audience.
Movies with non-exploitative nudity seldom appear and even
rarer are those where nudity itself becomes one of the main
elements without which the film wouldn't make any sense. One
of such examples is SIRENS, Australian comedy directed in
1994 by John Duigan.
The plot of the film is inspired by the incident in the
biography of Norman Lindsay (played by Sam Neill), 20th
Century Australian artist who gained controversial
reputation by challenging moral standards of the time by
using explicitly erotic images in his paintings. In 1930 one
of such paintings, "Crucified Venus", is about to be
exhibited in Sydney. Anglican Church authorities view the
painting as too blasphemous for public exhibition and young
Rev. Anthony Campion (played by Hugh Grant), who had just
arrived from England, is sent to visit Lindsay at his estate
in Australian Blue Mountains and try to talk him over from
displaying the controversial image in public. When Campion,
accompanied by his young wife Estella (played by Tara
Fitzgerald), arrives to Lindsay's home, he would find the
artist, his wife and two children living together with three
young beautiful girls that serve as models. Soon it becomes
obvious that Lindsay won't change his mind, but the train
derailment forces Campions to prolong their stay at
Lindsay's home. During that time, in a hedonistic and
carefree atmosphere of the estate surrounded by enchantingly
beautiful Australian landscape, both Anthony and Estella
experience events that would start changing their views on
love, marriage and sexuality.
Many critics were tempted to view SIRENS as nothing more
than soft core pornography wrapped in the package of
"serious" film. At first glance, those critics might have a
point - the plot is weak or almost non-existent and in many
instances the conflict between sexuality and conventional
morality is illustrated with rather predictable situations
and gags, recycled from Bocaccio, D.H. Lawrence or even West
European "sex comedies" of 1970s. But Duigan justifies that
with the great sense of style and generally humanistic
approach to the story and characters. SIRENS doesn't feature
any sort of villains - even the conservatives, who are
supposed to be adversaries to Lindsay and his liberal views,
are presented as misguided but generally nice folks - Church
uses diplomacy instead of trying to force its way, and
Lindsay's redneck neighbours compensate their bigotry with
common-sense approach to life and manliness of their local
boys. The humour in the film seems incredibly restrained and
decent, at least compared with average Hollywood films that
would tackle sexuality as one of its subjects.
The two best known actors of the film - Sam Neill and Hugh
Grant - are something of a disappointment in this film.
Neill barely appears in the film, except in the scenes in
which his character fights ideological wars with the priest,
while Grant plays the same character he had played in dozens
of 1990s films. The pleasant surprise of this film are
actresses. The best known of them is fashion supermodel Elle
Fitzgerald. This was her first major role and she gained
extra pounds in order to give Rubenesque proportion to her
figure and thus her character physically resembling the
beauty standards of 1930s. The acting job in the role of
mischievous model Sheela was perhaps not as impressive, but
it was more than decent as far beyond the accomplishments of
other supermodels that tried acting. Portia de Rossi was
also good in the role of Giddy, the most naive and the least
"corrupted" of all three models. But the greatest acting
asset of the film was Tara Fitzgerald, who again appeared
with Hugh Grant one year later in THE ENGLISHMAN WHO WENT UP
THE HILL AND CAME DOWN THE MOUNTAIN. Here Fitzgerald
presented a lot of her acting talent, as well as her body.
Her figure, that seems so small compared to voluptuous
figures of Macpherson and Kate Fischer (who played Pru,
model who embraced Communist ideology), is used by Duigan as
a tool of character development - final liberation of that
character comes when Estella starts seeing that body as
equal to the models. The last shot of the film neatly
combines the beauty of Fitzgerald, Macpherson and other
ladies with the beauty of Australian landscape. Duigan had
the eye for such pretty sights, and he also utilised
Lindsay's real life home as authentic location. In some
instances, the symbolism was too obvious and some jokes
(like the stories about citizens of Australia being killed
by various wild animals) didn't exactly work, but SIRENS is
nevertheless very stylish and entertaining film that should
be recommended even to those viewers who are indifferent
towards seeing beautiful women naked.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Rear Window (1954)
Cinema as an art form owes its popularity and very existence
to the fact that human beings tend to like experiencing
things, people and situations they are not likely to
encounter in their normal lives. That natural curiosity
becomes especially appealing in situations that don't
require physical contact nor have any direct consequences.
That lack of immediate contact or consequences is often
enough to turn some banal, ordinary images and situations
into interesting experiences. This psychological phenomenon
was until recently branded as nothing more than sexual
anomaly called "voyeurism". In modern world, success of
tabloids and reality TV shows like BIG BROTHER indicate that
voyeuristic tendencies have more universal appeal and that
they couldn't be brushed off as mere sexual perversion. One
of the cinema authors who understood that and based some of
his greatest films on it is Alfred Hitchcock. REAR WINDOW,
his 1954 thriller, often cited as one of the greatest film
ever made, could be seen as some kind of ode to voyeurism.
The film is based on the story by Cornell Woolrich and
screenplay by John Michael Hayes. Plot takes place in one
Greenwhich Village apartment, occupied by L.B. "Jeff"
Jeffries (played by James Stewart), adventurous photographer
who broke his left leg while trying to make an action shot
during the auto races. Now he is wheelchair-bound in his
little Greenwich Village apartment. The only form of
entertainment comes in the form of rear window, which
provides excellent view to the apartments surrounding the
courtyards. Because of summer heat and lack of air
conditioning, most of the windows are open and shades never
closed, so Jeff can watch private lives of his neighbours
almost all the time. This provides insight into many real
life dramas, including unhappy marriage between jeweller
Lars Thorwald (played by Raymond Burr) and his nagging bed-
ridden wife. That drama becomes most interesting after Mrs.
Thorwald disappears, and Jeff is soon convinced that her
husband murder had killed her and began disposing the body.
His old friend and police detective Lieutenant Thomas J.
Doyle (played by Wendell Corey) doesn't share Jeffries'
suspicions and demands more proofs before he could launch
the official investigation. On the other hand, Lisa Carol
Fremont (played by Grace Kelly), glamorous fashion
consultant and Jeff's love interest, and his nurse Stella
(played by Thelma Ritter) are more open-minded and volunteer
to help him in his gathering of evidence.
REAR WINDOW was made by Hitchcock during the zenith of his
career - 1950s and early 1960s - time when he became object
of worship among film critics and established cult following
he enjoys until this day. This film clearly demonstrates why
Hitchcock enjoys such reputation. Like in many of his
classic thrillers of that period, relatively simple mystery
plot is opportunity for Hitchcock to deal with some more
interesting topics like alienation or aberrant sexuality.
Actually, this film explores sexual themes with boldness
quite unusual for 1950s standards. Many of the real life
dramas that entertain the protagonist explicitly or
implicitly deal with twisted sexuality - newlywed young man
(played by Rand Harper) must deal with his wife's sexual
insatiability; Miss Lonely Heart (played by Havis Davenport)
can't express her own sexuality; Miss Torso (played by
Georgine Darcy) is an exhibitionist; couple who sleeps on
fire escape (played by Sara Berner and Frank Cady) uses
their dog as surrogate for children, implicitly suffering
from sterility; struggling songwriter (played by Ross
Bagdarasian) is suffering from writer's block which could be
read as metaphor for impotence. Even the protagonists have
problems that could be viewed as sexual - Jeff, apart from
his obvious voyeurism, is also faced with impotence, while
his glamorous girlfriend might be viewed as cold, distant
and frigid. Hitchcock, whose best film were dealing with
various forms of sexual aberrations, explored not single,
but many of such phenomena.
Another Hitchcock's trademark in his golden phase was
inclination towards experiment. REAR WINDOW represents
exactly one of such occasions when he decided to use
unconventional structure of film. Entire plot takes place in
a single room, and the audience is able to witness only
events seen and heard by the protagonist. To make an
interesting, exciting film in such circumstances might
represent unsolvable problem for any less experienced
director, but Hitchcock managed to produce not only one of
the best films of his career, but also one of the most
successful experiments in history of cinema. Secret of his
success was in superb use of editing and clever manipulation
of viewer's expectations - suspense is gradually increased
through seemingly banal events of everyday life. Voyeuristic
effect is increased with Hitchcock's wise decision not to
use Franz Waxman's original music except in credits. Such
music would be too distracting, and Hitchcock finds
alternative in radios which play popular 1950s songs in the
background - these songs sometimes can be used as ironic
comment on the plot, but they mostly add to the utterly
realistic atmosphere of the film. While today's filmmakers
would make this film cheap by shooting on location,
Hitchcock was fortunate to enjoy benefits of the largest
indoor set in history of Hollywood. Thus the film could be
meticulously planned up to the most insignificant detail,
and REAR WINDOW is therefore, in strictly technical sense,
one of the most perfect films in history of cinema.
Another Hitchcock's trademark is ability to extract the best
out of actors at his disposal. One of such actors was James
Stewart, then in the latter stage of his career, when he
successfully transformed his all-American on-screen
personality in order to play darker, imperfect and more
complex characters. His Jeff is just one of such characters
- when we meet him, he has already established himself as
irresponsible adrenaline junkie, and his reluctance to
burden himself with permanent relationship makes him even
less appealing. His actions in the film are at first caused
by boredom, but afterwards his crusade against potential
murderer is nothing more than an excuse to satisfy his more
down-to-earth voyeuristic impulses. Until the truth is
discovered in the end of film, we can't be sure whether an
innocent man might suffer because of Jeff's boredom,
voyeurism and too much imagination. Grace Kelly, another
great Hitchcockian actress, again shows that she could be
more than just a pretty face. Her role of stunningly
beautiful, glamorous, but distant and cold woman become more
complex when Lisa Fremont becomes infected with her
boyfriend's voyeurism and adrenaline addiction. It can be
said for Thelma Ritter, talented supporting actress whose
character of preaching nurse goes through similar
transformation. Wendell Corey as Jeff's sceptical friend is
also good, as well as Raymond Burr as down-to-earth but
therefore even more menacing figure of potential murderer.
The only possible argument against REAR WINDOW as perfect
film might be found in Hitchcock compromising his original
idea and allowing some scenes not to be shot from Jeff's
window. But this little and unnecessary nit-pick shouldn't
deprive REAR WINDOW of well-deserved position among the best
thriller ever made.
Review written on September 10th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Time After Time (1979)
For many scientific purists, concept of time travel is so
preposterous that they tend to bar time travel films and
novels from science fiction domain. According to them, time
travel books, comics and films should be branded fantasy
instead. That position might find its arguments in the way
that Hollywood usually treated time travel. Most of the
time, that concept was nothing more than a convenient excuse
for exotic, but standard adventures and films without any
ambitions of seriousness. But, every once in a while, there
comes a time travel film with brains. George Pal's classic
adaptation of equally classic H.G. Wells' novel THE TIME
MACHINE is one of them. TIME AFTER TIME, 1979 film and
directorial debut by Nicholas Meyer, is perfect companion
piece to it.
In George Pal's film, by naming the hero - Victorian time
traveller - "George", the authors hinted that the real hero
of the novel might be H.G. Wells himself. Meyer, who had
already played with mixing fiction with real historical
personalities in his novel SEVEN PERCENT SOLUTION, goes even
further - the time traveller in his film is really H.G.
Wells (played with Malcolm McDowell). Same as his "George"
incarnation, he invites his friends in London 1893 to
present them his new innovation - the time machine. The
presentation is, however, interrupted when Scotland Yard
arrives. It turns out that one of the guests, Doctor John
Leslie Stevenson (played by David Warner) happens to be Jack
the Ripper. While Wells and his friends struggle with
shocking revelation, Stevenson uses the confusion and, out
of desperation, decides to test this new machine. Examining
Stevenson's mysterious disappearance, Wells concludes that
the killer managed to travel to year 1979. Feeling
responsible for allowing bloodthirsty maniac to roam in
future Utopia, Wells goes to future too in order to bring
him to justice. His travel brings him to San Francisco 1979,
strange new megalopolis that at first sight looks like an
utopian society. But, soon he discovers that the Utopia has
its bad side, and, most of all, his quest for Stevenson is
failing. Things change when he meets Amy Robbins (Mary
Steenburgen), bank teller and liberated woman, who decides
to help him in his quest, mostly because she fancies bizarre
but charming Englishman.
Although it is actually not based on H.G. Wells' novel, this
film is closer to its spirit than 1960 version. When he
wrote the novel, Wells was less interested in pure
scientific speculations; instead, he saw science fiction as
a way to talk about burning social issues of his time, as
well as to offer some solutions. This film presents us Wells
as a man before his time, socialist reformer who fought for
free love, feminism, racial equality, people's rights, and
many other things we now take for granted. Meyer uses time
travel to confront Wells' ideals with reality - when he
arrives in San Francisco during the zenith of ultra-liberal,
hedonistic era of sexual revolution and counter-culture, he
discovers that many of his ideals are reality. But, on the
other hand, human nature hadn't improved and, all those
ideals are paired with world wars, nuclear weapons,
pollution, terrorism and other horrors Wells couldn't have
imagined. While poor idealistic reformer has trouble fitting
into this fascinating, but in the same time frightening
world. On the other hand, bloodthirsty yet cynical and
practical Stevenson makes 1979 his home without any
difficulty.
Clever commentary is the reason enough to fend off all the
critics of this film, who had considered TIME AFTER TIME to
be nothing more than light- hearted fantasy. Their argument,
of course, is valid only the movie is entertaining indeed -
conflict between Victorian gentleman and the modern
environment provided excellent opportunity for many subtle
yet effective jokes. The humour in this film is really
charming, and it is helped by Malcolm McDowell who uses this
film as rare opportunity not just to play a good guy for a
change, but also to express his comedic talents. His partner
Mary Steenburgen shows her comedic talent too, and also the
great skill that helps her in the transformation between
strong modern liberated woman and classic damsel in
distress. The romantic chemistry between the two is great,
and it shouldn't surprise anyone that they transcended their
partnership into real life.
Unfortunately, David Warner didn't feel particularly
inspired in the role of Jack the Ripper. He lacks the
charisma of pure evil that is necessary ingredient for any
effective villain that this film required. Flaw in the
characterisation is just one of the many of this film -
cheesy and totally unconvincing special effects, scientific
plot holes and implausibilities, some rather uninspired
lines - that culminate in rather disappointing and ultra-
conventional finale. The musical score of Hollywood veteran
Miklos Rozsa, on the other hand, might have looked
anachronistic in any other film of the period, but it was
right on the target in this story. But, all in all, TIME
AFTER TIME is more than good piece of science fiction
cinema, that could outrank not only some of the time travel
atrocities of its own time (FINAL COUNTDOWN comes to mind),
but also some of the future films with much more fame
(TERMINATOR, BACK TO THE FUTURE).
(Special note to x-philes: Charles Cioffi, who played
skeptical FBI official in the pilot episode of the X-FILES
appears in this film with similar role of skeptical San
Francisco police inspector.)

Title
Review for Hard Drive (1994)
"Get a life", words spoken by Sharon Stone's character at
the end of SLIVER, might be a good advice to protagonist of
HARD DRIVE, 1994 erotic thriller directed by James
Marandino. That man is Will (played by Leo Damian), wealthy
Californian who never leaves house and spends all time in
front of the computer screen. Reason for that is his
obsession with on-line communications, namely those of the
sexual nature. Lately he developed on-line relationship with
mysterious woman named Delilah. They exchange their bizarre
sexual fantasies, and once Delilah suggests that they try
one of them in real life, Will agrees. However, this fantasy
is rather dark and in might not be as harmless in real life
as it is in cyberspace.
Made in a time when Internet only began to establish itself
as global phenomenon, this film tries to predict some of its
after-effects - alienation and addiction to cyberspace as
preferable form or reality. Unfortunately, when screenwriter
and lead actor Leo Damian tries to explore the ultimate
consequences of such alienation, HARD DRIVE begins to fall
apart. The story is stuffed with plenty of totally
unnecessary characters, although at least one of them,
Will's real life girlfriend Laura, is played by quite
capable Belinda Waymouth. Unfortunately, despite rather nice
photography by Sead Muhtarevic, HARD DRIVE in the end falls
apart because of cliches and director James Marandino's
inability to prevent confusion among the audience. Although
HARD DRIVE at least tries to deal with serious subjects, the
audience is left with the impression of failed effort, and
those subjects seem too lofty for unsuitable for something
so exploitative like erotic thriller.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Henry V (1944)
One of the examples of Shakespeare's universal appeal is the
fact that even his earliest plays, historical dramas, happen
to be popular and that their audience includes people who
actually don't care that much about English medieval
history. Compared with Bard's later masterpieces like
HAMLET, MACBETH or TEMPEST those plays might look crude and
simplistic, but they still have that Shakespearean appeal
and represent the challenge for future generations of stage
and movie artists. In 1944 Britain, one of such plays proved
to be rather useful for wartime propaganda purposes, and
Laurence Olivier, famous stage and movie actor, producer and
director, was asked by British government to adapt HENRY V.
The result was a film that later earned Olivier a honorary
"Oscar".
The play HENRY V deals with the King Henry V of England and
his military campaign in France during the Hundred Year War
between those two countries. In 1415, fresh on the throne
and with the reputation of careless, hedonistic and
irresponsible youth, Henry waged the campaign in order to
strengthen both his own domestic authority and English hold
on vast territories in France. His campaign was partially
successful, mostly because of the illness. Forced to retreat
towards friendly port of Calais, Henry and his tired and
dwindling army encountered superior French force near the
castle of Agincourt on October 25th. Using the good
defensive position and superior longbow tactics against
arrogant French knights, Henry carried the day and turned
himself into one of the greatest national heroes of England.
Ironically, that triumph proved to be the last major victory
for the English in Hundred Year War. Only a generation
later, Joan of Arc would turn the tide and begin to finally
drive English out of France.
Battle of Agincourt perhaps didn't have major historical or
military significance for the outcome of Hundred Years War,
but it provided future English historians and artists with a
great inspiration for uplifting, patriotic works of art.
Same thing that had inspired Shakespeare, inspired Olivier
too, and he dedicated his film to British commando and
airborne troops. However, despite being created mostly for
morale boosting purposes, HENRY V was more than a piece of
simplistic propaganda.
First of all, Olivier was rather ingenious in his
adaptation. Equipped with relatively high budget and first
Technicolor cameras, he decided to use talents of Dalas
Bower, Alan Dent and his own to adapt Shakespeare's language
and make it closer to the common man. Another decision was
to make this play realistic by shooting it as a stage play
being performed in Globe Theatre 1600 AD. That provided few
amusing, almost humorous behind-the-scenes segments about
stage actors' life in Shakespearean times. Production sets
by Carmen Dillon and Paul Sheriff, transcended their
artificiality by being modelled after illustration in
medieval chronicles, giving this film somewhat fairytale,
surreal atmosphere. That effect is somewhat diminished when
Olivier uses locations of Ireland (neutral in WW2) and
thousands of Irish regular army as extras in order to
reconstruct the battle. The battle scene is most
spectacular, but it lacks the emotional impact and
excitement usually associated with similar scenes in
historical spectacles. Apart from that, this film suffers a
lot from Olivier trying to be faithful towards Shakespeare
on the wrong places, especially when dealing with rather
boring segments about common soldiers in Henry's army.
Olivier's scene of royal seduction, on the other hand, still
possesses certain surreal and charming quality.
Despite its flaws, HENRY V held a good reputation through
decades, but, unfortunately, newer generations would almost
certainly compare it to more modern and artistically
ambitious 1989 version by Kenneth Branagh. Those comparisons
are very bad for Olivier's work, since they reveal the fact
that 1944 version had text drastically changed and trimmed
for propaganda purposes, making Henry in Olivier's version
much nicer person from Henrys in Branagh's version and real
history. Anyway, even with the later work that diminished
its reputation, HENRY V is a film to be seen and appreciated
by both lovers of classic cinema and those who like
Shakespeare.

Title
Review for I'm Gonna Git You Sucka (1988)
It's not easy to categorise films in general, but with
comedies thing seem much simpler. There are three types of
comedies - situation comedies, character comedies, and,
finally, parodies. Parodies are the easiest form and that
can be proved by the way Hollywood made them in the 1980s.
Those made by the Zucker-Abrachams team are classic example
- bunch of hillarious gags, usually ridiculing most of the
commercial hits released in few last years, patched together
with something resembling the plot. I'M GONNA GIT YOU,
SUCKA, made in 1988, is also a parody, but parody with a
difference. First of all, it has some major theme to be
parodied - blaxploitation movies of 1970s. It is also a
author's work - talented black comedian Keenen Ivory Wayans
wrote the screenplay, directed the film and stared in the
main role.
The plot is set in a ghetto ("Every Ghetto U.S.A.", says the
opening title) where young black man just became another
victim of "O.G." - fatal overdose of gold chains. His
brother Jake Spade (Keenen Ivory Wayans) returns from the
Army and finds the remaining family under pressure from
goons who work for local crime lord Mr. Big (John Vernon).
Determined to protect the family, avenge brother and clean
his neighbourhood from gangsters, Jake seeks help from John
Slade (Bernie Casey), his childhood idol who used to fight
the criminals in 1970s. Slade reassembles his old crew -
Kung Fu Jones (Steve James), Hammer (Isaac Hayes) and
Slammer (Jim Brown) and they begin with their crusade.
It is a sad thing that I'M GONNA GIT YOU, SUCKA was made in
1988. Audience at the time probably didn't understand or
appreciate the blaxpoitation in-jokes and other period
references (like the BRADY BUNCH theme in the background),
unlike today's audience, accustomed to the great 1970s
revival. Any way, jokes in this film are of various quality,
often lame; Wayans, however, compensates that with some real
pearls. And most of all, Wayans obviously liked doing this
film, and same can be said about various performers. It is
great fun to see some blaxploitation heroes like Bernie
Casey or Jim Brown playing ten or fifteen years older,
middle-aged versions of themselves. Wayans also uses the
talents of his family - his brother Damon (later noted in
THE LAST BOY SCOUT) shines in a small, but memorable role of
Mr. Big's goon. The soundtrack was also good and utilised
for some good jokes. All in all, the film was perhaps badly
directed and some jokes aren't funny, but as a whole, it
isn't just entertaining for the audience, but it is also a
tribute to blaxploitation phenomenon.

Title
Review for Casablanca (1942)
There are some works of art that are almost impossible to
review, not because of their own complexity, but because of
their legendary status which prevents the reviewer to say
anything original. One of such masterpieces is CASABLANCA,
probably not the best film in the history of the seventh
art, but definitely the most popular one. Its popularity can
be measured not in a multitude of more or less disguised
remakes that were made in more than half a century since its
premiere, but also in countless tributes and references that
movie makers use in their works to this day. CASABLANCA is
also a movie that has the very rare virtue of both being
praised by the critics and loved by general audience.
One of the things that makes this film even more unique was
the fact that it was doomed to fail, at least judging by
conventional movie-making wisdom of its time. It was based
on a Broadway play so mediocre that it hadn't been produced
on stage; screenplay by three writers - Julius G. Epstein,
Philip J. Epstein and Howard Koch - was beeing written as
shooting went along; the main actors were producers' second
choice, and, finally, man behind camera, Michael Curtiz was
considered to be capable, but not great director. However,
the movie was commercially successful and earned three
"Oscars", including the one for the best film. Until this
very day, it is considered to be the best example of
Hollywood film- making in its own Golden Age.
The plot of the movie was heavily influenced by the needs of
WW2 propaganda, yet it also used rather complicated and now
almost forgotten political circumstances of that global
conflict in order to make intriguing story. In December
1941, Casablanca, exotic port on the Atlantic coast of North
Africa is controlled by officially neutral, yet
Nazi-collaborating French Vichy government. Thousands of
refugees from war-torn Europe are stuck there on the way to
Lisbon and safety of America, and ready to pay any price for
precious exit visas. Many shady characters thrive on their
misery, including the corrupt police chief, Captain Renault
(Rains). His best friend is Rick Blaine (Bogart), who used
to be idealistic anti-Fascist, and now owns popular night
club in Casablanca and lives by his own cynical philosophy
of "sticking his neck for nobody". However, everything
changes when he gets in possession of two precious extra
visas. This event coincides with the arrival of two new
refugees to Casablanca. One of them is Victor Laszlo
(Henreid), Czech resistance leader who escaped three times
from Nazi concentration camps and became the legend of
enslaved Europe. He is accompanied by his beautiful wife
Ilsa Lund (Bergman), with whom Rick had a stormy affair in
the eve of Nazi occupation of Paris. The couple needs visas,
especially because of the Gestapo Major Strasser (Veidt)
being on their trail. Rick is now forced to choose between
love, wounded pride, self-preserving interest and his own
hatred of Fascism.
The casting for this movie seems influenced by divine
inspiration - Humphrey Bogart, most legendary actor in the
history of cinema, is one of the rare character actors who
elevated his persona to the star status. Bogart's portrayal
of Rick as complicated man, torn between idealistic past and
bitter present, was so perfect, that his icon would forever
be connected with that character. Another icon in his
company is Ingrid Bergman, great actress of Old Hollywood,
here in her artistic and visual prime. The cinematic
coupling of Bogart and Bergman became one of the main
symbols of that era of filmmaking - some happier times when
the romance on the screen didn't look childish nor trite
like in some more contemporary works. For many people,
CASABLANCA is probably the best romantic film ever made. But
the reason for that isn't the romance itself - it's the
realistic story of people forced to make tough, and often
wrong choices in their life.
The casting of CASABLANCA was right on target not just in a
case of main leads. The supporting actors also did a
marvellous job. Sidney Longstreet and Peter Lorre were here
mainly to give a mystic flavour spotted in a previous Bogart
classic - John Huston's MALTESE FALCON; yet both of them
managed to portray colourful and original characters.
Another shining example of good casting is now almost
forgotten Paul Henreid as the weakest part of love triangle;
character of Victor Laszlo has believable charisma and looks
like a somebody who could inspire millions of people to rise
against Nazi tiranny. Unfortunately, the charisma that
burdened Laszlo, leaves little place for difficult choice,
making his character forever overshadowed by Rick/Ilsa
coupling.
However, Rick and Ilsa actually have a serious competiton
for most memorable character in CASABLANCA. Captain Renault,
brilliantly portrayed by Claude Rains in a role of a
lifetime, was embodiment of perfect, almost unmatched
balance between ethical corruption and physical charm.
Despite being the undoubtful villain in almost entire movie,
Rains managed to make Renault sympathetic character, and his
final conversion to the side of Good, symbolized in not so
subtle gesture at the end of movie looked unnecessary. Rains
also gave another dimension to the movie, making it even
more ambiguous; people who like to analyse movies to death
discovered signs of homosexuality in Renault's relationship
towards Rick, and Rick's final words leave room for even
more outrageous speculations.
Together with well-drawn characters and exciting story, the
movie was good in creating his own atmosphere. Professional
nitpickers would probably have a field day in discovering
numerous historical and geographical inaccuracies, but
CASABLANCA is still a shining example of Hollywood WW2 movie
that is beliavable, if not realistic. Any way, even if we
don't see it as a historical document, CASABLANCA is movie
that can be source of entertainment as well as infinite
inspiration.

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
Among all the films made by James Cameron, TRUE LIES is the
least appreciated (with the exception of PIRANHA 2). This
could be explained with the fact that TRUE LIES seem rather
atypical for Cameron and his opus. While almost all other
Cameron's films might have a humorous bit of dialogue or
two, they tend to be dead serious, whether they deal with
time-travelling cyborgs, aliens or doomed ocean liners. So,
when Cameron announced his choice of 1994 project - American
remake of LA TOTALE!, rather obscure French 1991 farce -
many people were surprised. This film, although laced with
spectacular action and other director's trademarks, still
looked like an excursion from Cameron's home waters.
Naturally, the film, although commercially successful, was
misunderstood by the critics who dismissed it as bad or, at
best, unusual moment in otherwise unquestionable career.
The protagonist of the film is Harry Tasker (played by
Arnold Schwarzenegger), agent in Omega Force, supersecret US
government agency that deals with nuclear terrorists. After
retrieving important information during a dangerous raid on
Swiss chateau he returns to his house in Washington D.C.
where he is greeted by his wife Helen (played by Jamie Lee
Curtis), 14-year old daughter Dana (played by Elisa Dushku)
and a dog. Tasker's family doesn't have a clue about his
line of work and for the last fifteen years they are
convinced that Harry works as dull sales representative for
computer company. Harry managed to keep his professional and
family life apart, but this is about to change very soon.
Harry is on the trail of Salim Abu Aziz (played by Art
Malik), leader of dangerous Mideastern terrorists who had
acquired ex-Soviet nuclear warheads and who are about to use
them in order to blackmail US government. This, however,
becomes secondary problem to Harry, who is convinced that
his long-neglected wife has an affair. Against the advice of
his partner and best friend Gib (played by Tom Arnold) Harry
decides to find identity of mysterious lover. His
investigation brings him in touch with Simon (played by Bill
Paxton), used car salesman who tells outrageous stories
about his spy adventures in order to get lonely and
adventure-seeking housewives to his bed. Humiliated Harry
plots spectacular revenge on Simon and his wife, but his
actions would have unforeseen consequences.
Most of the criticism directed towards TRUE LIES came from
those people still unable to accept comedy made with 100
million US$ of budget. When they appraised the film, they
appraised as straightforward action drama and, naturally,
they were less than enthusiastic about action scenes that
defy laws of gravity, common sense or, in some cases, even
good taste. Cameron seemed to enjoy making those scenes as
spectacular as possible, but his decision to go over the top
(horse-motorcycle chase is one of such example) indicate
that his aim was nothing but parody. And not only parody of
Bond films (which receive homage in the opening scene), but
also parodies of 1980s action movies, including some of
those that turned Schwarzenegger into star (COMMANDO,
PREDATOR) and, finally, Cameron didn't hesitate to make
parody of himself. This new, unusual humorous setting seemed
like a good thing for Schwarzenegger, whose role of Harry
Tasker is his best comedic effort so far. His success is
even bigger when we consider that he was partnered by Tom
Arnold, one of top American comedians. Actually, almost
everyone in this film seems comfortable in their roles.
Jamie Lee Curtis has especially difficult task since she
must play various personalities - modest housewife who turns
into irrestisible seductress only to end up as strong,
independent woman Cameron likes to have in his films.
Failure to explain such transformation is probably the
biggest problem of this film, and it wasn't Curtis' fault;
she played her role very well. Villains, on the other hand,
are more cartoons and less characters. This probably doesn't
represent problem for Art Malik, whose Salim is deliberately
played over the top, but Tia Carrere as evil seductress
would be marked as pretty face and nothing more.
Another, more serious, charge against TRUE LIES came from
those who found some of the contents socially unacceptable
in this day and age. The most common accusation was
misogyny. Two male protagonists stalk, kidnap and torture
woman before they subject her to extremely cruel and
humiliating practical joke. For many people, especially
those who take 1990s "political correctness" seriously,
comedy in TRUE LIES failed to justify presentation of such
actions as an acceptable behaviour. Harry, of course, gets
his comeuppance and in the last scenes of the film he is
presented as equal to Helen, but that nevertheless failed to
silence the critics. Another group that viewed TRUE LIES as
controversial were Arabs; portrayal of Arab terrorists as
dirty, unshaven and utterly stupid dark-skinned fanatics
might have looked offensive and stereotypical on the verge
of racism. Cameron again tried to pre-empt the criticism by
creating the character of Harry's trusted and computer-
literate Arab sidekick Faisal (played by Grant Heslov). This
failed to produce desired effect and TRUE LIES is until this
day cited as the most explicit example of Hollywood
prejudices against Arabs and Muslims in general.
However, those viewers who don't care about political
correctness would probably appreciate TRUE LIES as stylishly
done piece of Hollywood entertainment. This combination of
spectacular action and hilarious comedy actually represents
one of the most entertaining films of 1990s. TRUE LIES is
film that definitely doesn't deserve its bad reputation and
almost inevitable slide into oblivion.
Review written on September 10th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Dead Zone, The (1983)
Works of Stephen King are the clearest examples of good
literature being basis for bad or mediocre movies. Most
popular and influential contemporary horror writer in
America had seen almost all of his works adapted either for
films or for television. But in most cases, all those works
were mediocre, disappointing at best, or sometimes even
downright awful. Not even the talents of reputed directors
like Carpenter could save King's work. One of those talents
was David Cronenberg, Canadian director who had made
reputation with his inventive, yet disturbing and extremely
gory horrors in 1970s and early 1980s. THE DEAD ZONE, his
1983 adaptation of Stephen King's novel represents one of
his first departure from the horror genre.
The plot revolves around Johnny Smith (played by Christopher
Walken), mild- mannered English teacher that lives a normal
life and is just to be married to his beautiful girlfriend
Sarah (played by Brooke Adams). His life is shattered to
pieces when he becomes a victim of a terrible traffic
accident. Awaken from coma after five years, he finds that
he had lost his job, girlfriend and ability to walk without
a limp. But he gained something else in return - psychic
ability to have visions about someone's past and future. At
first it looks like a gift, but Johnny soon realizes that
all his visions concern death, violence, pain and misery.
Johnny shields himself from world, unsuccessfully trying to
get his old life back as a home tutor. In the meantime, Greg
Stillson (played by Martin Sheen), ambitious politician,
shows no scruples in his unstoppable campaign for U.S.
Senate.
On the surface, THE DEAD ZONE looks like a very good film,
one of the better Stephen King's adaptations. The story is
interesting, pace is good and Cronenberg is this time more
interested in characters and settings than blood or gore.
The atmosphere is also fine, with a clear contrast between
snowy, fairytale American Northeast and dark secrets that
lie within their inhabitants (the exception is sometimes too
monotonous musical score by Michael Kamen). Unfortunately,
what this film lack is coherence. Instead of clear plot we
have whole bunch of subplots patched together. The result
looks like a multi-part mini-series being edited into
feature film. The subplot that had the potential to be most
intriguing comes too late - somewhere in the last third of
the film. Until then viewer had been exposed to many
interesting storylines, all of them being dealt adequately,
but not enough to gather our attention. Interesting
characters, played by small army of very capable actors,
come and go without an apparent reason. One of those
storylines, for examples, is subplot dealing with serial
killer - its implausible, yet on the other hand predictable
resolution is probably the weakest part of the film; it also
provided some really gratutitous nudity and violence.
The actors in this film are rather good. Christopher Walken,
one of the most prolific character actors in contemporary
American cinema, is here in rare opportunity to play not
only the lead, but a good guy too. His minimalistic approach
is perfect for the role of the normal man who is constantly
tormened, first by the loss of his previous life, than by
the powers that force him to abandon human contact, and,
finally, with the greatest responsibility someone has to
imagine. His talent sometimes helps us to forget some of the
really dreadful lines provided by not too inspired
screenwriter Jeffrey Boam. On the other side is Martin Sheen
that sometimes goes too far playing the role of egomaniac
without scruples. Tom Skerrit as Sheriff Bannerman is good,
but he spends too little time on screen. Same is with
Herbert Lom as Doctor Weizak, who is very impressive and who
happens to deliver the most effective dialogue in the movie.
With an impressive atmosphere, good acting and some rather
interesting issues raised in the last segment, THE DEAD ZONE
still remains very good film. Unfortunately, it also leaves
the viewer with the impression that it could have been much
better. But, considering the really bad record with Stephen
King's adaptations, sometimes we must satisfy ourselves with
the less than stellar material.
(Special note to x-philes: William B. Davis, who later
became household name with his portrayal of Cigarette
Smoking Man in THE X-FILES, could be seen in this film in a
small role of ambulance driver.)

Title
Review for Against the Wall (1994) (TV)
New generations who watch Al Pacino chanting "Attica!
Attica!" in DOG DAY AFTERNOON, are probably less aware what
those words mean than the audience in early 1970s. For those
who used to be around in those times, word "Attica" is
forever associated with the great prison riot in 1971,
tragic event that traumatised the American nation in the
very same way Waco, Oklahoma City bombing and school
shootings are doing today. Hollywood simply ignored that
events, same as those events are ignored now, and left to
the professional yet routine treatment of television
industry. In case of Attica, it happened with the ATTICA,
1980 television movie directed by Marvin Chomsky. The author
of this review used to watch this movie long time ago, and
it was very impressed with it. Fourteen years later, HBO
made a cable version of those events, directed by John
Frankenheimer, director who had made reputation by making
great political thrillers in 1960s and 1970s.
The story is told from the perspective of Michael Smith
(Kyle MacLachlan), young man from Attica, New York, who
follows the family tradition and becomes the guard in nearby
State prison, nicknamed "The Factory" by the local
population. However, unlike his predecessors, including his
father (Harry Dean Stanton), retired guard who now owns the
bar, Smith is the product of its generation - idealistic,
liberal and open for new ideas. Soon, he is shocked to find
that the prison is run like nothing has changed outside the
walls. Guards like sadistic and racist Weisband (Frederic
Forrest) treat prisoners like animals. Smith is, on the
other hand, aware that it can't go for long. The inmates,
mostly blacks like Jamaal (Samuel L. Jackson) are convinced
that they too should have some new political and other
freedoms that the rest of country enjoys under the reforms.
The anger and discontent explodes in the violent outburst
that would leave scores of prison guards, including Smith,
as hostages.
Technically, the movie is well-done. The acting is superb,
which isn't so hard to imagine with excellent character
actors like Forrest, MacLachlan, Jackson, Stanton and
Clarence Williams III (playing prisoner Chaka) around. Also,
the grey photography of John R. Leonetti provides a lot of
gloomy atmosphere, that was essential for this kind of
picture. Unfortunately, Frankenheimer in later years
continues with the series of bland and forgettable movies
that undermine his reputation, and AGAINST THE WALL is not
an exception. It happened mostly because of screenplay; Ron
Hutchinson wrote characters less like a living and breathing
people, and more like a symbols. So, the division between
the guards and inmates seem somewhat artificial, same as the
use of "good vs. bad" stereotypes in characterisation (most
notable in confronting Smith with Maclachlan, and Jaamal
with Chaka). Also, the film is too didactic - the
characters keep telling to each other and audience that the
times are changing, instead of leaving that task to the
director. The ending of the film, with its "symbolic"
message being spelled out, is even worse. However, despite
those serious flaws, and despite the fact that the Attica
prison riot deserved somewhat better depiction, the movie
serves its purpose simply by showing that dark chapter of
American history to the audience of today.

Title
Review for Godfather, The (1972)
Many years ago, when the author of this review had to rely
only on cinemas and television as the source of cinematic
knowledge, he was intrigued by the word "godfather",
featured in many movies and television shows as the synonym
for organised crime. The use of the word didn't stop there -
many movies were branded "godfathers" by their distributors,
in order to bring the audience hungry for intelligent and
spectacular drama about gangster organisations. Fascination
with the word and the movie who inspired their use grew with
years. Unfortunately, I wasn't able to see the first movie
before being exposed to the second. Nevertheless, the first
seeing of THE GODFATHER was memorable experience indeed -
years of waiting actually paid off in a three hours of
cinematic feast.
In many ways, THE GODFATHER follows the same pattern of many
cinematic classics who used to be made in a time periods or
circumstances that aren't here anymore. It was made in a era
when the Old Hollywood collapsed, and the new rules hadn't
been established. The studios were willing to experiment and
to give the movie authors free reign over their projects.
One of such authors was Francis Ford Coppola, who made one
of the most intimate, yet most universally appealing movies
of all times; the movie which earned its cult status by
satisfying both the high standards of snobbish critics and
the simple needs general audience. The greatness of the
movie can't be seen only in a success that followed him in a
last quarter of century; it could be even more tangible in a
series of references, imitations and hidden remakes created
by Coppola's colleagues through the years.
Almost every scene in a movie is memorable, but for many
most effective is a beginning - in a dark room, Bonasera
(Salvatore Corsitto), Italian undertaker, tells that he
believes in America and its values; but only minutes later
his speech gives another spin on the beliefs in life,
liberty and pursuit of happiness - they shatter confronted
with the humiliating and unpunished rape of his daughter. In
order to see justice done, Bonasera is forced to ask favour
from his godfather, powerful Mafia figure Don Vito Corleone
(Marlon Brando), using the marriage of Don Vito's daughter
Connie (Talia Shire) as an opportunity to win over the
mobster's heart. That same wedding is a nice opportunity to
meet Don Vito's sons, family and friends. Don Vito has three
sons - Sonny (James Caan), whose macho temperament is nicely
combined with the calm wisdom of his adopted brother and
family advisor Tom Hagen (Robert Duvall); hedonistic Fredo
(John Cazale); and, finally, college educated Michael (Al
Pacino) whose disgust with the violence and crime forced him
to leave the family and come to the wedding as a decorated
WW2 hero. However, Michael's reluctance to engage in the
family business gets tested soon after the wedding. Angered
by Don Vito's refusal to engage in narcotic operations,
other Mafia families from New York organise the attempt on
his life; simply by trying to protect his father, Michael
gets drawn in the war and slowly becomes the rising member
of his crime organisation.
Since both the real-world Mafia and numerous Italian
American organisation actually tried to stop this movie from
being made or distributed, it is quite ironic to see THE
GODFATHER as a source not of numerous movie cliches that
actually portray the Mafia as a social element more benign
than in real life (mobsters as devout family men; violence
exists only between its members and doesn't affect general
and innocent population; opposition to drugs etc.). It is
even more surprising to see THE GODFATHER not only as an
inspiration to other, less original, filmmakers, but also to
the real-world gangsters who tried to imitate the appearance
of his main characters. However, although the movie might
seem a little bit apologetic towards Mafia, and definitely
has insiders' point of view, it still has the flavour of
authenticity, necessary for the viewer to have a critical
relations towards the characters and their morally
questionable actions.
The authenticity of the movie isn't just in some references
towards real-life mobsters and mob-related stories and urban
legends. Coppola worked very hard to capture the way of life
in his native Italian American community, and also invested
a lot of effort in order to have his epic story, that takes
place in late 1940s and early 1950s, firmly set in that time
period through production design, costumes, hairstyles and
soundtrack that is well balanced with the original music of
Nino Rota, that also became one of the identifying symbols
of the movie.
The most memorable element of the movie are its actors.
Marlon Brando, almost washed-up in the time when he made THE
GODFATHER, gave the performance of his life by playing Vito
Corleone - his role was so grand that the actor himself
parodied it in THE FRESHMAN. Although obviously shadowed by
Brando, the other actors were also impressive. Among them,
Al Pacino, who had to work hardest by portraying slow
transformation of lead character, shines most brightly and
his role of Michael shone the path to his future as one of
the best serious movie actors in contemporary American
cinema. The calmness of Pacino's character, calmness that
crumbles under emotions only in brief moments of family
crisis, is so in contrast with the emotional outbursts that
would be Pacino's trademark in a years to come.
The other actors might not be in Brando's or Pacino's
league, but they benefited from Coppola's good casting and
also gave the roles of their life simply by being in this
movie, so well-written and directed. The only exception to
this is James Caan, who works well with the role given to
him, but whose all-American appearance seems a rather out of
place with the more or less ethnically pure Italian American
cast. Despite that shortcoming (one and perhaps the only in
the entire GODFATHER), the cast is really more than
impressive, although many actors and actresses later didn't
live to the potential indicated by their performance in this
movie.
Those who like analysing movies to death would probably ask
why THE GODFATHER kept its cult status through the quarter
of century. There were many well-made, well-directed and
well-acted movies produced in the years before and after,
but it seems that only THE GODFATHER stood the test of time
and kept the imagination of the future moviegoers. The
reason might probably be in the universal subject of the
movie; although it shows rather obscure and ethnically
isolated phenomenon the messages of THE GODFATHER can be
translated on all the worlds languages and applied to other
systems in different times and places. The movie portrays
both the society and individuals who lost their freedom
because they were too insecure or unprepared for
responsibility; same as the poor Italian immigrants had to
rely on Mafia to overcome the difficulties of New World
(like Bonasera in the opening sequence), Michael is forced
to join the family because he, despite all his efforts,
can't live in a insecure world outside his father's
omnipotent shadow. And even when he actually becomes his
father (in a brilliant and most memorable last shot), the
freedom is lost - omnipotence and freedom are just illusion,
because with the power comes both the responsibility and the
never ending task of keeping. The story of this movie could
have taken place everywhere in the world, and that explains
why the people will associate with its characters for many
decades to come.

Title
Review for American Yakuza (1994)
The author of this review, while being introduced to the
phenomenon called "straight-to-video" in the early 1990,
made an interesting observation. It dealt with the trailers
of the "straight-to-video" movies. The good trailers usually
meant bad or unwatchable movies. The trailer for AMERICAN
YAKUZA, 1993 action film by Nick A. Capello, was one of the
better ones. But the movie itself was one of the rare
exceptions to the rule above; it was surprisingly good and
it delivered the goods promised in the trailer.
The plot of this movie, based on the screenplay by John
Allen Nelson and Max Strom, uses the very same American
phobias as much more spectacular (and less successful)
RISING SUN - phobias based on the great success of Japanese
economy in 1980s and the infiltration of Japanese capital
into American mainland. But in order for this film to have
attractive "straight-to-video" potential, the Japanese
invasion of USA happens in the form of yakuzas - Japanese
crime organisations that are taking over lucrative crime
businesses from the locals like Mafia. Of course, that leads
to the series of bloody conflicts and one of the people
caught in the crossfire is Nick Davis (played by Viggo
Mortensen), convict recently released from prison. He
happens to be in the right place and the right time and
saves the life of an important yakuza. Yakuza reward him by
employing his services and he gradually begins to get their
trust and friendship. Of course, they don't know that Davis
is undercover FBI agent, now torn between his official duty
and the loyalty he feels towards his new friends.
Although the screenplay seems rather weak excuse for the
series of standard action scenes, the writers should be
commended because very few of them would use the form of an
action movie to preach multiculturalism, like Nelson and
Strom do. Of course, the plot is full of simplifications and
sometimes not very plausible events, like in many
straight-to-video films. But AMERICAN YAKUZA still has a
very good impact, because the direction by Nick A. Capello,
very MTV-like style (few years before that style became
fashionable), reminds the viewers of John Woo's Hong Kong
films. The music by David C. Williams is also very good. But
the most impressive element of the film is Viggo Mortensen,
one of the most capable American character actors, here in a
very unusual role of an action lead - tough, but sensitive
man with a hidden agenda. AMERICAN YAKUZA is still a
low-budget action film in its essence, but the talent of its
makers managed to cross the barriers of such genre
designation.
Review written on September 11th 1999

Title
Review for Maverick (1994)
Last year's WILD WILD WEST is something unforgivable and
unjustifiable, but at least in the beginning it might have
looked like a good idea. Five years before, another 1950s
western TV series got itself revamped into rather successful
summer blockbuster. This film was MAVERICK, 1994 western
comedy directed by Richard Donner.
The protagonist of this film is Bret Maverick (played by Mel
Gibson), gambler who is both skillful with cards and guns.
He nevertheless prefers coning than shooting people, and
such abilities will be needed when he decides to join great
poker game which is held on Mississippi riverboat. But to
enter this game he must pay large entering fee, so he must
either collect all debts or find some ingenious ways to
depart people from their money. In doing so, he would cross
paths with Anabella Cranston (played by Jodie Foster),
southern belle whose beauty is not spoiled by bad Southern
accent or lack of scruples. While two of them join forces
and travel to the boat, they are pursued by lawman and
Maverick's old acquintance Zane Cooper (played by James
Garner). All that would lead to whole series of adventures
and encounters with various bizarre characters of the Old
West.
Scriptwriter William Goldman probably envisioned MAVERICK
and western version of STING - story which represents
complex set of intrigues, twist and characters who
constantly try to fool each other. However, his efforts
failed for one simple reason - plot aroused very little
interest in director Richard Donner, who instead envisioned
film as series of elaborate and mostly humorous action
scenes. Sometimes those scenes don't have much connection
with the rest of film, in some segments they are slow and
tendency to have as much cameo appearances as possible makes
this film too long. But film is nevertheless saved by
enthusiastic performances of Mel Gibson and Jodie Foster,
two actors who obviously enjoy playing light-hearted
characters for change. James Garner, who played Maverick in
the original series, is very good in the role of Cooper,
while Graham Greene is hillarious as Indian chief. All in
all, despite the lack of plot and excessive length, there is
enough humour for the audience to enjoy MAVERICK as
unpretencious entertainment. Western fans would be
additionally satisfied because MAVERICK with its light
spirit is rather refreshing addition to the rejuvenated
genre, represented with dark, depressive and revisionist
films of the early 1990s.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Nell (1994)
If we are to believe a character in NELL, 1994 drama
directed by Michael Apted, everyone has an ulterior motive,
even Mother Theresa. Finding those ulterior motives is
difficult and sometimes impossible, but in the case of those
who made this film it is rather easy - whole purpose of this
endeavour was to bring another Academy Award to its
principal actress Jodie Foster.
The plot of this film, based on the play IDIOGLOSSIA by Mark
Handley, begins in the remote backwoods of North Carolina. A
woman who lived her most of her life in a remote cabin has
died and country doctor Jerome Lovell (played by Liam
Neeson) discovers her daughter Nell (played by Jodie
Foster). Young woman has been taught to hide from the world
and it seems that she has never seen another human being
apart from her mother. Since the mother suffered a
speech-impairing stroke, Nell never learned to speak proper
English and instead developed unintelligible language of her
own. Authorities, represented by psychologist Dr. Paula
Olsen (played by Natasha Richardson), are convinced that
Nell can't function in outside world and that her interests
would be best served if she is institutionalised. Lovell
thinks that she should remain free and manages to delay
court decision for three months. In that period both Lovell
and Olsen must observe Nell in her natural surroundings and
present their findings to the court. Lovell tries to use
this as an opportunity to decipher Nell's language and
finally establish proper communication.
The plot of NELL deals with very intriguing subject - role
of the society and civilisation in forming human mind.
Previously this subject was tackled by such great directors
like Francois Truffaut and Werner Herzog. British director
Michael Apted is not exactly in their league, but his career
indicates that he is capable of making decent film out of
this material. Unfortunately, he was not capable of
compensating the inadequacy of William Nicholson's script.
The script, same as anything else in the film, was subjected
to the single purpose - create as many opportunities as
possible for Jodie Foster to show her ability to portray
socially handicapped character. Because of that, the movie
is stuffed with scenes in which Foster talks gibberish or
lives in her own private world. Naturally, those scenes last
too long and Foster, despite all of her talent, becomes
irritating after a while. The plot that is supposed to wrap
up this character is even worse, filled with all Hollywood
cliches that culminate in the corny and quite predictable
finale. The only thing that makes this film watchable is a
splendid photography by Dante Spinotti that captures natural
beauties of North Carolina. But those lovely sights are
hardly a reason for viewers to spend almost two hours of
their life to watch this single- purpose (and failed)
effort.
Review written on September 18th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Basic Instinct (1992)
There are many ways in which a movie could be influential.
Some are influential because they are truly landmarks of
movie history; others simply make big money and inspire
multitude of cheap imitations that could be seen as subgenre
by themselves. In 1990s such subgenre was made of "erotic
thrillers" - films that tried to compensate forgettable
plots with one or two scenes of sex, as explicit as puritan
American censors would allow. After many of those films
failed as big Hollywood projects, genre of erotic thriller
found its purpose in the domain of straight-to-video,
satisfying the needs of the audience too shy to seek porn
titles in video stores. This subgenre, one of the most
despised by mainstream critics in 1990s, owes its existence
to one of the most overhyped films in the history. This film
is BASIC INSTINCT, 1992 thriller by Paul Verhoeven, which
also happens to be one of favourite guilty pleasures for the
author of this review.
Plot of the film begins when retired rock star has torrid
sex with mysterious blonde only to get stabbed to death with
an ice pick in the heat of passion. His murder is being
investigated by Nick Curran (played by Michael Douglas), San
Francisco police detective with long and painful personal
record of alcoholism, cocaine abuse and frequent shooting
incidents that had tragic consequences. His attempts to lead
healthy life under the guidance of police counsellor and his
occasional girlfriend Doctor Elizabeth Garner (played by
Jeanne Tripplehorn) begin to crumble when he encounters the
murder suspect in the form of deceased rocker's girlfriend.
Catherine Trammel (played by Sharon Stone) is not just
stunningly attractive woman and rich heiress; her degree in
psychology enables her to play with people's minds. There
isn't any evidence pointing to her guilt, but her biography
indicates that people around here have a tendency to suffer
violent deaths; most disturbing about it is the fact that
such incidents, including the latest murder, had been
vividly described in Catherine Trammel's novels. Curran is
convinced of her guilt and wants to find the conclusive
evidence, but his determination is followed with Trammel's
willingness to engage into perverse mind games, in which she
would use her seductive abilities as well as Curran's own
animal impulses.
Two things turned BASIC INSTINCT into one of the most
overhyped films of 1992. First one was the record amount of
money paid for the screenplay by Joe Eszterhas (of later
SHOWGIRLS infamy). The other one was the unprecedented wave
of street protest by American gay activists over alleged
negative portrayal of lesbian and bisexual characters in the
film (those demonstrations, staged at the zenith of
Political Correctness, later had major impact on Hollywood;
few producers would ever dare to have a less than saintly
gay characters in their movies). For the author of this
review, both the film's producers and demonstrators were
wrong. First of all, Eszterhas' script, although not as bad
as his later reputation would indicate, was hardly worthy of
those 3 millions US$. The plot, which was supposed to be
whodunit style murder mystery is full of red herrings, major
plot holes and elements and situations that sometimes really
insult viewers' intelligence. And, before the script
culminates in corny and weak ending, it is being spiced with
all police movie cliches plus some added bonus in form of
sex, drugs, police corruption and all possible ingredients
of decadent lifestyle.
Allegedly unfavourable (at least for 1990s PC standards)
portrayal of homosexual characters actually corresponds with
the way Eszterhas treated everyone else in this movie.
Hardly any character is likeable - they are all either
incredibly stupid, bigoted, flawed or simply lack any values
associated with decent human beings. The only exception -
character we actually care for - is Curran's partner Gus,
but that has more to do with the way George Dzundza played
this character than with corny lines and stereotypical
character written by Eszterhas.
Having all that in mind, BASIC INSTINCT could be viewed as a
triumph of style over substance. Verhoeven had really
tremendous task in hiding such terrible flaws of the script
and turning this film into truly enjoyable piece of trash
cinema. He succeeded in this by staging some elaborate
scenes that would later become memorable. The best example
is, of course, famous interrogation scene which is excellent
combination of superb editing, costume design by Ellen
Mirojnick, suggestive photography by Jan de Bont, and, of
course, Sharon Stone's acting. After being exposed to such
brilliant piece of manipulative filmmaking who would bother
to think about story that doesn't make sense? Just in case,
Verhoeven uses all tricks in the books, by providing some
good action and gore and indulging himself in Hitchcockian
references - those associated with VERTIGO are most obvious,
thanks to San Francisco scenery. But the biggest attention
is given to the oldest and most effective ingredient of
successful trash - sex. Apart from usual quantities of
nudity, both male and female, this film provides scenes of
very graphic sex, as close to softcore porn as possible in
the puritanical atmosphere of Hollywood. Those scenes,
source of great hype at the time, might look rather mild or
even boring after so many years; but Verhoeven, compared
with his imitators (including himself in dreadful and
downright anti-erotic SHOWGIRLS) looks like a real
grandmaster of Hollywood style smut.
The biggest contribution to the BASIC INSTINCT was
definitely given by her female lead Sharon Stone. That
actress here played the role of a lifetime, creating one of
the most memorable characters in the history of cinema.
Catherine Trammel might be too much of a character in the
script to be believable - beautiful woman, intelligent
manipulator and psychopathic villain. Yet, Sharon Stone
manages to bring her to life; she doesn't just look
stunningly beautiful - she simply oozes sexuality, combined
with the great confidence of superior mind and the seductive
appeal of utter evil. Men (and some women) are powerless
against such unstoppable sex machine; for many of them being
ice-picked to death might even seem like a acceptable price
for brief moments of ecstasy in her bed. This great role of
Sharon Stone (that would actually begin to haunt her in the
rest of her career) shadowed everyone else. For Michael
Douglas it wasn't such a problem, since he only reprised the
role of oversexed male pig from FATAL ATRACTION. But Jeanne
Tripplehorn was not so convincing as her rival and later had
to work much harder in order to establish herself as a real
actress. Actually, in the long run, BASIC INSTINCT had hurt
careers of almost everyone involved, despite being
commercial success. The only exception, perhaps, is Jerry
Goldsmith; his great, atmospheric musical score was often
praised as the best element of the film; even those who
don't like BASIC INSTINCT are often saying that Goldsmith's
score improved the general impression.
All in all, BASIC INSTINCT is a film that should be viewed
as nothing more than a good example of Hollywood
craftsmanship. It is enjoyable little flick that didn't
deserve its popularity, as well as its infamy.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Lord of the Rings, The (1978)
Sometimes,  it takes a very strange course of events to lead
somebody towards the literature or any other piece of art he
appreciates. In my case, it all began in mid 1980-s, when I,
like  many  of  my  classmates, got  hold  of  my first home
computer.  Our  parents believed that  those  new toys would
help  us  in study. They  were, naturally, wrong. Instead of
solving   mathematical   problems  or   taking  interest  in
technical  studies,  we were spending  months in front of TV
screens  playing  video games. One  of  the most popular was
"Hobbit",  adventure  game based  on J.R.R. Tolkien's novel.
"Hobbit"  was  great intellectual challenge,  and many of us
borrowed  the  book from the school  library only to get the
clues  to  solve the game. Sadly,  there wasn't any need for
the  book's  sequel  - famed fantasy  epic  "The Lord of the
Rings".  The  game was never  made, except for parody called
"Bored of the Rings".
Despite that, I was actually intrigued when "The Lord of the
Rings" was first aired on (then) former Yugoslav television,
couple  of  years later. That wasn't  the  first time I have
ever seen adaptation of Tolkien on the small screen - one of
the  children's  theatres in Belgrade  had  their version of
"Hobbit"  aired  (with some baby face  man trying to pass as
Gandalf).  I also saw segments of "The Lord of the Rings" in
a  form of comic book. So, when  I actually saw the movie, I
felt  somewhat familiar with the  material - story about few
brave  heroes,  members of the  different mythical races, in
the  mission  to  stop the  evil  all-powerful sorcerer from
taking  control  of  Middle  Earth.  Unfortunately,  due  to
circumstances  outside  of my control,  I was forced to stop
the  viewing somewhere in the middle of the movie. Lucky for
me, I had to wait only a year before the re-run, and finally
I  saw  the  whole  thing.  But,  shortly  after the closing
credits  I began to wonder "Is it all? First tale? It *must*
be the sequel."
A  year later, when I finally added three books of Tolkien's
masterpiece  to  my  collection,  I  began understanding why
Ralph Bakshi's THE LORD OF THE RINGS ended the way it ended.
Seeing  1200 pages of text, able  to keep me preoccupied for
weeks  and  moths,  I was again  reminded  of  an old wisdom
"Great  books  make  mediocre movies,  and  vice  versa". It
happens  mostly because sometimes it is simply impossible to
bring  the rich content of hundreds or thousands of pages of
the  book  in the hundred or  less pages of the script. Film
authors  who  try  to capture  book's  spirit  on the screen
usually   fail,  either  by   omitting  too  many  important
elements,  or  by  stuffing material  and  making  the movie
unwatchable  bore  (David  Lynch's DUNE  could  be  the nice
example).  Bakshi,  although he  somehow managed to condense
the  most important elements of  the "Hobbit" into the first
few  minutes of the film, knew  that he couldn't turn entire
Tolkien's  novel into two hour film,  was forced to use only
the  first two books - "Fellowship of the Ring" and parts of
"Two Towers".
Another  problem  that should face  any author ready to take
Tolkien to the big screen is the high cost. With today's CGI
and special effects, Peter Jackson's plans to make a feature
film  version  aren't  so wild.  Two  decades ago, making an
animated movie looked like the only alternative for producer
Saul  Zaentz. In doing so,  he employed Ralph Bakshi, author
of  sometimes controversial animated movies, responsible for
bringing adult content and sensibilities to this, until that
time, almost entirely children's genre.
Bakshi's  techniques  in  making  this  movie  are  somewhat
similar  to  those employed in  his WIZARDS - Sci-Fi/Fantasy
epic  he had made a year  earlier - combination of animation
with  rotoscoped live footage. Here  he used live actors and
managed  to combine them with  the drawn characters, perhaps
in order to make the events of the books more dramatic. That
backfired  a  little - unlike  Orcs, human characters seem a
little  bit  too  unrealistic, and  many  times, viewers are
forced  to  be engaged in "who  is who" game. Another thing,
that  might  be  a flaw,  is  amount of violence, especially
bloodletting,  which makes this film closer to BRAVEHEART or
CONAN  THE BARBARIAN than family entertainment. On the other
hand, Tolkien's original text, that was at times rather dark
and adult, can be also be responsible for that.
Anyway, although inferior to the book, THE LORD OF THE RINGS
is  quite  interesting and rather  original attempt to bring
literature masterpiece to the big screen. Although it mostly
failed  as  a standalone  cinematic entertainment, it served
its purpose by intriguing viewers enough to yearn after more
Tolkien, both on paper and on cinema.

Title
Review for Super Cops, The (1974)
Today we see that US television holds actual monopoly on the
adaptations of true stories. But quarter of century ago, it
wasn't the case. In the golden age of 1970s Hollywood often
allowed its director to seek inspiration for their films in
current and sometimes very recent events. One of such films
was SERPICO, Sydney Lumet's account of the real life New
York policeman who fought police establishment and
corruption as well as crime. THE SUPER COPS, made a year
later by the famed blaxploitation director Gordon Parks,
deals with the same subject and has real life protagonists
too. But, similarities between those two movies cease,
because while Lumet made very serious and depressing drama,
Parks took another direction and used that material for
light-hearted comedy.
The movie begins with the documentary footage that
introduces us to the main characters - New York policemen
David Greenberg and Robert Hantz (both of them served as
technical advisors and appeared in small cameos in the
movie). Than we see the beginning of their police careers -
after graduating they were on probation in traffic unit, but
that didn't prevent Greenberg (played by Ron Leibman) and to
pursue his dream of taking drug dealers off the street.
Assissted by his partner Hantz (David Selby), he makes whole
series of arrests working plain clothes in his spare time.
Police establishment is less impressed with the numerous
arrests than with their total disregard of internal police
protocol. As a punishment, they are both sent to 21st
Precint, stationed in the worst crime-ridden and drug-
infested part of town. There they would continue their
crime-fighting crusade, despite the open animosity of their
colleagues and suspicion by their paranoid superior, Captain
Krasna (played by Dan Frazer). Their success in putting drug
dealers out of business is turning them into local legends
with nicknames "Batman" and "Robin". However, that also
brings attention of powerful local drug bosses who order
contract on their lives.
Comparisons between SERPICO and THE SUPER COPS, despite
their genre differences, are unavoidable, and that is the
main problem with the this film. Same as Lumet's work, THE
SUPER COPS have a rather weak plot that doesn't concentrate
on a single chain of events and, instead, simply depicts the
years of someone's police career through the series of
anecdotes. Those anecdotes, mostly showing ingenious and
often very funny methods that Greenberg and Hantz employed
in order to deceive and arrest criminals, allowed Parks to
make whole series of short but very entertaining action
scenes. Unfortunately, those scenes alone weren't enough to
make coherent story out of them; script by Lorenzo Semple
Jr. simply ignores private life of the protagonists and his
characters aren't fleshed out and are often non-existent.
Ron Leibman tried to fill that emptiness by playing
Greenberg as neurotic, but that often turned into
unnecessary over-acting. David Selby, on the other hand, is
rather uninterested as his second fiddle. Potentially
interesting performance was given by Sheila E. Frazier in
the small role of Greenberg's prostitute informer, but Parks
drastically reduced her screen time. By concentrating on the
action and ignoring character development, Parks shortened
this film to 90 minutes, quite reasonable length that made
this film anything but boring and prevented many viewers
from being too annoyed with its numerous flaws. Anyway, film
is still very funny and it could also be seen as a product
of its times - one of the most hilarious scenes deals with
the hidden listening devices, theme very familiar for the
people who used to live during Watergate era. THE SUPER COPS
descended into obscurity and this is quite understandable,
since the movie was dwarfed by the real genre classics of
that era. But, on its own level it works fine and today's
audience, faced with usually inferior material of the same
genre, would probably appreciate it.

Title
Review for Dark Half, The (1993)
Success of Stephen King's literary career was such that the
writer himself couldn't resist to be inspired by that
phenomenon. He wrote two novels on the subject - MISERY and
THE DARK HALF. The latter one was inspired by the real
events of King's career - discovery of his early four
novels, written under pseudonym "Richard Bachman". As
anything King ever put on paper, that novel was adapted to
screen. The 1993 film was written and directed by George A.
Romero, filmmaker whose classic NIGHT OF THE LIVING GENRE
created a cult following among horror movie fans.
Protagonist of the film is Thad Beaumont (Timothy Hutton),
literature professor whose own writing is failure. But, few
people, including Thad's loving and supportive wife Liz (Amy
Madigan) know a secret - Beaumont, under the pseudonym
"George Stark" wrote whole series of graphic, violent novels
that turned to be best-sellers. One day, facing blackmail,
Beaumont decides to go public, reveal true identity of
"George Stark" and stop writing those novels. After the
symbolic burial of "George Stark" his life should turn to
normal, but, instead, first the blackmailer, than his own
publisher and few other people fall prey to vicious serial
killer. Sheriff Alan Pangborn (Michael Rooker) discovers
evidence pointing to the writer's complicity, but Beaumont
claims that the murders were committed by "George Stark" who
somehow turned into living flesh and wants to have his life
and writing career back.
Many screen adaptations of King failed because even the most
talented directors simply couldn't process richness and
complexity of King's prose into cinematic language. In this
film Romero tried to evade this by making a longer film,
with the plot slowly unfolding, thus allowing development of
atmosphere and characters. That also gave room for
exploration of few themes - like existence of "dark halves"
in every personality, and sometimes blurring boundaries
between the author, his work and the outsiders' perception
of both. Unfortunately, the link between supernatural
segments in the beginning and the end haven't been properly
explained. So, most of the time we watch standard
psychological thriller about mad slasher/split personality,
with mystic elements being somewhat out of place. The
finale, that in King's adaptations usually turns into cheap
schlockfest, is very original and spectacular in this film.
The actors did very good job, especially Timothy Hutton in
an interesting double role. Amy Madigan was good as his
wife, and Michael Rooker was very believable as sympathetic
lawman. All in all, although not very successful, THE DARK
HALF is one of the better adaptations of King, that could be
enjoyed even by those who aren't fans of his literature.

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
Watching the news from Kosovo, we are again reminded that
human beings can sink to the lowest levels of depravity. We
are also reminded of the sad fact that people in general
tend not to learn anything from history, nor do they know
how to apply that knowledge properly. As a result, the last
decade of this sad century, with the tragic events in former
Yugoslavia, Caucasus or Central Africa, looks like nothing
has changed, that the mankind is again in danger to be
sucked into another vicious cycle of ethnic, religious and
racial hatred. The only comfort is in the fact that the
intolerance never managed to reach the levels of Holocaust.
Holocaust is the word most often associated with the World
War Two. It was also the word that became almost universal
synonym with the worst evil imaginable. Events like the
Holocaust happened before, and, sadly, it would probably
happen again, but the scope, magnitude and utter
irrationality of the event is something quite unique. It
shocked the contemporaries, who had been used to much lower
standards of human conducts than us, and it still baffles
many historians, philosophers, psychologists and other
scholars. Holocaust also inspired numerous works of art.
Among those works of art, Hollywood also gave its
contribution, which shouldn't surprise anyone due to the
strength and influence of Jewish lobby within American
motion picture industry. SCHINDLER'S LIST, "Oscar"-awarded
1993 film by Steven Spielberg, may not be the best among
them, but it is definitely the best known.
The film is based on the book by Thomas Keneally, which
described the fascinating true story about Oskar Schindler,
one of the more unusual and perhaps a little bit brighter
episodes in that darkest chapter of world history. The film
begins in 1939, after the conquest of Poland by German army.
That country becomes anything but happy place for local
Jews, who are forced to abandon their careers, property and
homes and live in overcrowded ghettos, experiencing hunger,
disease and utmost poverty. Their situation is an excellent
opportunity for Oskar Schindler (played by Liam Neeson),
small-time German businessman from Sudeten region of former
Czechoslovakia. He comes to Krakow and buys local factory
with the money he had borrowed by local Jews, who got raw
deal in the process. He employs local Jews as the cheapest
labour force available, and begins making large amounts of
money. He actually doesn't run the factory - his trusted
Jewish accountant Itzhak Stern (Ben Kingsley) is doing all
the work - and instead spends all his free time drinking and
womanising. But, things are about to change when the Final
Solution starts showing its final and ugly face. When SS
units, led by sadistic Amon Goeth (Ralph Fiennes) begin with
pogroms, Schindler is at first worried about the loss of his
labour force. But gradually, he begins worrying less about
the money and more about people he is going to save.
Unlike most of the other stories that inspired filmmakers,
story of SCHINDLER'S LIST is an excellent opportunity for
all those who want to have a broader perspective of the
Holocaust, perspective that transcends simple formulas and
simple explanations. First of all, screenplay of book by
Thomas Keneally and screenplay by Steve Zaillian are evading
some popular myths. First of all, Holocaust, although
ignited by Nazism, wasn't some unexplainable aberration that
came to Europe out of blue; it was a nothing more than a
case of old anti-semitism driven to extreme; and it wasn't
uniquely Nazi nor German. Second, as some newer examples may
show, pure irrational hatred wasn't the sole motive -
Holocaust was fine opportunity for many shady characters to
fill their pocket. Protagonist of this film, who at
beginning, wants to bleed Jews dry of their money, is a fine
illustration of that, often overlooked, economic aspect of
the Holocaust. What happened to Jews in WW2 Europe was
heinous crime, but it was also good business for those who
knew to use opportunity.
Perhaps that was the greatest quality of SCHINDLER'S LIST.
It evades black-and-white characterisation and gives us a
protagonist who is hardly example of virtue. His motives, as
well as his moral alignment, gradually changes through time.
At first he is nothing more than war profiteer - probably
the slimiest category of all people we might see during the
armed conflict. But in the same time, Liam Neeson portrays
him with irresistible charm - the charm of the same
magnitude that saved thousands of innocent people and
brightened Schindler's reputation among critical historians.
As movie gradually progresses, and Schindler transforms into
good Samaritan, we are still left with the mystery - why did
that character change. But, in the end, it didn't matter
much to the people he had saved and who would always be
grateful to him.
The movie doesn't have just a complex protagonist, it has
similarly complex and, in a perverse way, seductive villain.
Amon Goeth, played by British actor Ralph Fiennes, is in a
way similar, but very different than Schindler. He is a
sadistic thug, who is seduced by the enormous power given to
him by the specific historical circumstances. This movie,
like many other, actually tries to explain his villainy by
indicating that sadistic and murderous behaviour was
motivated by his ulterior weakness. For some, this might
look oversimplification of Nazi psychology, but Fiennes, who
gained 13 kilograms just for the purpose of this role, plays
Goeth as twisted version of Schindler. Like him, Goeth is a
hedonist who likes women, alcohol and money, and even has
certain charisma of evil, but whenever we are ready to
forgive him, he shows again his ultimate dark side. Fiennes
was really incredible in this role, and even managed to
outshine Neeson.
Actors were, however, outshined by director. Steven
Spielberg made this film partially for personal reason,
trying to finally come to grips with his own Jewish
heritage. But it was also opportunity for him to improve his
reputation of film artist, much tarnished with commercially
successful, but artistically disappointing JURASSIC PARK.
And that opportunity was exploited in almost every regard.
Spielberg made film different from everything he had ever
made and very few people would recognise his style. First of
all, he used black and white photography by Janusz Kaminski,
which was good choice. Most people associate Holocaust with
black and white photographs, and by being monochromatic,
SCHINDLER'S LIST became more realistic and thus more
powerful. Another thing that distinguishes SCHINDLER'S LIST
from previous Spielberg's work is the use of steadycams and
constant movement of cameras that also provided more realism
and brought viewer right in the middle of the story.
Finally, unlike in all of his earlier films, Spielberg felt
unrestricted with his reputation of family entertainer -
SCHINDLER'S LIST contains scenes of unimaginable atrocities,
random violence and graphic bloodshed, as well as foul
language and nudity. Considering the subject matter, such
elements were necessary and many critics argued that
Spielberg, by refusing to compromise on them, actually
matured into real cinema artist.
Unfortunately, Spielberg might have been able to defeat
self-censorship, but he wasn't able to defeat himself. There
is a very small, but significant difference between very
good films and true masterpieces. For almost all of its 197
minutes SCHINDLER'S LIST looks like it belongs in the latter
category. But at the very end, Spielberg the Artist
surrenders to Spielberg the Entertainer and we are exposed
to the now infamous speech by Liam Neeson, speech that
revealed Spielberg as unable to resist the urge to fill this
film with cheap and unecessary sentimentality. Without that
speech, SCHINDLER'S LIST would have been one of the greatest
films of all times.
However, even with such flaw, SCHINDLER'S LIST is a very
good film, probably one of the best in 1990s. Perhaps it
didn't stand the test of time, perhaps it won't be as
immemorable as some had predicted. It also probably isn't
the ultimate film of the Holocaust (SHOAH was, in the humble
opinion of this author better; and Benigni's LIFE IS
BEAUTIFUL was at least equally good). It also probably did
very little to educate modern generations of the historical
evils (it was reported that skinheads in some German cinemas
actually cheered during the scenes involving massacres of
Jews), and the world probably isn't the better place because
of this film. But, nevertheless, it is very good piece of
cinema and those who are ready to spend three hours in front
of the screen would be rewarded with powerful,
thought-provoking piece of seventh art.

Title
Review for Hitman, The (1991/I)
Back in 1980s, Chuck Norris used to be synonym for the
action films. He couldn't, of course, top the success and
fame of big action names like Sylvester Stallone or Arnold
Schwarzenegger, but sheer quantity of his films guaranteed
that he was household name among shoot'em up and beat'em up
genre aficionados. That quantity was mostly provided by
Cannon Group, prolific production company that dominated the
B-movie market in previous decade by flooding it with cheap,
formulaic and, more often than not, unwatchable genre
products. THE HITMAN, 1991 action thriller directed by
Chuck's brother Aaron, is one of the last among them.
Chuck Norris here plays Seattle cop betrayed, shot and left
for dead by his partner (which shouldn't surprise anyone,
considering the fact that the partner is being played by
Michael Parks, specialised for roles of usually very mean
characters). Surviving the shooting, cop is pronounced dead
and hired as deep undercover agent. He infiltrates the
underworld circles in Seattle and becomes their top hitman,
using his abilities to start brutal war between three major
crime organisations - Italians, French Canadians and
Iranians.
Since it is rather absurd to expect great acting ability
from Chuck Norris, at least not in this kind of movie, the
biggest attraction of this film should have been action.
Well, the action in this film falls flat - it is boring,
repetitive and not at all exciting. It is nothing more than
monotonous series of scenes that contains violence too
brutal even for this type of films. We know very little
about Norris' character while, on the other hand, gangsters
are portrayed with more human dimension. In the end we
almost feel sorry for them, since they are shown totally
powerless against Norris and his unstoppable and bloody
crusade. During the film, somebody obviously became aware of
that problem, so the screenwriter introduced the subplot
dealing with the black boy who gets adopted by Norris. That
caused another problem - any questions about nature of that
relationship had to be quashed with another subplot - this
one dealing with lady lawyer who sleeps with the hero and
gets killed after fulfilling that screenplay obligation. The
photography in this film is dark, setting is depressive and
this forgettable piece of 1980s style cinema leaves viewers
without any reason to justify the hour and half spent in
watching it.

Title
Review for Blood of the Innocent (1994)
When Walter Hill made RED HEAT more than a decade ago, idea
of East Europeans becoming major players in organised crime
looked preposterous. In the decade after the fall of Berlin
Wall this vision became reality - East European countries
became more than fertile ground for various forms of
organised crime, many of them previously unheard in the
West. BEYOND FORGIVENESS, 1994 Polish-American action
thriller directed by Bob Misiorowski, deals with such
reality. Its protagonist, Chicago policeman Frank Wusharsky
(played by Thomas Ian Griffith) is searching for the
murderers of his brother. The trail leads him to Warsaw
where he would gradually discover Russian mafia setting up
major business of killing innocent people in order to sell
their organs on the black market. This discovery would also
endanger Wusharsky's life.
Being shot on Polish locations, BEYOND FORGIVENESS had a lot
of potential to look at least marginally more interesting
than usual by-the-numbers low-budget action film. Script by
Charles Cohen actually mentions some problems that are
characteristic to the newly democratic countries of Eastern
Europe - namely the fact that the old and corrupt Communist
Nomenklatura simply transformed itself into new yet equally
or even more corrupt establishment. However, those issues
are barely touched upon, and instead director Misiorowski
delivers predictable yet utterly unconvincing story about
American superhero that rescues helpless Poles from evil
Ruskies. To make things even worse, the action scenes are
badly directed, the protagonist Thomas Ian Griffith is
unconvincing, and otherwise respectable actors like John
Rhys-Davies and Rutger Hauer don't seem very enthusiastic
about their roles either. Because of that BEYOND FORGIVENESS
is a wasted effort that potential viewers shouldn't award
with their attention.
Review written on September 21st 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Taxi Driver (1976)
When people are talking about good old times, they actually want to make
some bad times look better. Nice example of such behaviour is
contemporary attitude of popular media towards the 1970s. For new
generations, Superseventies are the lost Golden Age of chic fashion,
cult TV shows and sexual freedom unchecked by AIDS. For people who
actually had to live in that period, it was the Gloomy Decade, marked by
lost ideals of 1968, rampant inflation and unemployment, international
terrorism, fuel crisis and loss of faith in almost anything that
previous generation stood for. Feelings of despair and nihilism found
its reflections in many films of that era. Martin Scorsese's TAXI
DRIVER, which symbolises both the glory and despair of the Seventies, is
most celebrated of them all.
The movie's protagonist is Travis Bickle (Robert de Niro), 26-year old
former Marine who takes the job of taxi driver in New York City because
he can't sleep at nights. The job gets him exposed to the dark side of
apocalyptic megalopolis, and Travis gradually gets alienated from the
rest of world. The only bright spot in his life is Betsy (Cybil
Sheperd), attractive woman working in Senator Palantine's presidential
campaign. Their date ends as humiliating fiasco because Travis makes
fatal mistake by inviting her to porno movie theatre. Losing his only
link to better side of the world, Travis gradually descends into
psychosis, becoming convinced that his mission in life is to battle scum
on the street. He purchases a formidable arsenal of guns and begins
physical preparations for the inevitable conflict. That conflict finally
comes when he takes personal interest in Iris (Jodie Foster), 12-year
old prostitute who temporarily took refuge in his taxi.
As many great movies that got cult status through the years, TAXI DRIVER
became the object of many interpretations. For some critics and scholars
it is an exploration of universal subjects that date back to Dostoyevski
- loss of moral compass in a bleak reality of dirty, overpopulated
industrial cities; the story could have been set in 19th Century same as
in our times. For others, the movie uses Raskolnikov-like figure in
order to portray burning problems of 1970s America - its apparent
inability to deal with the consequences of rapid social changes that
occurred in previous decade.
Brilliant performance of Robert De Niro in role of a lifetime can give
arguments for both sides. His Travis Bickle has a lot in common with
most of the average viewers of today - many of us share his feelings of
isolation, loneliness and outrage towards crime, drugs, prostitution and
senseless street violence. His pathetic attempts to establish some kind
of human connection with the people around him, sometimes in most
unusual circumstances - like with Secret Service agents, pimps or job
interviewers - make him a person too goofy to be the hero, and too
pathetic to be the classic villain. However, most of the average viewers
are sensible enough to recognise the tin line that separate concerned
citizens or troubled souls from fanatical madmen. But despite anything,
average viewer at the end actually cheers for Travis - his crusade
against "scum" is something that average person wants, but doesn't have
a stomach/lack of brains to do it.
While De Niro's Travis might come in and out of particular times and
places, other persons that appear in the film (mostly played by the
character actors) give it distinctively 1970s feel. Wizzard (played by
Peter Boyle) presents the only link with America's better past; but only
because he is the oldest taxi driver in company and therefore everybody
assumes that he "knows stuff". His obvious inadequacy in giving advice
to troubled Travis illustrates the inability of pre-1960s generations to
find answers to the problems of Gloomy Decade. Other characters, on the
other hand, show the bad side of New Age. Matthew "Sport" (Keitel, who
befriended real-life pimps in other to prepare for his role of a
lifetime) is dressed like a hippie; Iris found excuse for her escape to
the world of drugs and child prostitution in a ideology of
Counterculture. Porno movies, that should be the element of new times of
sexual freedom, are too much even for supposedly "liberated" Betsy. Even
the politicians, like Senator Palantine, are lost in post-Vietnam and
post-Watergate mess; his broad and senseless "messages" that cover the
lack of any serious program can't fool even such idiots like Travis. The
Past is gone, The Present is bad, and even The Future seems bleak, and
the feeling of pessimism can't be washed away even by ironic happy end.
Travis and his world found themselves in a desperate situation, and
Martin Scorsese uses the best of his cinematic skills in order to spill
the gloom of Schrader's screenplay into the silver screen. New York City
in the night is portrayed as a Hell on Earth, and the red light and
steam coming out of sewers give it surreal, almost Stygian atmosphere.
Another important element of the atmosphere is score of great Bernard
Herrman, whose efficient use of jazz elements gives some melancholy that
softens the brutality of motion picture.
One of the greatest ironies of TAXI DRIVER is the fact that the movie
was, same as his protagonist, famous for the wrong reason. Instead of
receiving cult status because of his artistic merits, for many years it
was tabloid-fodder because of Hinckley and his real-life re-enactment of
events in the movie. Now, more than two decades later, when some other
"life imitating art" incidents get more attention, we can finally enjoy
TAXI DRIVER in all its artistic glory.

Title
Review for Scam (1993) (TV)
Whenever mothers tell their sons to beware of certain kinds
of women, they probably have protagonist of this film in
mind. "Heroine" of SCAM, 1993 TV thriller directed by John
Flynn, is Maggie Rohrer (played by Lorraine Bracco), con
artist who seduces rich single men only to slip
tranquillisers in their drinks and clean their valets while
they sleep. John Shanks (played by Christopher Walken), her
latest potential target is not only able to see through her
act but actually wants to use it for the scheme of his own.
The idea is to rip off powerful crime lord by stealing his
programmer's computer files. Maggie agrees to participate in
the scam but she doesn't trust her new partner, especially
after she finds hints that could give entirely different
motives to his actions.
Script by Craig Smith (based on his novel) looked quite
interesting, providing crime story which revolves about
intrigue and mind games instead of gunplay. Director John
Flynn, specialised for action films, had quite impressive
cast for this TV production - always reliable Christopher
Walken is great as con artist with mysterious motives, while
Lorraine Bracco is quite believable as not very glamorous
but successful professional seductress. Unfortunately, it
seems that Flynn and the rest of the crew got a little bit
too relaxed during the production - movie looks rather
cheap, Jamaican locations aren't used enough, and the plot
in the end becomes quite predictable despite endless twists.
Final result is rather disappointing, and the good actors
got wasted in the film that didn't rose above mediocrity of
American TV production.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Animal House (1978)
One of the things that differentiates the author of this
review from most of the world's film critics is the opinion
of John Landis. Many of Landis' films, often lauded by
critics, were disappointments for me. That is especially the
case in the latter part of his career, and it is hard to
imagine why and how this author reached a cult status. But,
earlier, while he was starting his cinema career in 1970s,
he used to make quite nice films. One of the most legendary
ones is ANIMAL HOUSE, 1978 comedy that was overshadowed by
his greatest success - BLUES BROTHERS, shot two years later.
This film actually doesn't have a lot of plot. It is set in
fictional Faber college in 1962 and chronicles the struggle
between two student fraternities - Omegas, nice,
by-the-book, rich, arrogant and powerful students, and
Deltas, nonconformist losers who, instead of studying, spend
all their time for alcohol, drugs, sex and different kinds
of orgies. Their activity become the thorn in the side of
the college administration who decide to kick them all out.
But the brave Deltas would refuse to give up without a
fight, that would culminate in the apocalyptic parade in the
end.
Some may think that ANIMAL HOUSE represents sorts of
autobiography for its writer Chris Miller, who based the
plot on his own experiences as Darthmouth College student in
1962. Others may argue that Landis in this film, by
portraying the rivalry between Omegas and Deltas, gives his
own commentary about the great struggle between the forces
of Old and New in 1960s America. But the real motive for
ANIMAL HOUSE was most likely nothing more but the excuse for
entire series of jokes, many of them so tasteless that they
really questioned the standards of its, rather liberal,
times. Yes, some of these jokes are rather tasteless, many
of them including Bluto (brilliantly played by late John
Belushi) and his repetitive use of bodily fluids becomes
boring after a while. Some other jokes also aren't so funny.
But guess what? Film as a whole works as an excellent guilty
pleasure - made without any redeeming values nor high
artistic standards, but film that makes other, more noble
and ambitious works, to pale in comparison simply by
entertaining viewers. Most of the jokes are funny,
characters are well- played by excellent actors (Donald
Sutherland, John Vernon, young Kevin Bacon among others),
and the soundtrack is very good. The only real reason to
bash ANIMAL HOUSE is the fact that it spawned entire
sub-genre of its imitations in the decade to come - movies
with the words "soft", "hard" and "body" in title, all of
them sharing its low standards, but not the talent of its
creators. But we shouldn't be too harsh towards ANIMAL HOUSE
- today, same as two decades ago, it serves its purpose by
entertaining us.

Title
Review for Asphalt Jungle, The (1950)
There are plenty of people in contemporary America who claim
that the wave of school shootings and similar violent
incidents should be blamed on movies, TV, computer games and
other media that allegedly instigate violent tendencies and
other forms of social pathology among the young audience.
Such notions might be true and false, but they weren't very
original. Many decades ago, long before TV and Internet,
there were scholars who used to study the influence of films
and popular culture on the formation of criminal
personalities. One of them was the author of a Criminology
textbook I read many years ago. He thought that the movies
indeed could instigate criminal behaviour and he named one
anecdote as an example. Two young boys robbed the jewellery
store and went into the life of crime after watching of THE
ASPHALT JUNGLE, 1950 caper drama by John Huston. I find this
anecdote very unbelievable, because the film happens to be
one of the classics of film noire, and an undisputed mother
of all "criminal enterprise going bad" movies.
The plot, based on the novel by W.R. Burnett, is set in the
unnamed big city somewhere in American Mid West and follows
a group of different people engaged in various criminal
activities. "Doc" Riedenschneider (played by Sam Jaffe) is a
criminal who became a underworld legend because of his
methodically planned heists. After being released from
prison, he wants to put one of his old plans - robbery of
jewellery store - into action, but he needs personnel and
someone to finance the operation. After being approached by
Alonzo P. Emmerich (played by Louis Calhern), a lawyer with
criminal connections, "Doc" begins assembling his crew. The
safecracker is Louis Ciavelli (played by Anthony Caruso),
who accepts the job because he wants to feed his family. The
"muscleman" is Dix Handley (played by Sterling Hayden),
violent street mugger who wants to pay his gambling debts,
and the getaway driver is Gus Minissi (played by James
Whitmore), hunchback and Dix's only friend. The heist,
although methodically executed, goes bad, and in the end,
the criminals themselves are in danger of being robbed.
Emmerich entered into this business because he was flat
broke and he wants to steal the loot for himself.
THE ASPHALT JUNGLE should be distinguished from many other
film noires because of the treatment it gives to the crime
and criminal underworld. Unlike many films with the same
subject that treat criminals like utter villains, this film,
scripted by Huston and Ben Madow, goes to the great lengths
in order to explore such characters and their ulterior
motivations. As a result, THE ASPHALT JUNGLE is a one of
more realistic films of such genre. Criminals are portrayed
as people not very different from "normal", law-abiding
citizens; they share the same hopes, dreams and fear like
the rest of us, but, most importantly, they all have very
human and understandable flaws. And those flaws, and not
their inherent evilness, are responsible for the wrong
choices that would lead them to the life of crime. Huston
condemns those choices and shows the comeuppance his
characters would get, but he still feels the need to show
some sympathy and even pity for them.
Those characters are probably the most important element of
the film, and Huston was very lucky to have a great acting
talent at his disposal when he made this film. Each of them
was almost perfect for the role, always revealing the fatal
flaw of their characters in subtle, but effective details.
Sterling Hayden is great as a street hooligan who wants to
leave the filthy city streets for the clean, open air of
rural home. James Whitmore's getaway driver went into the
life of crime because of his physical deformation. Louis
Cahern plays probably the best role of his career -the aura
of cultivated, self-confident and respected legal
professional, used during contacts with his criminal clients
and associates, is just a mask under which he hides the real
character of womanising weakling. It was a real spectacle to
see how Cahern gradually removes this mask as the movie
approaches its conclusion. But, even such utterly crooked
and pathetic individual is worthy of pity since he showed
some conscience towards his old, sick wife. Probably the
best character is the one who is most enigmatic of them all
- Sam Jaffe plays a criminal mastermind who gives a positive
reference to the expression "professional criminal". His
Riedenschneider is a model of utterly business- like,
emotionless, intelligent yet very charming criminal; his
professionalism , disdain towards violence, temperance and
even gentleman's manners makes us wonder why did such
character chose the life of crime in the first place; the
answer is very discreetly hinted in one of the last scenes
of the film. The other actors are also good, like Jean Hagen
in the role of Dix's trusted girlfriend. Marylin Monroe, on
the other hand, is very good as Emmerich's bimbo mistress,
but, that role, being her first big break in Hollywood,
haunted her later career in Hollywood with its stereotypes.
Huston as director is in his prime, utilising the script and
the acting talent to their fullest. The pacing of the film
is superb, plot moves very quickly despite the lack of
action. The dark, urban scenery and almost exclusive use of
interiors is also very effective in creating the atmosphere
of depression, anxiety and final doom that waits its
protagonists. Probably the only flaw of the film, and very
minor and debatable flaw, is the presence of Police
Commissioner Hardy (played by John McIntire), character
whose moral virtue and crime-fighting determination looks
somewhat artificial and put in this film only to counter-act
for early 50s rather bold motive of police corruption. But,
even such one-dimensional character is played by good actor
and his lines stick long in the memory (although they look
more appropriate for Sidney Lumet's dramas about moral
ambiguities of law enforcement). Perhaps only a small step
away from perfection, THE ASPHALT JUNGLE is one of the best
films ever made, and its greatness could be witnessed by the
fact that many films in last half a century were inspired by
it, but very few came even close to its quality.

Title
Review for Mi nismo andjeli (1992)
The old saying about forbidden fruit being the sweetest can
be best illustrated with the way Croatian public greeted
Serbian films in the darkest hours of recent Balkan wars.
During those times Tudjman's regime tried to severe any
cultural link between Croatia and former federal partner and
state propaganda machinery mercilessly tried to turn Serbia
into this Earth's equivalent of Mordor and their inhabitants
into Orcs. State- sanctioned chauvinism reflected not only
in the official ban of all Serbian cultural imports, but
also with brutal censorship of media materials in Croatia
proper. For example, even 100% Croatian films made in
Communist past were forbidden from being shown on TV for the
simple reason of having distinguished Serbian actor in one
of major roles. Naturally, overzealous implementation of
such policy created almost instinctive reaction of certain
segments in Croatian movie going public; this reaction
manifested in Serbian films becoming popular ingredient of
any wilder party, and gradually many enterprising
individuals began crossing battle-lines and supplying this
newly formed market. The circle of people who enjoyed and
appreciated Serbian films steadily grew, and when the
cultural barriers between two countries collapsed few years
ago, nobody was particularly surprised to see Serbian films
in Croatia being almost as popular as films made in
Hollywood.
Among the first batch of Serbian films that turned into cult
material was MI NISMO ANDJELI, comedy directed in 1992 by
Srdjan Dragojevic. The plot of the film is rather simple and
it features Angel (played by Uros Djuric) and Devil (played
by Srdjan Todorovic). Two of them are fighting for the soul
of Nikola (played by Nikola Kojo), Belgrade playboy who is
enjoying reputation of city's top heartthrob despite the
fact that he treats women like garbage. One of his latest
victims is Marina (played by Milena Pavlovic), mousy 18-year
old high school who slept with Nikola after accidentally
getting drunk during the party. Few months later Nikola
doesn't remember the incident or the girl, but this Marina
is carrying his child. Thankfully, Marina's best friend Bubi
(played by Branka Katic) tells her not to reconcile with
this and two of them begin working very hard in order to
hook Nikola with Marina again. Before this happens, Nikola
is going to experience some rather strange events, thanks to
the manipulations of Angel and Devil.
If you want to see effects of war on filmmaker, you should
compare MI NISMO ANDJELI with other works of Srdjan
Dragojevic who would later become cinematic celebrity thanks
to his gritty war dramas PRETTY VILLAGES, PRETTY FLAMES and
WOUNDS. When the first segments of the film were being shot,
the old Yugoslavia was still in one piece, and the
protagonists are having vacation in Croatian parts of
Adriatic Coast (references to one particular island were
later creating salvos of laughter among local Croatian
public). The war actually manifested itself only in one, not
particularly inspired scene with Bubi's father in military
fatigues, a scene that would create more winces than laughs.
Apart from that, MI NISMO ANDJELI is completely set in its
own fantasy world that consists of teenagers and playboys
from well-to-do Belgrade families, who listen to rockabilly
music and live life closer to standards of 1950s America
than brutal 1990s Balkans. Dragojevic, however, sometimes
gives few glimpses of real Serbia, but those glimpses are
more in parodical nature (especially when they deal with
Serbian folk music subculture that went hand-in-hand with
extreme Serb nationalism) and not very different from scenes
in which Dragojevic gives homage to his cult classics like
TWIN PEAKS and ALIEN. Lack of perspective and solid plot is,
however, more than compensated with Dragojevic's incredible
sense of humour. Not burdened with war and atrocities,
humour in MI NISMO ANDJELI provides light but effective
entertainment.
Apart from humour, main strength of MI NISMO ANDJELI is in
characters, which are played by diverse but very talented
cast. The most recognisable face to foreign audiences is
Nikola Kojo, who had worked with Dragojevic in his two later
films. But the best impression is left by Branka Katic,
actress who turned otherwise supporting role into the most
sympathetic and memorable character. Those who are fans of
ex-YU cinema from past decades would probably enjoy seeing
faces of Eva Ras, Bogdan Diklic and Predrag `Miki'
Manojlovic in bit parts. Perhaps the only weakness of the
film is in its local nature - in order to truly appreciate
the humour and references of the film, viewer must at least
be familiar with former Yugoslavia. However, those who give
MI NISMO ANDJELI a try, are probably going to be rewarded
with film which deservedly broke through even the hardest
cultural and political barriers.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Seven-Per-Cent Solution, The (1976)
Blurring the line between fiction and real history isn't
just an accidental consequence of few recent Hollywood
epics. Some authors actually see it as an intriguing
creative experiment. One of such experiment is TIME AFTER
TIME, movie that featured historical character of British
author H.G. Wells equipped with the most famous fruit of his
fiction - time machine. Nicholas Meyer, director of this
film, obviously likes these experiments, judging by his
novel THE SEVEN-PER-CENT SOLUTION, in which he paired
fictious character of Sherlock Holmes with one of his most
famous real life contemporary. The novel was adapted for
screen in 1976 and directed by Herbert Ross.
The story is set in 1891, year that corresponds with the
time when Arthur Conan Doyle, real-life creator of Sherlock
Holmes, tried to kill off his most successful creation (and
was forced to revive him three years later, after being
pressured by multitude of angry fans). Meyer's novel and
script give an alternative explanation for the three-year
absence of Holmes, using some subtle hints given by Doyle.
In the beginning of the film Sherlock Holmes (played by
Nicolas Williamson) is obsessed with Professor Moriarty
(played by Laurence Olivier), whom he accuses of being head
of all-powerful criminal organisation. Holmes' partner
Doctor Watson (played by Robert Duvall) actually finds
Moriarty to be nothing more than pathetic old man, who used
to be Holmes' nemesis in childhood as his mathematics tutor.
The real reason for Holmes' paranoid delusions lies in his
decades-long cocaine addiction, which recently entered
terminal phase. Watson wants to cure his friend of such
affliction, but late 19th Century medicine is still unable
to cope with such complex psychological problems. The only
glimmer of hope lies in young and controversial physician
from Vienna named Siegmund Freud (played by Alan Arkin), who
recently published scientific article about cocaine
addiction. Watson tricks Holmes into travelling to Vienna,
where Freud would use his new psychiatric methods in order
to cure the detective from his addiction. The treatment is
successful and Holmes, recuperated and refreshed, is ready
to return the favour by offering to help another of Freud's
patients - famous actress Lola Deveraux (played by Vanessa
Redgrave). She had recently escaped bunch of mysterious
captors who had abducted her and drugged her with cocaine.
Both Holmes and Freud feel personally motivated to find the
perpetrators of this crime and join forces in order to solve
this mystery.
THE SEVEN-PER-CENT SOLUTION has anything a good period film
should possess - small army of very talented British actors,
great care about period details, attractive Viennese
locations, and finally, very intriguing script with lot of
references interesting to history buffs. British cast, led
by always reliable Nicol Williamson, is supported by
excellent Robert Duvall (whose British accent seems genuine,
at least to the untrained ears belonging to the author of
this review) and very good Alan Arkin. Unfortunately, the
general impression of the film is not that good. Basically,
the plot is interesting in the first half, when we are
exposed to the dark, unexplored side of Sherlock Holmes
character and Meyer's often amusing revisionist speculations
about the true background for Doyle's original stories. But,
later, when Holmes finishes his business with Freud, film
doesn't stop and instead we are witnessing standard, and
rather weak crime mystery, saved only with few humorous
remarks. In it Holmes and his friends must use their muscles
more than Holmes' brain, but the action isn't that
spectacular, and the finale, that even features
swashbuckling scene is more corny than realistic. However,
general impression of the film is more than good - great
care about period details and obvious fondness authors feel
for the Gilded Age made this rather charming, although
imperfect example of Hollywood craftsmanship.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Point Blank (1967)
Few films have been so thoroughly and universally trashed by
the critics as PAYBACK, 1999 crime thriller by Brian
Helgeland. Most of them attacked the overuse of violence and
utter lack of any moral compass among its characters. The
author of this review agrees with most of the critics, but
only partially. The filmmakers had it coming, but for
entirely different reasons. The biggest crime made by makers
of PAYBACK lies in the fact that they had dared to remake
POINT BLANK, 1967 film by John Boorman. That film happened
to be one of the best underrated film classics of all times,
and its reputation really shouldn't have been tarnished by
uninspired and tedious remake.
The plot of the original film is based on THE HUNTER, 1964
novel by Donald E. Westlake. Its protagonist (played by Lee
Marvin) is known only by the name Walker. His best friend
Mal Reese (played by John Vernon) is a gangster owing huge
debt to all-powerful Organisation. In order to save his
friend's life, Walker agrees to take part in a robbery that
would pay Reese's debt. But, instead of gratitude, Walker
receives two bullets by Reese, who then takes off with
Walker's adulterous wife Lynne (played by Sharon Acker) and
Walker's 93,000 US$ share of the loot. Walker was left for
dead, but he managed to survive and a year later he is
approached by some creepy individual named Yost (played by
Keenan Wynn). Yost offers information about Lynne and Reese
in exchange for Walker's help with his own plans about
Organisation. Walker agrees and begins the violent campaign
to take revenge and retrieve his money.
One of the reasons why POINT BLANK was somewhat shadowed by
other films of 1960s lies in the fact that it was probably
made at least a decade before its time. Dark, nihilistic
script by Alexander Jacobs, David and Rafe Newhouse, as well
as extremely violent, amoral and emotionally damaged
protagonists belong more to the 1970s than to idealistic
1960s. However, most critics and viewers probably failed to
see the real element of the originality in POINT BLANK. The
reason why this film should enter all film encyclopaedias
lies in the original directorial approach and very distinct
visual style employed by its director John Boorman. Rather
simplistic plot and even simpler characters are enhanced by
the heavy atmosphere and use of tricks today mostly
associated with "artsy" films or music videos - slow motion,
repetitive flashbacks, fast editing and, above all, very
haunting soundtrack by Stephen Edwards. POINT BLANK
therefore looks very different from most of the crime
thrillers. Another thing that makes it very distinct is a
rather original perspective on the criminal underworld -
people who inhabit such realms are well- dressed,
well-educated, they live in luxurious, modern, stylish
apartments and houses and, generally speaking, and instead
of looking like the pariahs of the society, they look like
its pillars. In that regard, by presenting criminals like
modern-day aristocracy and criminal organisations as
equivalent of all-powerful state POINT BLANK would resemble
some crime thrillers of the latter decades.
Heavy atmosphere and style of POINT BLANK compensated the
simplicity of the script, but Boorman, unfortunately,
overplayed that card. In some instances the events on the
screen are unclear, characters act irrationally and film
even lacks the proper closure, leaving the audience without
expected catharsis. Boorman even makes more confusion with
some surreal shots, hinting that the whole film could be
nothing more than a fantasy of a dying Walker. On the other
hand, the viewers are still focused thanks to excellent
cast. Lee Marvin played wonderful and complex role of a
seemingly simple character - at first he is man in love,
faithful friend, and later he turns into extremely violent
yet stone-cold killer whose motivations shift, but his
determination does not. His acting is very subtle, and the
emotional states of Walker are presented through small
gestures, short glances or cold, impersonal action. He
managed to overshadow everyone else, including very
energetic Angie Dickinson as his accidental partner.
Overshadowed by the lead or not, supporting cast is splendid
- John Vernon played the first of his many villainous roles,
James Sikking is great as cynical hitman, as well as Lloyd
Bochner and Carroll O'Connor as corporate gangsters. Sharon
Acker as his wife appears relatively shortly, but her role
is also memorable, especially during her final monologue
that expresses the emotional emptiness of her character.
POINT BLANK perhaps earned its reputation simply by being
shot in the right time, but it could provide good
inspiration to future film- makers. With better results than
the last time, we should all hope.

Title
Review for Grand pardon II, Le (1992)
DAY OF ATONEMENT, 1992 crime thriller directed by Alexandre
Arcady, is just another example how advertisement can create
expectations completely different from the actual products.
Those who watched the trailer for this film expected
low-budget action film dealing with Latino gangsters in
Miami and featuring Christopher Walken as its principal
star. When they watched the complete film, they got
something else - expensive and at times quite spectacular
sequel of French crime epic about family of Algerian Jews in
which Christopher Walken appears just as one of many
supporting actors in rather minor role. Rather complicated
plot (which is in many ways incomprehensible to those who
haven't seen the first film) revolves around Raymond Bettoun
(played by Roger Hanin), former boss of Parisian Jewish
underworld who has just spent ten years in prison for
following old code of honour. After release Bettoun comes to
Miami where he is greeted by his son Maurice (played by
Richard Berry), now a wealthy businessman. Raymond doesn't
need much clues to figure out that the source of his son's
wealth came from money laundering and participation in
booming cocaine trade.
It is obvious that Arcady, inspired by Coppola's GODFATHER
saga, tries to give epic scope to the plot and characters
while giving it a setting similar to de Palma's SCARFACE.
Unfortunately, unlike Coppola and de Palma, he has some
problems handling an material that would work much better in
mini-series than in feature film format. There are simply
too many characters and subplots for two- hour film to
handle it properly. The actors, especially Roger Hanin as
dignified crime lord, are good, photography is fine, some
action scenes are handled very well, but all those elements
fail to connect into coherent whole. As a result, DAY OF
ATONEMENT is a film that, despite of its relatively high
budget and great display of various talents, looks like a
cheap and not very inspired copy of American originals.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Eye of the Storm (1991)
According to Hitchcock and various other filmmakers,
isolated motels, diners, gas stations and similar
establishments in American Southwest can be rather dangerous
place for weary travellers. At the beginning of EYE OF THE
STORM, 1991 German- American thriller directed by Yuri
Zeltser, one of such places becomes deadly for their owners
who get murdered during the stick up. Ten years later their
son Steven (played by Bradley Gregg), who was blinded during
the incident, still runs motel together with his older
brother Ray (played by Craig Sheffer). Hardly anything
happens there until alcoholic and abusive William Gladstone
(played by Dennis Hopper) gets stranded there with his
attractive wife Sandra (played by Lara Flynn Boyle). Their
unexpected presence creates the chain of the events that
would end in bloodshed.
Yuri Zeltser, author of this film, was obviously inspired by
Hitchcock's PSYCHO, but he chose to add some new and
potentially interesting elements to the original plot.
Instead of Norman Bates we have two brothers - one of them
traumatised physically, another mentally. Sexual tension
between beautiful female patron and shy motel clerk is
heightened with the presence of alcoholic husband. EYE OF
THE STORM is impressive in visual sense, with photography by
Karl Walter Lindenlaub providing a lot of claustrophobic
atmosphere. The acting is fine - Hopper, Gregg and Boyle are
comfortable with their roles, but Sheffer at times overacts
his psycho routine. Unfortunately, EYE OF THE STORM, which
was supposed to be intense psychological drama, deteriorates
into cheap and predictable slasher flick during melodramatic
finale. In the end, this film reminds us that original
approach can't prevent filmmakers from wasting too many
opportunities.
(Special note to the PROFILER fans: Ally Walker appears in
the beginning of the film in the small role of killer's
girlfriend.)
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Ace Ventura: Pet Detective (1994)
Jim Carrey is one of the most talented comic actors of our
time, but his reputation often suffered because of the
critics' snobbery. Carrey still suffers because of the huge
popularity of his early movies, especially comedies that
relied solely on his comedic talent and hardly anything
else, causing animosity among critics who demanded higher
standards of American film comedy. ACE VENTURA, 1994 hit
film by Tom Shadyac that turn Carrey into the mega-star is
one of those films that explain why some critics don't like
Carrey and why this actor didn't get his well- deserved
"Oscar".
The protagonist of this film, with screenplay co-written by
Shadyac, Carrey and Jack Bernstein, is Ace Ventura (played
by Carrey), private detective specialised in locating and
retrieving lost pets. His talents are spotted attention of
Miami Dolphins football team, whose owner hires him to find
team's mascot - dolphin named Snowflake. In his quest Carrey
is aided by Dolphins publicist Melissa Robinson (played by
Courtney Cox), while inimical police lieutenant Lois Eichorn
(played by Sean Young) thwarts his investigation. When
Dolphins star Dan Marino (played by himself) also
disappears, Ventura's investigation receives further
complications.
ACE VENTURA: PET DETECTIVE is a film almost without the plot
but that doesn't discourage Carrey. Instead the lack of
meaningful story is seen as an opportunity for him to
display his great comedic talent, including almost
indescribable skills of physical comedy. Humour is often
bellow standards of good taste and definitely not suited for
children, especially in scenes that spoof CRYING GAME. All
supporting actors seem uncomfortable or disinterested for
their roles. However, as long as Carrey appears on screen
the film is truly hilarious, and since Carrey appears with
86 minutes, many of those shortcomings can be forgiven. At
least by those viewers who want nothing more than
light-hearted entertainment and comedic talent in its barest
essence.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Blue Sky (1994)
"Better late than never" is the phrase that could be applied
to BLUE SKY, 1994 drama directed by Tony Richardson. Shot in
1991, but not released due to the bankruptcy of Orion
Pictures, this movie was finally unearthed three years
later. It was too late for its director Richardson who had
died from AIDS shortly after the end of shooting, but not
for the rest of cast and crew, especially Jessica Lange who
surprised many by getting an "Oscar" for the role in this
film.
The plot of this film is set in the year 1962, during the
most intense period of Cold War. Major Hank Marshall (played
by Tommy Lee Jones) is a scientist assigned to help
conducting nuclear bomb tests. Being a radiation expert, he
is too aware of the effects those tests may have on the
environment and civilian population so he wants to abandon
atmospheric tests in favour of much safer, subterranean
tests. The military higher-ups don't particularly like his
heretical views, but most of the Hank's problems come from
his family, namely his wife Carly (played by Jessica Lange).
She is very attractive yet emotionally unstable and her
manic phases tend to manifest in public outbursts of
scandalous behaviour and open flirting with other men. Hanks
nevertheless loves his wife and he is always able to forgive
her, but not the military authorities who handle this
perpetual scandal by relocating Marshall, his wife and two
daughters from one base after another. The latest relocation
brought them from Hawaii to the ugly, run-down Army base in
Alabama. The base commander Vince Johnson (played by Powers
Boothe) is soon attracted to the glamorous scientist's wife.
The plot for BLUE SKY consists of two stories, each of them
suitable for feature film of its own. One depicts the
struggle of lone individual against all-powerful
organisation and it could serve as an excellent history
lesson for post-Chernobyl generations, showing them the
mentality of Cold War, which sacrificed environment,
individual lives, basic morality and common sense for the
sake of nuclear supremacy. This Strangelovian story is
followed by more intimate yet equally fascinating love story
between Mr. and Mrs. Marshall. Unlike most of Hollywood love
stories, this one shows the often very painful sacrifices
people must make in order to have something resembling a
good relationship. Mixing those two stories into one plot
could have looked like a recipe for disaster, but screenplay
Rama Laurie Stagner, Arlene Sarner and Jerry Leichting
succeeds in that. The script has some of the cliches,
including melodramatic, predictable and not very convincing
finale, but the characters and their interactions are
well-drawn and the story in general engaging from start to
finish. The best job was done by actors. Jessica Lange truly
deserved her "Oscar" - her portrayal of Carly is wonderful,
both on the outside (especially in scenes where she brings
touch of Monroesque Hollywood glamour and sexuality to the
dreary and dull setting of early 1960s US military) and
inside, when she makes us understand why her husband loves
her so much despite the endless series of humiliation and
embarrassment. Tommy Lee Jones is also very good in the role
of a man whose love is stronger than machistic pride, and
whose stoicism in matters of heart manifests as virtue in
matters of military ethics. Amy Locane, who was very young
during the production of this film, is very remarkable in
the role of Marshalls' older daughter Alexandra. All in all,
BLUE SKY, despite some flaws, is an interesting and touching
drama that deserves more attention than its single "Oscar"
might indicate.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Star Trek: Generations (1994)
>From time to time almost everyone experiences peculiar
feeling of being born too early or too late. The author of
this review is reminded of such phenomenon any time he
thinks about STAR TREK phenomenon. I was too young to watch
original series of STAR TREK. Afterwards, certain
unpleasantness in this part of the world prevented me and
most of my generation from enjoying STAR TREK: THE NEW
GENERATION and STAR TREK: DEEP SPACE NINE. As a result, the
only incarnation of Roddenberry's universe I have complete
insight belongs to STAR TREK: VOYAGER and STAR TREK movies.
That probably explains why I wasn't particularly
enthusiastic about STAR TREK: GENERATIONS, 1994 film by
David Carson - project that was supposed to pass the torch
from one generation of STAR TREK crew to another.
Plot begins in 23rd Century when legendary Starfleet Captain
James T. Kirk (played by William Shatner) joins the crew of
Enterprise B on their maiden voyage. But this routine affair
turns into disaster because Enterprise B gets involved into
rescue of two ships, endangered by mysterious energy ribbon
called Nexus. Some of the passengers are saved, but Kirk
disappears. 78 years later, crew of Enterprise D, led by
Captain Jean-Luc Picard (played by Patrick Stewart), must
also deal with Nexus, but their efforts are complicated by
gang of renegade Klingons and activities of Dr. Soran
(played by Malcolm McDowell), evil scientists whose plans
include destruction of entire solar systems. Soran's schemes
also cause interesting shifts in time-space continuum that
would bring Picard and Kirk together.
Being the seventh film in STAR TREK movie series,
GENERATIONS is another example of "odd numbers" malady that
plagues this particular franchise. Screenplay by Ronald D.
Moore is burdened with the need to depict "passing of the
torch" between two generations of STAR TREK, so the film
gets stuffed with references to the past glory of ST:TOS and
ST:TNG - Romulans, Klingons, Borg etc. Unfortunately, many
of those references are completely lost to those viewers who
lack proper "trekkie" credentials and who are forced to
watch rather uninspired and cliche-infested plot (including
the mother all bad SF cliches - mad scientist, played by
tragically typecast Malcolm McDowell) and heavy-handed
attempts of humour. Luckily, the acting is more than
satisfactory, especially in the scenes that combine talents
and charismas of William Shatner and Patrick Stewart. The
last appearance of Shatner as Kirk is probably one of the
most memorable moments in STAR TREK history and even those
viewers who were never fans of the original series could
feel its effect. But this sentimental dimension can't ascend
GENERATIONS from the levels of Hollywood's mediocrity and
this film is one of those pieces of cinema that can be
enjoyed and appreciated only in its proper context.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Escape from New York (1981)
Whether the world today is in a good or bad shape is a
matter of debate. However, many would agree that the world
looks much better than in the visions of film-makers from
late 1970s and early 1980s. The movies that marked the
Golden Age of Science Fiction cinema - MAD MAX, BLADE
RUNNER, ALIEN - painted the near future (and some of the
periods in which we live now) in very dark colours. Among
some of the directors who had joined the trend was John
Carpenter, young but already respectable director, who had
established his reputation with very cheap, but effective
genre films like DARK STAR, ASSAULT ON PRECINT 13 and
HALLOWEEN, who later became cult classics. His futuristic
action thriller ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, with some 7 millions
US$ in budget, was his first trip into the big budget
territory. Although some of the contemporary critics saw
film as a sell-out, ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK became cult classic
too. Even the dreadful sequel ESCAPE FROM L.A. failed to
ruin the reputation of the original. It is somewhat ironic
that ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK marked the critical milestone of
Carpenter's career - after this film, the filmmaker went
mainstream, and his career, same as the world in this movie,
went south.
Among all the post-apocalyptic and dark futuristic films,
that thrived in that era of pessimism, ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK
has the most outrageous plot premise. In 1988, the crime in
USA has quadrupled and the government, unable to preserve
law and order by any other means, decided to turn Manhattan
into maximum security prison. The prisoners forced to spend
the rest of their lives behind high walls, surrounded by
machineguns, minefields and thousands of policemen and
soldiers with shoot to kill orders. Into this living hell
falls plane carrying U.S. President (played by Donald
Pleasance), who is immediately taken hostage by the inmates.
Prison warden Hawk (Lee Van Cleefe) decides to rescue
President using the talents of "Snake" Plissken (Kurt
Russell), convicted bank robber and former World War 3
veteran. In exchange for his freedom, Plissken must enter
the prison and rescue the President in less than 24 hours.
His dedication to the job is enhanced with surgically
implanted mini-bombs within his arteries.
For the viewers who see this film for the first time, ESCAPE
FROM NEW YORK might look somewhat silly, considering the
fact that the bleak future, depicted in it, never happened.
It is inconceivable that the US government would try to
solve the crime problem by destroying the nation's top
economic and cultural centre. However, those viewers who
manage to suspend disbelief (among other things, we are to
believe that WW3 wouldn't go nuclear and that the wartime
America would still have efficient leftist underground),
should be rewarded with more than fine piece of cinema.
First of all, unlike many of the films inspired by it (Enzo
G. Castellari's rip-offs), this film has a unique
atmosphere, provided by cheap yet inventive and very
effective production design and special effects. The
Manhattan skyline, seen in total darkness, although matte,
has a very menacing look. The music, again composed by
multitalented Carpenter, is monotonous yet still effective -
sometimes being illustration of the action scenes, but most
of the time serving as some kind of ironic commentary
towards the whole movie.
However, the best icon of this film is the protagonist.
"Snake" Plissken, brilliantly portrayed by former Disney
child actor Kurt Russell, is one of the finest examples of
anti-heroes in modern cinema. With the anti- establishment
look of 1960s rebels, combined with the world-weary voice
that brings memories of Clint Eastwood in his spaghetti
western phase, Kurt Russell created one of the most
effective action protagonists in decades to come. His
character is superbly portrayed with only few lines. Of
course, Russell isn't alone - he shares film with a lot of
great character actors in small but memorable roles. Lee Van
Cleef, playing the warden, with his presence connects this
film with Sergio Leone's classics. Ernest Borgnine is also
very effective in a role of the last remaining New York
cabby, while always reliable Harry Dean Stanton shines in
the role of Brain. Isaac Hayes is great as the charismatic
chief villain, Duke of New York.
Compared with some of the more recent products of action
genre, ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK looks somewhat slow. There are
relatively few action scenes, and they don't last long. Some
of the critics tend to see this as a movie's flaw, because
the long pauses aren't used by Carpenter to show more of
apocalyptic New York and its prison society. Others point
out that the most of the movie takes place at night, which
could be explained with Carpenter's budgetary restrictions.
However, despite those flaws, ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK is still
a very good movie. Failed as futuristic vision, it is still
a superb action adventure, movie that makes us nostalgic
towards the times when the future looked bleak.

Title
Review for Feng yu shuang liu xing (1976)
Those accustomed to Jackie Chan in his early Hong Kong films
are probably aware that the popular actor had to follow the
same path as most of other major stars. He had to work his
way up to the leading roles by playing second fiddles or
characters that could be hardly associated with his current
screen charisma. One of such interesting cases is THE KILLER
METEORS, 1976 kung fu film directed by Lo Wei.
The hero of this film is My Way (played by Jimmy Wang Wu),
martial arts expert equipped with secret and deadly weapon
called "killer meteors". His reputation is such that any
other martial arts expert or heavy in the neighbourhood has
to pay him annual tribute just to stay alive. My Way's
deadly reputation is matched only by those of "Immortal" Wa
Wu Bin (played by Jackie Chan), another "Killer Meteor" who
seeks his help. When two "Killer Meteors" meet, Wa Wu Bin is
just a shadow of his former self, being poisoned by his
treacherous wife, Madam Tempest, who gives him antidote in
order to keep him alive. My Way is asked to steal the well-
guarded antidote and he accepts, entering the deadly web of
intrigue, treachery and shifting loyalties.
Fight scenes in THE KILLER METEORS are shorter and less
spectacular than in an average kung fu film. But this is
probably a good thing, since longer scenes would stand in
the way of the plot, which is incredibly complex for a
simple genre movie. There are numerous characters with
hidden personal agendas and even more twists, enough to fill
entire season of soap opera series, but screenwriter Ku Lung
somehow manages to squeeze all that into feature film
format. The resulting confusion should be attributed to poor
dubbing and bad editing. Lo Wei's direction is hardly
stellar, and some special effects are truly laughable. On
the other hand, they give THE KILLER METEORS certain trash
quality, together with some unintentionally funny lines
spoken by characters. This film is still very entertaining,
but probably less to those who take kung fu films more
seriously. For those without prejudice, it could provide a
good guilty pleasure.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Jésus de Montréal (1989)
In today's Amerocentric world few events can take universal
importance and recognition without being connected to USA in
some obvious way. This is true now, and it was true even a
decade ago, before the end of Cold War and globalisation.
One of the examples is the way Christian communities in the
world reacted to films that were allegedly attacking the
fundaments of their faith. First of them, Martin Scorsese's
LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST got instant notoriety, was
publicly denounced, boycotted and banned in many countries.
However, global anti- Christian stigma branded on this film
could not be explained only by the controversy of the
material. At least part of the reason for such reaction lies
in the fact that it was major Hollywood production, starring
major American stars and being directed by one of the
best-known and most respectable American director. Only a
year later, Denys Arcand, the best known and most respected
filmmaker in neighbouring Canada, also dared to question
fundaments of Christianity in JESUS OF MONTREAL. This time
there wasn't any reaction or major controversy - Arcand not
only got away with this but also got himself prestigious
Cannes Film Award in the process. One of the reasons for
that is the fact that he shot film with cast of globally
unknown actors and with exclusively French dialogues. So,
this film couldn't have impact American or global mass
markets and thus bring unwanted attention and controversy.
This proved to be a mixed blessing for JESUS OF MONTREAL,
because fewer people are aware of something that should be
described as one of the finer films of the last century.
The plot of this film begins with Father Leclerc (played by
Gilles Pelletier), Catholic priest who has been staging
Passion Play in Montreal Catholic Sanctuary for almost four
decades. Knowing that the times have changed and that the
old-fashioned production needs refreshing, he hires young,
talented but relatively unknown actor Daniel Coulombe
(played by Lothaire Bluteau) to stage new, more modern
version. Coulombe takes this job very seriously - he hires
small troupe made out of mostly young or unemployed actors
and actresses, while taking the role of Jesus for himself.
In order to make his portrayal as realistic and convincing
as possible, he spends a lot of time in historical research
of Jesus and his times, and that research includes some new
and controversial findings that would find its place in the
new text of the play. When this modern, innovative and
effective production premiers in front of the audience, the
result is theatrical triumph, but Daniel and his colleagues
have little time to celebrate because Church authorities
aren't very enthusiastic about questionable content. When
Father Leclerc demands that some alterations be made in the
text, Daniel and his actors decide to defend their artistic
integrity but their stand would have tragic consequences.
Whenever a film deals with divisive issues, its makers tend
to take one side, and that, especially among less
experienced directors, can lead to films turning into cheap
propaganda. There are some critics who would undoubtedly
view JESUS OF MONTREAL as nothing more than atheist attack
on concept of religion, especially Christianity. Same as
Coulombe's play within the film, JESUS OF MONTREAL
approaches New Testament without awe expected by other
directors - Jesus is presented as down-to-Earth historical
character who became religious figure decades after his
death; his message and everything else got distorted through
centuries, and now serves only in order to maintain the
power of hypocritical, corrupt and oppressive Church.
However, although Arcand (who wrote screenplay for his film
and appears in small cameo as judge) presents arguments
against religion, he doesn't take clear atheistic stand -
even the opposing, religious, side can find arguments for
their cause. Reason for this near-heretical and yet very
balanced approach is in very clever and effective
film-making that blends serious drama with a lot of humour
and satire. The title itself might explain the secret of
this film - noble, mythical, ancient and religious figure of
Christ is contrasted with glittering and ultra-materialist
setting of Montreal, one of the most modern city of today's
world. Arcand manages not only to utilise this sharp
contrast but also to reconcile these opposing images with
each other, same as the opposing views they are supposed to
represent. This is achieved mainly by characters and events
in modern-day Montreal being equivalent of those in New
Testament; in some other instances all that would look
anachronistic or corny, but here Arcand manages not only to
pull it off but to create some moving scenes and
long-lasting images, and the seemingly anti-religious tone
of the film is compensated with humanist message that should
reconcile atheists and believers alike.
While Arcand as screenwriter filled this film with clever
allegories and multi-layered story elements and character,
Arcand as director filled this film with impressive sights
and sounds. Some of the images in the film are long-lasting
and they have set the tone of the film. One of the greatest
examples is the walking on the water which is performed
twice in the film - once as part of Coulombe's play, and on
another occasion it features half-naked actress Mireille
(played by Catherine Wilkening) shooting perfume commercial.
Arcand never misses opportunity to show majestic skyline and
architecture of Montreal, while, in the same time, he also
never fails to present hypocrisy and corruption that reigns
in that city. The musical soundtrack is also great and
features long range of sources - from Bulgarian folk,
through classics to modern rock'n'roll. The acting - which
should be the pivotal element of this film - is flawless.
Lothaire Bluteau looked perfect for the part of
Coulombe/Jesus and he justified all of Arcand's expectations
while portraying artist who hid strong convictions and
artistic passions bellow seemingly quiet exterior. Catherine
Wilkenning is also great in the role of Mireille, Coulombe's
colleague and love interest, same as Johanne-Marie Tremblay
as equivalent of Mary Magdalene. Gilles Pelletier is great
in the role of imperfect priest, while Yves Jacques is
equally effective as Satan-like attorney specialised in
milking show business clients.
All in all, whatever the audience might think or feel about
issues presented in JESUS OF MONTREAL, this film is one of
the excellent examples of superb filmmaking, which deserved
its awards and which continues to be great viewing and
thought-provoking experience.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon (1987)
The author of this review didn't need advice of Wes Craven
to build opinion about movie sequels. Together with remakes,
now extremely popular among big studio executives, sequels
represent the embodiment of Hollywood's creative bankruptcy.
I became aware of that almost decade and half ago, when the
inevitable comparisons between sequels and original films
began giving disappointing results. To make thing even
worse, bad quality of sequels even managed to change the
initial good impressions of originals. Such thing almost
happened to LETHAL WEAPON, one of the most successful movie
franchises in modern Hollywood. The slide of quality in
sequels wasn't that severe, but the change of character was.
While the last film in the series represents one of the
purest examples of action comedy genre and "high concept",
the 1987 original, directed by Richard Donner, was made as
deadly serious police film.
The plot, based on the screenplay by Shane Black, is set in
Los Angeles during Christmas. Roger Murtaugh (played by
Danny Glover) is black LAPD homicide detective who has just
turned 50 and has every reason to be proud of his life
achievements - perfect service record, nice family and
suburban home that is embodiment of American dream. Martin
Riggs (played by Mel Gibson) is white LAPD narcotics
detective who became expert in marksmanship and martial arts
while serving in Special Forces during Vietnam War; recent
death of beloved wife, on the other hand, made him
emotionally unstable and nearly suicidal so nobody wants to
work with him. Murtaugh reluctantly becomes his partner and
two policemen, who don't have anything in common except
Vietnam War record, starts investigating suicide of
high-class prostitute. The case stops being routine when it
turns out that the prostitute happened to be daughter of
Michael Hunsaker (played by Tom Atkins), rich banker and
Murtaugh's war buddy. Hunsaker hints that his daughter's was
actually murdered in order to stop him from spilling beans
about large and sinister conspiracy. His words are taken
seriously when everyone connected with the case, including
him, starts getting killed by expert assassins. Murtaugh and
Riggs continue with the investigation that would lead them
towards "Shadow Company", group of former CIA agents and
mercenaries led by General McAllister (played by Mitchell
Ryan). In the meantime, Riggs himself becomes assassin's
target and Murtaugh's daughter Rianne (played by Traci
Wolfe) gets kidnapped.
First viewing of LETHAL WEAPON was more than pleasant
surprise to me. On the surface, the script contains enough
cliches to make this film indistinguishable from multitude
of 1980s action romps featuring Vietnam veterans and their
deadly skills being used on hordes of evil drug dealers in
three-piece suits. But LETHAL WEAPON looks different from an
average film of such kind, thanks to the very good direction
by Richard Donner. This director never belonged to the major
league of Hollywood filmmakers, but his reputation of
reliable craftsman is well deserved, since he always
succeeds in turning his mega-budgets into pleasant viewing
experiences. In case of LETHAL WEAPON, big budget became
evident in a series of elaborate and spectacular action
scenes (stuntman died during filming one of them). But the
spectacle comes second to the well-created atmosphere of the
film and Donner's clever use of sharp contrasts - Murtaugh's
suburban idyll vs. Riggs' living in cheap trailer, glamorous
lifestyle vs. corruption and depravity. But the sharpest
contrast is provided by combined forces of Eric Clapton and
Michael Kamen whose musical score confronts spirit of
Christmas with atmosphere filled with loneliness, tragedy
and death.
Actually, action scenes, no matter how spectacular they are,
come second to the atmosphere of the film. But the most
memorable things about LETHAL WEAPON are its two leading
characters. What differentiates remarkable action films from
simple action films are the protagonists we care for, and
Shane Black did wonderful job in providing that by writing
Murtaugh and Riggs. Actors playing them did even more
remarkable job. Danny Glover is simply excellent as
policeman who embodies American middle-class ideals -
successful career, material wealth, loving family - and his
insistence on police procedure and reluctance to shoot first
and ask questions later - qualities usually associated with
hero's monkey-wrenching superior in average police movies -
become quite understandable. But Murtaugh hides skeletons in
his closet - his painful and (presumably violent) Vietnam
past is well hidden from his family, and when his family
becomes endangered Murtaugh gets as irrational as Riggs. Mel
Gibson, on the other hand, embraced Riggs as opportunity to
play character very different from the one that made him
famous in MAD MAX series. Unlike the deadly but cool Road
Warrior, Riggs is initially presented as "damaged goods" and
he stays that way until the last shot. We are glad that the
person with such skills is employed on the side of Good, but
few of us would like to be in his company. The scenes that
feature Riggs' outbursts have intensity rarely matched in
the history of cinema. Both Glover and Gibson employ a lot
of talent in order to slowly build tolerance and later the
bond between those two almost irreconcilable personalities.
All other actors were shadowed by such great performances,
although some, like Traci Wolfe as Murtaugh's daughter with
teenage crush on Riggs, underlines humanity of lead
characters.
Unfortunately, the film loses its momentum in the second
half, when character exposition gives way for action and all
cliches associated with it. In many ways, those actions
scenes, although well-done, are implausible (Murtaugh and
Riggs, no matter how insane they are, would hardly go after
whole army of vicious killers without back-up) or even
predictable (dreadful final showdown between Riggs and chief
assassin played by Gary Busey). Some critics would frown
upon the such first class characters being used in third
grade plot that deals with government agents going bad and
using covert ops for selfish and nefarious purposes -
something that became action movie cliche by itself in late
1980s. Such plots, inspired by Iran-Contra scandal and all
conspiracy theories that followed it, could, unfortunately,
be inspired by some world conflicts that are actual today
and where the line between political intrigue, military
operation and organised crime is always blurred (as the
career of recently deceased Serb paramilitary leader Arkan
clearly shows).
Despite being associated with uninspired sequels and cliched
one-liner about old age and certain bodily function
(actually borrowed by Friedkin's TO LIVE AND DIE IN L.A.
shot two years earlier), LETHAL WEAPON remains one of those
rare 1980s action films that passed the test of time.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Lassie Come Home (1943)
The latest STAR WARS craze clearly shows that certain
categories of movies are very hard to review objectively.
The reviewer is often tempted to judge movie not by its own
merit, but by his or her own feelings of nostalgia towards
past times. Many of those movies belong to the category of
family entertainment, which is natural, because for many,
those films invoke happy memories of childhood. For the
author of this review, one of such films is LASSIE COME
HOME, 1943 Hollywood film by Fred M. Wilcox, one of the
classics of family entertainment. I first saw this movie at
the very early age and it was one of the most memorable
movie experiences in my life.
Based on the novel by English author Eric Knight, this film
is set in Depression era Yorkshire, where Sam Carraclough
(Donald Crisp) and his wife (Elsa Lanchester) and son Joe
(Roddy McDowall) must endure the hard times caused by
employment. For the little Joe the only comfort in those
hard times comes in the shape of Lassie, collie which is his
father's pride and joy. But one day money runs out and
family is forced to sell the dog to rich Duke of Rudling
(Nigel Bruce). The dog, however, is using every opportunity
to run back to his old owner, which is causing great
frustration to Duke's kennel keeper Hynes (Pat O'Malley).
The escapes are to stop when Duke moves to Scotland. Duke's
granddaughter Priscilla (Elizabeth Taylor) would allow dog
to escape and begin long, hard and dangerous journey south.
At first glance, LASSIE COME HOME might look like nothing
more than standard Old Hollywood tearjerker. But even those
who don't like tearjerkers would, in most likelihood, agree
that this film looks almost like a mythical masterpiece
compared with some of the recent examples of the genre. The
script by Hugo Butler is very tight and simple, but, in the
same time, provides enough material not only to entertain
the young audience, but even to make them think. The main
element of the plot is based on real life - conflict between
reason and emotion, this time accelerated by down-to-Earth
economic hardships, something very palpable not only to the
audience fifty years ago, but for people in many countries
today. The sub-theme of poverty is very present in the film
- on her journey Lassie encounter many characters who suffer
because of it, and the only act of violence in the movie is
economically motivated. But even those who don't appreciate
this social aspect of the film would enjoy it, because it is
well-told and interesting adventure story, full of not so
spectacular, but really moving and memorable scenes. In hour
and half we see some barely sketched characters, who are
magically fleshed out by excellent actors, whether they are
veterans like Donald Crisp or child newcomers like young
Roddy McDowall and Elizabeth Taylor. Another thing that
distinguishes this film from the rest is absence of true
villains - compared with today's cinema, the characters seem
surreally good. The music by Daniele Amfitheatrof sets the
right, melancholic atmosphere, same as Oscar-nominated
colour photography by Leonard Smith. The film was great
success in its time and spawned many sequels, and, in later
years, many remakes and imitations. But for the author of
this review LASSIE COME HOME is one of those rare and
precious films that are to be enjoyed by all generations -
children and adult.

Title
Review for Cat People (1982)
Whenever someone mentions "1980s" and "horror film" in the
same sentence, the first association is usually FRIDAY 13TH,
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET or myriad of similar low-budget
"teenage slasher" films inspired by their respective
successes. But, in the beginning of decade, horror films
didn't exclusively belong to the world of B-cinema. At least
some of them had high budgets and ambitious directors at
their helm. One of such examples is CAT PEOPLE, 1982 horror
by Paul Schrader, film that enjoyed quite popularity at the
beginning of the decade only to completely vanish from
moviegoer's memory in few years. That same fate was
experienced by many great 1980s hits, but rarely was so
unjustified like in the case of this film. The only
explanation could be found in critics' snobbery. CAT PEOPLE
was remake of classic 1942 B-horror, and, as such, it simply
had to be inferior piece of work. Also, large quantities of
violence, gore, sex and nudity didn't help either - many
critics viewed Schrader's film as exploitative.
Plot of this movie begins when 21-year old Irena Gallier
(played by Nastassja Kinski), who spent most of her life in
orphanages and foster homes, arrives to New Orleans to
finally reunite with her older brother Paul (played by
Malcolm McDowell), who works as priest. Irena is so thrilled
to find long lost family that she doesn't care about few
bizarre and mysterious details of Paul's lifestyle,
including long periods he spends outside home. During one of
such periods Irena visits local ZOO and becomes obsessed
with one of its exhibits - magnificent black panther. The
animal was brought in the cage after attack on prostitute.
Oliver Yates (played by John Heard), zookeeper who had
caught the beast is still puzzled by many unexplained
circumstances of the bizarre incident, as well as the origin
of the panther. His attention, however, shifts towards
beautiful young woman who spends all her time in front of
panther's cage. He falls in love with Irena, who, although
still a virgin, returns his feelings. When Paul returns
home, he would show not only unusually high degree of
insight into Irena's romantic life, but also his own
unnatural jealousy. This revelation is just one of many
shocking discoveries and events that would turn Irena's life
into ultimate nightmare.
Many people who criticise Schrader for using too much sex
and nudity in his version of CAT PEOPLE probably didn't pay
attention to movie's tagline "An Erotic Fantasy For The
Animal In Us All". While Tourner in his 1942 version had to
rely on small budget and only hint things, Schrader was able
to enjoy benefits of big budget, like location shooting or
special effects by Albert Whitlock, as well as liberal
censorship standards of pre-AIDS era that allowed more
explicit erotica in mainstream Hollywood. All that enabled
Schrader to use 40-year old original in order to explore one
of the most common motives in various forms of art -
connection between Eros and Tanathos. This motive, which was
exploited as one of the most boring cliches of "teenage
slasher" genre (which was, among many things, parodied in
Craven's SCREAM), was brought to its purest and most logical
incarnation in CAT PEOPLE. Unlike the killings of horny
teenagers in cheap 1980s horrors, committed by sexless,
passionless and machine-like monstrosities who are there to
please puritanical desires of the audience, homicidal
violence in CAT PEOPLE comes from the same source as sex
itself - dark depths of our collective unconsciousness - and
it is equally irrational and primordial in its nature, and
the killers are even more motivated by carnal desires than
the victims. Connection between sex and violence is even
underlined with the imagery that twists around all movie
cliches - in most of the other films, nakedness of the
characters symbolises their vulnerability; in CAT PEOPLE
nakedness symbolises their "natural state", in which they
are more prone to indulge into their irrational and
homicidal instincts and thus become even more dangerous than
with their clothes on.
Schrader's ambitions in this film were matched by his talent
as a director. CAT PEOPLE is much slower than most of the
other horror films, but Schrader uses this great length to
slowly yet methodically build characters and atmosphere. All
the scenes in this film possess certain eerie quality - from
the mythical, primordial past depicted in the prologue to
the exotic architecture of New Orleans. Camera of John
Bailey builds such atmosphere together with the a very good
musical score by Giorgio Moroder, which was very popular in
early 1980s, same as David Bowie's title song. However, the
screenplay by Alan Ormsby is somewhat disappointing - many
lines of dialogue are weak, and characterisation is
incomplete, especially in the end.
However, the acting is superb, although most of the leading
talents hardly managed to repeat the same success in the
decades to come. Young Nastassja Kinski, whose career in
next two decades would be tragic example of missed
opportunities, simply shines in her first major Hollywood
role. This role could be rather thankless, because most of
the viewers (especially males) would pay more attention to
her willingness to expose her body in front of camera, than
her actual acting abilities. But those abilities are there
nevertheless, and Nastassja Kinski is great in her portrayal
of young woman, torn between virginity and carnal desires,
between her need of normalcy and frightening dark forces
within her unconsciousness. Her partner, John Heard, who
would become of the most reliable Hollywood supporting
actors in 1980s and 1990s, is more than good in one of his
rare leading roles. But the greatest of them all is Annette
O'Toole, whose character of Yates' colleague and former
girlfriend Alice allowed both her and Schrader to play with
genre conventions - in the beginning, while she establishes
her relationship with Irena, she plays the part of sexually
active and "experienced" Bad Girl vs. young, innocent Irena;
in the end, the tables are turned and Alice is next-door
type who is symbol of good and normalcy against Irena as
Evil Seductress. Unfortunately, Malcolm McDowell, who plays
potentially most interesting part of Irena's troubled
brother fell victim to typecasting, and his Paul is almost
indistinguishable from psychotic villains he had played in
million other films.
All in all, despite its shortcomings, CAT PEOPLE is film
that hardly deserved its slide into relative obscurity. This
is very good piece of filmmaking and one of the rare
examples of "erotic thriller" which gives good name to that
ill-reputed genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Kumonosu jo (1957)
Apart from being the greatest Japanese film director of all
times, Akira Kurosawa received great deal of respect for his
effort to bridge cultural gaps between Japan and West in his
films. Due to the popularity of Kurosawa's "jidai-geki"
1950s and 1960s classics Japanese culture became part of
global pop culture and many Western artists began seeking
inspiration for their work in Japanese or Oriental motives
(George Lucas finding inspiration for STAR WARS in HIDDEN
FORTRESS is the best known example). However, Kurosawa
didn't just popularise Japanese culture for the outside
world - he took cultural exchange more seriously and many of
his best- known works feature distinctively Western themes
in Japanese setting. One of such example is with Shakespeare
plays being set in medieval Japan. Kurosawa made two of such
films in two different phases of his career. KUMONOSU JO,
known either as COBWEB CASTLE or THRONE OF BLOOD, was made
in 1957 and its script was based on Shakespeare's MACBETH.
The plot begins with rebellion against Kuniharu Tsuzuki
(played by Takamaru Sasaki), powerful warlord and master of
unapproachable Cobweb Castle. When all seems lost, Tsuzuki
is saved by the bravery of his two top lieutenants and best
friends - Taketori Washizu (played by Toshiro Mifune) and
Yoshiaki Miki (played by Minoru Chiaki). Before they are
arrive into Tsuzuki's castle to receive reward for their
deeds, they must pass through Cobweb Forest and there they
stumble onto mysterious witch (played by Chieko Naniwa). She
foretells their future - both Washizu and Miki's son will
become new masters of Tsuzuki's castle. Washizu is sceptical
at first, but when the prophecy starts to unravel he becomes
restless and nervous, not knowing how to reconcile his
loyalty and growing ambition. His wife Asajo (played by
Isuzu Yamada) begins to use this sentiment and gradually
leads Washizu towards treacherous murder of his master. As a
result, Washizu becomes new master of Cobweb Castle but he
is not at peace with himself, because the other part of the
prophecy - ascension of Miki's son Yoshiteru (played by
Akira Kubo) haven't been fulfilled yet. Washizu's growing
paranoia and desire to prevent the destiny would lead to
inevitable and bloody conflict with his best friend.
KUMONOSO JO has the misfortune of being put in the same
basket with other pieces of Kurosawa's opus, usually better
critically acclaimed or more popular than it. This film,
shot in black and white and in 1:33 aspect ratio, lacks the
splendour of Kurosawa's latter day samurai epics like
KAGEMUSHA and RAN; on the other hand, down-to-earth realism
and humour present in Kurosawa's most popular "jidai geki"
films like SEVEN SAMURAI and YOJIMBO. Taken out of the
context of Kurosawa's magnum opus, KUMONOSO JO is a fine
piece of filmmaking. Kurosawa knows how to use empty Mount
Fuji locations creates the atmosphere of doom and
hopelessness which is perfect for this Shakespearean
tragedy. Actors are also quite fine -Toshiro Mifune's
neurotic character is perfectly paired with Isuzu Yamada
whose face, covered in white make-up, hides any sign of
emotion, making her Japanese version of Lady Macbeth
creepier than most similar characters in history of cinema.
However, her creepyness can't be compared to Chieko Naniwa
in truly frightening performance as evil spirit/witch of
unidentifiable gender.
But despite all of that, all those who expect something in
the class of SEVEN SAMURAI would be a little bit
disappointed. For example, apart from Washizu and Asajo,
none of the other characters is fleshed out; great Takeshi
Shimura, who played such a great role in SEVEN SAMURAI, is
barely recognisable and appears for few brief moments.
Reason for that is perhaps in Kurosawa's desire to be
faithful to Shakespeare's original as much as possible; in
the process he failed to bring something new and original to
the text. Despite the new Japanese settings, this version of
MACBETH looks artificial and theatrical. Furthermore,
Kurosawa makes another mistake in prolonging certain scenes
up to the point when even the patience of his most loyal
fans get tested. Those fans, as well as the other viewers,
might in the end be rewarded with the extremely long, brutal
and unforgettable death scene that is the only truly
remarkable and recognisable moment of this film.
All in all, despite being technically a very good piece of
"jidai-geki" or Shakespeare adaptation on its own, KUMONOSO
JO is a slightly disappointing film that could be truly
enjoyed only by the most enthusiastic Kurosawa fans, able to
withstand Great Master even when he is not at his best.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Bitter Vengeance (1994) (TV)
Virginia Madsen built her career around the roles of women
who use their sex appeal in order to manipulate men and
bring them to their doom. The character played by Virginia
Madsen in BITTER VENGEANCE, 1994 television thriller by
Stuart Cooper, is total opposite of such stereotype. Annie
Westford is modest librarian married to Jack (played by
Bruce Greenwood), former policeman who now works as security
guard in the bank. The husband is far from being incarnation
of marital virtue - he not only has an affair with co-
worker, but also dreams of using his position and law
enforcement experience in order to execute a perfect bank
robbery. The carefully drawn plan works wonderfully for Jack
- he escapes with stolen money and fakes his own death. For
Annie, this is beginning of a nightmare - she just lost a
husband, all her money and became prime suspect in the
robbery.
The script, written by Pablo F. Fenjves, looked rather
promising, offering few interesting twists to film noir
formula - woman being manipulated by man instead of other
way around. Unfortunately, director Stuart Cooper approached
this material in the same way Soviet bureaucrats used to
approach economic problems - by blindly following formulas
and not caring if the thing didn't work. As a result, BITTER
VENGEANCE suffers from inadequate pacing - in the beginning
it is too slow, and the ending is too fast. Apart from
Virginia Madsen who does her best in rather unusual role,
and Bruce Greenwood (who would later become one of the more
reliable character actors in Hollywood) as her husband, the
acting is not particularly impressive. Because of that,
BITTER VENGEANCE is a routine television product, not good
enough to earn viewers' attention.
Review written on September 30th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
When people discuss the slow yet unstoppable decline of
quality film-making within commercial Hollywood cinema, they
like to point out sequels as one of the symptoms. Sequels
might also be taken as a symbol of those trends, because
they illustrate the lack of creativity within big budget
cinematography; instead of innovation, resources are poured
into well-established and repetitive formulas. Naturally,
the movie often blamed for inspiring such bad trends, STAR
WARS, had the sequel of its own. But, luckily, it was one of
those precious few exception to the rule - THE EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK was the sequel that rose above the high
standards set by its glorious predecessor.
Unfortunately, the quality and real importance of this movie
is often ignored due to the simple fact that it is often
referred as "the second in STAR WARS trilogy". Unlike the
original, who could be seen by as standalone adventure, THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK required built-in audience, and those
audience, as well as the critics had some difficulties in
appraising the movie as a single artistic achievement. Those
who did mostly consider the second movie to be the best in
trilogy. The author of this review shares that sentiment,
same as the heroes of Kevin Smith's CLERKS. I might also add
that I consider one of the best in many splendid science
fiction movies made in that golden age between 1977 and
1982.
The same era was perhaps splendid for the fans of science
fiction cinema, but the content of those films, like MAD
MAX, ALIEN or BLADE RUNNER, was mostly pessimistic. The
feeling of gloom influenced even such light-hearted and
fairy-tale saga like the STAR WARS. Dark atmosphere is
evident from the beginning; the previous chapter ended with
Rebels celebrating the destruction of Death Star, powerful
weapon of evil Empire. Yet, despite their triumph, they are
far from decisive victory in the war. The Empire still has
the upper hand, and that is clearly demonstrated when
Imperial forces destroy the main Rebel base on the ice
planet Hoth. In order to save itself from total
annihilation, main Rebel force is dispersed all over Galaxy.
Heroes from the previous film are separated into two groups;
first group is Rebel commander Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill)
who, together with his faithful robot R2D2 (Kenny Baker)
flies to swap planet Dagobah. His goal is to fulfil his
personal vision and find Yoda (voice by Frank Oz), 900 years
old Jedi master, that would complete his training in the
ways of mystic Force. Another group of our heroes - rogue
pilot Han Solo (Harrison Ford), his co-pilot Chewbacca
(Peter Mayhew), Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher) and robot C3PO
(Anthony Daniels) - are on the spaceship Millennium Falcon,
being mercilessly pursued by Imperial fleet, whose leader,
evil lord and former Jedi knight Darth Vader (David Prowse,
voice by James Earl Jones), wants to capture Luke Skywalker.
The sequel to the megapopular STAR WARS defied many
unofficial Hollywood rules about sequels. Instead of simply
enhancing well-established, attractive and obviously
successful elements of the previous film, this sequel used
it a foundation for its own, original narrative structure.
Instead of relying on bigger special effects, bigger
explosions or more spectacular sights and sounds, like many
sequel makers do these days, creators of THE EMPIRE STRIKES
BACK actually worked very hard to remedy those few flaws the
original had. Most notable of all was in cardboard
characterisation. That task was given to the talented
creative team of Leigh Brackett, respected Fantasy/SF
author, and Lawrence Kasdan, whose directorial star would
shine in the next decade. They managed to develop their
characters, breath some life and new dimension in their
appearance, and also forced them to make some difficult
moral dilemmas. The clear boundary between Good and Evil was
slightly blurred in this movie, when even the some members
of Imperial military were given opportunity to express their
human emotions. But, most of all, difference between STAR
WARS and THE EMPIRE is in plot and sinister overtones; the
heroes of the movie aren't superhumans immune from misery
anymore. They get maimed, hurt, tortured, both physically
and emotionally, and this time the viewers, even those who
consider the whole trilogy to be escapist fantasy, are
really compelled to care what would happen to them in the
end. The aliens, who used to be one of the more entertaining
attractions of the previous movie, are mostly left out of
the picture; there aren't nice fuzzy creatures here - apart
from Yoda, all the aliens are hostile or, either, prosaic
domesticated animals that "smell bad". That was another
element of gritty realism, that distinguishes this film from
the rest of trilogy. The movie is also full of surprise
twists, and the final one is probably the best known in the
entire history of cinema.
Even the acting, often regarded as the weakest segment in
whole STAR WARS saga, is here at its prime. Mark Hamill is
very convincing as the suffering hero, probably because bad
things that happen to his characters corresponded with some
bad things that happened to him in real life. Carrie Fisher
was also brilliant, especially in her scenes that witness
the unresolved sexual tension between Princess Leia and Han
Solo. Even Billy Dee Williams is good in his limited role of
Lando Karlisian, one of the rare new characters of the saga.
However, the most impressive character addition is Yoda,
small and frail, yet spiritually strong figure. The magic of
the Muppet creators, suggestive voice of Frank Oz, combined
with Yoda's sharp lines (one of them would become the
nemesis for Beverly Hills plastic surgeons)  left the strong
imprint on many generations of STAR WARS fans.
Apart from the a screenplay and well-defined characters, THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK also benefited from the superb direction
by Irvin Kershner, whose career reached its peak here. The
look of the film corresponds with the changes of the
atmosphere; the blue colour dominates Peter Suschitzky's
photography throughout the whole picture. Special effects
are improved over STAR WARS, and still impressive after
eighteen years (one of the proofs is 1997 special edition,
that, unlike other two parts of STAR WARS trilogy, leaves
most of them untouched and brings only small improvements).
Even the musical score by John Williams, with his immortal
"Imperial March" theme, sounds like the best in the trilogy,
with its dark overtones brilliantly corresponding with the
general feel of the film.
Grim atmosphere of the movie, however, can't prevent the
many generations of viewers to experience the very same
"sense of wonder" that overwhelmed them in the previous
picture. THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK is the original, very
special segment of STAR WARS saga, but also the element of
STAR WARS saga nevertheless. But even those who somehow
managed to escape the magic charms of George Lucas' universe
and failed to become hard core fans, could enjoy in the
magnificent quality of this masterpiece.

Title
Review for Arctic Blue (1993)
Those who are prone to mistake Hollywood's products for
reality shouldn't watch NORTHERN EXPOSURE. For them, Alaska
might have look like a better place to live than Hawaii.
However, in the meantime, there were those movies who
offered alternative version of Alaska - closer to the vision
of cold, harsh place of Jack London's novels, or the
frontier of an American Wild West. In such wilderness,
adventure is still possible, but also close encounters with
the characters who many of us wouldn't like to see in our
neighbourhoods. One of such characters is Ben Corbett
(played by Rutger Hauer), hardened trapper who is prone to
violence. In one of such incidents, small row between his
friends and rival hunters ends with bloodshed. Among all of
them, Ben is caught and accused of murder. However, before
he faces trial, he must be transported from isolated town to
proper authorities. This is the job for environmentalist
Eric Desmond (Dylan Walsh), who would soon find that
murderer's friends are ready to do anything in order to save
their friend.
When they think about the plot, filmophiles among the
audience would probably find a lot resemblance to the
classic 1957 western 3:10 TO YUMA. Similarities aren't
accidental - this film really looks like western.
Unfortunately, faced with somewhat small budget, director
Peter Masterson doesn't direct ARCTIC BLUE like western.
Instead, it often baffles audience with shots more
appropriate to experimental video. Screenplay by Ross
LaManna is bellow par, with clear story diluted with poorly
written, yet morally ambiguous characters, and also with
unnecessary elements of environmentalist propaganda. Casting
is also rather bad, especially in the case of awfully inept
Rya Kihlstedt in the role of Eric's girlfriend. Luckily,
Rutger Hauer, same as in many similar instances lately,
saves this basically forgettable piece of low budget cinema
with his screen personality. Also, some of the action scenes
are impressive. But, in the end, ARCTIC BLUE is a film with
the flaws that outweigh its virtues.

Title
Review for Dream Lover (1994)
Too many thrillers in 1990s relied on the same formula -
protagonists having to deal with seemingly innocent and
pleasant individual who is in reality a dangerous
psychopath. So, whenever authors of such thriller tried to
evade or bring fresh spin for this formula, results were
usually better than average. One of such examples is DREAM
LOVER, 1994 thriller written and directed by Nicholas Kazan.
Protagonist of this film is Ray Reardon (played by James
Spader), successful and rich architect who is recovering
from the painful divorce. On one of the parties he meets
Lena (played by Madchen Amick), beautiful and mysterious
woman who would arouse his curiosity as well as his lust.
Two of them gradually start a relationship, end in bed, get
married and raise a family. Ray's idyll begins to crack when
strange incidents begin to cast doubt about both Lena's
identity. Faced with the great possibility that he was lied
for years, Ray loses grip on reality and all that leads to
unexpected finale.
Nicholas Kazan, son of famous director Elia Kazan and
well-established screenwriter of his own, reverses 1990s
thriller formula by avoiding use of dangerous lunatic as
convenient villain. Psychotic character in this film is
actually the protagonist, while villain happens to be normal
person with immoral, but quite understandable agenda. Kazan
also reverses the formula by turning protagonist's
affliction into advantage instead of weakness. Rather
unconventional and totally surprising ending is also one of
the advantages of the film. Acting is very fine, with James
Spader allowing darker overtones to manifest in his screen
personality. Madchen Amick, one of TWIN PEAKS beauties, is
also quite impressive as femme fatale, and male audience
would probably appreciate her willingness to perform nude in
front of cameras. Unfortunately, Kazan shows some problems
in pacing - the ending is somewhat too abrupt, and the
scenes featuring Ray's insane fantasies seem too distracting
and "artsy". However, DREAM LOVER is definitely film worth
watching and one of the most underated 1990s thrillers.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Possessed by the Night (1994)
"De gustibus non disputandum est" ("People's tastes should
not be discussed") is an old Latin proverb that is going to
be seriously challenged whenever someone chooses interior
decoration similar to the one chosen by the protagonist of
POSSESSED BY THE NIGHT, 1994 erotic thriller directed by
Fred Olen Ray. For writer Howard Hansen (played by Ted
Prior) a simple jar containing brain looks like an exotic
artefact so he brings it home. Needless to say, the said jar
is alive and able to lead Hansen and people around him to
evil. But this is just a part of Hansen's problems, since
his literary agent Murray (played by Frank Sivero) is a
gambling addict in serious debt to mean gangland boss Scott
Lindsay (played by Henry Silva). In order to pay his debts,
he wants to steal the manuscript of Hansen's yet unfinished
novel and his sexy secretary Carol McKay (played by Shannon
Tweed) is sent to Hansen's household.
When queen of cheap 1990s "erotic thrillers" Shannon Tweeds
stars in a film directed by trash cinema king Fred Olen Ray
the viewers might be certain that the result of this
combination won't have any redeeming values. Whole
Cormanesque horror plot is nothing more than an excuse to
have Shannon Tweed naked in front of cameras. The trouble
with POSSESSED BY THE NIGHT is in the plot being way bellow
even such minimal standards necessary for this kind of
movies. To make things even worse, this "plot" is combined
with even more ridiculous subplot about loanshark wanting to
go straight, introduced probably only in order to fill 90
minutes of running time. Result of all this is, as you might
expect, a complete mess. It is sad to see how once great
actors like Henry Silva or notable performers like Sandahl
Bergman sink their reputations by appearing in this film.
However, at certain points this film becomes so bad in an
entertaining way, and Shannon Tweed does deliver her goods
on the screen, so it could be said that POSSESSED BY THE
NIGHT fulfilled its purpose.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Wild at Heart (1990)
Once I was asked why I don't give highest grades to the
recently released films. The answer is rather simple - too
many times I had been blown away after watching the film for
the first time, only to see more and more flaws with each
subsequent viewing. As a result, many films that I used to
call masterpieces now seem overrated to me. So, in order to
spare myself of critical embarrassments, I tend to be
cautious and give highest grades only to those films that
pass the test of time.
One of such examples is related to the career of David
Lynch, American director who used to be rather obscure
figure in the film world, known only among lovers of "artsy"
cinema. His unexpected success with TWIN PEAKS television
series brought him to the mainstream audience, and being
Lynch fan became fashionable. At the apex of his popularity,
in 1990, he directed WILD AT HEART, strange combination of a
road movie, melodrama and black comedy which would bring him
his first "Palme d'Or". But his stunning success was marred
with very vocal minority that booed his film at the Cannes
Film Festival. Such event foreshadowed the strong division
among the critics when they discuss this film -some hail it
as genuine Lynchian masterpiece, and some call it cheap
exploitation of his mainstream popularity. At first, I was
blown away with this movie and thought of it as one of the
best films of 1990s, truly remarkable event. Later, I began
to see its flaws and now I don't see it as especially
important chapter in the history of cinema.
The plot of the film is based on the novel by Barry Gifford.
Sailor Ripley (played by Nicolas Cage) and Lula Fortune
(played by Laura Dern) are couple whose passionate love to
each other withstands all the challenges, including bizarre
attempt on Sailor's life that ended with Sailor serving two
years for manslaughter. Sailor gets out of prison and Lula
agrees to come with him to California. While two of them
head west, stopping in flea-bag motels in Deep South, Lula's
psychopathic mother Marietta (played by Diane Ladd)
desperately wants to separate them and hires services of
private detective and her part- time lover Johnny Farragut
(played by Harry Dean Stanton). However, her motive is not
just the well being of her daughter; Sailor used to work for
Marcello Santos (played by J.E. Freeman), local crime boss
who also happened to be Marietta's partner, both in business
and bed. While Santos' men join the pursuit in order to
silence Sailor, the couple is faced with more immediate
problem. Sailor and Lula run out of cash and get stranded in
small town in Texas, so Sailor is accept the offer by
menacing-looking criminal Bobby Peru (played by Willem
Dafoe) to take part in one of his capers.
Initial success of WILD HEART could be explained with the
strong impact felt by the first-time viewers. Even those
members of the audience who used to be familiar with Lynch
and his style of filmmaking, including the author of this
review, were caught by surprise when exposed to the very
original way he approached the story and the characters.
Naturally, Lynch used unusual editing techniques, camera
angles, suggestive photography and haunting musical score by
his composer Angelo Badalamenti to create dark and surreal
atmosphere, which actually helped the not so original plot
(doomed lovers on the run). But, the most interesting thing
in WILD AT HEART is barrage of shocks - Lynch bombards us
with unexpected events and character traits, often
challenging the endurance of the more squeamish audience.
For example, the lead character of Sailor in the beginning
of the film is attacked; he reacts with the most savage (and
very graphically depicted) act of violence. Only few scenes
later, he reacts to the similar act with equally irrational
and almost surreal chivalry. Few people like Lynch are ready
to combine so contrasting elements in the same movie, and
even fewer are ready to use them in the same scenes. One
second we are subjected to the sappiness, chivalry and
child-like innocence that belong to fairytales, only to be
brought down to earth with foul language, graphic violence,
explicit sex and, of course, Lynch trademark scenes
featuring various forms of physical and mental deformity.
That barrage of shocks and unexpected twists keeps the
viewers at their seats - they simply must see what is going
to happen next.
Unfortunately, somewhere in the second part of the film,
shock begins to wear off, some of those bizarre twists and
characters begin to look predictable and repetitive, most
notably numerous WIZZARD OF OZ references (except the last
surreal scene). Lynch also loses the sense of rhythm, there
are many scenes that go nowhere or should have been trimmed
a bit. The dialogue is also often weak, at least compared
with BLUE VELVET, Lynch's true masterpiece. Finally, after
two hours, some viewers begin feeling that Lynch didn't take
this film too seriously; whole purpose of WILD AT HEART
seems to be to Lynch's parody of himself and his cult of
filmmaking. One of the last scenes, with its ironic homage
to Kurosawa's YOJIMBO, foreshadows the incoming reign of
another cult favourite who had based his reputation on such
homages - Quentin Tarantino.
Whether Lynch took plot and characters seriously might be
debatable, but the cast definitely put great efforts.
Nicolas Cage played one of the great roles of his career -
Sailor Ripley is strange combination of street thug with the
heart of gold and Elvis impersonator. Cage managed to make
him both funny and human in the same time; we both laugh at
him and sympathise with his plight. Unfortunately, his
partners weren't up to the task, mostly due to Lynch's idea
to have his characters as bizarre as possible, and his
directing probably encouraged overacting. Laura Dern puts
too much effort to make her Lula as different as possible
from squeaky-clean all-American girl from BLUE VELVET; the
result is creature that engages in chain-smoking, swearing
and torrid sex and, unfortunately, has disturbing tendency
to make rather unappealing facial expressions. Her mother,
played by Laura Dern's real mother Diane Ladd (who deserved
"Oscar" nomination for this role) plays one of the most
embarrassing incarnations of evil in the history of cinema -
sex-crazed, drunk and downright stupid creature, way below
the high standards set by Wicked Witch of the West. Even
Willem Dafoe, who probably enjoyed opportunity to play Bobby
Peru, character as far away from his best- known role of
Jesus as possible, seems wasted here. His character appears
too late to stick in memory compared with deformed and
demented villains played by Grace Zabriskie and David
Patrick Kelly. Always reliable Harry Dean Stanton, who plays
only comparatively normal character in the film, is
tragically underused. Luckily, there are many Lynch's old
associates that improve impression about film with
interesting and memorable parts in cameos - Jack Nance,
Sherilyn Fenn, Isabella Rosselini and Sheryl Lee.
All in all, WILD AT HEART has some flaws, yet it is still
one fine example of Lynch's directorial talent. Evident
imperfection of this film shouldn't be the reason to discard
it with the same zeal as it was hailed as masterpiece ten
years ago. WILD AT HEART is still an interesting piece of
cinema and it can still provide intense viewing experiences,
at least for those who watch it for the first time.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Monolith (1993)
Long time ago, the author of this review watched the
documentary series COSMOS. In one of the episodes, its
narrator, Carl Sagan, made an interesting experiment. He
collected samples of all the chemical elements that create
human body and mixed them all, trying to create a man. Of
course, it failed. Unfortunately, the authors of MONOLITH
didn't watch this particular episode, otherwise they
wouldn't make a movie so utterly disappointing like this
one. Like Sagan, they had interesting elements for
interesting SF action thriller- good, or at least, capable
actors; good special effects; few interesting action scenes
- but they failed to connect them into coherent film.
The plot, like so many of them, takes place in Los Angeles.
Tucker (played by Bill Paxton) and Terri Flynn (played by
Lindsay Frost) are pair of tough LAPD detectives that are
investigating the murder of a small boy. The killer is
emotionally disturbed scientist, but, before they can find
out any motives for the killing, the suspect and all the
evidence is taken over by Department of Historical Research,
led by menacing Villano (played by John Hurt). Of course,
Tucker and Flynn decide to investigate further, and they
find a lot of violent incidents in the city - incidents
involving some malevolent alien force, capable of taking
over human bodies. But, before they anything about it, they
must take care of Villano and his henchmen, who would stop
at nothing to suppress the truth.
The concept of this film, although it resembles X-FILES
(that had the first season in the same year), is actually
very unoriginal - some mean alien coming to Los Angeles and
being unstoppable, until few dedicates members of LAPD take
care of him (like in I COME IN PEACE or HIDDEN). The
screenplay by Steven Lister is awful - it simply doesn't
connect the dots between obligatory action scenes, the
characters are unappealing and wooden, and the plot contains
wholes with the size of Nebraska. Of course, there are some
huge implausibilities (like organisation called Department
of Historical Research taking over murder suspects from
LAPD) that look like an insult to viewer's intelligence. If
Lister and director Eyres made those mistakes deliberately,
trying to turn this film into self-parody, they failed. The
film looks dead serious. Some actors, like Louis Gossett Jr.
and John Hurt, are doing their work very well, but they
can't breathe life into bad and stereotypical roles. Paxton
and Frost are, on the other hand, totally deprived of any
chemistry between the characters they play, either romantic
or classic "buddy buddy" model. Some action scenes look
interesting, but a lot of pyrotechnics and special effects
won't change the verdict on this film - MONOLITH is failed
film that should be avoided.
Review written on September 11th 1999

Title
Review for Dirty Dozen, The (1967)
Today most people would hardly rush to associate war with
anything noble or chivalrous, and even splendid little wars,
won without a single casualty, leave bitter taste in mouth.
But, some thirty years ago it wasn't so; the movie
audiences, with their war experiences shaped by the global
and relatively clear-cut Good vs. Evil conflict like WW2,
didn't see anything wrong with war, as long as their "good"
side was winning. Such perceptions were strengthened by the
series of WW2 action spectacles made in 1960s. They usually
featured small group of dedicated and chivalrous Allied
servicemen carrying out important and spectacular actions
behind enemy lines. It is rather ironic that the film that
began to undermine perception of war chivalry actually
belonged to this category. Directed in 1967 by Robert
Aldrich, THE DIRTY DOZEN later proved to be the most
remembered and most influential of all those war spectacles.
Its reputation, on the other hand, was diminished by the
series of uninspired television sequels made in 1980s,
including rather silly television series shot in former
Yugoslavia.
The plot, based on the novel by E.M. Nathanson, is set in
Spring of 1944. Allied forces in England are preparing for
the D Day, and American top brass is planning to paralyse
German command-and- control system by the behind-the-lines
raid on French chateau that is always full of top German
officers. The chateau is, however, fortified and heavily
guarded and only the most expendable men could be used for
this nearly suicidal mission. Major Reisman (played by Lee
Marvin) is an officer short on discipline, but with
reputation of man who gets job done. He is given the task of
selecting group of twelve soldiers, court-martialed and
convicted for murder, rape and similar offences and offering
them full pardon in exchange for their participation in the
mission. Since the alternative is decades behind bars, or,
in some cases, even the death penalty, they all accept the
offer. But that is the easy part for Reisman; being
notoriously short on discipline they prove almost impossible
to train. Despite that, Reisman is patient and his group,
nicknamed "The Dirty Dozen", soon begins to function as an
effective military unit. Reisman's superiors, on the other
hand, are having second thoughts and the unit must convince
them of their abilities before being sent to combat.
THE DIRTY DOZEN is an important film, because it was the
first one to acknowledge one fact, often ignored by the
militarists and other war apologists - one of the character
traits essential for being a good soldier is the lack of any
moral inhibitions towards killing another human being.
Aldrich presents that fact by portraying the Dirty Dozen as
a bunch of sociopaths, raving murderers, rapists, religious
fanatics and idiots; their characters are totally
undesirable in any civilised society, and in civilian life
they would all probably end up in jails, death rows or
lunatic asylums. But in the context of war, those character
traits prove quite useful and are actually encouraged by
their less hypocritical superiors. Aldrich shows that ironic
fact with a hard contrast between the Dirty Dozen, unshaved,
dirty soldiers that resemble barbarians and their more
"civilised" counterparts - first US paratroopers led by
uptight Colonel Breed (played by Robert Ryan), then finally
German soldiers, all in neat uniforms and probably much
nicer human beings than any of Reisman's group. In the end,
during the final battle, we actually see Dirty Dozen as
group of remorseless, stone-cold killers that brutally
massacre whole bunch of harmless old men, including their
wives and girlfriends; in time of peace, such action, that
painfully resembles Columbine High School shooting, would
bring universal condemnation; in time of war it would
actually bring decorations, promotions and heroic
attributes.
All this irony is, of course, very cleverly disguised in the
form of extremely entertaining action picture. The action
element, on the other hand, comes relatively late in the
film, but we are instead introduced to the multitude of
extremely colourful and interesting characters. And those
introductions are perhaps even better than the final
actions; we see whole bunch of very capable character actors
in some of the most memorable roles of their entire careers.
John Cassavettes is excellent as mean and mutinous petty
gangster Franco; Telly Savallas shows evil charisma as
murderous religious fanatic; young Donald Sutherland is good
as unit's idiot. But the best performance comes from Lee
Marvin, as tough, cynical officer who sees the world as it
is; he doesn't need his MP Sergeant Clyde Bowren (played by
Richard Jaeckel) to remind him that all those sweet-talking
convicts happen to be rather mean characters. Detailed
character development led to two and half hours of length,
leaving no time for any unnecessary romantic subplots. This
is good, since THE DIRTY DOZEN happens to be one of the
ultimate Guy Movies; women are reduced to recreational
objects or more exotic examples of "collateral damage".
Because of that, THE DIRTY DOZEN should have its reputation
untarnished by the remake, impossible in today's atmosphere
of "political correctness".
Aldrich's film, despite being classic, still has some flaws.
The final showdown in the end, despite being spectacular,
seems somewhat artificial compared, at least compared with
the similar battle in the last part of Spielberg's SAVING
PRIVATE RYAN. The ending is rather abrupt, cutting out the
survivors' journey to safety. But, in the end, THE DIRTY
DOZEN is still a very good piece of Hollywood art that tells
some rather unpleasant truths in the form of popular
entertainment.
(Historical note: According to the article I had read many
years ago, the novel was actually based on real life story.
US military convicts were offered pardon in exchange for
similar suicide mission in Nazi occupied France. They
agreed, but after the drop they turned their tails and spent
the rest of war in neutral Spain. In real life, use of
pardoned convicts as soldiers is rather common phenomena, as
experiences in former Yugoslavia indicate. In WW2 Red Army
and Wehrmacht employed such practice. The operation that
actually resembles this movie the most was conducted by
Germans. In May of 1944, frustrated with unsuccessful
attempts to chase down and destroy the core formations of
Yugoslav Partisans, German High Command planned the daring
parachute raid on the headquarters of Partisan leader Tito
and trained entire battalion of convicts for that very
purpose. In the end of the day, Tito, although initially
surprised, managed to get away and the convict paratroopers,
decimated in a hellatious battle, took only Tito's freshly
tailored Field Marshall uniform as their only trophy.)

Title
Review for Out for Justice (1991)
There is time for peace and there is time for war. There is
time for movies that take cautious approach to sensitive and
complex issues and there is time for movies in which Good
Guys kick the living daylights out of Bad Guys without
burdening themselves with any serious contemplation. The
time in which we are living is the time for the latter, so
movies like OUT FOR JUSTICE, directed in 1991 by John Flynn,
would be more than appropriate.
The protagonist of this film is Gino Felino (played by
Steven Seagal), New York police detective who grew up on the
mean streets of Brooklyn. His marriage is just about to end,
but family issues suddenly take second place when he hears
the news about his partner and best friend Bobby Lupo
(played by Joe Spatara) getting brutally murdered in front
of his family. Since the perpetrator - crack-smoking and
ultraviolent Mafioso wannabe Richy Madano (played by William
Forsythe) - has already been identified, the investigation
actually turns into manhunt. Both police and Mafia take part
in it, but hardly anyone shows the zeal equal to Felino who
uses various (mostly violent) methods in order to extract
information about Madano's whereabouts. As Felino begins to
close in, Madano and his small but vicious gang of street
decide to hit back by targeting Felino's family.
Steven Seagal is arguably one of the worst actors in
present-day Hollywood and his reputation wasn't helped by
the projects in which his ambitions turned out to be way
higher than his abilities. Thankfully, OUT FOR JUSTICE,
which he co-produced and co-wrote (including few song
lyrics) is not one of them. Weak standard plot about
policeman who avenges the death of his partner is nothing
more than an excuse for the series of scenes in which Seagal
displays what he knows best - taking care of any individual
or group foolish enough to challenge him in a various forms
of physical combat. The script lacks the usual preaching
tone of other Seagal's movies and the mean streets of
Brooklyn are used more to provide exotic flavour to the
setting than to serve as an illustration of drug addiction,
crime, violence and other social ailments of pre-Giuliani
New York. Instead of moralising, film presents things like
corruption and symbiotic relationship between police and
organised crime as something quite natural and, at times,
even beneficial to the society. And, naturally, in a
situation when everyone wants to see quick justice done,
issues like civil liberties and police procedure are thrown
through the window. Steven Seagal's character might be
obnoxious, intimidating and ultraviolent and the only thing
that actually align him to the forces of Good (apart from
couple of obviously manipulative attempts to show his
sensitive, altruistic side) is the fact that the villains
are even worse and, consequently, can be dealt only by
higher doses of their own medicine. Because of that
otherwise good character actor William Forsythe goes over
the top in his portrayal of homicidal cokehead. On the other
hand, other actors are quite solid in their roles, even when
they are thankless, like those of Madano's brother and
sister, played by Anthony De Sando and Gina Gershon.
Director John Flynn is more than able to keep things under
control and the film goes quite smoothly for 90 minutes,
leaving hardly any time for audience to pick various flaws
in the film. In the end, authors of OUT FOR JUSTICE can be
forgiven for cliched storyline, cartoonish characters and
ridiculous amounts of senseless violence - few films managed
to show how Good can defeat Evil in such a simple and
entertaining way.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Death Wish 4: The Crackdown (1987)
In the first DEATH WISH movie, mild-mannered New York
architect Paul Kersey, played by Charles Bronson, was
avenging the death of his wife. In the second, he was
avenging his daughter. In the third, he instigated small war
in order to avenge the old friend. Fourth movie, on the
other hand, begins with Kersey doubting the point of his
violent crusades and living the quiet life with his
girlfriend Karen, played by Kay Lenz. However, since this is
DEATH WISH MOVIE, we know that sooner or later something bad
is going to happen to the people Kersey cares for. This time
Karen's teenage daughter dies of a crack overdose and Kersey
is forced to return to his old vigilante ways. Kersey's new
targets, unlike the previous movies, aren't the ordinary
street punks but rich, heavily armed and well-connected drug
dealers. Even such unstoppable killing machine like Kersey
needs some support, and it comes from the publisher Nathan
White (John P. Ryan), determined to avenge the drug-related
death of his own daughter. White's plan is to make Kersey
kill major players in two rival drug dealing organisations
and thus instigate the war between them. The plan begins to
take shape, but Kersey's actions bring attention of two
police detectives - Reiner (George Dickerson) and Nozaki
(Soon Teck-Oh).
Fourth (and, unfortunately, not the final) installment in
the DEATH WISH series, will probably remembered as the
typical movie of Cannon Group, production company
responsible for some of the worst cinematic trash of the
last decade. However, although some critics might argue,
DEATH WISH 4: THE CRACKDOWN represents slight improvement
over the DEATH WISH 3. Paul Kersey, one of the most
intriguing (and potentially controversial) characters of the
1970s, is still being dumbed down by mediocre script, and
Charles Bronson really doesn't feel the need to put much
effort in his acting. However, the hand of a veteran
director J. Lee Thompson seems more capable of Michael
Winner's and the action scenes seem slightly less surreal,
although they still look cheap and repetitive and downright
boring. There are some attempts for the movie to have a plot
between the numerous scenes of violence, and one of such
attempts is a potentially interesting plot twist at the end.
The script even tries to fake some social conscience
(through criminally underused Kay Lenz's character) and
predates the War on Drugs campaign that would inspire many
Hollywood products in next few years. There are even some
half-hearted attempts of humour - both intentional and
unintentional, like in a scene where Kersey assassinates mob
figures by a wine bottle - but the quality of this movie is
still far away from Bronson's 1970s classics.
(Special note to x-philes: Mith Pilleggi, the actor who
plays AD Skinner in THE X- FILES, could be seen in a small
role of cannery lab foreman).

Title
Review for Feds (1988)
Those who have read some of my previous reviews know that I
have some problems accepting words like "comedy" and "Ivan
Reitman" in the same sentence. In the decade and half after
GHOSTBUSTERS, his last truly funny film, Reitman was
constantly failing to make any film able to produce laughter
among audience. This failure was most the evident case of
Hollywood creative bankruptcy associated with "high concept"
films, and it wasn't limited only on Reitman's work as
director. Reitman record as producer was equally
unimpressive, and FEDS, 1988 comedy directed by Dan Goldberg
is just another example.
The heroine of this film is Elizabeth De Witt (played by
Rebecca de Mornay), former Marine that decides to become an
FBI Agent. Before being enrolled in FBI Academy she is told
that only a fraction of the class would actually finish the
course, graduate and become an agent. Her own prospects seem
discouraging, since she lacks school credentials and skills
necessary to wrestle with high academic demands. Janis
Zuckerman (played by Mary Gross), her nerdish roommate, has
quite another problem - she could eat toughest academic
courses for breakfast, but her physical skills and fitness
seem way bellow high FBI standards. After a while both women
decide to compensate each other's flaws with tutoring.
Probably some time during production Goldberg and his
screenplay co- writer Len Bloom realised that their gags
simply aren't funny and that this rather weak copy of POLICE
ACADEMY couldn't work. So, they added some usual story
ingredients - action in the form of bank robbery subplot,
and some romance for our heroine, although failed one in the
form of hunkish would-be agent Brent Shepard, played by Ken
Marshall. Even with that, this film remain unattractive and
its short length shows the lack of creative juices among its
makers. Luckily, charm and tragically underused comedic
talent of Rebecca de Mornay save this film from turning into
total disaster. Unlike Mary Gross, who has the same facial
expression for the most of the film, she gives some realism
and humanity for her character.
Another thing that gives some purpose to this film is its
educational value. Those who are able to swallow Bloom's and
Goldberg's weak attempts on humour could get some
interesting insight into the inner workings of world's most
famous law enforcement organisation (after LAPD, of course).
The training course is presented seriously and realistically
with future Senator Fred Dalton Thompson playing quite
believable chief instructor and giving lessons usually not
applied by most of the on-screen lawmen. FBI, just as any
other police organisation in the world, relies on its brains
more than its guns, and this film reflects that - good
psychological skills, intelligence and mastery of
complicated legal procedures are actually more valuable than
simple gunplay. This message of FEDS is more important than
cliched and unsuccessful attempts to preach feminism.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Tommyknockers, The (1993) (TV)
About nine years ago, I read the article in Serbian science
fiction fanzine that dealt with the novels written by
Stephen King. The author gave very detailed analysis of each
of them, and in the end, ranked them all. On the bottom of
the list was THE TOMMYKNOCKERS. Whether the novel was indeed
the worst or not is not important, because almost any piece
of fiction with Stephen King signiture is likely to be
adapted to the big screen. So was the case with THE
TOMMYKNOCKERS, which was adapted into three-hour TV-movie in
1993.
Like many of Stephen King's novel, the story takes place in
a small town in the Northeast. The place is called Haven,
and one of its inhabitants is a writer Bobbi Anderson
(played by Marg Helgenberger). One day she walks in the
woods and stumbles into strange metallic object. Soon Bobbi,
and the rest of the town is witnessing a series of bizzare
events, most frightening of them all being the change within
the townspeople themselves. Good, God-fearing citizens are
turning into stone cold killers, all guided by mysterious,
evil force. Due to the alcoholism, Bobbi's friend Jim
Gardner (Smits) is the only man immune to the evil influence
and he tries to stop it.
Although it has budget, and many of very capable actors in
supporting roles (including the lead Jimmy Smits in a role
rather unusual for his screen personality), THE
TOMMYKNOCKERS is a television movie that simply looks cheap.
Reason for that is formulaic screenplay by Lawrence D.
Cohen, that doesn't improve the lack of originality in
Stephen King's plot, and also the professional, yet wooden
directing by John Power. In the end, after many plot holes,
predictable twists and lot of boredom, we have rather lame
finale with some cheesy special effects. All in all, this
film is still watchable, but most people would do themselves
a favour if they skip it.

Title
Review for Shadow, The (1994)
Comic book superheroes are rather thankless material for
contemporary moviemakers. With few exceptions, like Richard
Donner's SUPERMAN or Tim Burton's BATMAN, film adaptions of
popular comic book serials usually turn out to be utter
disappointments or total stinkers (including the sequels of
aforementioned films). The Shadow, popular character of
1930s pulp novels and radio serials who had given
inspiration to the creator of Batman, is one of those who
couldn't escape such fate in its 1994 screen adaptation.
The protagonist of the film is Lamont Cranston (played by
Alec Baldwin), New York millionaire with the bloody past of
opium smuggler. Long time ago in the Far East a Tibetan monk
helped him to see the errors of his ways and taught him
psychic skills, including ability to "cloud people's minds".
Because of these skills he is virtually invisible and every
night he goes on the streets of 1930s New York in order to
fight crime and injustice under the guise of The Shadow.
Shadow's skills are shared by his archnemesis Shiwan Kahn
(played by John Lone) who comes to New York in order to
pursue his life-long dream of world domination. His plan is
to hold city to ransom with an atomic bomb built by nuclear
physicist Dr. Reinhardt Lane (played by Ian McKellen).
Shadow does everything in his power to stop him, but his
efforts are complicated by scientist's daughter Margot
(played by Penelope Ann Miller) who possesses psychic powers
of her own.
THE SHADOW, unlike most of the comic book adaptations, has a
screenplay that tries to give three dimensions to their
two-dimensional pulp characters of the original. The same
screenplay, written by David Koepp, somehow manages to
include squeeze multitude of the serials' characters and
most memorable situations. Production design by Joseph C.
Nemec III, aided by CGI, succeeds in creating vivid and
beliavable ambient of 1930s New York on L.A. sound stage.
However, screenwriting efforts in character development are
compromised by bad acting - Alec Baldwin seems rather
disinterested in his part, as well as John Lone, who
obviously feels uncomfortable in the role of comic book
villain (while others, like Tim Curry, turn to unnecessary
overacting). The impression is somewhat improved by the
charming presence of Penelope Ann Miller which gave some
erotic flavour to this film. Unfortunately, director Russell
Mulcahy, revered for his work on HIGHLANDER and infamous for
his work on the sequel, shows his tendency to base films on
non-stop action and cheap pyrotechnics, usually at the
expense of the characters and story which probably ended on
the cutting room floor. So, THE SHADOW, the movie that could
have been another BATMAN, ends like one of those forgettable
Hollywood films that gave such a bad reputation to comic
book adaptations in general.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Aliens (1986)
Almost any film reviewer sooner and later gets nostalgic and
thinks fondly about certain period in film history, when
unmatched multitude of masterpieces emerged in a relatively
short time. For the author of this review, such Golden Age
happened in late 1970s and early 1980s, when he enjoyed most
of the movies he considers the best. Almost exclusively
those movies belong to the genre of science fiction; genre
that later became the domain of blockbuster infantilism,
inspired by Lucas and Spielberg. Most of the directors that
used to shine in that Golden Age, slowly faded away in the
years to come, unable to adapt to the new rules of
Hollywood. However, even in such atmosphere another
masterpiece happened; shining counterexample to the popular
belief that Hollywood sequels always must be inferior to the
original. Such movie was ALIENS, 1986 science fiction horror
by James Cameron, Canadian director who had a difficult task
in matching quality of 1979 classic ALIEN by Ridley Scott.
However, Cameron managed not only to make a good movie, but
he also made a masterpiece of his own, instant cult classic
that enjoys popularity even now, after twelve years and two
disappointing sequels.
Like many sequels do, ALIENS begins more or less exactly
where the old movie ended. Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) is a
sole survivor of the space freighter plagued by a single yet
deadly alien monster that killed the rest of her crew after
being brought from LV-426 planet. Her voyage back to Earth
in a shuttle ends when she is picked up by salvage team,
only to discover that her hybernated sleep had lasted 57
years. Burdened with terrible nightmare and forced to live
in a world with all her friends and family gone, Ripley also
loses her job, because her old Company executives don't
believe her story about alien-infested LV-426; the planet
was in the meantime colonised by terraformers and nobody
reported any problems. However, that is about to change when
LV-426 stops sending signals. Ripley reluctantly agrees to
join Company's senior official Burke (Paul Reiser) on a
rescue mission, led by Liuetenant Gorman (William Hope) and
his small but elite unit of Colonial Marines. Upon landing,
they discover that the entire population was turned into
hosts for alien organism. That means that they should deal
not with a single monster, but entire small army. Marines
quickly learn that in a first serious engagement, when they
despite all their firepower, get slaughtered. The remaining
band of survivors, nominally led by Corporal Hicks (Michael
Biehn), and actually by Ripley, finds itself stranded in a
small, isolated part of colony complex. Their chances of
survival aren't however, totally hopeless, because a little
girl Newt (Carrie Henn), daughter of the colonists, managed
to avoid monsters simply by hiding in ventilation tunnels.
The biggest achievement of ALIENS is a fact that the movie
seems to work both as a standalone action adventure, and as
a sequel in the same time. Script by James Cameron remains
true to the previous movie, even borrowing some crucial
elements of its plot; yet, despite all those similarities,
script manages to add new twists to the story and remains
original. The most notable difference between those movies
is in a genre; the first one was dark, disturbing, and
slow-paced horror which relied on a thick atmosphere of
anxiety and claustrophobia; the second one is an war movie,
that relies on a clever combination of suspense and non-stop
action thrills, that brings ALIENS clearly to the action
genre territory.
However, there is another element that separates ALIENS from
ALIEN; it is the fact that, unlike the previous movie, this
one has more time and opportunity to speculate about the
trends in future society and comment on the present one. The
world of ALIENS seems like a natural extension of the some
current yet disturbing trends of the Reagan era - supremacy
of all-powerful military-industrial complex, rebirth of
ultramilitaristic jingoism and, finally, yuppie philosophy
of material success through any means necessary. Cameron
obviously seems very concerned about the ultimate result if
such trends remained unchecked, because ALIENS could be very
easily (and most of the critics agree with such notion) seen
as a metaphor for another, this time historical disaster -
Vietnam. If ALIEN tried to warn about the fact that the
universe may hide some horrors that humans aren't ready for,
its sequel tries to warn that even in the brightest of
futures superior technology can't save humans from repeating
some costly mistakes from the past.
Because it tries to send a clear message, ALIENS, unlike
ALIEN, tries to be more humanely oriented film, even
uplifting, especially in the end. While the last one barely
had a happy end and left nothing but a bitter taste in
mouth, this one manages to praise courage, sacrifice and
human spirit, and rewards its heroes by giving them a ride
in the sunset in the form of well-deserved sleep. In order
to be achieve that impact, ALIENS collected a small yet
impressive group of well-drawn and three- dimensional
characters the viewer cares for. The only character shared
with ALIEN, Ripley, played by Sigourney Weaver in an
"Oscar"-worthy performance, was well- developed; already
proven to be capable of handling dangerous situations,
Ripley was hardened by previous traumatic experience and now
is ready to tackle with her worst demons. For some
contemporary critics, character of Ripley from ALIENS was
some kind of feminist response to the RAMBO-inspired
renaissance of action moviee machismo. But, unlike
Stallone's icon, Ripley was, through her interaction with
Nwet, also portrayed as a mother figure, capable of
emotions. Thus, character of Ripley can serve as an ideal
for strong and capable women who don't want to lose her
sensitivity and femininity.
Other characters are also well-drawn, although the
breath-taking tempo of non-stop action and their constantly
dwindling numbers wouldn't indicate so. Corporal Hicks,
played by one of Cameron's most reliable actors, Michael
Biehn, is brilliant as an indecisive, yet capable soldier,
whose single yet subtle scene with Ripley gives few precious
elements of sexual tension in this picture. Bill Paxton is,
on the other hand, gave much stronger impression as his
wisecracking yet panicky comrade who redeems his cowardice
in the end. He managed to shadow even Jeanette Goldstein and
her great effort to transform herself into tough female
Marine. Most subtle performance was one by veteran character
actor Lance Henriksen who played android Bishop; his simple
gestures helped to turn his android character Bishop into
the most human personality of all the cast. All of those
characters were also equipped with a series of sharp
one-liners that would become one of this movie's trademarks.
Even the slimy Burke, played by Paul Reiser, had one of
them.
Although ALIENS, unlike its predecessor, puts more emphasis
on action than on atmosphere, James Cameron had worked very
hard on visual details, trying to make it as faithful to
ALIEN as possible. Yet in the same time, he made ALIENS
quite unique with its new, futuristic weaponry, clothes,
vehicles and spaceships. Together with Stan Winston's superb
special effects those visuals made ALIENS one of the most
recognisable and visually stunning movies. While the
original was literally dark, Cameron's photographer Adrien
Biddle used a lot of light, but its combination with grey
tones made an atmosphere of ALIENS equally depressing.
However, the most noticeable element of the movie is a
superb musical score by James Horner, who had a very
difficult task in matching Jerry Goldsmith's haunting
soundtrack in the ALIEN. However, Horner made it by using
effective themes that perfectly match numerous action scenes
in the film. The proof of its quality lies in the fact that
the ALIENS soundtrack is often used outside this movie.
For a lot of people ALIENS is considered to be "the best" in
many categories. It is considered to be the best in Alien
cycle. It is also the best movie in already impressive
career of James Cameron. And, finally, it is also considered
to be the best science fiction film ever made. Some people
might disagree with anything from above, yet one thing
remains obvious -ALIENS is an excellent movie, not just for
the fans who built a whole cult around it, but also for the
regular viewers, who haven't been able to see something
matching its quality for a long time.

Title
Review for Gunfight at the O.K. Corral (1957)
When long-brewing conflict between feuding clans in
Tombstone, Arizona finally reached its culmination on
October 24th 1881, resulting gun violence didn't last more
than few dozen seconds. Hardly anybody at that time could
have predicted that the incident, known as "Showdown at the
O.K. Corral", would gradually get epic proportions and
become crucial part of American folklore. Myth of O.K.
Corral was later perpetuated by Hollywood, whose filmmakers
made multitude of westerns covering those events, some of
them later being hailed as classics. One of such films is
GUNFIGHT AT THE O.K. CORRAL, popular western directed in
1957 by John Sturges.
The plot of this film deals less with the showdown itself
and more with the relationship between two of its most
famous participants. The first is Wyatt Earp (played by Burt
Lancaster), sheriff of Dodge City whose successes in
bringing law and order to the numerous wild towns of Old
West already made him a legend. The other is Dr. John `Doc'
Holiday (played by Kirk Douglas), former dentist who traded
his profession for gambling career and whose notorious
reputation of gunslinger caused many aspiring thugs to make
attempts on his life. Holiday proved too good for them, but
the tuberculosis is going to succeed in what numerous
gunslingers failed. Earp, being of high moral principle,
doesn't like Holiday's way of life, but he nevertheless
saves him from the lynch mob. Holiday later returns the
favour by helping Earp to keep the peace in Dodge City. Two
men gradually learn not only to tolerate or respect each
other, but also become very good friends. After a while Earp
decides to quit the law enforcement business for the sake of
the new, peaceful life with beautiful Laura Denbow (played
by Rhonda Fleming). However, before their marriage, news
from Tombstone, Arizona would make him reconsider. Whyatt's
brothers, who work as local lawmen, got in feud with
Clantons, local clan of thugs and cattle thieves, so Wyatt
goes to Tombstone in order to help them. Doc Holiday follows
him, but when they arrive to Tombstone, Earps are not happy
to see their brother in the company of such notorious
gunslinger.
Most films that covered events at the O.K. Corral took very
liberal approach to historical facts, sacrificing accuracy
for the sake of simplicity or additional spectacle. Script
for GUNFIGHT AT THE O.K. CORRAL, written by Leon Uris,
wasn't exception, but the emphasis was this time given more
to the characters than to the action itself. Result is
somewhat overlong film, with at least few scenes that would
better be left on the cutting floor (like quite unnecessary
episode with Laura Denbow). But slower rhythm is compensated
with top acting performances. The most memorable are, of
course, those by two leads. Burt Lancaster and Kirk Douglas
again make a terrific team. Lancaster, although he plays
character of Earp closer to American myth than the version
used in future, more revisionist, films, allows his
character to show some vulnerability and occasional slip
into the dark side. Douglas, on the other hand, plays his
character splendidly - his portrayal of boozing and
terminally ill gunslinger, although it lacks Douglas'
trademark charm, is quite sympathetic and the audience would
forgive Doc everything, even the hints of abuse in his
relationship with long-suffering girlfriend Kate Fisher,
splendidly played by Jo Van Fleet. Both Lancaster and
Douglas excel in mutual scenes, creating buddy buddy
chemistry that would become legendary in future years.
Supporting cast is also splendid, but among many names
stands young Dennis Hopper whose portrayal of young,
troubled yet hot-headed Bill Clanton would provide one of
the most powerful scenes not only in this film, but also in
1950s westerns.
Director John Sturges, whose speciality was action, had
little opportunity to show his talents in this dominantly
character-driven piece. But even such low volumes of actions
allowed him to stage few really interesting scenes,
including the spectacular, albeit non-historical, showdown
at the end of the film. The movie benefited a lot from the
talents of musical composer Dimitri Tiomkin, who actually
repeated the technique used in HIGH NOON. The title song,
which is sung by Frankie Laine, works as sort of Greek
chorus and helps keeping the mythical atmosphere of the
film. The overall result is professionally done and
interesting film, which, although being bellow standards of
a true masterpiece, deserves its rightful place among the
western classics.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Color of Night (1994)
When I was little boy, I wanted to grow up and become
psychiatrist. It looked like a really attractive profession
to me - you earn money by doing nothing, just sitting and
listening to complete strangers while they confess the most
intimate details of their lives. However, even such life can
have some bad sides - some psychiatrists may become wanted
war criminals, and some, like Robert Capa, protagonist of
1994 thriller COLOR OF NIGHT, may happen to see their
patients jumping to their deaths through his own office
window. Capa (played by Bruce Willis) is shaken by
experience, so he needs some help from his old friend and
colleague Bob Moore (Scott Bakula) who lives in California.
However, after repeated death threats, Bob gets killed and
Capa, advised by police Lt. Sanchez (Ruben Blades), decides
to find the killer among the picturesque members of Bob's
therapy group. When he isn't solving the mystery, Capa is
engaged in passionate love affair with mysterious and sexy
girl name Rose (Jane March). In the meantime, the killer
begins stalking and targetting Capa too.
Many people actually despise this film, and they probably
have a lot of good reasons. First problem is in the
disorganised screenplay by Matthew Chapman and Billy Ray,
which is strange and not very successful mix of Agatha
Christie-like "whodunnit" thriller, and psychological drama.
Another is terrible miscasting of Bruce Willis who has some
serious problems in convincing the audience that he is
actually intellectual. Then, there is a bunch of awfully
stereotyped minor characters that serve as collective comic
relief. The plot is, of course, formulaic and totally
predictable, with the obligatory and not very thrilling
climatic showdown in abandoned warehouse. And, finally, many
film-lovers were disappointed to see Richard Rush, very
talented director of 1970s, engaged in this typical
Hollywood garbage, far bellow high standards of that golden
era.
However, what saves this film from total failure are the
actors. Brad Dourif and Lesley Ann Warren are charming as
the members of Capa's support group, same as Ruben Blades as
Chicano detective. Finally, Jane March looks really
attractive and although her allegedly steamy sex scenes with
Willis (the ones that caused some rating controversy)
definitely aren't worth the hype, she is at least good thing
to see. And finally, some elements of the screenplay, like
the lesbian relationship, have certain trash quality that
would give this film certain aura of "it's so bad that is
good" guilty pleasure. Anyway, with more of two hours of
length (with extra twenty minutes in integral version) this
film can be hard to watch for those expecting high quality
entertainment. Those more relaxed and equipped with the
benefits of VCR technology, might enjoy it a little bit
more.

Title
Review for Speed (1994)
"Thrillride of the summer" is a magical phrase that saves
legitimate movie critics from being branded sell-outs. It
allows them not to admit that they were degraded to the
intellectual levels of unwashed masses while they were
enjoying Hollywood blockbusters. It also helps them to later
explain why they were giving two, three or five thumbs up to
the industry products that couldn't pass objective
inspection. One of such products, ideal for the use of
phrase, is SPEED, 1994 action thriller by Dutch cameraman
turned director Jan de Bont, summer blockbuster that used to
be called "the movie of the year" in those pre-Tarantino
times.
The plot of the film is nice example of utter simplicity.
Harry Payne (played by Dennis Hopper) is a mad bomber who
wants to extort money from the city of Los Angeles and, in
the process, get even with Jack Traven (Keanu Reeves),
daring policeman who had foiled Payne's similar stunt in the
past. Payne rigs the city bus and sets the device to arms
itself whenever bus exceeds 50 mph speed limit. The bomb
wouldn't explode as long as the speed doesn't decrease below
that level. Traven becomes aware of that and first he races
to get to the moving bus, and than to stop it from going
under the critical speed limit. Among helpless passengers is
Annie (Sandra Bullock), who would have to take the role of a
driver.
Plot, although nothing but a loose cohesive material for
three long and spectacular action scenes, is rather complex
in comparison with the characters in SPEED. This "high
concept" product hardly needs characters - cardboard
cut-outs seem to do the trick. The most noticeable example
is Jack Traven, character without any life apart from what
we see on the screen. Lack of character and emotion is
adequate for the wooden style of acting by Keanu Reeves.
Dennis Hopper, on the other hand, plays just another in his
long series of psychotic villains, not trying at all to be
original. The only real personality in this film is Sandra
Bullock, in rather thankless role of romantic sidekick that,
ironically, launched her into Hollywood major league. But,
she, as well as anything else, is secondary to the
relentless attack on viewers' audio-visual senses and their
hormones. Jan de Bont, after spending lots of his career on
the sets of great directors, learned couple of tricks, and
it shows - SPEED is really entertaining film, full of
breathtaking stunts, explosions, chases and other
spectacular actions. Unfortunately, those qualities seem to
wear off on the second viewing, when the critical audience
becomes painfully aware of paper characters, lot of
implausibilites, lack of originality and whole series of
plot holes who could devour entire galaxies. The impression
is becoming even worse when SPEED gets compared with action
genre classics like DIE HARD or ALIENS, that could entertain
the audience for years afterwards. And here lies the answer
why "thrillrides of the summer" quickly burn out of our
memories as soon as leaves start falling in the autumn.

Title
Review for Separate Lives (1995)
Job of the policeman can be extremely stressful and,
according to SEPARATE LIVES, 1995 thriller by David Madden,
at least some members of that profession contemplate
alternative ways to give their contribution to the welfare
of the community. One of them is David Beckwith (played by
James Belushi), police detective who left the force in order
to pursue new career of psychiatrist. However, in order to
receive the necessary degree he must attend classes held by
Lauren Porter (played by Linda Hamilton) who takes notice of
new student and asks his help in dealing with rather
embarrassing personal problem. Professor Porter suffers from
psychiatric problem of her own - multiple personality
disorder as a result of childhood trauma. Every now and then
mild-mannered intellectual Lauren transforms into Lena,
promiscuous and aggressive woman who frequents L.A. club
scene. Lauren fears that she has committed a murder during
one of those episodes and she wants to hire Beckwith to
watch over her. Beckwith agrees and he combines his
professional skills of detective with knowledge of
psychology in order to discover the real truth.
Despite not very original basic premise about split
personality, plot of SEPARATE LIVES looks like a good
material for at least passable thriller. Unfortunately,
director David Madden was not exactly up to the task, same
well as rather disinterested James Belushi. His partner
Linda Hamilton didn't put much effort in her acting job
either. Difficult dual role seems way over her abilities,
and the erotic overtones, which could have saved this film,
are missing. Actually, the entire film looks so anaemic that
only couple of four-letter words indicate feature film
instead of routine TV production. To make things even worse,
presence of Vera Miles, intended as some kind of homage to
PSYCHO, mother of all split personality thrillers, can only
remind us of the fact that SEPARATE LIVES is light years
away from quality cinema.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Wilder Napalm (1993)
Every Hollywood star fears the moment when their drawing
power at the box-office starts to disappear. For two of the
big1980s names - Dennis Quaid and Debra Winger - such moment
came in 1993 when they starred in WILDER NAPALM,
supernatural comedy directed by Glenn Gordon Caron. While it
isn't unusual thing for a film to collapse at the
box-office, few of them became so obscure as this one did.
The protagonists of WILDER NAPALM are two Foudroyant
brothers who share pyrokinesis - ability and are able to
start fires with their own thoughts. Thing that they don't
share is the character. Wilder (played by Arliss Howard) is
introvert who wants to live a like a normal man and doesn't
want anything to do with his gift. More extrovert Wallace
(played by Dennis Quaid) have chosen the path of circus
performer. After many years two brothers meet and realise
that they share another thing - lust towards the same woman,
Vida (played by Debra Winger), who is pyromaniac. Since Vida
happens to be Wilder's wife, the never resolved conflicts
between the brothers are going to heat up.
The name which is usually associated with WILDER NAPALM
belongs to Vince Gilligan, screenwriter who later became one
of the most popular members of THE X-FILES writing team,
responsible for the more romantic and humorous episodes of
that TV show. In his first major movie script he shows great
ability to mix supernatural themes with romantic comedy -
combination that, judging by the abysmal results of
PRACTICAL MAGIC, can often lead to disastrous results.
Gilligan's approach (which is going to be employed by THE
X-FILES and myriad of similar shows) is to view supernatural
from the perspective of normal people who have to experience
such phenomena on regular basis. Gilligan's script is helped
by the great cast - both Winger and Quaid are very good in
their roles, although relatively less known Arliss Howard
steals the show. Unfortunately, the director Glenn Gordon
Caron was not exactly up to the task. The film was too slow
in the beginning and too rapid in the finale, and the comic,
light-hearted tone was compromised with extremely serious
scenes that draw WILDER NAPALM to the territory of drama.
Thankfully, those moments don't last too long and this
obscure little film is nevertheless going to entertain those
who give it a chance.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
Movie Reviews by Drax
http://www.purger.com/users/drax/reviews.htm
Movie Reviews on IMDb
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dragan+Antulov 

Title
Review for Touch of Evil (1958)
There are some great films that are considered to be great
for the wrong reasons, not always having something to do
with their quality. TOUCH OF EVIL, 1958 noir thriller
directed by Orson Welles, is one of such examples. Its good
reputation among film critics and aficionados comes from the
background, not from the film itself. Simple fact that it
was directed by great Orson Welles is reason for respect.
But the story behind cameras indicates "great" film. In the
early stages of production Welles was originally hired only
for the acting part. At the insistence of his colleague
Charlton Heston, Universal agreed to allow Welles not only
to direct, and he also re-wrote the original script by Paul
Monash. The result was unusual film that didn't particularly
impressed studio bosses, so they ordered TOUCH OF EVIL to be
re-edited. Welles was unsatisfied with their decision and
practically disowned the film, creating another myth about
great masterpiece ruined by shortsighted, conservative
studio establishment that didn't understand true Art.
The film was actually based on BADGE OF EVIL, obscure pulp
novel by Whit Masterson. Complicated plot takes place in Los
Robles, seedy town on U.S./Mexican border. Ramon Miguel
"Mike" Vargas (played by Heston) is top ranking Mexican
anti- narcotics policeman who has just dealt spectacular
blow to Grandis, powerful group of narcotic smugglers.
Before he testifies, he plans to enjoy honeymoon with his
beautiful American wife Susan (played by Janet Leigh). They
are monitored by "Uncle Joe" Grandi (played by Akim
Tamiroff) who wants to prevent Vargas' testimony by
intimidating his wife. Their plans are affected by unrelated
incident that happens on the border crossing - powerful
local businessman from US side of the border and his
girlfriend get killed by a car bomb. Vargas, who witnessed
the incident, volunteers to help the investigation because
he thinks that the bomb had been planted on Mexican soil.
Investigation is led by Captain Hank Quinlan (played by
Orson Welles), grotesquely obese policeman who became a
local legend because of his law enforcement abilities.
Quinlan doesn't need much time to find a suspect - young
Mexican shoe clerk Manelo Sanchez (played by Victor Millan)
was employee of the deceased and had affair with the bosses'
daughter. When Quinlan finds explosives in Sanchez' home,
diligent Vargas can't fail noticing that the evidence got
planted. When he confronts Quinlan about it and threatens
with exposure, the old lawman decides to get rid of the
overinquistive Mexican. He gets in touch with Grandi and two
of them are plotting diabolical scheme to discredit Vargas
through his wife.
Like many other cinema classics, TOUCH OF EVIL flopped
during original theatrical run and was generally viewed as
the failure. This opinion was shared by studio executives
and critics alike. The latter considered Welles' work to be
nothing more than B-film with A-actors shot in some
unconventional techniques. On the surface, their arguments
have some merit - story which is set in seedy border town
drowned in prostitution and narco-trafficking and featuring
lesbian biker (played by Mercedes McCambridge) as drug
lord's henchman can easily be viewed as pure pulp. Welles
also contributes to this impression by conveniently showing
Janet Leigh in revealing clothes and putting her character
through mock gang rape and similar ordeals suitable for
damsels in pulpy B movies. Because of that, many
contemporary critics failed to see that TOUCH OF EVIL also
happens to deal with some serious issues like racism or
endless conflict between police efficiency and civil rights.
Perhaps that, more serious, dimension of this film got
overlooked because Welles tried to break too many
stereotypes. His idea to invert Hollywood cliches by
confronting honest and civic minded Mexican lawman with his
violent and corrupt American colleague might have looked
appealing on paper, but with not sufficiently polished
characterisation it made TOUCH OF EVIL almost too surreal.
However, main reason why people got attracted to this film
lies in Welles' directorial mastery and less in its content.
The most legendary thing about this film is an excellent
opening - 3 minutes long and continuous crane shot that
follows various characters and reveals many important
details about them and town where plot takes place. This
scene is awesome, especially considering how difficult it
was to make it. Afterwards, only a handful of directors
actually bothered to shoot such elaborate, encompassing
scenes and the practice became fashionable only most
recently. Unfortunately, the opening scene is the best and
the rest of film can't surpass it. Welles used many
interesting shots in order to make elaborate and memorable
scenes, but none of them fulfils the promise of those three
opening minutes.
The most valuable segment of the film is acting. Orson
Welles the actor was as impressive as Orson Welles the
director. Few characters in history of cinema were as
well-written and superbly played as Captain Hank Quinlan.
Welles first used everything in his power to make him as
unappealing as possible - Welles, already a man with extra
weight in real life, used padded clothes and low camera
angles in order to make Quinlan obese to the point of
caricature. But physical unattractiveness pales in
comparison with Quinlan's cynicism, racism and immorality.
Yet the audience slowly becomes to find sympathies to
Quinlan, who is slowly but inevitably following the path of
self-destruction until melodramatic finale. Welles did truly
splendid job, but his strong performance only underlined the
weaknesses in the rest of casting. Studio-imposed decision
to cast Charlton Heston as Mexican (spoofed in Tim Burton's
1994 ED WOOD) turned ruinous because of the bad make up.
Same problems with make up turned another potentially strong
performance - Akim Tamiroff's drug lord - into caricature.
On the other hand, some supporting actors were more than up
to the task - Joseph Calleia as Quinlan's faithful partner
and friend; Marlene Diettrich as Quinlan's old flame and
Dennis Weaver as neurotic motel clerk that predates Norman
Bates in PSYCHO. Film also benefited from musical soundtrack
by Henry Mancini, although some critics claim that the
opening scene works better without music which interferes
with genuine atmosphere of border town.
TOUCH OF EVIL is definitely not the best film by Orson
Welles and it doesn't even belong among the best of the
1950s. But inferiority of this film is rather relative; even
in underachievement Welles showed the truly magnificent
scope of his talent and the excellent reputation of this
film is, after all, well deserved.
Review written on September 10th 2000
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Flashfire (1993)
In modern society law enforcement ceased to be exclusive
domain of certain distinct social groups and policemen now
come from all walks of life. FLASHFIRE, 1993 thriller
directed by Elliott Silverstein, represents this phenomenon
in the form of its protagonist. Jack Flinder (played by
Billy Zane) is policeman who came from the rich family and
later became despised by his financially less fortunate
colleagues. They hate him because he lacked motivation to
take bribes and later actually testified against fellow cop
during corruption trial. Real ordeal begins when his partner
gets killed by two assassins in motel during the encounter
with Lisa Cates (played by Kristin Minter). The girl managed
to escape without harm and therefore became witness. Flinder
wants to find people responsible for his partner's death and
decides to protect the prostitute, falling in love with her
in process. Soon it becomes clear that the assassins were
actually policemen and that the motive for murder was
actually cover- up of corruption scandal.
Exploitation cinema in last few decades embraced police
corruption as part of its most favoured motives. Naturally,
1990s B-films like FLASHFIRE can't be made without combining
this motive with other forms of sleaze. But FLASHFIRE
nevertheless fails to arouse our interest because
scriptwriters John Warren and Dan York drown the story with
cliches and predictability while director Silverstein gives
anaemic look to the plot and characters. FLASHFIRE simply
can't be rescued from the well-deserved descent into
oblivion - not even by the presence of always capable Louis
Gossett Jr. in thankless role of police captain nor by
physically attractive but nevertheless not very interesting
Kristin Minter in the role of femme fatale.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Searchers, The (1956)
First time I heard about THE SEARCHERS, 1956 western by John
Ford, it was mentioned as the best film of all times. At the
time, I was rather sceptical towards all those critics
pronouncing the best films of all times and I had to wait
few more years before I understood the real importance of
THE SEARCHERS. Soon after I had watched BANOVIC STRAHINJA,
1981 medieval drama shot in former Yugoslavia, I read few
articles that claimed that the story had been obviously
inspired by Ford's film. The story was actually inspired by
15th Century Serbian epic poem, and since it is rather hard
to imagine John Ford taking such an exotic and obscure
inspiration for his westerns, another conclusion must be
drawn. The story of THE SEARCHERS probably has a lot of
resemblance with many similar stories, myths and legends
told in different centuries on different continents - it is
one of those rare films that actually looks like a part of
universal collective unconscious. That is the reason why
this film is so important, and why it is considered to be
one of the best films by John Ford, but also one of the best
films made in this century.
The story begins in Texas in 1868. Three years after the end
of Civil War, Ethan Edwards (played by John Wayne), former
Confederate soldier is now wandering through the wastelands
of Texas. Brief visit to his brother Aaron (played by Walter
Coy) is interrupted when the group of Texas Rangers, led by
Reverend/Captain Samuel Johnson Clayton (played by Ward
Bond), comes to recruit volunteers in order to pursue group
of cattle thieves. Ethan joins the party, together with
Martin Pawley (played by Jeffrey Hunter), Aaron's
part-Cherokee adopted son, and they follow the trail until
they find the cattle slaughtered. They soon realise that the
cattle was stolen by a Comanche war party led by Chief Scar
(played by Henry Brandon), only to lure the men out of their
farms and leave their families unprotected. Rangers rush
back but it is too late for Aaron's family, which is
savagely massacred, with sole surviving little girl Debbie
(played by Lana Wood) taken captive. Ethan and Martin are
going after Comanches in order to rescue little Debbie and
take revenge. But the Chief Scar and his band prove elusive,
and two men spend years roaming the West in fruitless
search. Younger Martin is actually ready to quit, settle
down and marry his sweetheart Laurie Jorgensen (played by
Vera Miles). The only thing that prevents him is Ethan and
his ever growing hatred towards Comanches, hatred that might
even lead to killing Debbie, now probably turned into Indian
squaw after all those years outside Western civilisation.
Great popularity enjoyed by THE SEARCHERS among the critics
and film scholars could be explained with the fact that
Ford's movie explores some great philosophical questions -
human identity, eternal struggle between irrational and
rational tendencies within human beings. And such questions
don't appear in some hermetic "artsy" movie, they are asked
in a movie that belongs to the genre of rather
crowd-pleasing western. All this is wrapped nicely in the
script by Frank S. Nugent, based on a 1954 novel by Alan Le
May. On the other hand, splendid colour photography by
Winton C. Hoch and beautiful landscapes of Monument Valley
locations shouldn't fool anyone - THE SEARCHERS is very
serious and dark film, one of the darkest films of its time.
It shows Old West as visually magnificent, but very dark and
unpleasant place to live, always ready to awaken darkest and
most irrational tendencies among human beings - material
greed, sexual depravity and homicidal rage.
Dark overtones of the films are best embodied by its
protagonist. Legendary John Wayne gives another great and
memorable performance as typical hero of American West -
tough, hardened Westerner, one among those who turned savage
backwater of the world in the world's greatest superpower.
But, in the same time, Wayne reveals the hidden, often
forgotten other side of coin; his Ethan is tough Westerner
who fought the wilderness in order to civilisation, but in
the process he also became part of that wilderness. The real
test for every actor is play the convincing villain, and
Wayne passes that test with flying colours, because his
Ethan, although being nominal protagonist, also happens to
be the villain. His past is murky, he fought to preserve the
slavery, it is suggested that he robbed banks and probably
committed other crimes in order to earn the living. But the
most disturbing element of his character is racism, first
hinted in his mistreatment of his half-breed companion
Martin, than finally revealed in his acts of mindless,
pathological violence. Wayne should be really praised
because he managed to portray that unsympathetic character
with subtlety.
Ford also should be praised, because THE SEARCHERS was a
film that faced America with some thorny issues. One of
those issues was the real cause of racism among white
people. THE SEARCHERS, rather explicitly for its time,
confronts viewers with the ultimate nightmare for any
racist, open or closet - interracial sex, or, to be precise,
"violation" of white women by non-white men. Ethan is
clearly less disturbed by the fact that his family was
massacred by Indians than with the fact that the women were
raped in the process. His intent to kill Debbie becomes
evident in a moment when he realises that she is grown
enough to be regularly taken advantage of as Indian squaw.
Ford also shows a hypocritical nature of such racists - when
white men have sexual liaisons with non-white women (as
hinted in semi-humouros episode with Martin's "wife") Ethan
is joking; when there is other way around, he becomes
homicidal maniac.
After showing such racist attitudes, that were the dark side
of glorious American past, Ford also explicitly shows its
aftermath. Indians are portrayed as vicious killers, but
they are also portrayed as victims too. Glorious, mythical
7th Cavalry Regiment shows its true nature by
indiscriminately killing Indian women and children. Scar's
murderous rampage is also motivated with the revenge towards
white people who had killed his sons. In the end, both men -
Ethan and Scar - almost look like reflections of each other.
THE SEARCHERS is very good film, one of the best made in its
time, but the author of this review has some reservations
towards using the word "masterpiece". Film is rich with
details that could be discovered only with multiple
viewings, but those multiple viewings also reveal many of
the film's flaws. For example, use of comedic subplots and
characters, like eccentric Indian hunter Mose Harper (played
by excellent Hank Worden) sometimes does give a flavour of
realism and authenticity to this dark and depressing story,
but very often that could turn into grotesque, like the
presence of singing cowboy Ken Curtis playing Laurie's
"civilised" suitor, and the wedding scene is rather farcing.
The end is rather disappointing, with rather unexplained
Ethan's transformation from homicidal maniac into kind and
forgiving family man; that was probably made in order to
give this film a required happy ending.
In the end, THE SEARCHERS is film that belongs to the
category of so-called `important" movies - those which are
remembered less by their own merit, and more by the way they
influenced future film- makers. On the other hand, due to
the climate of "political correctness" it is unlikely that
today's Hollywood would dare to tarnish such important
legacy with a remake. This would probably represent the good
things for all those film-lovers who would like to be
introduced to that exceptional piece of classic cinema.

Title
Review for Singin' in the Rain (1952)
Contemporary Hollywood producers are often accused for the
damage they do to the reputation of American and world
cinema heritage by misusing old, classic movies as nothing
more than basis for cheap, empty and soulless remakes.
However, the misuse of the cinema heritage isn't the new
phenomenon; even some very talented authors and true artists
give a new, sometimes even twisted, perception of the old
films. The most notorious example is Stanley Kubrick in his
CLOCKWORK ORANGE - a single scene in this film was enough to
give totally different spin to one of the most beloved films
of all times - 1952 musical SINGIN' IN THE RAIN.
And that is really sad, because SINGIN' IN THE RAIN isn't
just one of the classics of Old Hollywood. It is also one
very fine example of a genre that is almost banished from
the big studios of today - musicals. Author of this review
used to adore that genre, especially the spectacular MGM
musicals made in 1940s and 1950s; in his earlier years, they
showed the magical, fairytale universes that used to created
the same sense of wonder like Lucas and his saga about a
galaxies far away. But things changed - in 1970s and 1980s
Hollywood found new ways to attract and entertain mass
audience, ways that required less talent and creativity than
those necessary for musicals. That was the reason why the
genre of musicals became obsolete and, unlike western,
didn't find a way to adapt to new realities. But that sad
fact was a blessing for the musicals of the Old Hollywood -
because they never had to compete with the newer musicals,
they kept their reputation as the best films of the genre.
And that also helped them to keep their reputation among
both the nostalgic audience and art-loving filmophiles.
SINGIN' IN THE RAIN, arguably the best of the genre and
often referred as one of the best films in the history, was
actually conceived as a way for MGM to re-use some of its
old material. Scriptwriters Betty Comden and Adolph Green
based the plot on the MGM-owned songs. Since many of them
were used in the first sound ("talking") pictures of late
1920s and early 1930s, the plot was set in Hollywood during
those years. The film starts in 1927 during the premiere of
"Royal Rascal", new period adventure by Monumental Pictures,
starring swashbuckling hero Don Lockwood (played by Gene
Kelly) and blonde bombshell Lana Lamont (played by Jane
Hagen). Studio had spread the rumours of Lockwood and Lamont
being romantically involved both on and off screen. Dan
actually can't stand Lana (which have some problems
distinguishing studio propaganda from reality), and instead
falls in love with a girl he meets on a street, aspiring
young actress Kathy Selden (played by Debbie Reynolds). His
problems with women are dwarfed by the problems of the
studio, suddenly faced with the "talking" movies phenomenon.
Silent era techniques are obsolete and the new film
"Duelling Cavalier" is bound for disaster, mostly because
the leading lady, Lana Lamont, has a voice that doesn't
match her physical beauty. Dan's old friend and trusted
partner, Cosmo Brown (played by Donald O'Connor) comes with
a brilliant idea - new movie is going to be turned into
musical, and Kathy is going to dub Lana's voice.
For some critics, the weakest element of many musicals is
the plot, often just a cheap excuse for connecting various
song and dance numbers. The script of SINGIN' IN THE RAIN
was made with such intentions, but the plot of this movie
actually works even without those scenes, turning this movie
into entertaining, very funny and at times even satirical
comedy. The film is even funnier for those who are more
familiar with the Hollywood history, with lot of references
to real life personalities, situations, rituals and, last
but not least, very accurate portrayal of the difficulties
experienced by Hollywood during the period when the movie
industry had to adapt to the use of sound. The movie
contains even some scenes that could be seen as a way for
Gene Kelly, its leading star, to spoof his own role in THREE
MUSKETEERS, 1948 swashbuckling classic.
However, the most recognisable element of SINGIN' IN THE
RAIN are the song and dance numbers. They were directed by
Stanley Donen and Gene Kelly, all of them in their artistic
prime and able to use huge MGM resources in order to create
spectacular, memorable scenes. Almost all of them are
superb, perfectly staged and some of them became essential
part of modern popular culture. Some of them are elaborate
and spectacular, like Gene Kelly's Broadway fantasy
featuring Cyd Charrise, although some would argue that it
looks somewhat out of place in this film. Another scene,
seduction of Kathy in an abandoned studio, is a triumph of
simplicity. Some are comical, like cartoon-like farce by
Donald O'Connor when he sings "Make Them Lough". But the
most important, most influential and most remembered of them
all is, of course, a scene featuring Gene Kelly singing and
dancing in the rain. When we take into account that Gene
Kelly was actually ill when he made those scenes, we must
really appreciate his talent and dedication.
The acting in the film was, of course, shadowed by the
dancing and singing, but that doesn't mean that people
involved didn't use their talents. Gene Kelly is extremely
charming and funny, same as Donald O'Connor as his comic
sidekick. Debbie Reynolds, who played a version of herself
in the film, being an aspiring young actress in real life as
well as in a movie, is simply adorable in her role and has a
very good chemistry with Kelly. Thankless job of a movie's
only villain, and rather unimpressive one, was superbly done
by Jean Hagen who earned the supporting role "Oscar"
nomination in the process. Hagen also dubbed Debbie Reynolds
in some scenes of the film, quite the opposite of the
characters in the movie. It is rather ironic, since the
script of SINGIN' IN THE RAIN satirically explored the
conflict between on-screen and off-screen life reality.
Made in the time when Hollywood was able to produce great
art and even satirically look at itself, SINGIN' IN THE RAIN
is one of those timeless classics that still have appeal to
the audience, even those younger generations that never
experienced the true power of musicals.

Title
Review for When the Bough Breaks (1993)
Spawned by the smashing success of SILENCE OF THE LAMBS,
genre of the serial killer film proved to be one of the most
enduring trends in the last decade. Multitude of such
projects, ranging from "high concept" Hollywood projects
down to low budget exploitation, offers wide range in
quality. WHEN THE BOUGH BREAKS is relatively little known
1993 film, that tries, less than other examples, to hide
being inspired by Jonathan Demme's work.
Movie begins with horrible discovery which indicates that
the Texan town became target area for vicious serial killer
who dismembers little children. Swaggert (played by Martin
Sheen), chief of local police, reluctantly agrees to seek
help from Dr. Audrey MacLeah (Ally Walker), State-paid
forensic psychologist who should make profile of possible
perpetrator. However, when MacLeah tries to engage in
investigation, she is faced with animosity of male
policemen, and Swaggert's lack of faith in her talents.
Working alone, she finds clues that connect the crimes with
institutionalised autistic child.
This film, written and directed by Michael Cohn, at first
glance, gives impression of being really cheap knock-off of
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS. That impression is, actually, more to
Michael Cohn's credit - he looked at Demme's work very hard,
and unlike many others, found out what had worked in SILENCE
OF THE LAMBS and what had not. So, this film, although
shorter, although less spectacular, is full of dark
atmosphere and elements which, although revolting, happen to
be fascinating and leave strong impression. The main
character, obviously inspired by Clarice Starling, is
original, though. Ally Walker gives really strong
performance as psychological investigator troubled with her
own personal, and never revealed, demons. Almost everyone is
under the shadow of that performance, including creepy Ron
Perlman and Martin Sheen (whose character simply disappears
in the middle of film). The result is low budget, but
effective, although anything but original film. Fans of Ally
Walker would probably enjoy this film very much, since it
could be seen as sort of prelude to her cult TV series THE
PROFILER.

Title
Review for Deer Hunter, The (1978)
First time I watched THE DEER HUNTER, more than a decade
ago, I was slightly disappointed. It was a great film, but I
found it to be below expectations heightened by the critical
hype and word of mouth. However, in the meantime, some very
unfortunate historical circumstances in my country forced me
to appreciate this film on quite another, more personal
level. And I found it to be more powerful, actually one of
the most powerful films ever made.
In 1978, when it was made, THE DEER HUNTER was hailed as a
true masterpiece, one of the best films ever made and
probably the most important film of its time. Such
reputation was acknowledged with four "Oscars". However,
more than two decades later, THE DEER HUNTER is one of those
masterpieces that are forgotten, ignored or underrated by
those who make Top 100 lists. There are many reasons for
that. First, its director, Michael Cimino, entered the
history with his major flop HEAVEN'S GATE and the resulting
image of loser, megalomaniac and bad filmmaker marred even
the reputation of his true masterpiece. Second, treatment of
Vietnamese in THE DEER HUNTER is hardly acceptable for those
critics who judge films based on their political
correctness. And, finally, at the end of millennium, USA, as
the only remaining superpower and most powerful and
self-confident nation of the world, doesn't like to be
reminded of Vietnam War, the most embarrassing episode in
recent national history.
The plot of the film is based on the screenplay by Cimino
and Derek Washburn. It begins some time in early 1970s in
Clayrton, small industrial town in Western Pennsylvania,
populated mostly by descendants of Russian immigrants. We
follow group of young steelworkers that spend all their free
time drinking, playing pool and hunting deer in nearby
mountains. One of them, Stephen (played by John Savage) is
about to marry pregnant Angela (played by Rutanya Alda). On
the wedding, his best man Michael (played by Robert de Niro)
finds mutual attraction to best lady Linda (played by Meryl
Streep), but refuses to pursue it out of loyalty to her
boyfriend and his best friend Nicholas (played by
Christopher Walken). Next day friends go to the hunting
trip, the last before Michael, Stephen and Nicholas get
enlisted to fight in Vietnam War. Their friendship would be
ultimately tested in Vietnam, where they witness
unimaginable horrors and atrocities and finally get captured
themselves. Led by Michael, they escape from Viet Cong
prison, but when they reach safety, they are only shadows of
their former selves. Stephen has lost his legs, Nicholas has
lost his mental health and disappeared in the streets of
Saigon and Michael, upon returning to his hometown, finds
that he too has problems connecting to people.
One of the most interesting things about THE DEER HUNTER is
the very neat and disciplined structure of the film. Number
three, that is very important in Christian, especially
Orthodox Christian, tradition, plays important role in this
film. THE DEER HUNTER has three major protagonists, lasts
for three hours and is composed of three different acts.
Cimino as director likes to stage elaborate scenes with
long, expository shots (hard to imagine in MTV-style school
of directing today), with meticulous care about details.
First act depicts everyday life of our heroes as simple,
normal human beings and portrays them as people we might
find next door. We see them working, having fun and trying
to solve their petty every day problems. First act,
especially the scenes that deal with the wedding, were often
criticised for being overlong and unnecessary. Nothing could
be farther from truth - Cimino had to make first act that
long in order to make viewers as familiar with characters as
possible. When we switch to second and third act, and we see
how those characters and people around them are permanently
changed, the emotional impact is much stronger.
Uneventful, simple and boring existence in the gloomy
industrial heartland of America suddenly becomes idyllic
when Cimino shocks us by throwing our heroes right in the
middle of Vietnam inferno. Scenes of violence and
unimaginable atrocities were shocking and disgusting for the
audience of its time, but for today's audience they might
seem tame, thanks to many imitators and film makers who
pushed the envelope even further. These scenes, although
still not suitable for the squeamish viewers, are also
necessary, because we must understand what really happened
to our heroes. And than comes the third act, when our heroes
must return home, wrecked beyond any repair. Michael, who
was best prepared for the ordeal due to his hunting skills,
personal philosophy of "one shot - one kill" and charisma of
natural leader, looks unaffected on the surface and actually
tries to bring back some normalcy to the lives of his
comrades and community. But even he is personally affected,
and things are just not going to be the same - even the most
innocent hunting in the woods brings too many painful
memories. And even his old neighbourhood isn't the same
anymore, being indirectly affected with traumatic war.
>From the day of premiere Cimino had some problems with
critics, especially those from the left wing of political
spectrum. THE DEER HUNTER, unlike most other films that
dealt with Vietnam in those times, portrays Vietnam War from
rather unusual perspective. Film ignores generational
conflicts and social turmoil of 1960s, as well as internal
American politics and endless debates caused by the war. By
giving his young protagonists blue-collar immigrant
background, Cimino portrays them as people who don't care
about rights and wrongs of the Vietnam adventure; they go to
war because they feel obliged to the country that gave new
opportunities to their impoverished ancestors. Instead of
generational conflicts, those people have problems with
their identity - they are very Russian and very American in
the same time. This background enabled Cimino to surprise
the audience with somewhat unusual twists on all Vietnam
cliches of 1970s. First we see community that actively
supports the war (even in closing years, when the majority
of the country saw the utter pointlessness of the endeavour)
and greets veterans as true heroes (quite differently from
college students that used to heckle incoming veterans as
"baby killers"). Then, we not only see something very rare
in Hollywood cinema - spectacular Orthodox Christian
ceremonies - but also we see Russians, in 1970s perceived to
be the greatest enemies of American way of life, as more
American than average Americans themselves.
Uniqueness of Cimino's perspective becomes problematic when
film focuses on Vietnam itself. Cimino takes very one-sided
approach, which later brought him accusations of racism
(Cimino would later try to silence those critics with almost
Marxist view of late 19th Century USA in HEAVEN'S GATE and
more balanced approach towards Chinese Americans in THE YEAR
OF DRAGON) . The only atrocities portrayed in this film are
those committed by NVA and Viet Cong, but even the friendly
South Vietnamese are actually shown to be unworthy of noble
American protection, since they misuse it only to deprive
young Americans of money in most rotten ways possible.
Saigon is shown as decadent moral cesspool that rightly
deserved to be cleansed by victorious Communists at the end
of the film. Cimino enhanced that reputation by being
deliberately inaccurate in some details. Russian Roulette
scenes are the most notorious example. Scene in Viet Cong
prison is one of the most powerful in the history of cinema,
but it lacks credibility in the context of realities of Viet
Cong's guerrilla warfare. Same is with the whole underground
Russian Roulette playhouses in Saigon, subplot that gives
this film the only major plot and characterisation flaw.
However, even that flaw is dwarfed by the enormous talent
invested in this film. The acting is probably best known -
THE DEER HUNTER had one of the strongest and most memorable
casts in history of cinema. Robert de Niro as the nominal
lead is at his best, portraying the Michael as simple hero,
unofficial leader of the group, quiet, reliable man, yet
affected with the atrocities and able to show strong
emotions in traumatic experiences. He is partnered with
really great actors that give touching portrayals of his
best, yet physically or mentally inferior friends. John
Savage is great as Stephen, one of the most tragic
characters in modern cinema, as well as "Oscar"- awarded
Christopher Walken who gives excellent Nicholas and his slow
slide into madness. Other acting talents were great. John
Cazale's role of false macho friend Stan is especially
moving when we take into account that the actor was actually
dying from terminal cancer in front of cameras. Meryl
Streep, one of my favourite actresses, is also grand in one
of her earlier roles; her "girl next door" charm is nicely
contrasted with the inner traumas, indirectly caused by war
and conflicting feelings towards boyfriend and his best pal.
One of the underrated performances also came from George
Dzundza as bartender John, the one who has the warmest
personality on the outside, yet suffers from guilty
conscience on the inside.
Great acting was also enhanced with great atmosphere. Always
reliable director of photography Vilmos Zsigmond used mostly
grey tones, but they are effective in all scenes - whether
they feature industrial settings of Pennsylvania, natural
paradise of Allegheny Mountains, devastated Vietnam
countryside or infernal underworld of Saigon. Simple musical
score by Stanley Myers is also great, providing romantic,
sentimental tone so much in contrast with harsh,
naturalistic events of the film. Every time I think of
romance, I always remember that theme.
Finally, the ultimate reason why people should watch THE
DEER HUNTER lies in its universal importance. I witnessed
war and saw how it could change people and communities,
sometimes irreparably. Names, locations, causes and
belligerents might be different, but the aftermath is always
the same - no matter how prepared they might be, people are
always deeply affected with violence and destruction. I saw
too many Michaels, Stephens and Nicholases first hand and
witnessed how psychological wounds, both on them personally
and on the society as a whole, could have devastating
effects. THE DEER HUNTER, in its sincerity, dwarves almost
any other film that deals with the ugly reality of war;
compared with it SAVING PRIVATE RYAN looks like simple
militaristic propaganda. Today's world, in which many wars
are fought for the sake of daytime politics and winning
elections, needs more films like THE DEER HUNTER.

Title
Review for Client, The (1994)
Before I saw THE CLIENT I had already been disenchanted by
the books of John Grisham. To be quite frank, I haven't read
them (although they used to be something resembling
bestsellers on the small and bibliophobic market of my
country) but I had opportunity to watch two of the screen
adaptations - Pollack's THE FIRM and Pakula's PELICAN BRIEF
- and that was enough to make me think about Grisham as
nothing more as mediocre author. By that time, I had already
watched enough of Joel Schumacher's films to have opinion
about him as nothing more than mediocre film-maker. Perhaps
that was the reason why this film actually worked - mediocre
script was perfect match for mediocre talent.
The movie, like almost all Grisham's books is set in
American South and features some unusual characters in big,
and, more often than not, legal trouble. This time the
protagonist in question is Mark Sway (played by Brad
Renfro), 11-year old boy from dysfunctional family who had
just witnessed the suicide of a important mob lawyer Romey
Clifford (Walter Olkewicz). Just before killing himself,
Romey told Mark about the body of a murdered senator and
other details that would put away wiseguys like his client
Barry Muldano (Anthony La Paglia) behind the bars. Federal
prosecutors led by politically ambitious Roy Foltrigg (Tommy
Lee Jones) are convinced that the boy knows those details
and they begin harassing him. The boy then hires attorney in
a form of Reggie Love (Susan Sarandon). She, being the
recovered alcoholic, perhaps doesn't look like a much of
help, but she would fight for the rights of his client. In
the meatime, Muldano and his cronies are trying to kill the
boy.
The film has rather weak premise - boy is smart enough to
elude law enforcement and hire attorneys, yet not
intelligent enough to know that the co-operation with the
authorities is the only way for him to stay alive. Perhaps
that works in real world, but in Grisham's works, same as in
the script by Akiva Goldsman, there are some other rules. In
any case, Schumacher directs this forgettable script as real
professional, not allowing us to stop and think of all the
flaws in it. The biggest attraction here is a great acting
talent, most notable in the forms of Susan Sarandon and
Tommy Lee Jones, actors whose talent is very suitable for
fascinating Grisham's characters. Sarandon is very good as
strong professional woman, and Jones is great as scruples
yet charming public official. Actors in minor roles are also
good, like Ossie Davis as sympathetic judge, Will Patton as
menacing yet intelligent policeman and Mary Louise Parker as
boy's desperate mother. On the other hand, Anthony La Paglia
is rather pathetic in thankless role of stupid Mafioso. All
in all, THE CLIENT is still forgettable, but watchable piece
of cinema that gives the phrase "mediocrity" a good name.

Title
Review for Above Suspicion (1995)
Fate can play cruel jokes on people, and the actors aren't
exception. In 1995 Christopher Reeve, actor best known for
playing lead character in SUPERMAN films, filled headlines
after suffering terrible riding accident that left him
paraplegic. It turned out that one of his last roles before
the accident required him to play wheelchair-bound character
in ABOVE SUSPICION, 1995 cable television thriller directed
by Steven Schachter.
Protagonist of the film is Dempsey (played by Christopher
Reeve), superb police detective who is loving father and
caring husband. Family considerations, on the other hand,
don't prevent his brother Nick (played by Edward Kerr) from
having an affair with Dempsey's wife Gail (played by Kim
Cattrall). One day, during a routine bust, Dempsey is shot
and paralysed. Knowing that he would have to spend the rest
of his life in a wheelchair, Dempsey decides to commit
suicide and provide for his family in the process. He
approaches Gail and Nick and asks them to help him in his
plan to end his life by staging his suicide as apparent
murder. Motivated less by compassion and more by huge
insurance policy, adulterous couple decides to participate
only to find themselves as targets of Dempsey's diabolical
scheme. Dempsey has committed a perfect crime, but his
former colleague Rhineheart (played by Joe Mantegna) is
convinced that the apparently helpless cripple, who happens
to be the most experienced homicide investigator, staged the
whole thing. But proving his suspicions is going to be much
harder than he has anticipated.
The script, which was written by Jerry Lazarus, Steven
Schachter and actor William H. Macy (who plays the role of
prosecutor in the film) had some potential. However,
suspension of disbelief, necessary for viewers to enjoy this
film, is forever marred by the real-life events that put the
entire plot of the film into completely different
perspective. But this is not the only problem of ABOVE
SUSPICION. Director Schachter is not able to make his mind
whether to make this film as straightforward thriller,
police action film or courtroom drama. Genre confusion is
not much helped by low budget that makes this film look much
cheaper than it should be. Great performances by Reeve and
Joe Mantegna as relentless investigator aren't reason enough
to watch this routine product of cable television. In the
end, ABOVE SUSPICION is a film that could be recommended
only to those who want to satisfy their morbid curiosity.
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for St. Ives (1976)
In 1990s we had Steven Seagal movies. We had been prepared
to that, thanks to 1980s Chuck Norris movies. In 1970s,
often regarded as the Golden Age of cinema, we had Charles
Bronson movies. Such films, action-oriented thrillers
relying solely on the charisma of its lead, were that
period's equivalent for straight-to-video films of today.
They were low budget but made with solid craftsmanship and,
unfortunately, hardly distinguishable from each other. ST.
IVES, 1976 thriller directed by Jack Lee Thompson, is one of
the examples.
The protagonist of this movie Raymond St. Ives (played by
Charles Bronson), former crime reporter and would-be book
writer, who suffers from compulsive gambling. In order to
improve his situation he takes an offer by Abner Procane
(played by John Houseman), Beverly Hills eccentric, to use
his street knowledge and mediate the return of some
important but stolen documents. A simple exchange gets
complicated with couple of murders, and even more
complicated when St. Ives realises that Procane was actually
one of most successful criminal masterminds of Los Angeles.
Good connoisseurs of 1970s cinema would have experiences a
whole lot of deja vus watching ST. IVES. The film has a
rather complicated conspiracy plot, like many of 1970s
thrillers did (with Barry Beckerman's script somehow
managing to squeeze it into 90-minutes format). The
directing style of Jack Lee Thompson mimics other, more
successful crime thrillers with the use of shaky camera and
very dark photography. Lalo Schiffrin as composer provides
some good atmosphere with his recognisable style. Acting is,
on the other hand, sub-par, with Bronson, and almost
everyone else, sleepwalking through the role. Bronson didn't
even have many scenes that would capitalise on his charisma
of an action star. His lack of chemistry with Jacqueline
Bisset as his alleged romantic interest is almost palpable.
John Houseman and Maximillian Schell, on the other hand,
bring some fun playing their characters in very campy,
almost theatrical styles. The biggest fun, however, comes
when viewers start recognising future big stars and
important players like Jeff Goldblum, Robert Englund, Harris
Yulin or Michael Lerner, all playing minor, but interesting
roles. All in all, those who miss ST. IVES wouldn't miss a
thing, but those who watch it, won't miss hour and half of
their lives afterwards.

Title
Review for Betrayal of the Dove (1993)
There are exploitation movies and exploitation movies. Some
exploit lowest desires of the audience and do it by
delivering huge amounts of senseless violence, gratuitous
erotica or tasteless jokes. But they aren't most despicable
form of exploitation films. Most despicable are those who
exploit the audience naivete, those filled with couple
decent stars or names that should convince viewers that they
would actually see something good. But the sad reality tells
us that Los Angeles happens to be cruel, competitive place,
and often great, good or decent actors are forced to work on
projects that are bellow their standards. In case of Helen
Slater, the actress that the author of this review likes,
BETRAYAL OF THE DOVE, 1993 thriller directed by Strathford
Hamilton, was one of such films.
In this film Helen Slater plays Ellie, young professional
woman faced with many agonising problems in her life. Her
young daughter is having nightmares, her former alcoholic
husband is constantly harassing her, while her matchmaking
co-worker makes thing even more unbearable by introducing
her to her dorky cousin Norman (played by David L. Lender).
Her friend Una (Kelly Le Brock), on the other hand, offers
real treat in the form of young and charismatic doctor Jesse
Peter (Billy Zane). However, soon her life is in danger and
she is forced to question her new friends.
BETRAYAL OF THE DOVE is a lame thriller with complicated yet
nonsencial plot, and characters we actually don't care
about. Even if the actors like Helen Slater, Kelly Le Brock
or Billy Zane worked really hard, they would hardly make us
care for them. The only exception is David L. Lander whose
character, that should have served as some kind of comic
relief, gets brutally eliminated too early in the film. What
we are left is an incoherent mess of subplots (some of them
including parapsychology) and many of the loose ends not
getting tied up in the bloody, Elisabethan and utterly
unconvincing finale. Viewers should do themselves a favour
and skip this one.

Title
Review for Year of the Dragon (1985)
Some people would hardly believe it, but in the early 1980s
Oliver Stone was regarded as anything but left-wing. His
scripts were often being accused of promoting ethnic
stereotypes, sexism, and in the case of CONAN THE BARBARIAN,
even the most questionable right-wing agenda. One of such
examples is YEAR OF THE DRAGON, now almost forgotten 1985
gangster epic by Michael Cimino, the very first film that
misfortunate director made after his HEAVEN'S GATE fiasco.
That movie is now almost forgotten, but in its time it made
a serious brouhaha with its alleged racism towards Chinese
American community. Naturally, it was Oliver Stone with his
screenplay who was named the biggest culprit. On the other
hand, very few people then actually bothered to judge this
film on its cinematic merit, instead of cheap daytime
politics. As soon as THE YEAR OF THE DRAGON went out of the
release, it was forgotten, despite being one of the more
ambitious and interesting films of the previous decade.
The movie begins in New York, whose quiet and picturesque
Chinatown gets shocked by the assassination of its top Triad
boss. Following his death, the citizens of Chinatown and
neighbouring quarters become targets of a whole series of
violent incidents. On the surface, it looks like a
escalation of youth gang activity; however, all those
attacks are actually part of campaign, cleverly orchestrated
by Joey Tai (John Lone), young Triad boss who wants to
remove the old guard and become the undisputed leader
himself. Unfortunately for Joey, he is not the only
ambitious man who wants to break the well-established rules
of his community. Captain Stanley White (Mickey Rourke),
most decorated policeman in New York, is put in charge of
Chinatown. His Vietnam traumas and hatred towards Asian
people drives him to start relentless anti-crime crusade
with total disregard towards the law and unofficial pact
between the police and local community leaders. That brings
him in an unavoidable conflict with Joey, which would result
in even more bloodbath.
Critics who accuse Cimino and Stone of anti-Asian racism are
missing the point, because the way Chinese community is
portrayed in YEAR OF THE DRAGON isn't much different from
the way some other ethnic or racial communities of America
used to be portrayed in crime thrillers. For example, these
days hardly any Italian American would be offended by the
way Mafia is dealt by Hollywood. Cimino's sin was probably
in the fact that he was one of the first directors who used
to dig behind the surface and expose the problem. Even more,
YEAR OF THE DRAGON didn't just try to show all the sinister
reality of crime-ridden Chinese community and its share of
the evil that lurks on American street. It actually tried to
explain that the Chinese themselves are the greatest victims
of their crime lords, and even went further. The root of the
problem, according to the characters in the movie, doesn't
lie within the community itself; the self-isolation which
gave the crime organisations so much power is the direct
result of the racism. When the Asian people get shunned and
humiliated and denied their fair share of American dream,
they have no other choices but to turn to themselves and the
old ways, however bad it could be. So, YEAR OF THE DRAGON is
basically the anti-racist film.
The anti-racist message was, however, blurred by the heavy
use of some police film clichs. Like in the 1970s, the hero
and chief villain are presented like a total visual
opposites of their character alignment. The "good" cop is
presented like a racist, wife- cheating redneck pig, who is
ready to sacrifice not just himself, but also his friends,
family and colleagues in his personal, and very questionable
war; Mickey Rourke in one of the strongest performances of
his career even gives him some traces of psychosis. The main
villain, played by John Lone, on the other hand is handsome,
cultivated, charismatic man, who actually cares both for his
family and is shown as person capable of compassionate
deeds; Stone's script even goes even further and gives Joey
Tai opportunity to present himself as a leader whose
business-like philosophy might even signal the break with
the old tradition and bring his people from the isolation.
Unfortunately, if the movie concentrated on those two
characters only, YEAR OF THE DRAGON would be remembered as
thought-provoking epic worthy of GODFATHER. But it wasn't
meant to be - in order to make Stanley White definitely
likeable, out of blue comes the character of Tracy Tzu,
Chinese American TV reporter whose father somehow managed to
earn fortune in honest way and integrate her daughter into
American way of life. For some undetermined reason, Stanley
White gets attracted to her and begins questioning his own
racist beliefs. Although that would make his character more
sympathetic, his metamorphosys doesn't get properly
explained, most probably due to the incredibly inept (and
"Razzie" awarded) performance of Arianne as his love
interest. Things get even more complicated, when the
character of Stanley's long suffering wife Connie (Caroline
Kava, one of the most underused actresses in today's
Hollywood) gets overexposure, together with unnecessary and
too direct allusions to Stanley's own immigrant background.
All those many subplots are, on the other hand, excellent
opportunity for Cimino to make another film of epic
proportions. High budget, today almost unimaginable for the
movies that deal with simple "cops and robbers" stories,
gave an excellent opportunities for many delicate mass
scenes that Cimino likes so much. Some of them - like a
meeting with drug-producing rebels in the hills of Burma,
funerals, complicated shootouts in public places - are
impressive and would remain long in the the viewer's memory.
Unfortunately, Cimino didn't care much of the script, and
some of those scenes, including many unnecessary subplots
and scenes involving side characters, slow the pace of the
movie significantly. The uninspiring musical score by David
Mansfield is often used on the wrong places and because of
it, YEAR OF THE DRAGON sometimes look like a incoherent
combination of many different movies. However, despite all
those faults, and also because such movies would be hard to
make these days, YEAR OF THE DRAGON remains one of those
rare Hollywood products - unusual and thought-provoking
films.

Title
Review for Chase, The (1994)
When I first saw THE CHASE, 1994 comedy written and directed
by Adam Rifkin, I was convinced that it was definitely
inspired by the chase on Los Angeles street - most
spectacular episode in the O.J. Simpson case. However, some
time ago I found, to my great surprise, that THE CHASE had
been released in March 1994, some three months before those
events. Thus, this rather insignificant film has the honour
of being one of the most sinister examples of life imitating
art.
Protagonist of this film is Jack Hammond (played by Charlie
Sheen), young man who was sentenced to twenty years of
prison for the crime he didn't commit. He escapes from
prison but he needs quick getaway car in order to cross
Mexican border. So he kidnaps Natalie Voss (played by Kristy
Swanson), steals her car and begins drive to the border,
followed by police. Since Natalie happens to be the daughter
of rich Dalton Voss (played by Ray Wise), media joins the
chase with TV crews boarding cars and helicopters and all
other suitable means of transportation. In the meantime,
Jack and Natalie, oblivious to the media circus around them,
are becoming friends and more than that.
Perhaps Adam Rifkin envisioned this film as bitter satire on
modern media, but in reality THE CHASE turned into typical
one-joke movie which went downhill as soon as protagonists
began their drive. From that point on, film is full of bad
and uninspired jokes (some involving bodily fluids or frozen
corpses), and capable actors like Ray Wise, Kristy Swanson
and Charlie Sheen must fight with lame dialogue (especially
in scenes featuring Henry Rollins in the role of policeman)
and their characters being one- dimensional caricatures.
Before the end credits (which, according to many, feature
the most hillarious scene of the film) the audience must
endure usually predictable plot and some obligatory, but in
the context of this film laughably implausible romantic
scenes. When the end comes after 94 minutes, THE CHASE
nevertheless looks like a complete waste of time.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Blazing Saddles (1974)
There are plenty of reasons why 1970s should be viewed as
the Golden Age of filmmaking. The most obvious of all those
reasons is better quality of movies, at least compared with
present times. That is evident not only in cinema industry
as a whole, but in careers of individual directors. Some
people whose names today are synonymous with mediocre or
downright bad filmmaking actually happened to make very good
films in 1970s, and some of those films are even considered
to be the classics. The best known example of such
phenomenon is the present-day career of Mel Brooks, actor,
screenwriter and director whose comedies in last two decades
were, to say the least, extremely disappointing. The
disappointment is even greater when we compare such letdowns
with the movies Mel Brooks used to make in 1970s. In that
period he created some of the most original and entertaining
comedies in the history of American cinema. One of such
films is BLAZING SADDLES, ultimate western spoof made in
1974.
The plot of the film takes place in the unnamed Western
territory in 1874. Hedley Lamarr (played by Harvey Korman)
is corrupt attorney general in the administration of
incompetent governor William J. Le Petomane (played by Mel
Brooks). Small town of Rock Ridge lies in the path of
encroaching railroad and Lamarr sees that as an opportunity
to make himself wealthy. Bunch of cowboy goons, led by his
trusted lieutenant Taggart (played by Slim Pickens), is sent
to terrorise the town and force citizens to sell all their
land to Lamarr. Instead of fleeing, good folk of Rock Ridge
petition governor to send them a sheriff. Lamarr grants them
their wish in the form designed to offend them - Bart
(played by Cleavon Little), black railroad worker who awaits
execution for striking his racist boss with a shovel. Bart
comes to town, and, naturally, good citizens turn out to be
racist bigots. The only help comes in the form of Jim a.k.a.
The Waco Kid (played by Gene Wilder), town's drunk and
former expert gunslinger that would become his friend and
mentor. Despite everything, Bart manages to do his job and
take care of terrorising cowboys, gradually earning the
respect of the citizens. Frustrated Lamarr uses another
approach and employs femme fatale talents of Lily von
Schtupp (played by Madeline Kahn), bar singer who should
seduce the sheriff. That plan fails when Lily gets seduced
by Bart instead, and Lamarr takes last ditch attempt by
assembling the small army of bandits that would raze the
town to the ground. Bart must use all their ingenuity in
order to save Rock Ridge and gets an absurd, but
nevertheless effective idea how to foil Lamarr's plans.
The screenplay for BLAZING SADDLES was written by five
different people (Brooks, Andrew Bergman, Richard Pryor,
Norman Steinberg, Alan Uger) and because of that plot gets
weak and quality of humour in the movie is uneven. But, in
general, the film is extremely entertaining, and Brooks as
director keeps the good pace, making this film 93 minutes of
pure fun. Brooks as parody maker has one great advantage
over his colleagues in later decades - this film, despite
sometimes loose plot, is actually very tight in terms of
general theme. And Brooks also shows a great fondness for
the object of his parody - the movie is full of references
to classic westerns and Golden Age Hollywood, references
that couldn't be made by someone who wasn't very familiar
with the period and that type of cinema. Brooks also enjoyed
privilege of having truly superb cast at his helm. Cleavon
Little, his lead actor, was actually replacement for Richard
Pryor, too controversial comedian at the time, but his
performance was great. Others were also great, each creating
memorable characters - Gene Wilder as alcoholic sidekick,
Harvey Korman as pathetic over-the-top villain and, finally,
Madeline Kahn in Marlene Dietrich impersonation almost as
iconic as German actress herself. Brooks also gave his
acting contribution in the role of governor that could be
seen as role model for Clinton. Brooks obviously enjoyed
working in this film (as well as the rest of cast, painfully
trying not to burst into laughter in front of cameras) and
also helped write few memorable songs ("The Ballad of Rock
Ridge", "I'm Tired" and "The French Mistake") together with
John Morris. The general result is short, but effective film
that could be seen thousand times and still make people
laugh.
There is another reason why this film should be appreciated,
and it is probably the same reason why 1970s are viewed as
the Golden Age of filmmaking. Only in that period BLAZING
SADDLES could have been made. Two decades earlier the same
film would be crucified as iconoclastic, subversive,
insulting to the memory of pioneers and opposed to all old
American values and other pillars of society. Two decades
later the same film would be equally unacceptable because of
the way it treats the new sacred cows of Hollywood - Jews,
blacks, Indians, women and homosexuals and all the other
"oppressed minorities". Looser standards of censorship,
together with the lack of "political correctness" enabled
Brooks to turn this film into equal-opportunity satire, in
which anyone might get mercilessly ridiculed. From our point
of view, and especially after experiencing low standards of
Hollywood humour in last two decades, viewing experience of
BLAZING SADDLES is quite refreshing. Huge popularity of this
film, still uncontested after so many years, really
shouldn't be that surprising.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Wayne's World 2 (1993)
Spielberg, Mallick and Benigni actually didn't have to
bother. The acronym "WW2" won't lose the original meaning to
the new generations of moviegoers.
That is one of the conclusions that the critical viewer
might draw from WAYNE'S WORLD 2, 1993 film directed by
Stephen Surjik, sequel to the popular 1991 comedy. The
original was, like some other comedies, based on sketch used
in SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE show. Although it didn't reach the
cult status of BLUES BROTHERS, that light-hearted comedy,
directed by talented Penelope Spheeris, provided enough
laughs and entertaining pop culture references that it
became pop culture phenomenon itself (some of the words and
phrases used by characters of Wayne and Garth entered into
peoples' vocabulary). Two years later, when inevitable
sequel came, times changed. Spheeris was out of picture, and
Myers, besides playing the main character, had conceived the
whole concept, had to cope with less talented Surjik.
This parody, like so many that used to be made in Hollywood
in those times, has hardly a noticeable plot. The characters
are same - Wayne (played by Myers) and Garth (played by Dana
Carvey) are two headbangers who live in suburban Chicago and
broadcast their show out of basement in Wayne's home (in
this film, the studio has moved to abandoned doll factory).
While Wayne's girlfriend Cassandra (Tia Carrere) is being
wooed by sleazy producer Bobby (Christpher Walken) to go to
California, Wayne sees the vision that would convince him to
organise Woodstock-like concert in his home town. These
storylines serve as a weak fundament to series of gags,
referencing popular films, television shows and, in the end
credits, even obscure 1970s commercial. Unfortunately for
Myers and all the people involved, some of those gags work,
and some don't. Same concepts that looked refreshing and
entertaining two years earlier, seem boring and repetitive
now. Fortunately, film provides few laughs and hour and half
spent in front of the screen doesn't look a total waste of
time.

Title
Review for Wilby Conspiracy, The (1975)
Apartheid in South Africa, one of the more shameful episodes in the
last half of this century, seemed to be mostly ignored by Hollywood
until late 1980s.  Before that time, American mainstream producers
didn't dare to tackle the subject of the country that was nominally
capitalist democracy and Western ally, yet with the regime that made
Communism look good. Instead of them, that task was carried out by
movie authors in Commonwealth countries, less troubled with cheap Cold
War politics. One of such projects is 1975 British production THE
WILBY CONSPIRACY, directed by Ralph Nelson and based on Peter
Driscoll's novel.
The movie begins in Cape Town courtroom, where Rina van Niekirk
(Prunella Gee), liberal white lawyer, tries to win freedom for her
client Shack Twala (Sydney Poitier), black anti-apartheid activist who
spent ten years in prison. To her own big surprise, the government
decides to let Twala go, but only hours after the release he gets
again in trouble with police, this time together with Rina's boyfriend
Jim Keogh (Michael Caine), British engineer. Two men become fugitives
and are forced to drive to Johannesburg, where Twala seeks help by
Doctor Mukharjee (Saeed Jaffrey), Hindu dentist and fellow member of
Black Congress. In the mean time, sadistical Major Horn (Nicol
Williamson) from the secret police is on their trail.
Like many thrillers from the 1970s, THE WILBY CONSPIRACY has a rather
complicated plot and some of today's viewers might even get lost in a
quagmire of political intrigue and endless double-crossings between
the movie's protagonists.  But, Ralph Nelson wraps it up as a solid
piece of entertainment, using political reality of contemporary South
Africa mostly as a background for conventional action thriller. So, we
have a lots of humour, fistfights, car chases and even one totally
gratuitous sex scene. Some might argue that the subject of racial
inequality and totalitarian oppression would be inappropriate for the
use in a such mainstream product. Anyway, the actors did a really good
job - Michael Caine brings a lot of charm to his role, unlike Sidney
Poitier, whose almost solemn presence gives a rather nice contrast to
Caine and establishes "buddy buddy" chemistry between the two. Other
performances seems bland, except for Nicol Williamson as very
convincing and intelligent villain. The end of the movie is perhaps
slightly disappointing, but nevertheless THE WHILBY CONSPIRACY as a
whole is worth watching, especially compared with today's "politically
correct" movies.

Title
Review for Jailhouse Rock (1957)
The author of this review must admit that he was never
particularly big fan of Elvis Presley. The undisputed
musical talent of King and his equally undisputed importance
in the history of modern culture have very little to do with
that. I tend to judge Presley mostly on his movie
appearances, which is most unfair, since his record in that
field, unlike music, wasn't very inspiring, to say the
least. Even JAILHOUSE ROCK, directed in 1957 by Richard
Thorpe and often cited as Presley's best film, could hardly
improve such unflattering impression,
The plot begins when Vince Everett (played by Elvis
Presley), young manual labourer who suffers from temper
tantrums. One of occasions led to the bar brawl that
resulted with his prison sentence for manslaughter. In
prison Everett is put in the same cell with Hank Houghton
(played by Mickey Shoughnessy), former country singer that
couldn't fail noticing the musical talent in his young
cellmate. Hoping for a lucrative partnership, Hank teaches
Everett few tricks that would make him a pop star after
release. Once free, Everett, however, has quite different
ideas and pursues his own career, which practically goes
nowhere until he meets recording industry employee Peggy Van
Alden (played by Judy Tyler). Guided both by the
appreciation of Everett's talent and her feelings towards
the young man, Peggy decides to become his partner and later
witnesses his meteoric rise to fame and fortune. However,
their relationship remains strictly platonic and later
deteriorates when Everett gets seduced by the irresponsible
and decadent lifestyle of a pop star.
The only reason to watch JAILHOUSE ROCK lies in the musical
numbers featuring Presley. However, in order to see them, a
viewer should endure truly horrible script by Guy Trosper
and mediocre direction by Richard Thorpe. Film lacks
coherent plot and looks like a various unfinished films
hastily patched into one. The acting is good, though.
Character actor Mickey Shaughnessy is more than passable in
rather complex role of Everett's mentor and young Judy
Tyler, tragically deceased after the shooting of the film,
is quite charming as Everett's romantic interest. Elvis
Presley here plays surly, arrogant character, closer to his
original image of 1950s youth rebel than his later, more
mainstream incarnations. Quality of his acting is merely
passable but quite adequate for the job, although Presley
looks like someone who could do much better with proper
script. Unfortunately, such better chances never
materialised in his lifetime and watching of this film might
be quite depressive experience for those aware of King's
unfulfilled potentials.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Outbreak (1995)
When people think about the eradication of human race, they
usually envision nuclear holocaust, sudden change of
climate, asteroids falling from the sky or similar
spectacular events. But history teaches us that the equally
deadly potential lies in tiny microscopic organisms -
viruses and bacteria able to practically wipe out entire
nations. Invention of antibiotics and progress of medical
science in the last century or so created illusion that the
infectious diseases are the thing of the past. That illusion
was shattered with the epidemic of AIDS in 1980s, and people
are now more willing to pay attention when media starts
reporting about various exotic ailments that happen to be
contagious, deadly and untreatable. Few of those ailments
are as scary as various forms of haemorrhagic fever -
extremely contagious viral infection that causes one of the
most unpleasant deaths imaginable. Probably the most
notorious among them is Ebola, disease which killed hundreds
of people in central regions of Africa five years ago. By
the unusual yet chilling coincidence, these events happened
roughly in the same time as the premiere of OUTBREAK, major
Hollywood feature film that dealt the effects of Ebola-like
outbreak on modern society.
The "protagonist" of this film is Motaba virus, strain from
Central Africa which is able to kill infected human in less
than 48 hours upon contagion. Despite not being airborne and
thus having limited contagion potentials, the strain is so
deadly that the two US Army experts in late 1960s would
rather firebomb the infected camp in Central African jungle
than allow infection to spread further. Some thirty years
later, Motaba again strikes Central Africa, but, as usual in
such circumstances, isolated villagers are dead before they
can spread the infection further. Unfortunately, monkeys can
carry the virus and one of them is caught and smuggled into
USA. Soon, the population of Cedar Creek, small town in
California, starts getting sick and dying like flies.
Colonel Sam Daniels (played by Dustin Hoffman), U.S. Army
top expert for infectious diseases disobeys the orders of
his superiors - General Billy Ford (played by Morgan
Freeman) and General Donald McClintock (played by Donald
Sutherland) - and flies to now quarantined Cedar Creek in
order to investigate the origin of mysterious plague. There
he meets his estranged wife Robby Keough (played by Rene
Russo) who investigates disease as the head of CDC team.
They start working together while the crisis escalates,
because the strain mutated into airborne form. While Daniels
and Keough struggle to find possible cure and thus stop the
epidemic from spreading to the rest of the nation,
McClintock offers simple but grim alternative - firebombing
the town and incinerating the virus together with all the
inhabitants.
OUTBREAK was directed by Wolfgang Petersen, German filmmaker
who enjoys reputation of one of the best craftsmen in modern
Hollywood. His talent is at display in this film, especially
in the way he paces film and turns screenplay by Laurence
Dworet and Robert Roy Pool into thought-provoking yet
exciting story. The same feeling of doom and helplessness
that marked DAS BOOT, Petersen's best known film, could be
sensed here too, but Petersen creates it through entirely
different methods. Events in the film happen at the rapid
pace, and the viewer could empathise with the protagonists
who see world literally falling apart before their eyes, in
the same way microscopic bug destroys the bodies of their
victims. Petersen is uncompromising in the portrayal of the
destructive effects of haemorrhagic fever - nobody is immune
from its devastating effect, people get infected and die
regardless of their race, religion, gender, age or whether
they are nice people or not (all illustrated with almost
comedic but chilling shots of virus travelling from one
unsuspecting host to another). What is even more chilling in
this film is the way epidemic destroys society indirectly -
human relations, even most basic must be severed, kindness
and compassion equals suicide, people must leave their loved
ones in order to survive and the only way to stop the
apocalypse is to use even less considerations and more
genocidal potential than the illness itself. Because of the
chillingly realistic and believable depiction of the
apocalypse that might wait around the corner turned OUTBREAK
was supposed to be one of the best disaster films ever made
in Hollywood.
Unfortunately, that didn't happen. Although Petersen managed
to overcome some unnecessary plot distractions in the
screenplay (marital problems of the protagonists), he
couldn't overcome certain realities of 1990s Hollywood. And
one of such realities is the unwritten rule that any film
with a budget over 50 million US$ must have obligatory happy
ending in order to satisfy the audience. So, in the last
third, film suddenly changes genre and general mood - what
was supposed to be dark, disturbing drama about conflict
between Humanity and Nature is suddenly turning into
light-hearted actionfest that feature conflict between Good
Guy (Dustin Hoffman not very comfortable and even less
believable as action hero) and Bad Guy (in the form of
Donald Sutherland who repeats his evil bureaucrat/officer
routine for the umpteenth time). Naturally, all notions of
credibility go down the toilet and the viewers' intelligence
is repeatedly insulted with the series of implausibilities -
while average R&D in real life pharmaceutical industry takes
years to create drugs, our hero manages to extract the
medicine in the matter of minutes, just to save his wife in
time; bomber crews, which are trained to exterminate
millions of innocent civillians without any remorse, are
simply talked into disobeying the direct order). That last
segment of OUTBREAK - flooded with cliches and cheap
sentimentality - is probably the one of the most
disappointing pieces of celluloid ever made in 1990s
Hollywood and it could serve as the perfect illustration of
the sad state of American film industry.
To be fair, even in this segment, Petersen handles the
action very well, and OUTBREAK in general looks like a
well-acted and well-crafted film. But, among the many missed
opportunities of 1990s Hollywood, this one is probably the
most bitter.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Kill Me Again (1989)
Film noir is rather popular genre choice for young,
independent filmmakers making their directing debuts. This
is hardly surprising, since the genre originated in
B-studios of 1940s Hollywood, where cheap sets and low
budgets mandated stories and characters with dark
nitty-gritty realism being the anti-thesis of A-production's
glamour. Since such films usually have contemporary settings
and rather ordinary, every-day set of characters and
situations, even today they tend to be cheap and rather
simple. But there are directors who tend to stick to that
particular genre even after reaching fame and having a
ticket to mainstream Hollywood. One of them is John Dahl,
author of RED ROCK WEST and THE LAST SEDUCTION, two film
noirs that are often considered to be among the best pieces
of American cinema in 1990s. But even his directing debut -
KILL ME AGAIN, made in 1989 - shows truly great talent at
work.
The plot of KILL ME AGAIN, based on the script co-authored
by Dahl and David A. Warfield, begins with two lovers and
small-time criminals - Fay Forrester (played by Joanne
Whalley) and Vince Miller (played by Michael Madsen) -
successfully stealing 825,000 US$ from Nevada mobsters. Fay,
however, can't resist the temptation to spend all the money
by herself, especially since Vince happens to be rather
violent and possessive sort of man. So she uses opportunity
to escape with the loot and takes refuge in Reno. There she
devises a plan to get rid of Vince permanently by faking her
own death. Private investigator Jack Andrews (played by Val
Kilmer) agrees to help her due to his own financial
problems. He stages the fake murder but soon afterwards Fay
disappears and Jack becomes murder suspect. He manages to
get out of custody and starts looking for Fay, but he is not
the only one who does so since Vince and mobsters are also
trying to get their hands on the loot.
KILL ME AGAIN could be best described as film noir stripped
to its essential elements. Here we have them all -
seductive, manipulative and utterly immoral femme fatale,
who also happens to be brunette (same as in Dahl's next two
film noirs); weak male protagonist who is manipulated by
that character although he should have known better; stash
of money as "Mac Guffin" and series of plot twists. Dahl
keeps everything simple in this film - his characters, with
the sole exception of Jack, seem to lack their own past and
all their actions are motivated by their present-time needs
and situations. Because of that the film is relatively
short, and the desert scenery of American Southwest seem to
underline said simplicity of the characters and story. Said
simplicity is somewhat compromised with William Olvis'
musical score which happens to get irritating after a while.
The acting in the film is generally very good, although Val
Kilmer minimalist performance doesn't quite explain some
elements of his character. However, he has a good chemistry
with Joanne Whalley, who used to be Mrs. Kilmer during the
production of the film, although two of them couldn't be
described as one of the great film noir couples. Joanne
Whalley is, nevertheless, very good in the role of femme
fatale. But the best performance comes from Michael Madsen,
who shows superb talent in his portrayal of possessive,
violent and psychopathic criminal, in many ways similar to
his best known role of Mr. Blonde in RESERVOIR DOGS. He too
has a good chemistry with Joanne Whalley, thus providing
KILL ME AGAIN with one of the more interesting love
triangles in modern cinema.
All in all, KILL ME AGAIN, although somewhat obscured by
John Dahl's latter works, is a very good example of modern
film noir and as such it should be recommended to every
viewer who likes this particular genre.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com 

Title
Review for Maltese Falcon, The (1941)
Flood of remakes is definitely one of the most annoying
trends of contemporary Hollywood. It seems that every
outstanding film made twenty-five or thirty years ago is
about to get modern makeover. Judging by the way Hollywood
handled those remakes in past few years, it is almost
certain that many great films are about to have their
reputations forever tarnished by uninspired and usually
abysmal modern versions. Remakes, same as the sequels in
past few decades, are viewed as the manifestation of
creative crisis in modern Hollywood and its inability to
deliver anything original in their products. However,
remaking films is hardly a contemporary phenomenon in
Hollywood; movies used to be remade in previous decades same
as in our times. And in some rare occasions remakes turned
out much better than original. The best example is, of
course, one of the best known films of all time - THE
MALTESE FALCON, film noir classic directed by John Huston in
1941.
The plot of the film is based on the "hard-boiled" detective
novel by Dashiell Hammett, which has been adapted for the
screen twice before - in 1931 and 1936. Protagonist is Sam
Spade (played by Humphrey Bogart), tough and street-wise
private investigator from San Francisco who shares a firm
with his partner Miles Archer (played by Jerome Cowan). One
day their services are hired by mysterious and good-looking
Miss Wonderly (played by Mary Astor). What was supposed to
be routine surveillance job goes terribly wrong for Archer
who gets killed, while Spade becomes a prime suspect. Almost
immediately after that Spade is approached by peculiar yet
sinister world traveller Joel Cairo (played by Peter Lorre)
who wants to hire his services in order to put his hand on a
certain object. Spade is convinced that those two events are
connected and his suspicions are gradually proving correct -
not only Cairo, but also few other interested parties are
involved in the case that revolves around ancient and
priceless artefact known as "Maltese Falcon". That includes
Miss Wonderly who is not what she claims to be, yet that
doesn't prevent Spade to fall in love with her.
THE MALTESE FALCON is often seen as the Hollywood's first
film noir. The genre of hard-boiled detective stories
existed before, namely in the domain of pulp literature, but
this film was first to bring it to the silver screen in its
recognisable form. Because of that, THE MALTESE FALCON has
great historical importance - it represents something of a
milestone in development of American genre cinema. It is
also the reason why many of the characters and situations
might look like cliches, but to view them this way would be
a great injustice to the film that actually inspired such
cliches. However, when we watch the film we are hardly aware
of such cliches - the plot and character type, despite being
utilised in numerous other films through the latter decades,
are still interesting and the movie provides lot of
entertainment. This accomplishment is even greater when we
consider that THE MALTESE FALCON was actually the first film
directed by John Huston, one of the greatest American
filmmakers of 20th Century. It could be argued that his
first film (in which his father Walter appears in small
cameo role) is actually the best film in his entire career,
making this the second such instance in 1941 - the very year
when Orson Welles made his CITIZEN KANE.
One of the reasons why THE MALTESE FALCON happens to be as
great now as it was more than a half a century ago could be
found in its timeless quality. The story, characters and
situations are universal and you could sense that they might
exist in each era, including our own. This is due to the
extremely clever and tight script by John Huston, who took
each scene and each piece of dialogue from the original
novel and packed it into the coherent whole as faithful to
the dark world of Hammett's fiction as possible in early
1940s Hollywood. And because of that the movie looks
incredibly modern - its content, with hidden and some not so
well hidden layers, might very well belong to our time. The
protagonist is anti-hero with the utter lack of conventional
moral code - he is cynical, adulterous, lacks any compassion
and sometimes manifests sadistic pleasure in using violence.
There is hardly anything that separates him from the
villains in this film, except for the fact that he is more
experienced and more intelligent and therefore uses
manipulation instead of the acts that would brand him as the
villain in the classical sense. Even his final act, when he
does the Right Thing, is motivated more by the common sense
than adherence to even the most basic ethical principles. In
the world of THE MALTESE FALCON almost everyone (with the
exception of Spade's loyal secretary Effie, played by Lee
Patrick) is bad - each and every character is motivated by
greed or instant self-gratification in the form of sex (like
the character of Iva Archer, played by Gladys George). Even
the forces of law and order, which are supposed to give some
kind of moral compass, are presented as inept or violent.
Because of that, THE MALTESE FALCON, with the cast of
exclusively immoral characters, might remind contemporary
audience of the Tarantinoesque films about criminal
enterprise going bad.
Huston's flawless direction was in many ways helped by truly
stellar cast. The most recognisable of all actors, Humphrey
Bogart, used this role of morally questionable protagonist
as an excellent opportunity to make his transition from the
roles of traditional villains, which he had played in 1930s,
to the roles of noble heroes he was going to play in 1940s.
Cynical and near-psychopathic Sam Spade is, therefore, one
of his most recognisable screen incarnations, although not
as a loveable as his next greatest role in CASABLANCA. His
partner Mary Astor is also great - she might not look
enchantingly beautiful compared to the other femme fatales
of film noir, but she nevertheless manages to ooze
wickedness on the screen in a manner which is, in a sense,
more sexy than physical looks itself. Of course, the rest of
the cast is even more interesting. Peter Lorre's role of
homosexual gangster is legendary, and it is no wonder that
he became one of the greatest characters of his time. Sidney
Greenstreet as seemingly cultivated yet equally ruthless
criminal (with the large belly as a character trait, which
Huston emphasised with clever camera angles) is also great,
and his accomplishment is even greater, considering that
this was his first major on-screen role. Finally, Elisha
Cook Jr. is equally impressive as young wannabe thug. The
good acting was essential for the success of this film,
because the complicated plot would be quite uninspiring
without interesting characters and the cast capable of
presenting them to the screen. Huston again shows his great
directing skills by managing to tie every loose end and keep
the appropriate pace in the same time, making this film
slightly more than an hour and half long.
THE MALTESE FALCON, with its great direction, truly stellar
cast and interesting story and characters is a film that
managed to transcend its time and it is still able to
entertain the audience six decades after its making. To
countless new generations of viewers this is film is more
than an important piece of film history. It is a true
masterpiece.
Review written on September 17th 2001
Dragan Antulov a.k.a. Drax
E-mail: dragan.antulov@st.tel.hr
http://www.film.purger.com - 
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian

Title
Review for Amarcord (1974)
According to Hollywood movies made in last few decades, life
in small town is one of the worst things that could happen
to a human being. Even worse fate awaits those who were
unfortunate to grow up in those dark, God-forsaken places
and later forced to live forever traumatised by the
experience. On the other hand, it seems that something more
than Atlantic Ocean divides Europe from America, because one
of the most popular and beloved European films takes exactly
the opposite view. This film is AMARCORD, 1974 comedy by
famous Italian director Federico Fellini, which later gave
inspiration to numerous imitations and homages, and even led
few American screen artists to adopt its heretical views
about benefits of small town life.
The film is based on the screenplay by Fellini and Tonino
Guerra and it lacks the plot in usual sense. Instead we
follow one year in 1930s Italian summer resort town of
Rimini through the series of short vignettes that depict
various local events and customs, as well as series of
local, often very colourful characters. Although many of
those characters occasionally take the role of narrator,
movie concentrates on its nominal protagonist, 14-year old
boy Titta (played by Bruno Zanin) and chronicles his sexual
frustrations, obsession with local beauty queen named
Gradisca (played by Magali Noel), problems in his lovingly
dysfunctional family, as well as troubles his father (played
by Armando Brancia) have with Mussolini's fascist regime.
AMARCORD was often noted as the ultimate nostalgia film, and
it probably explains why it is very popular, even among
those people who actually don't like Federico Fellini's work
very much. Every member of its potential audience would find
part of himself or herself in this film, because Fellini in
this film clearly illustrates natural human desire to paint
past in the best way possible. Distortion between actual
past and its subjective interpretation could be found even
in the title of the film - word "Amarcord" is nothing more
than badly pronounced phrase "I remember" in local Italian
dialect. In the same way the word is distorted, so is the
past in memories of those who remember it. After the
premiere, Fellini rejected any claims about autobiographical
character of this film, but it doesn't matter whether Rimini
of AMARCORD actually resembles Rimini of Fellini's childhood
or not; any place and any time could resemble characters and
situations of this film.
Fellini's views on nostalgia are clearly illustrated with a
way he mixes reality and fantasy in this film. Even the most
naturalistic scenes are laced with dark humour and grotesque
images. Characters look like caricatures, actors playing
them often deliberately overact, and women, especially those
who fuel Titta's sexual fantasies, often have certain body
parts with gargantuan proportions. Every now and then,
scenes that depict 1930s reality gradually slide into
fantasies of movie's characters and Rimini becomes almost
indistinguishable from the magical place in characters'
visions. Because of that, almost everything in this film
looks different, and in most cases better, than it would
have looked in the real life. Even the Fascism gets
Fellinian make-over - Fellini views Mussolini's totalitarian
regime as nothing more than visual spectacle (explaining why
similar regimes enjoyed such popular support throughout
history) and opportunity for comedy. When Fascists finally
show their true colours and begin torturing their opponents,
even this becomes opportunity for scenes of macabre humour.
Unlike many of his Italian colleagues in 1970s, who had used
1930s period setting to explicitly condemn Fascism and serve
fashionable political agenda, Fellini doesn't care that much
about politics. Lack of self-righteous moral perspective is
compensated with Fellini's humanistic approach to his
characters. Each of them, regardless of age, gender, social
class or physical appearance, is given opportunity to
express his or her views, dreams and fears. Fellini treats
all those characters with warmth and affection, even when he
paints them as grotesque caricatures of real people. Because
of this warmth and democratic spirit, AMARCORD could be
viewed as one of the most humane films of 20th Century, and
it keeps its general feel good atmosphere despite depicting
having many uncomfortable, melancholic and even tragic
moments.
Fellini couldn't produce such effects without using his own
directorial talent that gave a very personal touch to this
movie. Vignettes aren't memorable because of the characters
only; Fellini uses camera, painting film in bright colours,
especially in the scenes that depict character's fantasies.
Fellini also knows how to use locations, whether such
location happens to be luxurious hotel, bright-coloured
beach or rural countryside. Even the down-to-earth streets
of Rimini, where everyone knows everyone, gets magical
dimension during the snowfall. On the other hand, lack of
credible special effects somewhat diminished the same effect
during the ocean liner scene. This atmosphere is also
provided by incredible talent of composer and Fellini's
long-time associate Nino Rota. His Amarcord theme is
probably one of the most recognisable, most popular and most
relaxing and uplifting pieces of film music ever produced.
That music alone should be the reason to view AMARCORD as
one of the indisputable classics of seventh art.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Title
Review for Fatal Instinct (1993)
Deluge of so-called psychological and "erotic" thrillers
that started in 1987 with FATAL ATTRACTION and reached its
peak in 1992 with BASIC INSTINCT, simply had to inspire at
least one Hollywood parody. This task was given to Carl
Reiner, director who had done the similar job in his 1982
film-noir parody/homage DEAD MEN DON'T WEAR PLAID. Eleven
years later result of his efforts was comedy FATAL INSTINCT
(which incidentally shares the name with 1991 erotic
thriller starring Michael Madsen).
Protagonist of the film is Ned Ravine (played by Armand
Assante) who works as policeman at day and as defence
attorney at night, often defending the clients he had
arrested himself. He is happily married man, although his
cheating wife Lana (played by Kate Nelligan) plots to kill
him for insurance money. In the same time he must deal with
the romantic advances by seductive blonde Lola Cain (played
by Sean Young) and personal problems of his secretary Laura
Lincolnberry (played by Sherilyn Fenn) who escaped from
abusive husband. Another of his problems is Max Shady
(played by James Remar), ex-convict who wants to settle some
old scores with detective/lawyer.
Reiner definitely knows how to make a comedy, but his
scriptwriter David O'Malley missed the target. FATAL
INSTINCT indeed tried to parody best known late 1980s and
early 1990s thrillers, but those scenes are mixed with the
scenes in which the objects of parody come from classic film
noires of 1940s. This anachronistic combination doesn't look
very believable and only strengthen the impression that
O'Malley and Reiner ran out of ideas. Jokes are mostly lame
and not particularly funny, additionally limited with the
filmmaker's need to tame the humour to PG-13 levels. Actors
are more than fine, including Armand Assante in one of his
rare comedic appearances, and Sean Young again exploits her
psychotic bitch routine. Unfortunately, like many genre
parodies of 1990s Hollywood, FATAL INSTINCT too is rather
forgettable film, totally meaningless to those who were
spared from the objects of its parody.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com
